For once in my life I'm doing a good deed... And it is useless.
I miss you.
You're so impatient with me.
Oh, there's a butterfly!
I may be antisocial, but it doesn't mean I don't talk to people.
I am not an artist. I never had the knack for it.
You're just running away from life's problems.
My computer has got to be useful for something.
If I wanted to scare you, I would tell you what I dreamt about a few weeks ago.
I will play Sudoku then instead of continuing to bother you.
I am curious.
Why don't you come visit us?
Seriously though, episode 21 made me almost cry while laughing.
How do you find food in outer space?
You're not fast enough.
It's useless to keep on thinking any more.
I just wanted to check my email.
There's no doubt: the universe is infinite.
The world is a den of crazies.
Thanks to you I've lost my appetite.
This is too expensive!
There are no real visions.
The sign '&' stands for 'and'.
Do they sell notebooks at that store?
He's sleeping like a baby.
I meant no offense.
You must take his age into account.
Would you please reserve a room near the Toronto international Airport?
He likes sports as well as study.
You should take care of your sick mother.
The experiment ended in failure.
There are few apples in the basket.
If not for my advice, you would have failed.
He decided to put off his departure.
Are you busy on Sunday afternoon?
Don't forget to turn off the gas before leaving the house.
She is envious of my success.
The baby ceased crying.
No one was late.
The candle went out by itself.
Do you eat rice in your country?
Heaven and hell exist only in the human heart.
Then he looked at her intently, and suddenly gave her a hug and kissed her on the lips.
Snow covered the bus.
She suddenly angry.
I turned off the radio.
I am bored.
We can't keep a sheep at home. What should we do with it?
I'll hang the sheets myself, the neighbor said. "It's not like they're that heavy."
Have a good meal!
What children! You send them to get candy and they return with a dog!
History is the teacher of life.
Man plans things, but the gods decide.
There is a lot of danger in walking around here at night.
The meeting was put off until next Friday.
He is taken care of by his uncle.
She was raised by her grandmother.
I think he is angry.
I miss you badly.
I learned about the new book by the advertisement in the magazine.
Discussing the matter further will get you nowhere.
He said that he gets up at 6 o'clock every day.
His stupid answer surprised everybody.
Don't exceed the speed limit.
I wish to go to Paris to study art.
He put aside the book.
I want to go to Africa someday.
The shoppers stood in a line.
Be at the train station at eleven sharp.
Be careful on your way back home.
Mike ran very fast yesterday.
The population is increasing.
This coffee is not hot enough.
This coffee is not hot enough.
He explained how to play the guitar to me.
The well is dry.
He lives in a little cozy house.
He is too young to go there alone.
Her watch is ten minutes slow.
She was surprised at the news.
It's time to separate.
This problem certainly requires a solution, but that's like shooting a cannon at sparrows
It flew out of my head.
I dove into the river.
It is impossible that she should have killed herself.
It's rude to make fun of your boss in public.
You had better turn off the light before you go to sleep.
Mt. Fuji is a beautiful sight at sunset.
Mr Ito is a highly educated man.
He stayed in his hotel most of the next day, talking to friends and supporters.
The TV remote control is under the couch.
I buried my dog at the pet cemetery.
The universe is full of mysteries.
Her dream is visiting Paris.
He would often come to see us when I was a child.
Were I to die, who would look after my children?
At first, he sounded very sincere.
Practice is as important as theory, but we are apt to value the latter and despise the former.
My father and my brother work in this factory.
London is among the largest cities in the world.
Sometimes I walk to work, and sometimes I ride my bike, because I live very close to work.
I got stuck in traffic.
When you go, I'll miss you very much.
She cried bitterly.
Those shoes go well with this white skirt.
She didn't feel like eating lunch.
She read one poem to him.
There's a beautiful bridge over the pond.
If I were in her place, I wouldn't give up yet.
In the name of the moon, we'll punish you!
The lawyer was expecting Ben.
The smell of roses filled the room.
Don't sugar your tea.
Does objective history exist?
He said that he was sick, and this was a lie.
We tried to persuade him.
That makes no sense.
I am curious.
He's a hopeless case.
I'm deaf and mute while I'm eating.
Adherents of various religions live in Belarus.
Uninstall method: Chuck the whole folder into the recycle bin.
A spectre haunts Europe: the spectre of communism.
Please don't interrupt me.
Do you think you could give me a paper bag?
You shouldn't judge by appearance.
Take this medicine in case you get sick.
I informed her of my arrival.
He advised me on my study.
Now I must say good-bye, he said suddenly.
Say goodbye to your friends.
Today, we had two false alarms.
Every morning, I eat honey for breakfast.
Don't get angry.
A man without ideals is hollow.
He tried not to hurt others' feelings.
Hurry up a little!
I spread the big map on the table.
I was very surprised at the news.
Masako usually walks to school.
First we'll eat, and then we'll go.
Hurry up or you'll miss the train.
Rome was not built in a day.
I never see that play without crying.
It’s an anime about a normal Japanese schoolboy who married his alien teacher. Things like this happen in Japan.
She talked her husband into having a holiday in France.
She is very pretty.
He is very handsome.
He's curious about everything.
He is an authority on China.
The wind gently kissed the trees.
Mr Smith is a candidate for mayor.
What shall I put on: trousers or a skirt?
Guests always bring delight; if it is not when coming, then it is when leaving.
That's a real person.
How was the universe formed?
I miss you.
You’ll use the computer for studying, and not for playing games.
She was talking all the time.
I dropped by the bookstore and I bought an interesting book.
Please say hello to Mrs. Andreescu!
It is no use quarreling with fate.
Let’s go now. Otherwise, we’ll be late.
You're just running away from life's problems.
The Red Cross supplied the hospital with blood.
I have a large collection of stamps.
She was carrying a basket full of flowers.
Our company is planning to build a new chemical plant in Russia.
Diane is your half-sister too, George.
How far is it to the airport?
Which way is the beach?
If I read this book once more, I shall have read it three times.
He's still gotta overcome major difficulties.
He's really cute, and so I like working with him.
She's very wise.
His aim is to become a lawyer.
He continued his work after a short break.
The waiter brought a new plate.
The policeman was checking the cars one-by-one.
The children were sliding on the ice.
China is rich in natural resources.
You'd be able to do the puzzle if only you had a little bit more patience.
I usually go on foot.
My life would be meaningless without you.
I'm sharing my flat with my brother.
You should have eaten more fruit.
He was ready to help her with dish-washing.
He doesn't see his family in his busy life.
I often think about my deceased mother.
The colleague whose husband is French has left for Paris.
The night was so chilly that when I returned I was almost frozen.
The capital market is not what it was a few years ago.
I've always thought that a heart attack was nature's way of telling you that it was time to die.
What a beautiful sunset!
I'm walking to school.
She graduated from Kobe University.
It will take five to ten years for the technology to be ready.
These are my shoes and those are yours.
It is next to impossible to carry it out.
I have a friend whose wife is a pianist.
What's the date today?
Dr. White acted as our interpreter.
You probably think she told me she was on her way to visit her sick grandmother.
It was a mistake for such a young parent to have, and raise a child.
The rumor turned out false.
The chance is gone.
He finally bent to my wishes.
That's not the truth.
Life is too short to learn German.
He left the office without saying a word to anyone.
She may have been surprised when she heard the news.
I can't bear the sight of him.
It’s a quarter past eight.
What time does your class end?
He became a famous singer.
An expensive car is a status symbol.
Don't interrupt me!
Speech is silver, silence is golden.
Maybe this world is another planet's Hell.
Only in philosophy can you use a circular argument and get praised for it.
He who has love, is in God, and God is in him, for God is love.
There are four seasons in a year - spring, summer, fall, and winter.
The first blow is half the battle.
He hurried so as to catch the bus.
She was faithful to her promise.
I'm at the airport now.
I opened the envelope and pulled out a letter.
John broke the window.
This technology is an incredible thing!
She was waiting at the quay as the ship came in.
There were a lot of empty seats the day I went.
He is not guilty of murder.
The man was surprised at the news.
Please develop this film.
They worked in perfect harmony with each other.
I had no time to eat.
I've got a pass for the swimming pool.
He often breaks his word, but I like him all the same.
She did not let failure discourage her.
I am free all afternoon on February 27.
The young man must have felt very desperate when he resorted to such a terrible act.
Never was she so frightened.
Her dress and shoes were a good match.
The whole idea is abhorrent to me.
Is there any possibility of his resigning?
Mom did not mention it.
No words availed to persuade him.
He did his best.
I wish I could buy that guitar.
I am proud of being a good son.
He cares little for my advice.
This custom dates from the Edo period.
My housework is to wash the dishes.
Turn off the TV.
He bent down and picked up the ball.
A man drew near.
In general, communication between doctors and their patients is the most important part of medical treatment.
The village is connected with our town by a bridge.
Being sick, I had to stay home.
She is a nurse.
She will do her best to be here on time.
The plan is well worth trying.
3. If you do phone then hang up immediately, without following any instructions given.
Wind accompanied the rain.
You'd better be careful about going to her house.
We must keep a diary every day.
Social customs vary greatly from country to country.
I pulled her by the sleeve, but she went on talking unconcernedly.
Kate was surprised by Brian's story.
He seems to deal in clothes.
He told me about the accident as if he had seen it with his own eyes.
She is shy of strangers.
He should resign from his post, since it's too much responsibility for him.
His victory at this age in an international competition is a good indication of a bright future.
A good idea occurred to me just then.
I don't like people who always insist on talking about politics.
He is apt to give vent to his feelings.
It doesn't matter whether he comes or not.
Betty is a dancing teacher.
That incident drew his interest.
Will you give me your radio for my bicycle?
You'll have to study harder from now on.
She told me about the evils of stealing.
People whose homes are in the town want to live in the country.
I am proud to call him my teacher.
Feeling the house shake, I ran out into the street.
He is busy with the final draft.
The mayor provided me with an identity card.
They seem to be in love with each other.
If I were to tell him the truth, he would be angry.
I persuaded him to take part in it.
He is second to none in mathematics in his class.
They accorded him many honors.
Rainy season begins in June.
He collided with a tree.
The thermometer went down below zero.
I am uncomfortable in these new shoes.
The man sitting over there is a famous singer.
He was persuaded to be more sensible.
My stereo set is inferior to yours in sound quality.
We will get to Tokyo Station at noon.
The dog came running to her.
I think she made up that story.
Vienna is a beautiful city.
This artist creates beautiful paintings.
What a beautiful sunset!
Don't forget to turn off the gas before leaving the house.
Welcome!
Welcome.
I advise you to go abroad while young.
He died of a heart attack.
It is one thing to make a plan and quite another to carry it out.
She smiled and said goodbye.
We tend to think that our time is our own only on Sundays and holidays.
Sure enough, the ghost appeared on the balcony.
I cannot help laughing at her joke.
After a lot of problems she managed to learn to drive a car.
The government has imposed a new tax on wine.
I entered the bookstore on the way.
We tied him up so that he wouldn't be able to escape.
I play the guitar after school.
It shows that English is no longer the language only of the people of England.
You can see how much difference a few degrees can make.
There are pros and cons to anything.
She had good reason to file for a divorce.
Go and help wash the dishes.
He hurried to the station.
To obey the law is everyone's duty.
She just said good-bye and hung up the phone.
The boy gave a great shout.
Furthermore, experiments were never carried out against the rules but were performed always well within them - otherwise they would not be recognized as experiments at all.
Don't interfere in private concerns.
The dew falls in early morning.
The room was light enough for him to read the letter.
I don't wanna clean up dog shit.
You'll get there on time if you make the train.
He often paints landscapes.
The government will have to deal with the financial problem.
Tonight will be fine. Let's make it for 6:00.
My refrigerator is out of order.
Excuse me, Ann broke in.
Will you tell me the way to the station?
He is handsome, and what is more very rich.
My uncle took me for a ride in the countryside.
Can you arrange these flowers for me?
May I take a few days off to visit my family?
This law does not apply in Japan.
He told me about the accident.
That's the cause of his failure.
All of a sudden, my mother began to sing.
We saw a castle in the distance.
He lived in Kyoto in his college days.
Something's wrong with my e-mail.
I forgot to turn off the gas!
Fred is always telling lies.
There are many places to visit in Kyoto.
I am surprised that you should not know of their marriage.
Abide by the inevitable.
The plane had already taken off when I reached the airport.
Our new English teacher is fresh from college.
Please fill in the application form and send it back by November 2nd.
The board is strong enough to bear the weight.
Japan is poor in natural resources.
The excitement reached its peak.
They parted, never to see each other again.
Whose textbook is this?
He made advances to her.
He is studying to be a minister.
He asked the policeman how many people had been killed in traffic accidents the previous day.
He invented a false rumor.
Is physical education a required course?
He is the last man that is suited for the job.
His handwriting is bad.
He missed the train by a minute.
Desperate men often do desperate things.
He died a soldier's death in the battle in the cause of democracy.
At the turn of the century, children still worked in factories.
Minnesota's state bird is the mosquito.
You mustn't answer your mother back when she scolds you.
Rick and Carol broke up two months ago, but he's still carrying a torch for her.
Beethoven was a great composer.
We see each other at the supermarket now and then.
I wish I could buy a motorcycle.
A monster lay on a rock near the top of the mountain.
He missed the train by one minute.
The motorbike struck the telephone pole.
She bowed to me politely.
A miserable sequence of defeats discouraged us.
She complains of headaches, and that very often.
I haven't finished reading the book yet.
He laid out this garden.
This is all the air that is available to us.
He won't be easily discouraged, because he's a tough guy.
Japan has a lot of trade with Canada.
The problem is we don't have enough money.
He has done the work completely.
Your plan is sure to succeed.
He trussed up the thief.
The baby is playing with some toys.
I sat apart from them.
He stood still with his eyes closed.
Old practices died hard in the country.
Losing my daughter has taken away my will to live.
The politician did not bother to apologize for betraying our trust.
She shuddered at the thought of the accident.
In case of a fire, use this emergency stairway.
To make matters worse, it began to rain.
He is inferior to me in learning.
We are supposed to take off our shoes at the entrance.
But that's only natural because you don't know their ways yet.
It is good for nothing.
It is good for nothing.
It is good for nothing.
I had lived in Sendai for ten years before I visited Matsushima.
People are more educated now than they used to be.
According to one legend, it gets its name from a priest.
I'm afraid that he might be late for the train.
I can't think of his name just now.
The plan has many practical difficulties.
Forks and chopsticks became popular because they could easily handle hot food.
My hobby is collecting old coins.
He didn't run fast enough to catch the train.
I like this house, because it is very comfortable.
When did you finish writing the letter?
We'll resume the meeting after tea.
I found the book boring.
I chanced to see him in town.
She has a lively interest in everything around us.
I wish they would turn off the radio.
She held her hands tightly over her ears.
They have finished their work.
He published the book about the history of coins.
He brought us sad news.
Tom has an eye for modern art.
The old man looked wise.
He went skiing in Hokkaido.
Put your name on the notebook in case you forget it.
She has large interests in the car industry.
They invited us around for a meal.
He pounded the table in a fit of anger.
Let's start with Lesson Ten.
Stuff today and starve tomorrow.
A man with a full belly thinks no one is hungry.
One hand washes the other.
She is proud of her father being rich.
The spectators at the baseball match cheered their team on.
What's the latest news?
She has three sisters: one is a nurse and the others are teachers.
I met with an awful accident.
My father failed in business.
Please keep the fire from going out.
An announcement of his death appeared in the newspapers.
When I see that play, I always cry.
The police were inquiring into the suspect's past.
It will do you good to live in the country.
He knew full well that he didn't have long to live.
The coach made him a good pitcher.
A tiger is larger and stronger than a cat.
He is, so to speak, a star player.
He whistled for his dog.
He glanced at her and saw she was angry.
Where does the airport bus leave from?
Two trucks bumped together.
Ben ran a 100-meter race with Carl.
She turned away in anger.
That party is always pandering to the middle class.
I chose these over the shoes.
I am an eager student of magic.
It was unbelievably quiet there; perhaps that's why he liked the place so much.
I haven't heard from him for a long time.
Those cities have uniform traffic laws.
The dog suddenly charged at the child.
My father runs a restaurant.
My boss didn't excuse me for coming late to the meeting.
Ten minutes' walk brought me to the station.
I have kept a diary for three years.
The thin man paused in the shade with his knees a little bent.
The kite got caught in the tree.
He looked around.
An elephant is a very large animal.
Most Japanese take a bath every day.
Won't you come and see me next week?
She applied her handkerchief to his wound.
The way he looked at me irritated me very much.
I'm sorry to give you all this trouble.
She wants to move out and find a place of her own.
Her eyes shone as they reflected the light of the room.
All in all, I thought it was a good book.
Ken lit the candles.
Although he is over 70, he is still active.
There's a hole in this sock.
I like the silhouette these clothes give me.
Rank boys according to their height.
I checked every part according to the instruction book, but it did not run.
It follows from what she says that he is guilty.
She is looking forward to her birthday party.
Our city has one third as many people as Tokyo.
It is only recently that people have begun to realize the importance of nature conservation.
I always walk.
That suit has an expensive look.
They can overcome their fear.
She totally drives me nuts.
Parents have responsibilities to look to their children's health.
We go downtown to do shopping.
He is a very sincere person.
One drop of this poison is enough to kill 160 people.
I feel happy because I am quit of that trouble.
He held her by the sleeve.
His opinion comes into conflict with mine.
They were called out three times last night.
She gained a position of responsibility in the firm.
I'll miss you terribly if you leave Japan.
Her father became an invalid as a result of a heart attack.
I wished her a good night.
You must not take either a shower or a bath.
I think it dangerous for children to swim in this lake.
I'm 17, too.
He returned from the office.
Whose bike is it?
He said he wanted to put an end to such a trifle.
She described him as handsome.
Estella and I are going for a walk.
His failure has nothing to do with me.
Please inform me what options are available to me.
She's driving me crazy.
Children should obey their parents.
The small boat was at the mercy of the wind.
He is fond of vegetables, and cabbages in particular.
She loves the doll like her own sister.
He seems to have missed the point.
Nancy did some shopping on the way.
We import grain from the United States.
I bumped into Miru at the school gates, just as she was arriving from the girls' dormitory.
He earns at least $1,000 dollars a week.
My father doesn't eat fruit that much.
They know how to make an atomic bomb.
First we'll hit Kyoto.
He addressed himself to the mayor.
Don't let the chance slip!
In most cases we had to give in to their demands.
We must always be prepared for the worst.
Pay attention!
Pay attention!
How do you make your money?
These legends should be handed down to our offspring.
The teacher aroused our interest.
The office was full of activity all day.
He carried the box upstairs.
This hotel has accommodations for 1000 guests.
I don't have much desire for wealth.
She lived in five different countries by age 25.
I tried to avoid conflict.
He is not so diligent as he used to be.
He fell among bad companions.
The death of his father filled him with sorrow.
The time will come when she'll regret it.
She screamed and fainted.
The children were delighted to see their grandparents whom they had not seen for quite a long time.
When she said "I missed you" she began to cry.
Someone has taken my shoes by mistake.
Lightning normally accompanies thunder.
He wants to dispose of his land.
The mail train lost most of its mail in the fire.
We decorated the room ourselves.
This room is comfortable.
That's free.
To be continued.
It is not good to talk with your mouth full.
Habit is second nature.
We're not afraid of any difficulties.
Bread and games.
I understood from his accent that he was an American.
People in towns are attracted by life in the country.
He stands out among the painters of his time.
Nobody can escape death.
You must always keep your hands clean.
The field where we used to play ball is now all built up.
He was cheered by the good news.
I got sick, and so couldn't come to school.
Father keeps a diary every day.
The mayor's family was harassed with threatening phone calls all day.
I've visited Nara.
I am tired from a long walk.
The plane crash took 200 lives.
Did you have a good meal at that restaurant?
His mother didn't allow him to ride a motorbike.
The men are getting into shape riding bicycles.
When Sony came back with a 2 billion bid, CBS could not refuse.
I go by the nickname "Itch."
I'm running from the girl.
While I was waiting for the bus, I saw a traffic accident.
There was a tense atmosphere in the room.
He departed from the old custom.
The train is due at noon.
I left the firm, because I wanted to be on my own.
The story wandered.
I'm not lying. I swear to God!
I think this one has to die for the other to live. It's a cruel world.
I gathered from this letter that he was angry.
He knocked his brother about.
Feel free to ask any questions.
We can not agree with you on this point.
She whispered something into his ear.
Please wish me luck.
They took away all of our paperwork.
Avian medicine - diagnosis and treatment of illnesses.
I could read between the lines that he wanted me to resign.
Where did you buy the shoes?
We moved here separately three years ago.
I don't know why he was late.
When you have written your name, write the date.
I persuaded Yoko to give up smoking.
They discarded unnecessary things.
She isn't a good cook.
Richard is fair, even to people he does not like.
They lost the battle.
Life is very dear to me.
I came upon an old friend of mine on the train.
Why do you blame me for what happened?
We intend to look into that matter.
His play ended in large success.
A lot of clients come to the lawyer for advice.
Handmade goods are very expensive nowadays.
His songs were very popular with young people.
Every day has a sequel.
He is devoid of human feeling.
Many countries are having difficulties in the economic sphere.
I had a hunch something pleasant was going to happen.
She clutched her baby in her arms.
She yelled in a rage.
There is insufficient light for reading.
Most of the passengers on board were Japanese.
But for your help, I would have failed.
They announced the date of their wedding in the newspaper.
I think I'll take a bath tonight.
She seems to have seen the very accident.
Don't argue when you are angry and don't eat when you are full.
Tall buildings may sway in a strong wind.
He substituted for the injured player.
The fifth volume of this set is missing.
The time will come when you will know the truth.
I saw a stranger steal into his house.
A full description of him has been circulated in every newspaper.
It's a snap once you get the hang of it.
He has quite a few valuable paintings.
The water is nice and cool.
I went on foot only one way.
He has no religious mind.
I am not cut out to be a politician.
They carried out a new chemistry experiment.
He has access to the American Embassy.
Both you and I must take care of the dog.
I leaned forward, eager to catch every word he spoke.
I must pay a visit to the doctor tomorrow.
The two incidents are connected with each other.
She said that she brushes her teeth every morning.
The greatest happiness lies in freedom.
He made for the light he saw in the distance.
I have plenty of time, but not enough money.
Reading affords me great pleasure.
The vigorous man is engaged in diverse activities.
She has very neat handwriting.
She married Tom last month.
Nothing can excuse him for such rude behavior.
She filled her bag with apples.
Even a worm will turn.
You should see the sight.
Nowadays we are apt to forget the benefits of nature.
Nara is as old as Kyoto.
The man answered to the description.
I don't want a Ferrari bad enough to sell my house to get one.
They are jealous of our success.
My sister presses my trousers.
Excuse me for one moment.
Tom was mindful of my warning.
Mary has finished her Japanese assignment.
Don't quarrel with your bread and butter.
They were told to play in the nearby park.
Though I am tired, I will work hard.
She had no rule of thumb about it, but she got it right every time.
Doctors should keep abreast with all the latest developments in medicine.
I'm sorry. I'm partly responsible for it.
He makes it a rule to go over the financial section every time he reads the paper.
The stars twinkled.
Can computers actually translate literary works?
The color of her dress and that of her shoes go well together.
Only 3 out of the 98 passengers survived.
Nearly all Japanese have dark hair.
Mr Smith made him some toys.
I caught a beautiful butterfly.
You can't enter the building without a permit.
He has just been appointed the U.S. Ambassador to Japan.
Fill the blanks with suitable words.
It's about time you were independent of your parents.
As the days passed, our campaign grew in momentum.
Miss Sato is in charge of my class.
It is hard to convince Jack.
I talked her into marrying him.
The women bowed to each other so many times.
There's a large risk involved.
We retire at eleven o'clock.
Stop shooting the breeze and get to work!
We don't negotiate with terrorists.
What kind of movie is it? Is it popular?
The patient breathed his last.
Playing the guitar is fun.
He was welcomed wherever he went.
Our international sales continue to grow, bringing the name of Toyo Computer into businesses world-wide.
Our team lost the first game.
The aeroplane to Dunedin left the aerodrome promptly at eight in the morning.
A loud noise in the night scared him.
We ran into each other at the airport.
Jeez, what're you up to?
We heard the bomb go off.
Oh, no! We're running out of gas.
Our ancestors came to this country 150 years ago.
This was an additional fund for buying books.
He will never visit the town again.
They say he is guilty, but I believe the contrary.
It's a piece of cake.
You should always wash your hands before meals.
I ran into my old teacher at the station.
Take care.
He is proud that his wife is a good cook.
The clouds are getting darker.
He is an ardent music lover.
He has spent most of his working life as a diplomat.
I left my new pair of gloves in the library.
The population of Sweden is on the increase.
Mothers are often not appreciated.
They were flushed with success.
A person's soul is immortal.
Don't keep company with him.
I hurried out so as to be in time for class.
All orders must be accompanied with cash.
The coach gave me some advice.
I visited many parts of England.
Traffic is heavy around here.
He is not such a man as to flinch from danger.
It's already 11 o'clock.
The time will come when you will regret this.
I have a daughter who's married to a Frenchman.
My mother went shopping, didn't she?
It seemed that her family had moved to Hokkaido.
The argument weighed with him.
I recommend it strongly.
He jumped into the water clothes and all.
The new year will come in an hour.
My cat killed this mouse.
The Holy Roman Empire came to an end in the year 1806.
Crying is an expression of grief.
I was angry because he was late.
She is unbelievably naïve.
He ran like a scared rabbit.
We have to respect local customs.
The judge made no bones about his disgust with the accused's actions and handed down the severest sentence possible.
I walk every day.
Let's pray to God, and He will answer our prayers.
The government's new economic plan leaves much to be desired.
They replaced coal with oil.
I held him by the collar.
Unless you hurry, you will be late for school.
Tom's friends called him Mr Money Bags.
He's anxious about his examination result.
He was meditating on his future life.
They are going shopping.
They collect our garbage every Monday.
The dog attacked the little boy.
He has been sitting there for two hours.
Run fast, or you will be late for school.
I have so much work to do that I have to put off my trip.
Just the other day, with no time to send for help, many people lost their lives.
It's very rude of you to say a thing like that.
After the battle they delivered the town to the enemy.
Let's give up our plan to climb it.
A strong wind is blowing and I can't walk fast.
She is not such a girl as you imagine.
She is beautiful, and what is more, very graceful.
His failure taught me a good lesson.
For him to finish it in a day would be impossible.
Our teacher said that water boils at 100ºC.
Which is stronger, a tiger or a lion?
The reason he was absent was that he had a severe headache.
It being awfully cold, the party were almost frozen to death.
I could not subdue the desire to laugh.
Her blue shoes go well with that dress.
If you are free, come around to see me.
The Japanese take off their shoes when they enter a house.
Her heart was full of joy.
He burst into the room.
The road is dusty. It cannot have rained yesterday.
Fame is not always an accompaniment of success.
By what authority do you order me to do this?
Suddenly, all the lights went out.
I felt something touch my foot.
He is only too pleased to be advised by a woman.
Best of luck in your tournament.
There's a hole in my coat.
They are going to launch an artificial satellite tomorrow.
The news of her death came as a bolt from the blue.
There was a large audience at the concert.
It is fact that he wants to visit Egypt.
What he did next was quite a surprise to me.
India was governed by Great Britain for many years.
I had nothing to do with the accident.
The Tokaido line terminates at Tokyo.
The former is inferior to the latter in some respect.
Where's the airport?
I have put on two kilograms this summer.
He says he's related to that rich family.
Tom got angry at the children.
Man is none the happier for his wealth.
Because a man whose manners are as bad as yours must try everyone's patience.
We should take the necessary steps before it's too late.
Bad habits die hard.
They chased the man to arrest him.
You told her that you had finished the work three days ago.
His novels are, for the most part, very boring.
Do you make friends with these boys?
Have you eaten the cake yet?
It has just struck eight, hasn't it?
After so many visits, we want to rest a little.
He arrived safely.
You had plenty of time.
She fainted in the store and found herself in the first aid room when she came to.
Who has torn the envelope open?
I've become impotent.
It rained for three days in a row.
Glasswork came from Persia by way of the Silk Road.
The ones who shout at me don't bother me.
I rest on your promise.
For all his wealth, he is unhappy.
Moving money and technology from one side of the globe to the other is not enough.
When the bomb exploded, I happened to be there.
I canceled my hotel reservations and stayed with friends.
His failure is out of the question.
Since there are no buses on this road, we will have to walk.
Only members of the company are entitled to use the facilities.
He retorted that it was all my fault.
He's dry and unemotional.
You have no good reason for thinking as you do.
Don't leave the bicycle in the rain.
I am very surprised that she became a Diet member.
During O-bon, Japanese people believe they receive a visit from an ancestor.
I want brown shoes, not black ones.
My thoughts are in agreement with them.
He made the final decision on all such matters.
The women were so surprised as not to be able to speak.
Could you gift wrap it?
I'm so grateful to you for this opportunity.
Lay up for a rainy day.
She devoted her life to the study of science.
Bite the bullet.
I looked on him as the boss.
He searched for the key.
It is only a short walk from the station.
She earns a living as a writer.
The raft has drifted far off from the shore.
He deceives others with his appearance.
Sports always come naturally to him.
That plane will take off at five.
At last he realized that he was mistaken.
Sports activities require a slender figure.
They will give way to you if your opinion is reasonable.
You should carry out your first plan.
I felt the house shaking terribly.
He reflected on what answer to make.
We live on rice.
He was elected chairman.
Heavy taxes are laid on wine.
Please remove the mud from your shoes.
Women use talking to maintain personal relationships.
I need to go to the China Construction Bank.
He devoted all his time to the study of history.
As soon as their meeting was over, they set to work.
When my uncle left for America, many people came to see him off at the airport.
Teachers shouldn't fall back on their authority.
Bernard Kouchner, who established Medecins Sans Frontieres, did not oppose the Iraq war.
Tomorrow, I'll take the books to the library.
To execute a plan was simple.
My dear little cat has been missing for a week.
I'm dizzy.
He canceled the appointment at the last moment.
I have done all of my homework and I'd like to take a short break.
I was late to school.
It's been about two days since I put the body in the refrigerator.
They couldn't cope with difficulties.
He had really come to get gold.
I sat for the exam, only to fail.
He should get to the office in an hour.
I tried to fulfill my duty.
His last play was a big hit.
I don't care for sports.
Some people derive pleasure from watching horror movies.
No one but Tom handed in the report.
He was pleased with the toy.
You will be missed by your friends.
It can be dangerous for young people to ride motorcycles.
They say that the cabinet will fall.
Don't miss the bus.
The worm turns.
Please take your shoes off.
I begged her not to go.
He took charge of the firm after his father's death.
He sent fruits and vegetables to his daughter.
She felt no shame at having said what she did.
He has spent most of his time as a career diplomat.
I'm going to miss you.
He broke six windows one after another.
It was yesterday that Jake broke this window.
He got the money from her by a trick.
The teacher has a great influence on his pupils.
Lucy cannot use chopsticks.
I learned to play the guitar when I was ten.
I have to finish the work by four o'clock.
I put off the conclusion.
Philosophy is often regarded as difficult.
Hurry along or you'll be late.
You have to buy one at the office.
He pressed his face against the shop window.
I was taking a bath when he came.
Enjoy life while you may.
I'm proud to be a part of this project.
He took no notice of our warning.
This national park is full of beautiful scenery.
All the orchestra were pleased with their success.
I went for a walk.
He lives in a world of fantasy.
He came bearing a large bunch of flowers.
I got sick.
Life is short and time is swift.
He can ski as skillfully as his father.
Can you ship it to New York City?
Paint the trees against the background of the blue sky.
Unfortunately, I didn't get the chance to see the castle.
There was no irritation on his part.
I thanked him for what he had done.
No one survived the plane crash.
A fat white cat sat on a wall and watched them with sleepy eyes.
He told his wife not to buy on impulse.
A man's body dies, but his soul is immortal.
What kind of songs are popular these days?
Capital, land and labor are the three key factors of production.
I think, therefore I am.
Wait a minute! Hang on!
There are only books on the bookshelf.
The country is rich in natural resources.
Linux is a free operating system; you should try it.
He has committed suicide.
You must remove your shoes before entering a house.
He doesn't have a job. He's retired.
I talked my boyfriend into buying me a ring.
They're going to knock down that monument.
You are guilty of murder.
A stranger asked the girl whether her father was at home or at his office.
This is a picture painted by him.
Thank you very much for your invitation.
Write the date of your birth.
Is that your bicycle?
You're already useless.
I'll visit you tomorrow.
I visited Rome for the first time in my life.
My father is always getting angry.
Why should I apologize to you?
Water reflects light.
The road is icy, so take care.
My brother plays guitar.
Lucy came to see me three days ago.
Which is easier, skiing or skating?
Having finished lunch, we went skating.
I'm dying of thirst.
Possibly he knows who broke the windows.
I paid for the purchase in cash.
I read your new book with real delight.
Go two blocks and turn left.
I need your clothes and bike.
This is a gorgeous town.
Bill often fails to keep his word.
This girl is not ashamed of anything.
You're disgusting!
I did well at the interview!
It is easy to add 5 to 10.
Turn off the gas.
These letters can be typed by any secretary.
But few of them are worth reading.
The ship was flying the American flag.
They could not cope with those difficulties.
The train is ten minutes late today.
How are you keeping off this intense heat?
One must take off one's shoes before entering houses.
Ivan Mazepa wasn't a traitor.
You have to abide by the laws.
Life cannot exist without water.
He has reached the end of his patience.
He wishes the accident hadn't happened.
He's very good at playing guitar.
There is a crack in the glass.
I'm sorry to disturb you, but there's a phone call for you.
Absence of rain caused the plants to die.
You must be careful when you write answers in a test.
Do you know when they will arrive? "At eleven-thirty this evening."
The company is managed by my older brother.
Ken shared the room with his older brother.
Nara is a very old city.
The world's population tends to increase.
He used to go to school by bicycle, but now he goes by bus.
She told me how it was wrong to steal.
They still haven't found a buyer for that house.
That noise is driving me mad.
I have a good appetite today.
I have to go shopping.
She kissed me on the cheek and said goodnight.
We'll take lunch at noon.
He painted a picture of a dog.
I don't feel well today. The well water is the cause of many illnesses.
There is much water in the pond today.
Today he was late for his class. But he is, on the whole, a satisfactory student.
The driver increased his speed.
As I am off duty today, let's go to the beach.
I'm very sleepy today, too.
He finally succeeded in getting a job.
She fooled me into giving her the money.
Why are you late?
The new minister took over the job on Monday.
Patience is the mother of science.
When I hear this song, I think of you, and miss you.
It's already eleven. It's high time you were in bed.
You must be careful in choosing your friends.
Can you play guitar?
The boy playing the guitar is Ken.
Who is playing the guitar?
Sugar melts in hot water.
He looked at her over his glasses.
She became an object of universal admiration.
Like me, he's also not tall.
The price of rice has come down.
Keep the dog out.
That's unbelievable.
How boring!
I can play the guitar.
All her efforts culminated in failure.
The automobile industry is one of the main industries in Japan.
I couldn't get in touch with him.
Do not talk with your mouth full.
This tablecloth measures 5 feet by 3 feet.
We don't have enough time.
When can I visit you?
Do you miss me?
A bus transported us from the airport to the city.
The top of this tree is level with the fence.
It must be dangerous to swim in this rapid stream.
Bill has a lot of original ideas.
Give me a key, and I will unlock the universe.
The laboratory has the most up-to-date equipment.
I am responsible for this failure.
At what time will the taxi go to the airport?
Even his servants despised him.
I miss you very much.
He has a blue bicycle.
It's fucking hot.
I took part in the sporting event.
He would like to take part in the contest.
Jim's uncle is due to retire next year.
Could you find me an attorney?
Can I go to work?
The news leaked out.
I envy you your success.
She was so scared that she couldn't speak.
She was so scared that she couldn't speak.
Would you kindly switch off the radio?
The news that she got divorced was a big surprise.
The old custom is still kept up in that district.
The escape was nothing less than a miracle.
He was in charge of preparing a magazine for publication.
We don't care what he does.
It took him only a few minutes to realize his mistakes.
She won't take an airplane for fear of a crash.
The spread of computers.
He has been the chief of his tribe for 35 years.
The victim is thought to have taken a large quantity of poison by mistake.
Don't be late to school.
I'm a cook.
I won't lose!
You had better see the doctor.
He is wise enough not to do such a thing.
On hearing the news, he rushed out of the house.
Kate is crazy about the new singer who appears on television frequently.
It is dangerous for you to swim in this river.
Cezanne is famous for his landscapes.
I should cancel the trip to LA.
That Italian author is little known in Japan.
The last time I went to China, I visited Shanghai.
The custom originated in China.
If you have any complaints, let me know, and I'll look into them.
There's no need to panic. There's plenty of time.
There live in this world people of all sorts of colors and manners and customs.
Please tell me the way to the post office.
My mother thinks of everything in terms of money.
Our school burned down.
Are you American or French?
She cut the apple in two.
She has beautiful handwriting.
He treats me like his slave.
It is thirty meters in length.
The final decision rests with the president.
I generally have lunch there.
There was hardly anyone who didn't laugh when the singer fell off the stage.
He earns his living by writing.
His influence extends all over the country.
He never breaks his promises.
In order to have an idea of our current projects, we invite you to visit [url].
They went to the beach.
You must turn over a new leaf and work as hard as possible.
He is swimming in the pool.
Could I ask you to drive him to the hospital?
They are faced with a serious situation.
She is a nurse.
I found out that the woman I thought was a nurse was actually a doctor.
He is a lion at home and a mouse outside.
He took poison by mistake.
This is a good textbook.
I'd like you to meet my brother, Tom.
She bikes to school.
Please be polite.
Please be polite.
Nakido is a file sharing platform.
I'm very impatient to see the new version of Tatoeba.
I'm eating rice now.
I'd explain it to you, but your brain would explode.
I miss it.
He's a Frenchman.
And thus he failed the exam.
Polish nails are more expensive than the Chinese ones.
Polish nails are more expensive than the Chinese ones.
What a long cucumber!
The mayor prescribed to the citizens how to act.
Don't use computer translation.
He transferred to the office in Chiba.
I will be taking the exam about this time tomorrow.
I think she is sick.
The mail arrives before noon.
When I was having a bath, a good idea came to me.
My parents would not let me go out with boys.
The squirrel was busy gathering nuts.
Squirrels are storing up nuts against the winter.
How many medals did the Japanese athletes collect?
I want some potatoes.
She has been studying French for ten years, so she ought to realize what French is.
The girl who works at the bakery is cute.
We have a wide choice of fruits at the supermarket.
He flew into a rage.
He is busy learning English.
Please fill in this form.
I expected her to have come yesterday.
If there were no books, life would no doubt be very dull.
We were somewhat surprised at his strange question.
Planets move around a fixed star.
After a short visit, he suddenly stood up and said he was leaving.
He decided to go to France.
Spare me the sympathy.
He was attacked by a sharp pain in his stomach.
You'd better examine the contract carefully before signing.
So what? It doesn't matter to me.
He looks very vigorous, considering his age.
He called her bad names.
We made pancakes for breakfast.
I always view this photo with disgust.
What was the weather report?
He drank orange juice out of a bottle.
She blacked out on seeing the scene of the accident.
Put it back in the nest.
The man wore a gun on his hip.
If you are to succeed, you must work hard.
Always give way to traffic coming from the right.
The trainer must think of her health.
We fought hard for victory.
I'll say this: I am innocent.
I'll say this: I am innocent.
Fasten the rope to the tree.
She wiped her wet hair with a towel.
Is this a picture that you yourself drew?
They are more emotional than we.
John played the guitar and his friends sang.
The doctor she visited is famous.
The patient was in danger.
Sauron wants every hobbit to fear him.
The girl didn't like to wash dishes.
Japan depends on foreign trade.
Moths are attracted by light.
If her nose were a little shorter, she would be quite pretty.
I would rather be killed than live in disgrace.
How I wish I had been more careful!
Put an icepack on your cheek.
She looked in her bag for the key of the house, but could not find it.
The light of the lamp glimmered in the fog.
My skirt is too long.
He has reached the end of his patience.
How does he gain his living?
He has a fair income.
Excuse me, could you pass me the salt and pepper?
If you're hungry, then eat.
She said she was twenty years old, which was not true.
Your handwriting is very good.
Please fill this bottle with water.
I named the kitten Tama.
You young people have no sense of humor at all.
I don't want dinner.
There is no admission fee for children under five.
His office is past the bank on your left.
I often meditate on the meaning of life.
This scenery is magnificent.
The maintenance of the house costs a lot.
This is the office in which he works.
We sent out the invitations yesterday.
The accused tried to justify his actions.
Don't get discouraged if you should fail.
How much does he earn per month?
Lucy's mother told her to look after her younger sister.
He is washing his car.
I don't give a damn about my CV.
On my way home I fell asleep in the train, and rode past my station.
He's considered to be one of the greatest scientists in the world.
Don't take it so seriously.
Anyone know where Nikolai's gone off to?
Telephone booths are as scarce as hen's teeth around here.
He is good at imitating her Irish accent.
I'm grateful for the invitation.
Did she hurt that kitten?
In the end she chose another kitten.
The kitten wanted in.
He almost drowned.
My life had no linguistic meaning... until the day I met Saeb.
Is Mother scolding the horse?
Don't give up if you fail.
The person standing at the front of the room is a professor in the History Department.
Her father is Japanese.
The bicycle is mine.
Draw a straight line.
I... actually don't know that either, Dima admitted. "Sometimes, this story really doesn't make any sense."
They want to talk to you about areas of mutual interest.
I'll answer for this accident.
His weight strained the rope.
She said she feared that he might fail.
It takes two hours to read this book.
I was curious to know why people had been staring at me.
She is by far the best player in the club.
Will you impart the secret to me?
Turn right at the crossroad.
Twitter is not good enough.
At that time, Mexico was not yet independent of Spain.
The family is the basic unit of society.
When I came home, my sister was playing the guitar.
Would you help me look for my keys?
You can't drink seawater because it is too salty.
She keeps a record of everything she buys.
Whose shoes are these?
It matters not how long we live, but how.
He refused my offer to drive him home.
Without your help, we wouldn't be able to carry out our plan.
Sam is two years younger than Tom.
It is useless to talk to him.
You need to work very hard.
These trees will screen our new house from public view.
I beg your pardon.
Rice grows in warm countries.
She must be angry with me.
He stood up and looked at the mouse.
He's a typical Japanese man.
I don't think that was a wise decision.
Shakespeare's "Macbeth" is a tragedy.
I'll give you a ride home.
We usually walk to school.
I often go swimming in the river.
A sea separates Ireland and England.
Do you know who invented this machine?
A meter is 100 centimeters.
She arrived late as usual.
Shoes are stiff when they are new.
Please introduce yourself, sir. What's your profession?
It is dangerous to drink too much.
We lost almost all our away games.
You need to take your shoes off before entering the room.
Sometimes, Grandma is more dangerous than the KGB.
He takes a bath every morning.
He climbed up the tree without effort.
Botany deals with the study of plants.
It wasn't expensive.
The airport is quite far from the city centre.
Are you Japanese?
It's slightly windy.
In Japan there are beautiful cities, for example Kyoto and Nara.
Have you finished dressing?
That isn't cool.
Stop eating in bed, I'm sick of cleaning up after you.
He had a queer expression on his face.
A careful reader would have noticed the mistake.
This book is suitable for general readers.
This book is within the capacity of young readers.
The newspaper began to lose readers when it dispensed with one of its most popular writers.
These books are not fit for young readers.
Just because a certain book does not interest readers does not mean that the fault lies in the book.
I am very grateful for your help.
No one can stop me from going there.
My mouth is dry.
Can I turn off the TV?
Dust off the shelf.
Could you turn off the radio?
She types well.
She was buried in her hometown.
Let's get to work.
Do you keep a diary?
This country is rich in natural resources.
If you carelessly ask, "got a boyfriend?" she'll be put on her guard and say, "why do you ask?"
There are still some savage tribes on that island.
I am a nurse.
The pond was encircled with trees.
I wanted to surprise her.
Tom hid under the table.
Do you want pepper on it?
The last wound proved fatal.
Can you ice skate?
My mother doesn't know how to ride a bicycle.
The country's economy depends on agriculture.
I'm getting ready for the worst.
His wife is our Italian teacher.
We were all surprised at the appointment of Mr Brown as director.
When will you finish your assignment?
You're my princess.
No one can have three different birth dates.
I hid under the bed.
John goes to his office on foot.
I'll go to France to study painting.
He explained his plan both to my son and to me.
There were several stars to be seen in the sky.
She's Tom's sister.
My friend is studying Korean.
My Chinese teacher is a man.
Are you Chinese or Japanese?
In the U.S., they often mistake me for a Chinese person.
I parted with a friend at the train station.
The boy gave me a bow.
A boy came running toward me.
My sister is 10 centimetres taller than I am.
He and I often chat on the bus.
The popular singer committed suicide.
I appreciate your concern.
We will never give in to terrorist demands.
Ken wants to be a baseball player.
The clock is slow.
It's three years since we moved here.
The watch is slow.
On our first date he popped out his cell phone and started texting someone. I couldn't believe it!
I go to bed at eleven at night.
He has studied the possibility of a collaboration.
I'm afraid I've offended you.
What time does the shuttle bus leave for the airport?
I mostly have fruit for breakfast.
I appreciate what you did for me.
His constant complaints aroused my rage.
My dream is to buy a Lamborghini tractor.
The man stood up and began to sing.
He filled the bottle with water.
Whether he agrees or not, we won't change our plans.
Get up at once, or you will be late for school.
It seemed as if she was going to faint.
The defense lawyer was confident that he would be able to answer the prosecutor's arguments in his rebuttal.
Daniel thanked the policemen.
Masha dreams of starting a revolution, but is too shy.
What's the big deal about checking my email every 15 minutes?
She cried for joy when she heard that her son had survived the plane crash.
In the end, he recognized his own mistakes.
The two poems express human suffering.
How did you arrive? - By foot.
What's the length of this bridge?
The hotel was in sight.
He is not an American but an Englishman.
I want to bathe in the sea.
We ran for 10 kilometers.
Turn off the radio.
I am learning to play the guitar now.
Can you tell me the way to the nearest post office?
The wind blows.
We must always be prepared for the worst.
Now I am too old to walk.
Anyone who really wishes to apply themselves to the freedom of mankind must have the courage to face the truth, regardless how bitter it may be.
He solved the difficult problem easily.
You need to look after your loved ones.
Lucy's cute, but she's got an atrocious character.
We came here from the province where we both grew up.
He dropped in at the bookstore.
Bald people leaving for San-Francisco can't put any flowers into their hair.
For centuries Cracow was the capital of Poland.
I gave my father a silk tie.
I wouldn't even accept kielbasa from a bastard like that.
I got shanghaied by those bastards!
International TV? Dima asked. "What are you talking about, Al-Sayib?"
His name was forgotten.
Klava is bidding farewell to her husband.
Klava envied Lyusya.
Lyusya decided to give up on everything and leave for Siberia.
Our true nationality is mankind.
Fruits and vegetables are essential to a balanced diet.
Ice melts in water.
She is totally jealous of your youth.
You can't put him off until tomorrow?
We often hear it said that the Japanese are good workers.
A woman wrote 30 books about how to become happy, and then committed suicide.
He cut the envelope open.
The worst is over.
Have fun.
Shishir is following me.
There's many a slip 'twixt the cup and the lip.
No, I did it on my own account.
I will give you back the CD in a week.
I'm a deeply religious man and believe in life after death.
My father must have been handsome in his youth.
I will get you a bicycle for your birthday.
I'm in love with you.
I'm in love with you.
I persuaded him that he was wrong.
The baby stopped crying.
There's a hole in this bucket.
I found out where to buy fruit cheaply.
I gave my seat to the old lady.
You get up early, don't you?
Hey, Tom, forget about your worries.
He killed himself by taking poison.
I sat waiting on a bench.
He went so far as to say that I was coward.
They always go skiing in winter.
Would you please tell me the way?
Hurry up. You'll be late for school.
His father is Japanese.
Those shoes do not go with the suit.
Her skin is smooth.
What time do you get up every day?
I met Tom on my way to school.
Do you have these shoes in my size?
Can I speak to the person in charge?
A glass of white wine, please.
My sister Susan gets up early every morning.
He started singing an old song.
Brush your teeth every day.
This rule is applied to foreigners only.
I'll move soon.
I'm tired of your endless complaints.
The risk is too great.
The road turns left there.
Seeds must have air and water to grow.
She turned off the radio.
It is dangerous to swim here.
Mom, could you read me a bedtime story?
He works as a translator.
Is the hotel close to the airport?
Mom and Dad gave me a bicycle.
She manages a shoe store.
You work too hard.
He provided them with food.
He wiped the sweat from his face.
He's very sexy.
A three-handed monster came out of the wardrobe.
That river is dangerous to swim in.
I took a bus so as not to be late for my appointment.
He speaks Japanese as if he were Japanese.
I don't think he is fit for the job.
Her voice could hardly be heard above the noise.
He came here before noon.
He had reached the limits of his patience.
Babies cry when they are hungry.
I am not angry with him because he made a mistake.
Tom is a good cook.
I had no difficulty in finding his office.
She would have fallen into the pond if he had not caught her by the arm.
The whole experiment was recorded on film.
I took the opportunity to visit Rome.
He killed the goose, foolishly.
I'm a salesperson.
The eternal silence of these infinite spaces terrifies me.
The story was in all daily newspapers.
You had better go by tram.
He was fired against his will.
A man of straw is worth a woman of gold.
I go skiing very often.
You don't look so hot.
Can you direct me to the post office?
You cannot fail this time.
I met him at the end of the platform.
The eagle does not catch flies.
The eagle does not catch flies.
Weather permitting, we are going to get to the top of the mountain tomorrow.
Long time, no see.
Democracy is one form of government.
I lost my patience.
I buried my dog at the pet cemetery.
He found it difficult to please his father.
Thanks, I'm full.
Suddenly all the lights went out.
I asked her to make four copies of the letter.
Ukrainian girls are the most beautiful girls in the world.
He turned traitor.
The bus was ten minutes late.
Welcome to Hell!
He could not restrain his excitement.
I understand it a little, but I can't speak it.
I dreamt I was a bird.
I want to contact him. Do you know his phone number?
Nonsense!
He makes a point of doing ten push-ups before going to bed.
That very tune reminded me of my adolescence.
Don't throw away this magazine. I haven't read it yet.
Is there a mailbox near here?
She can't bear the noise.
I absolve you from your sins.
It's hot in here.
I apologize.
I declare this supermarket open.
There is no use in crying. No one will hear you.
I don't think he'll listen to you.
He has too many wild ideas.
He invested two hundred dollars in a growing business.
James had a great fear of making mistakes in class and being reprimanded.
He threw a rock into the pond.
Eat shit — millions of flies cannot be wrong.
He doesn't mean to be mean. It's just his nature.
She had a basket full of apples.
Five hundred dollars is a small sum for him.
When can we eat?
Please change the flag.
Show me the doll that you bought yesterday.
You cannot rely upon Jim's words since he tries to please everybody.
This museum is worth a visit.
He cycles to school.
I bought a pair of shoes.
I don't suppose it's possible to read a book by moonlight.
Do what you believe is right.
There's no more room in hell.
I heard news of his departure.
No one is perfect.
He has eleven children.
I want a piece of candy.
The chemical formula for water is H-O-H.
I don't like classical music.
There used to be big trees around the pond.
Mom bought a puppy for us.
You've got a big hole in your sock.
This makes absolutely no sense.
These shoes don't fit my feet.
My father gave me a puppy for my birthday.
It's like water on the duck's back.
I climbed to the top of Mt. Fuji.
You ask me to do the impossible.
I'm sorry I'm late.
I really hurried.
I'll drive you to the airport.
That guitar is too expensive for me to buy.
Turn the light off. I can't fall asleep.
I'd like to have a look at your stamp collection.
Can you teach me how to steal?
He gave me this doll in token of his gratitude.
I take a bath every morning in the summer.
Hamlet is Shakespeare's play.
She broke up with me because I don't make a lot of money.
I want to be a magician.
The girl broke the window.
I meant to look it up.
One-third of the Earth's surface is desert.
She gave me moral support.
Are you prepared for the worst?
An angle of 90 degrees is called a right angle.
The center is an ideal.
All of us were surprised at the news.
The ice is melting.
Zero, one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten.
You have Jim to thank for your failure.
Thoughts and feelings are expressed by means of words.
You are not Japanese.
I am against using death as a punishment. I am also against using it as a reward.
Can we find joy in spite of suffering and death?
What's causing the death of the most popular singer in the world?
He started learning English at the age of eleven.
Do you eat rice in your country?
Do you eat rice in your country?
That man is in a panic.
He was seething with anger.
Don't forget to turn off the gas before going out.
He took a mirror and carefully examined his tongue.
I'm not well.
Old people get up very early.
Children often live in a world of fancy.
Did you miss me?
I envy you your luck.
We are apt to forget this fact.
After the incident I came to have a higher opinion of him.
The rain is raining all around.
The rain lasted four days.
Words once uttered cannot be recalled.
Our team lost all of its games.
I've never seen such a wonderful sunset.
I've never seen such a beautiful sunset.
Nobody will regard us as office workers.
Would you do me a favor?
He is a busy man, so you can only get in touch with him by telephone.
I will give you a bicycle for your birthday.
We encountered many difficulties.
We have the right to live where we please.
They appreciate my effort.
I want a guitar.
I gave up all hope of survival.
English will take you a long time to master.
Not all doctors make a lot of money.
They named their cats Tom and Jerry.
Where is Tom's classroom?
A beard doesn't make a philosopher.
If anyone is not willing to work, then he is not to eat, either.
The word is on the tip of my tongue.
Learning English requires patience.
I don't want to go alone.
I want to get rid of it.
My mother must be angry.
This is a dead-end alley.
That is a Japanese doll.
It is driving me crazy.
Tom escaped the danger.
Ann always keeps her room clean.
Are you going to stay long?
A shiver ran down my spine.
Osamu Dazai committed suicide.
I believe the honest will win in the long run.
He filled the glass with wine.
Shall I drive you home?
She spoke for 30 minutes without a break.
Promises don't fill up your stomach.
All or nothing.
Let's take a tea break.
We talked quite frankly.
The car was stuck in the mud.
That's the reality.
The left hand doesn't know what the right hand is doing.
I'm in love with her.
You'll see, it's hard to please her.
My mother is angry.
He has acted on TV many times.
You can't have too much of a good thing.
Appetite comes with eating.
He was deprived of his civil rights.
Please take care of yourself.
I'm Chinese.
This is completely useless.
I take it back.
We had a very vigorous debate.
We should respect our parents.
His sharp eyes never missed a mistake.
We have a traitor among us.
I will show you a new approach to foreign language learning.
Reflections could be seen in the puddles.
Lincoln was elected President in 1860.
She shared her piece of cake with me.
The Holy Roman Empire ceased to exist in 1806.
Fresh fruit is good for your health.
Japan does a lot of trade with Britain.
The book attracted her attention.
Who ate?
The kitten wants to sleep.
Don't wake her up.
Don't wake him up.
In space, all warriors are cold warriors.
I did some busking during the summer.
Why is he angry?
She has lovers for every day of the week.
The exception proves the rule.
I am not angry, far from it.
You can't teach your grandmother to suck eggs.
A big car flew off the road today.
Birds of a feather will gather together.
I like to play guitar.
They are aware of the difficulties.
The rich sometimes despise the poor.
That place is worth visiting at least once.
Like cheese swimming in butter.
A storm in a teacup.
My wife is suffering from pneumonia.
This mine will close down next month.
A taxi drew up at the main gate.
Wish me luck!
I've missed you.
I missed you.
I miss you a lot.
There was a loud noise coming from the room.
Heed public opinion.
Did he have his trousers pressed?
I don't believe in religion.
The prouder the individual, the harsher the punishment.
There is no air in space.
This is an animal found in that desert.
This road leads to the airport.
You did this intentionally!
An envelope and a stamp, please.
He has a sense of humor.
Don't stroke the cat the wrong way.
A drop of luck helps more than a whole case of wisdom.
He believes that there is a spy among us.
My father bought me a bicycle.
I am eating a cucumber.
This bicycle belongs to my brother.
She stood out because she was wearing a red dress.
When in Rome, do as the Romans do.
I am eating rice.
Children are poor men's riches.
Those houses are 500 years old.
Where's the cook?
Wisdom comes with age.
It's all over with poor Tom.
In the course of the twentieth century all this changed.
The dream was a mystery to me.
He crossed the Pacific Ocean in thirty days.
She is careless about the way she dresses.
Like priest, like people.
Like mother, like daughter.
What goes around comes around.
In the U.S. I was often taken to be Chinese.
If women knew how much we miss them, they would leave sooner.
The rainy season has begun.
We took a taxi so as not to be late.
Please put the light out when you leave the room.
Why do you accuse my son?
You have been beaten. Give in!
Take this table away.
He did the work on his own.
Around honey, there is no lack of flies.
It's simply too cold today.
She attempted suicide.
Guess what! I'm going to New Zealand to study.
Hurry up, otherwise you'll be late for lunch.
The plan was doomed to failure from the start.
His accent sounds a little quaint.
All human beings are mortal.
He is not an American but a Frenchman.
What is the advantage to this technology?
Be careful handling matches!
Please wrap it up.
I carefully explored the contract.
You see I've resolved to follow you wherever you go.
To my surprise, he failed in the exam.
He is the picture of his grandfather.
Besides being a surgeon, he was a famous writer.
We should obey the traffic rules.
The traffic rules are not often obeyed.
His bicycle is blue.
With or without religion, good people can behave well and bad people can do evil; but for good people to do evil - that takes religion.
My father has a ranch and breeds cattle and horses.
He asks me to be attentive.
He says that I'm attentive.
Let me introduce myself.
I recommend this brand of coffee.
My decision to study abroad surprised my parents.
The airport is close at hand.
I prefer a hotel by the airport.
I'll call as soon as I am at the airport.
You must obey your parents.
You are free to do as you please with your money.
My joints ache when it gets cold.
I love to skate.
Shall we start?
It takes 165 years for Neptune to orbit around the sun.
Don't interrupt me while I'm talking.
We're heading for disaster.
Could you be more specific?
I'm fairly certain that it was the elephant.
Please be polite.
He has just published an interesting series of articles.
He invested all his capital in that business.
It was determined that faulty wiring was the cause of the fire.
How do I get to Chinatown?
Health is better than wealth.
My friend studies Korean.
He bought a new pair of gloves.
He finally kicked the bad habit.
Be polite to your parents.
I'm going to France to study painting.
I know you don't care.
Rock-paper-scissors, OK? "Rock" "Scis..Paper" "Foul!"
We walked for about 6 kilometers.
Being deeply thankful, he tried to express his thanks.
I live nearby.
Take her back.
I hereby tender my resignation.
I like to listen to classical music.
My mother has good handwriting.
The eagle is king of birds.
One of my hobbies is classical music.
I work as a salesman.
Deaf people can talk in sign language.
We communicate with each other by telephone every day.
What is the most popular sport in America?
She was angry. That is why she remained silent.
They don't always obey their parents.
I miss you so much!
Don't go too close to the pond so that you won't fall in.
Besides being a surgeon, he was a famous writer.
You can use my bicycle.
Please make three copies of each page.
Yesterday I met one of the most popular actors in the world.
There are many tourists in town.
My mother was very pretty when she was young.
He has no sense of humor.
What is the real cause of this tragedy?
The earth rotates.
I thanked Mary for her help.
Could you put this report into Italian for me?
The building was heavily damaged by fire.
Come on, I didn't mean to hurt you.
We stopped working at noon.
I cannot move my tongue to tell this!
Water is a liquid.
I go to school by bicycle.
I was affected by the summer heat.
He was greatly respected; while his son was as much despised.
I'll drive you to the airport.
We lost the game 3-2.
I never give up.
Our math teacher drew a circle on the blackboard.
He just missed the bus.
Tom is a responsible driver.
The little girl doesn't like to wear shoes.
The nurse will tell you how to do it.
The world doesn't revolve around you.
The boys are throwing a ball in the back yard.
She came hurrying to his bedside.
That problem was accepted.
That problem was accepted.
I forgot to buy the textbook.
This is a free newspaper.
He is a typical Japanese.
The more cheese, the more holes. The more holes, the less cheese. Thus: The more cheese, the less cheese.
That's how life is.
I generally walk to school.
She turned off the light.
That's one small step for man, one giant leap for mankind.
I share this room with my sister.
How much confidence exists that this assumption is correct?
Sapient beings are far more advanced than humans.
I saw her clean the room.
She was a tall, thin girl with long, soft brown hair.
He has finished his work, hasn't he?
Other members received less severe verdicts by the court.
It is time to feed the sheep.
They believe that the soul is immortal.
The death of one man is a tragedy, the death of millions is a statistic.
I must remind you about your promise.
It's not enough to know only one language.
I have a new bike.
If you want to learn a language well, learn it by yourself.
That's shit!
There is no use in making excuses.
Do not disturb.
I'm sorry. We've finished boarding.
Hunger is the best cook.
The pain was almost unbearable.
She participated in the beauty contest.
Where is the Japanese Embassy?
Tom started the engine.
His bike is better than mine.
This application just eats up your battery.
I have no patience.
Shortly after the accident, the police came.
I'm Chinese.
Be careful.
Could you hold on a minute?
I have a new email address.
This fact must not be forgotten.
Horses don't have horns; cows and sheep have horns.
Will you drive me home?
For a language to be international, it does not suffice to say that it is so.
My son took a candy from the box.
Jim's not a lawyer. He's a doctor.
Even the sky conspires against us.
She can't ride a bicycle.
She wrapped the present in paper.
This book is full of errors.
I wrote the wrong address on the envelope.
Most boys like computer games.
She had white shoes on.
Carry these books back to the bookshelf.
He took honey instead of sugar.
She is having dinner now.
It is hard to convince John.
I'm hungry because I haven't had lunch.
I've known Tom since he was a kid.
The experiment was a failure.
The price of gas is rising.
Whose guitar is this?
You'd better not keep company with him.
Please don't cut in while I'm talking with him.
Keep off the religious issue when talking with him.
It is no use talking to him. He never listens.
I'm not sure of the exact date.
This factory's productive capacity is 250 cars a week.
Don't let this chance slip by.
What's the name of this intersection?
Come in. I insist.
She laid the paper out on the table.
My headache has gone.
It's free for European Union citizens.
This is unbelievable.
We import grain from the United States.
We stood on the brink of a cliff.
We couldn't convince him.
We had a good time at the beach yesterday.
We're fed up with your complaining.
We have overlooked this important fact.
She had a vague feeling of guilt.
It was very difficult for her to control her emotions.
The area of the factory is 1,000 square meters.
The factory is running at full capacity.
Australia is rich in natural resources.
However long you try to hide it, the lies will come out anyway.
Don't let go of the rope.
At what time will the taxi go to the airport?
I am putting on weight these days.
Recently I moved to another apartment.
I took a look around.
He could not take effective measures.
She sent me an urgent telegram.
Do not intervene in matters which do not concern you!
Which platform is it on?
The plane took off easily.
She walked past clicking her high heels.
He kept his promise.
One of the important differences between Japanese and Americans is that Japanese tend to choose a safe course in life, while Americans choose to explore and challenge life.
The engine gave out.
I don't wanna press you.
The gate is so narrow that the car can't pass through it.
The cat slowly approached the mouse.
The cat came near being run over by a truck.
He has just published an interesting series of articles.
I wake up at 7 o'clock.
Marriage is the main cause of all divorces.
We are shorthanded now.
We are shorthanded now.
Our escape was nothing short of miracle.
She almost froze to death in the snow.
A dove is a symbol of peace.
Let's find sentences with new vocabulary on this topic, add them to the following list: _____; and translate them.
She works as a nurse in the local hospital.
Father takes a bus to his office.
They all envied my new car.
She came close to drowning.
Her heart was filled with joy.
I am looking forward to seeing you again.
She bade farewell to me.
The bad weather frustrated our plans.
You're sick!
You'll miss the train.
I'm fed up with working here.
You can reach me at the address written here.
I have kept a diary in English these ten years.
That doesn't bother me.
I played with the champion.
Are you Japanese?
I'm the type who gets nervous in front of people, so I'm bad at speech making.
It's no use asking me for money.
Don't interfere in my affairs.
Where's my box of chocolates?
Don't laugh at my failure.
I'd like you to see my collection of stamps.
Two boys stood in front of me.
Thank you so much for inviting me.
She thanked us for our help.
Someone broke the window.
They also sold wood and wood products.
This is too expensive.
She has good handwriting.
You were late.
You're late.
You're late.
From now on, I will not use that word.
Go to bed!
I walk to school.
Turn off the light, please.
She always walks to school.
He sells fruit.
The sky is full of stars.
His ancestors went there from Ireland.
His father failed in business.
The Japanese destroyed Pearl Harbor.
She is a beginner.
And open your textbook at page ten.
To hell with your problems.
Great men are not always wise.
When I fell off my bicycle, I couldn't get up for a few minutes.
I want to ride a bicycle, because I live far from my school.
I have a bicycle.
I had my bicycle stolen.
He assigned me a new job.
I want to eat a spicy chicken in a big plate!
It's time for lunch.
I actually saw a ghost.
I cycle to work.
Her work is to wash the dishes.
Do you know who painted this picture?
Who painted this picture?
Who broke this window?
Who painted this beautiful picture?
We are hoping to visit Spain this summer.
We're prepared for the worst.
We are exploring new sources, such as solar and atomic energy.
We are in the era of atomic energy.
Let us stop to think how much we depend upon atomic energy.
The ancient Greeks knew as much about the solar system as we do.
Solar energy does not threaten the environment.
The car passed by, raising a cloud of dust behind it.
Being determines consciousness.
Run, or else you'll be late.
Run, or else you'll be late.
Would you like us to go to the game together?
Finding his office was easy.
I usually walk to school.
I am grateful to them.
The captain was so angry he refused to give the crew shore leave.
I am not eating.
Every player is under obligation to keep the rules.
The player was pleased with his victory.
How many bowls do we have?
How much does the kilo of onions cost?
How much is the kilo of bananas?
He isn't good enough for her.
He ran past without noticing her.
You cannot be too careful when you drive a car.
Can you ride a bicycle?
The weather report was thoroughly wrong.
She visited Kanazawa two years ago.
Do you know why this date is important?
It is no use giving her advice.
I turned off the tap.
There's no point in taking a camera.
I need a new bicycle.
He succeeded in the examination.
He was absorbed in deep thought.
She was late to school.
She refused my invitation.
That sound is irritating.
She went for a walk.
Japanese Admiral Isoroku Yamamoto launched the battle.
When can one say that a person has alcohol issues?
The tap is running.
Do you have any CDs?
You shouldn't ride a bicycle on the sidewalk.
How many CDs do you have?
I will walk.
This manga is pretty popular in China.
I've missed you a lot.
He lives in that stately mansion.
I wonder if the plane will arrive on time.
We live in a society of democracy.
We parted, never to see each other again.
Don't spoil your appetite.
Tom has a lot of experience in computers.
A king's daughter is a princess.
Fred was thrilled to buy the car.
You're over-the-top in everything you do.
He has accumulated quite a collection of books.
He came running.
He spoke for ten minutes without a pause.
He died on the day his son arrived.
He touched the water with his foot.
Man, you're something!
You might be surprised at the outcome.
You might be surprised at the outcome.
The woman washes her face.
The birds flew south in search of warmth.
The birds flew to the south.
The bird flew away and was lost to sight.
Draw a straight line.
Look at the setting sun.
Silence is golden, but not when trying to learn a foreign language.
Silence is the most perfect expression of scorn.
I sometimes dream of home.
I meet him from time to time.
I can ride a bike.
What he said is not true.
Bring me a dry towel.
We were deprived of transportation.
Waiter needed.
The treatment is going successfully.
Have you put out the light in the dining room?
Sudden decrease in appetite is sometimes a sign of illness.
A promise is a promise.
The money was divided among the three.
The bridge has a span of 100 meters.
The bridge is under construction.
The bridge is still under construction.
Greetings!
Learning foreign languages is boring.
Truth is difficult to find at the bottom of a well.
Johnston decided to surrender.
Tokyo surrendered within days.
Mine owners refused to negotiate.
She is a tender girl of questionable morals.
It is the oldest wooden building in existence.
Do you have rice?
It's odd that there should be a light on in the office at this hour.
Every student has free access to the library.
Let's hurry to be in time for the meeting.
The children were so noisy that I couldn't study.
Remove the bandage.
He shared in my happiness.
That child was left in the sun too long.
The price includes tax.
Don't put all your eggs in one basket.
Did you miss me?
What do you recommend?
Do you have hot towels?
They make toys at this factory.
They tell me jokes, and then I forget them.
This water has an ugly smell.
This library has over 50,000 volumes.
You're crazy to buy such an expensive bike.
I had to decline the invitation because I was ill.
We graduate from high school at eighteen.
She played the guitar and he sang.
The radio gave place to television.
How much money do you want to earn?
Don't interrupt me but hear me out, please.
Don't forsake me!
It was a mouse.
She began to sing.
Let me think for a minute.
What do you think, Miss West?
You can watch television.
Are you in favor of the proposal?
You mustn't swim in the pond.
Are there oak trees on the hill?
His house was in sight from the top of the hill.
All men are mortal, all Greeks are men, therefore all Greeks are mortal.
You may rest assured; I have no ulterior motive in making this donation.
You must rid yourself of bad habits.
Did you break the window on purpose or by accident?
How many days will you remain in London?
They gained great wealth.
Patients often die simply because they yield to their diseases.
They saw an authoriy in him.
I'm sorry I was so rude.
I turned down the idea of going for a walk and stayed at home.
Do you wash your hands before meals?
He tore the photographs into pieces.
He looked out of the window.
Mom is about to enter the bath.
He is the very image of his father.
The concert lasted about three hours.
They really are wise.
Surrender to the enemy.
The teacher is strict with his students.
The letter returned.
Animals have instincts, we have taxes.
One more step, and you'll be a dead man.
The atomic bomb is the offspring of 20th century physics.
Physics is a branch of science.
They did not have enough gold.
They walked toward the bridge.
They had been defeated in battle.
Your mother is trying to break up our marriage.
What's the most delicious fruit in Japan?
Father visited my uncle in hospital.
Scotland has set itself on a course to obtain independence from London.
I guess that tomorrow I'll be completely bald.
Give me food for thought, and I will find food for my stomach!
I am a member of the sales department.
I don't care for moving pictures.
That's hogwash.
That's absolute nonsense!
We must keep calm.
You're Tom's friend, aren't you?
There were rumors about a misfortune.
My father does walk.
My father does walk.
It's because I want to become a translator.
Spend money and enjoy life!
She loves Tom more than I do.
He wants to be a husband at every wedding, and the deceased at every funeral.
He climbed up the tree like a monkey.
When you leave the room, please make sure you turn off the lights.
They raised their glasses and toasted to their success.
This puppy is crying, because it is homesick for its mother.
Finally, it's Friday.
I'll phone you as soon as I get to the airport.
We live in the age of technology.
My home is my castle.
The weather was perfect yesterday.
He carried out all his promises.
There is a gold coin.
The clock has just struck ten.
Zero comes before one.
What should we cook?
We're suffering from an unbearable heat wave for the second week straight.
She's not a good person.
Our team lost all its games.
The pain was unbearable.
She's beautiful regardless what she wears.
Did you know that John's father died of a heart attack?
The customers have started to come.
I like to go swimming in the sea.
The affair ends well.
Won't you tell me what time it is?
On behalf of the company, I would like to express our hearty thanks to you all.
The children on the beach are building a sand castle.
Here's my email address.
I love music, particularly classical.
The results fell short of my expectations.
Is he aware of the difficulty?
He got over the difficulties.
He's not tall, but strong.
I hid under the table.
I calmed down upon finding out that the operation was successful.
I see the Mr. and the Mrs.
He keeps a diary in English.
When are you walking home?
For the intelligent, a hint is sufficient.
He ended his life by jumping off a bridge.
Modern philosophy has its beginnings in the 19th century.
You can't pay too much for good shoes.
There's a possibility that the man was murdered.
We've had no word from Brian yet.
Are you angry?
Did you know that July 6 is the International Kissing Day?
They are pilots.
The money is in the well.
Are they Japanese or Chinese?
I'm French.
What's going on here?
He asked the general to recall his order.
YouTube videos are very meaningless.
This is the last warning.
It's not a toy!
We came to the conclusion that he should be fired.
The only thing you can learn from history is that you can't learn anything from history.
Seen from a distance, the hill looks like an elephant.
It looks like rain. You had better take in the washing.
Man is mortal.
Good food and enough sleep are absolutely necessary to good health.
I had to walk home.
She aided her daughter in dressing.
It's interesting to think about what the world would be like if it were ruled by women.
What type of tools do you require for the job?
I got the ticket for free.
She is careful about the way she receives guests.
I don't know if he will visit us next Sunday.
You have already eaten.
In all probability, the cabinet will fall.
The policeman's quick arrival surprised us.
Our plane took off exactly on time at six.
I'd like to go abroad one day.
They sat up all night.
This silverware set has been in my family for generations.
He was sitting there, delighted with my failure.
We can cure some types of cancer.
The sign "&" stands for "and".
His talent for dancing impressed everyone.
This CD is my son's.
Please lock the safe.
I went to the station to say good-bye to my friend.
Why are you angry?
I love puzzles so much!
Where is my office?
Thanks for the invitation.
What's this fruit called?
Where are the lions and tigers?
What fruit is red?
To the swimming pool!
He dwelt for a time in France, then went to Italy.
There are four seasons in a year.
It rained for three days on end.
Sticks and stones may break my bones, but words will never hurt me.
You see, humans don't create time; if we did we'd never run out of it.
He has sent the boy on an errand.
Kenya became independent in 1963.
She gave him a tender kiss.
Things are expensive here.
My decision to study abroad surprised my parents.
Hurry up, or you'll be late for school.
The baby's sleeping.
I passed out.
I passed out.
The war is not inevitable.
The fighting grew bloodier.
I regard him as a poet.
Do you mind if I smoke? "No, I don't mind at all."
You should use the paper bags again and again.
He packed his lunch in a paper bag.
He used a big piece of paper to make the bag.
What they are doing is ruining the economy.
It is no use arguing with her.
Everything is very expensive in this store.
Do you think we'll reach his house before noon?
I have no more desire to eat sweets.
Kinshasa is the capital of Democratic Republic of the Congo.
The King of France is bald.
Some of the students like to play the guitar.
I can't drink alcohol.
She has a bath every morning.
He misses his family.
In late August, the Allied forces captured Paris.
Dwight Eisenhower was elected president in 1952.
I wonder why Tom didn't show up last night.
Not knowing what to answer, I kept silent.
He made up that story.
Stratford-on-Avon, where Shakespeare was born, is visited by many tourists every year.
The expert appraised the watch at $200.
The Greeks also eat fish often.
This is my old bike.
John felt the presence of a ghost in the dark room.
Destroy this temple.
Hurry up, or you'll miss the bus.
I'm dizzy.
If you piss on the toilet seat, wipe it off!
Patience is a rare virtue these days.
How many of Shakespeare's tragedies have you read?
I want a book telling about Japanese customs.
The ship is bound for Finland.
You take everything too literally.
Not only the balls; the bat was also stolen yesterday.
Complete the following form to know who you could have been in a previous life.
Great minds think alike.
The light went out.
Turn off the radio.
I not only borrowed money from Tom, but also from his wife.
There's a bottle in the refrigerator.
He acted as my guide.
Please turn over the page.
She committed suicide by taking poison.
The coffee is nasty.
He is guilty of murder.
She persuaded him to do it.
She decorated her room with roses.
Metals conduct electricity.
Wine is poetry filled in bottles.
Forgive me for breaking my promise.
Who made the doll?
Please take my advice.
This man is Chinese.
It's already eleven. It's high time you were in bed.
You like classical music, don't you?
I heard an unusual sound.
He can't come to the office today because he doesn't feel well.
I went on deck from my cabin.
Today is a boring day.
This problem is not avoidable.
If I knew his address, I would get in touch with him right away.
In case of fire, break the glass and push the red button.
You can buy stamps at any post office.
Never tell a lie!
Tom accepted Mary's invitation.
The date of manufacture is shown on the lid.
I'm in love with you.
She ditched me.
As a rule, Japanese people are not good at foreign languages.
The exact temperature is 22.68 degrees Celsius.
Take off your shoes.
It is not good to break a promise.
Her mother has gone shopping.
He is telling a lie.
He likes tigers.
Hurray!
The war lasted nearly ten years.
My sister works at the United States Embassy in London.
I know a good Italian restaurant.
Our hens laid a lot of eggs yesterday.
The President of France will visit Japan next month.
I tried to teach myself how to play the guitar.
Every country has its national flag.
Can she ride a bicycle?
Cecil lit a candle.
She was in a silk dress.
Go to the garage.
Tom got fired.
Our dog is in the kennel.
I like Korean food.
I missed the train.
She came without notice.
He came without notice.
The Queen is to visit China next year.
I don't think I'll be able to hold in my anger any longer.
I asked him about the accident.
Heaven and hell exist only in the human heart.
He hid himself behind a large rock.
He stuck the book in his bag.
He lost the bet.
The best of friends must part.
I hid myself so that I might not meet him.
What do you do for a living?
She attained the age of eighty one.
She asked me if I knew Tom's address.
Break this glass in case of fire.
The forest is teeming with monkeys.
From now on, I will not use that word.
What a shame!
Let's start translating!
The Japanese attacked Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941.
I think, therefore I am.
I've broken my glasses.
Ken wants a bicycle.
Learn Italian.
The murder remains a mystery.
He makes mountains out of molehills.
One night a merchant was walking up the slope on his way home.
Tom ran out of money.
Tom has three sons.
Negotiations lasted many days.
I'm afraid she will turn down my request.
Tom has been put in jail.
Tom went to jail.
Her English is excellent.
You'd better hurry.
She gave me a pretty doll.
Once upon a time, there was a beautiful princess.
Go.
Let's get back to our sheep!
Run and hide in the mountains.
Brazil was visited by the Pope.
An eye for an eye, a tooth for a tooth.
Tom has a low-pitched voice.
That dog jumped.
The boss of the company, who is a woman, seems shameless.
It was a pleasure to spend the evening with a smart, funny and beautiful girl like you.
You have very sexy legs.
I won the gold medal.
They won the silver medal.
We won the bronze medal.
Consider divorce.
They haven't seen each other since the divorce.
Nothing should prevent divorce.
Many couples end in divorce.
I want to buy this toy doll.
She gave him hell.
Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, but today is a gift. That is why it is called the "present".
Stars twinkled in the sky.
It was like a bolt from the blue.
I think, therefore I am.
I am a translator.
Italian is my mother tongue.
The car came to a smooth stop.
I just ate sushi and drank beer.
Their plan resulted in failure.
God, hear my plea.
He worked as a diplomat for many years.
My uncle deals in fish.
My mother didn't mention it.
No animal can exist without plants.
Please turn off the radio.
Please turn off the radio.
Don't get angry!
When did you finish your studies?
The terrorists will come down from the mountains in a week.
His behavior aroused my suspicions.
We're going out for a meal on Friday.
Can you identify the man in this picture?
Tom was killed by lightning.
He was guilty of murder.
Will you permit us to leave now?
Music affords us much pleasure.
I talked my father out of smoking.
Their company survived the crisis.
Her father intends her to be a pianist.
His attempt ended in failure.
The mayor will shortly announce his decision to resign.
Shortly after the accident, the police came.
He has an outstanding talent for music.
Your philosophy of life varies from mine.
Ken has a guitar.
She plays the guitar.
Today, I met my new philosophy teacher.
The universe is infinite.
He bought a pair of shoes.
You're frightening me.
We should do away with the death penalty.
The organization plays a principal role in wildlife conservation.
I like listening to classical music a lot.
You aren't really going to kill Tom, are you?
Why did Tom cancel his trip?
He is very peculiar in his behavior.
He painted a picture of roses.
He lost his balance and fell off his bicycle.
Tom got these tickets for free.
My mom bought me a new skirt.
I don't have a bike.
Can she play the guitar?
Many a little makes a mickle.
He may have told a lie.
His words offended me.
This is life!
This letter purports to be his resignation.
Get an egg from the refrigerator.
The pond froze over.
He wouldn't let anyone interfere in his personal affairs.
Please contact me by mail.
A young dog is called a "puppy."
Don't judge a man by the way he looks.
I would like to walk along the river.
Don't put the wet towel in the bag.
It is expensive to live in Japan.
Smoking is dangerous to health.
This is the fifth concert by this orchestra.
They were clearing the snow from the sidewalk with a shovel.
Tom shared a well with his neighbor.
Tom is on death row.
The wound was fatal to him.
There are very many people who read simply to prevent themselves from thinking.
They don't know that I'm Japanese.
That's why I came late.
We spent the entire day on the beach.
I'm a little angry with you.
Money's tight for me this month.
I don't like these remarks.
I confirm my presence.
It's very hard to get rid of bad habits.
Tom does not know the difference between reality and fantasy.
Tom doesn't know the difference between Rome and the Roman Empire.
Every cloud has a silver lining.
In total there are 9 people in my family.
He handed me the letter and left.
How did you come up with this crazy idea?
Enjoy the moment.
If I were you, I would not have said such nonsense.
He wears shoes but wears no socks.
I'd better drive you home.
This book is too large to go in my pocket.
Urgent business prevented him from coming.
Don't talk while you have food in your mouth.
The skirt is green.
He retired at the age of 65.
Her beauty is indescribable.
Kyoto is visited by many tourists.
I was pleasantly surprised.
I really missed you when you were in France.
You should assume that email messages aren't private.
After she had read the letter, she tore it to pieces.
He drowned in the river.
He's afraid that he might be late.
There was silence as the judge pronounced sentence.
Everything genius is simple.
We got rid of the mice in his house.
Make a good translation of the sentence that you are translating. Don't let translations into other languages influence you.
You'll have some difficulty in carrying out the plan.
She told him she wanted a divorce.
You like elephants.
I put the money into the safe.
Is there much food in the refrigerator?
Which do you recommend?
Do I sound in love?
Tom and I were just talking about you.
He made a promise to take me to the movies.
Sooner or later, we'll have to buy a new TV as ours is a very old model.
You can't put two saddles on the same horse.
My host family gave me a hearty welcome.
I go to the city pool every day.
I was almost home when the car ran out of gas.
On foot, you'll arrive within thirty minutes.
Don't be late for school tomorrow.
I got up too late and was late for school.
I fear we are too late.
The lake has frozen over but I'm not sure the ice is strong enough to walk on.
What's the age of the universe?
He called out the name of the winner.
Are you full?
Are you angry at me?
She persists in saying that her analysis is correct.
Walk along the street and turn left at the third intersection.
She walked away without acknowledging me.
I can't shut it down.
Let's begin with this problem.
For comfortable weekly shopping you have to have a car.
The teacher tried to interest the students in current events.
It's the first time he has run across French.
Your ad could be here.
We must work hard.
When I saw my uncle yesterday, he told me that he had returned from London three days before.
We ate fresh fruit after dinner.
Suddenly, it became noisy.
He knows how to behave in public.
A lot of policemen guarded the hall.
Composers create music.
Please put your shoes on.
It was five years ago that I graduated from college.
He stressed the convenient aspects of city life.
This sound of danger lent me wings.
I just wanted to check my email.
The king and his family live in the royal palace.
She looked at several dolls and decided on the most beautiful one.
It's very sad.
Gold is heavier than silver.
The castle is worth visiting.
I think I'm going to faint.
I need a translator.
Your threats don't frighten me.
You shouldn't judge a person by his looks.
The towel is in the bathroom.
We are all looking forward to seeing you and your family.
Draw a line on the paper.
Maurice Ravel had a nice bike.
Wisdom is better than riches.
Which do you like better, cycling or jogging?
He had to take care of his dog himself.
It may rain around noon.
Is there a post office near here?
Is there a post office near here?
I like chicken.
You've taken a long time eating lunch.
Who wrote that poem?
Who is your favorite player?
The sun is about to sink.
To make matters worse, he fell ill.
Each boy has a bike.
Tom was just being polite.
Free Admission.
She is on death row.
The explosion frightened the villagers.
An old man broke into our conversation.
Today is Independence Day.
Tom opened the refrigerator.
Back off!
I suggest you keep out of this.
The bomb exploded two days ago.
I've taught myself to play the guitar.
Is it free?
The lawyer brought up new evidence.
The Japanese eat three times a day.
Are they Japanese?
Is he Japanese?
I was thinking about what she had said to me.
I write in my diary every day.
I didn't want to spend any more time trying to convince Tom to study French.
I am sorry to trouble you.
This is why I fired him.
I'm very grateful for your help.
He's not my boyfriend. Just a friend with benefits.
It's a pretty house.
The houses and cars looked tiny from the sky.
Every player did his best.
January, February, March, April, May, June, July, August, September, October, November and December are the twelve months of the year.
The bubble burst in the air.
I went to school on foot in those days.
Keep cool.
What happened to them is still a mystery.
Oil has been discovered under the North Sea.
If you had not eaten so much, you would not be so sleepy now.
I must resist.
Your theory is crazy, but it's not crazy enough to be true.
Does this bus go to the beach?
Does this bus go to the beach?
Tom is small.
The ambassador returned.
I don't feel like translating this sentence.
I was surprised by his sudden appearance.
Why is Esperanto the ideal language for communication?
You like elephants.
He was elected mayor of the city.
Children sometimes lack patience.
The more cheese, the more holes. The more holes, the less cheese. Thus: The more cheese, the less cheese.
He said he would run 200 kilometers in a day and he did.
He stands about seven feet.
That's quite a story.
How to get that done?
Her cheeks burned with shame.
I'm very thirsty.
I bathe every day.
I take a bath every day.
I've missed another chance.
I lost another chance.
I lost another chance.
He is better than any other player in the team.
He reddened like a schoolboy.
We will miss you terribly if you leave Japan.
Our teacher has a wonderful sense of humor.
I was late because I was sure that the lessons started later.
The photo takes me back to my childhood days.
Hail!
I don't believe that ghosts exist.
Peter always makes a mountain out of a molehill.
It was raining hard, but she insisted on going for a drive.
Unique ideas helped him to earn a high income.
Once a bad habit is formed, it is hard to get rid of it.
It is hard to master it in a year or two.
The darkness has not overcome it.
It took a long time, but in the end I was able to convince him.
It's easy to make friends, but hard to get rid of them.
There is no water in the well.
Brush your teeth after eating.
I am a Roman citizen.
I found him honest.
We arranged the books according to size.
You can walk, or alternatively, I'll drive you there in my car.
Without your help, I would have drowned.
Do you have a minute?
Tom doesn't have any siblings.
Tom doesn't have a TV at home.
Tom doesn't have a sister.
Tom doesn't have a cat.
Tom doesn't have a car.
You will have to go through hardship.
The war lasted two years.
Where is my diary?
The milk is in the fridge.
Playing with fire is dangerous.
Her husband is heavily dependent on drugs.
Juan is getting dressed.
It's a very dangerous sport, where a slight mistake can lead to serious injury.
Many soldiers were wounded in the battle.
The factory produces thousands of bottles every month.
Our country is in a crisis.
She attempted to commit suicide.
She tried to commit suicide.
You're doing it on purpose!
I can't find Tom. Has he gone already?
I need a stamp.
I'm sleepy.
I think it's sad to not have any friends.
I really appreciate your kindness.
She put up the new curtains today.
I visited the village he was born in.
I am talking with Tom.
Mrs. Ionescu, I'd like to ask you something.
I am very curious.
I am very curious.
Hick the woodcutter cuts wood.
He has a bicycle.
You are not a good person. You know that, right?
Teach me how to fold a paper crane. I forgot how to fold it.
Tom felt awkward.
My office is located on the fifth floor.
Tom has three uncles.
At the moment, there isn't anyone in the office.
Girls are wearing short skirts these days.
The boy playing the guitar is my brother.
Tom forgot to turn off the light.
The clock is ten minutes slow.
The heart of man is the place the devil dwells in; I feel sometimes a hell within myself.
Tom didn't have the money.
We have to expect the worst.
Only 16 percent of the teachers of this school are female.
Tom had no one to help him.
She's a very wise mother.
Tom had no money to pay for a cab.
Put away your toys.
You'd better avoid discussion of religion and politics.
Paris is one of the cities I visited last year.
The French flag is blue, white and red.
Such a man ought to succeed.
My aunt has an apartment for rent for 550 dollars a month.
There is very little probability of an agreement being reached.
Translator, traitor.
She missed him a lot.
Subtract three from eight and you get five.
They dropped an atomic bomb on Hiroshima.
The suspect was innocent of the crime.
The bell rings at eight.
I thought you were only angry with me and not with the rest of my family.
She was absent from school because she was sick.
When are we eating? I'm hungry!
What narrow stairs!
The cat is in the well.
Pass me the salt and pepper, please.
When does it end?
Turn off the radio, please.
The more unique each person is, the more he contributes to the wisdom of others.
The author presented a copy of his latest book to me.
You won't succeed unless you work hard.
I hurried so as not to miss the train.
Tom has never heard Mary tell a lie.
I found this movie very interesting.
No matter how much she eats, she never gains weight.
We sometimes swim in the lake.
I would like to be a pilot in the future.
I really hate dairy products.
I turned my steering wheel to the right.
Who broke the window?
Tom explained the reasons for his decision.
I will count to three, and then I will fire!
Contrary to popular opinion, hair and fingernails do not continue to grow after death.
We were playing on the beach.
Hell is other people.
It was an ideal day for walking.
Is this ladder strong enough to bear my weight?
There is a man by the side of the pond.
One of us should talk to Tom.
I must live up to his expectations.
You can never be too careful.
Who cared for the dog when you were away?
She applied a bandage to the wound.
I contacted my parents.
Not being careful of his health, he fell ill.
They live near the beach.
This is Tom's dog.
He said hello to the woman.
Another step, and you will fall down the precipice.
I have a collection of towels I've stolen from many different hotels I've stayed at.
A short walk brought me to the lake.
I'm angry that she didn't call me.
He didn't carry out his promise.
I tried to convince him that I was perfectly capable of it.
What time was it when you last saw Tom?
The problem began to assume an international character.
Yesterday it was neither too warm nor too cold. It was an ideal day for taking a walk.
He stood for freedom of speech for everyone regardless of color.
Japan is full of beautiful cities. Kyoto and Nara, for instance.
He keeps a diary.
They were shoveling the snow away.
Tom's not very handsome.
There are both advantages and disadvantages to city living.
Long skirts are out of fashion now.
A good beginning makes a good ending.
One cannot survive without money.
It snowed as was forecast.
There are five patients in the waiting room.
Smith died of a heart attack.
Thank you for inviting us to dinner.
It is because light travels faster than sound that we see lightning before we hear thunder.
We hurried to the airport, but we missed the plane.
If you're bored, I suggest you to go to the cinema.
Let's leave the decision to Tom.
When I was young I used to pray for a bike. Then I realized that God doesn't work that way. So I stole a bike and prayed for forgiveness.
We Japanese live on rice.
The crew is busy preparing for the voyage into outer space.
When you send a telegram, brevity is essential because you will be charged for every word.
It's a goat and it is absolutely normal.
When he heard the whistle, he crossed the street.
I'm not a magician.
I'm not a magician.
This coffee shop is cozy.
I can't remember the melody of that song.
We have a break from 10:40 to 11:00.
He turned the corner.
They've crossed the border.
I think I hurt his feelings.
I have no strong opinion about the matter, so whatever the majority thinks is good is OK with me.
Yesterday, I talked for 3 hours with my boyfriend. We haven't seen each other for a week.
Toby can't tell jokes.
He does not care for ice cream.
This transparent liquid contains a kind of poison.
I'll get in touch with you again about this matter.
I began to doubt the accuracy of his statement.
Despair drove him to attempt suicide.
The Japanese take off their shoes before entering a house.
Some of them have committed suicide.
Despite being fascinated with English, many Japanese don't even try to study it.
It's just five in the morning, but nevertheless it is light out.
Tom's way of talking gets on my nerves.
If you act like a fool, you must be treated as such.
The fortress being out of supplies, its protectors had to give up.
Don't talk nonsense.
If you only listen to the testimony of the victim you can't understand the full story of the incident.
I think Tom is going to get fired.
Those are Tom's dogs.
She went shopping.
Land of liberty, land of the future, I salute you!
I hope to go to Japan and beat the Japanese in mahjong.
This may be of use to you.
He was shy at the beginning.
As a consequence of overwork, he became ill.
It is good to have ideals... don't you think?
I met Tom who said he had just been to the store.
Apparently, Tom was late because there was a traffic jam on Rt. 19.
The people hailed the victory.
He is devoid of humor.
He has been sick for a week.
There is no use crying for help. No one will hear you.
It's a stupid idea.
She blushed bright red.
We often went skiing in the winter.
Which shoes do you like?
Tom knew a man whose father was a helicopter pilot during the Vietnam War.
This is a picture of an airport.
Tom has a lot of good ideas.
Aren't you surprised by his answer?
I love to play my guitar.
There are nine million bicycles in Beijing.
I woke up three times during the night.
With or without religion, good people can behave well and bad people can do evil; but for good people to do evil - that takes religion.
The child is stroking a cat.
Who is the team's coach?
He begged his father to buy him a bicycle.
He was under the influence of alcohol when he crashed his car.
Tom was surprised.
According to the weather report, it will snow tonight.
We were stuck for hours in a traffic jam.
Tom was so loaded with work that he would forget to eat.
I hope I can manage to make both ends meet.
Ken collects old coins.
Tom doesn't have enough time for a cup of coffee.
A great many people attended his funeral.
This is the worst of all.
One must be careful about free advice.
The rain follows me everywhere!
The driver was so fortunate as to escape death.
Jack hid the dish he had broken, but his little sister told on him.
I haven't heard from him since then.
Tom asked the waiter for a menu.
Don't talk nonsense!
How long will you stay in Japan?
Stop saying bullshit!
There's no doubt that she'll visit England this summer.
You should put your ideas in writing.
Tom is a minister.
My parents won't let me date.
Please write down what he says.
Spring is over and summer has come.
Do you accept traveler's checks?
Excuse me, do you know what is the weather forecast for tomorrow?
In a democracy, it is important that the press be independent.
Are you afraid of Tom?
He's hard to please.
Tom has a sore back.
Never judge by appearance.
She smokes excessively.
We've all missed you.
May I have your birth date?
The condition of the patients changes every day.
Tom has been a prison guard for ten years.
Where will you have lunch today?
They rushed out of the room.
Tom has two children.
You alone can do it, but you can't do it alone.
She likes short skirts.
I'm begging you.
The results of the experiment were not as we had hoped.
The couple carved their initials into the oak tree.
Tom is very glad that school is over.
Now is the time to start the work to build world peace without atomic weapons.
The teacher was surrounded by her students.
She gave me some practical advice.
Sumo is a traditional Japanese sport.
The smell of the flowers came in through the open windows of the bus.
The boy liked throwing eggs at people from the window of his flat.
Checks are accepted.
My sister is not a good cook, and neither am I.
It disgusts me.
A teenager sometimes acts like a baby.
I think my boyfriend is spying on my emails.
That's too much for my little brain.
The bird flies amazingly quickly.
The accident has caused many deaths.
It turns out that he often eats at his father's restaurant.
That song is very popular with young people.
The baby began to crawl.
My cat killed this mouse.
He cut away the dead branches from the tree.
The fruit smells delicious.
Tom has been hunting for a job since he lost his previous job last year.
My bicycle's been stolen.
She told her children to put away their toys.
After a long argument, I finally persuaded her to go camping.
Little by little they spread further.
Mr Brown is a wool merchant.
Do you really have free tickets for the concert?
I couldn’t help but remark on it.
She threw a suspicious glance at him.
Tom had no options left.
I ran out of fuel.
I don't think this old car will make it to the top of the hill.
English is one of the easiest languages to speak badly, but the most difficult to use well.
It's possible we'll arrive at the Tokyo station around noon.
It is time to stop watching television.
The baby held out his tiny hand.
Tom never felt comfortable expressing his own opinion.
I'll be late for school!
I was surprised at the news of his death.
Many international conferences have been held in Geneva.
Tom's house is just down the street from here.
I want a pet tiger.
The human skull consists of 23 bones.
I forgot my email address.
This is not a drill.
This newspaper is free.
This is suicide!
The children are playing with toys.
We have come to pay you a visit.
I wanted to go to Belgium again, as long as the country was still there.
When you arrive in Osaka, please contact me.
He really likes playing the guitar.
To tell you the truth, I don't care for America.
How shameful!
Could you tell me the way to the station?
She is frightened of thunder.
Father is busy putting up a wall.
I would appreciate it if you could agree to my plan.
I can't touch the corpse without gloves.
There were no customers, so we closed the shop earlier.
I don't recall ever wanting to be a fireman or a baseball player as a youth.
They demanded that the mayor should resign.
He feels happy in spite of his failure.
Before Einstein, scientists used to think that space had no end.
He wouldn't be available until four.
You should leave it for tomorrow.
The main crop of Japan is rice.
I can rip you apart with my bare hands.
I am afraid of offending you.
My university has a dormitory.
He has the advantage of a good education.
It's time to take a bath.
It's time to take a bath.
It's time to take a bath.
Our team lost.
A week is divided into seven days: Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, Friday, Saturday, and Sunday.
Ken calls me every day.
We are looking forward to our uncle's visit.
His dad calls him Tom.
His dad calls him Tom.
Fred followed my mother wherever she went.
The prisoners gave a false alarm.
Liquor is not sold at this store.
She is Tom’s older sister.
He fell into the water and drowned.
A ball hit her on the right leg.
Go to your posts.
I regarded Tom as a friend.
I've finally got the whole set!
The Chinese are a hard-working people.
He took out some coins.
The notebook is not yours. It's his.
Those present at the meeting were surprised at the news.
Mom was innocent enough to ask him: "Would you like any more beer?"
Which doctor is attending you?
There is insufficient light for reading.
It is said that adolescent friendships do not often last.
Long skirts are very much in fashion.
My bike was stolen yesterday.
I was unable to complete the task.
John doesn’t know how to play guitar.
Each of their opinions has both good points and bad points.
The police looked everywhere and couldn't find any trace of Tom.
A good horse knows its rider.
I sat between Tom and John.
I take a bath every day.
Redheads drive me crazy!
How much does he earn per month?
She wiped her face with a handkerchief.
We're running out of gas.
I feel uncomfortable in this chair.
Can I use this bike?
Any watch will do as long as it is cheap.
She waved at him.
Tom keeps a diary.
Go straight up the street for about 100 meters, and you will get to the junction of three roads.
Somebody tipped off the gang members to the police surveillance.
In Thailand, bringing up the children isn't the father's responsibility; it's entirely up to the mother.
Tom believes in magic.
Tom was livid.
What kind of play is it?
He has not realized his own mistake.
The patient is sick beyond all hope.
Our stock of oil is running out.
The funeral was yesterday.
A mirror reflects light.
His plane has not arrived at the airport yet.
Wrap yourself warm, it is cold out there.
I am an American singer.
Are you looking for oil in the area?
You work too much. Have a break!
I will teach you how to skate next Sunday.
It'll take not less than one hour to go there.
He's overreacting.
Tom is overreacting.
This bus will take you to the town.
I bought this coat at a low price.
I have missed you so much.
This will protect your skin.
It's a doll.
The Japanese live on rice and fish.
He is going to run for mayor.
Children often bother their parents.
He caught twenty butterflies.
I didn't know you were such a good cook.
You can visit NHK any time.
I bought a Microsoft mouse.
How was your stay?
They supplied money to him.
You lost the game.
He filled the bucket with water.
He was drunk on beer.
Watch out for thieves around here.
He is responsible for the accident.
It may seem obvious, but sentences you write yourself look the most natural.
Language enable us to communicate with other people.
Tom has a sore throat.
Tom isn't good at math.
I have lunch at noon.
Don't let her go out after dark.
You put far too much pepper in it.
Stop poking me.
He tendered his resignation.
They demanded that the president resign.
I took his part in the discussion.
I am almost 180 centimeters tall.
She passed the examination with ease.
She passed the examination with ease.
He hung his coat on a hook.
He devoted himself to the study of English literature.
The accomplishment of this task took many years.
All at once we heard a shot outside.
How long do you think it will take to go to the airport?
You are sending me a Japanese doll, right?
He is very talented.
A flock of birds whirled across the sky.
He has a fear that his brother will fail.
Waiter, I need a knife.
I'm going to work out the problem by myself.
I don't envy him.
We are liable to judge others by the clothes they wear.
In the morning, the air is cool.
The furniture in this office is really modern.
I was going on foot.
If he'd had time, he would have visited us.
Squirrels eat hazelnuts.
I detest Tom.
There were a great many people at the airport.
In some attempts, it is glorious even to fail.
You have a sense of humor.
The road is free.
I won't give up on Tom!
Tom has a car.
Father, forgive them; for they know not what they do.
The class was divided into four groups.
And why, pray tell, did you think I would agree to that?
He has visited Europe several times.
America is not the most democratic nation.
After a brief speech the mayor fielded questions from reporters.
Watch your step or you'll get into trouble.
The music gradually died away.
The date on the coin is 1921.
Tom has something in his right hand.
I thanked her for her kind hospitality.
There is no sense in your worrying about your health so much.
Wipe the sweat from your brow.
I have to translate the sentences.
She spends over a third of her time doing paperwork.
She is not tall.
The company always strives to satisfy its customers.
Judging from his appearance, he must be a rich man.
I always go to school on foot.
I'm a good cook.
I'm looking forward to your visit.
My sister is playing with dolls.
Can you work out the total cost of the trip?
I saw the match on television.
I'm honored to work with Tom.
They moved here three years ago.
She dreamed of becoming a nurse.
In the 90s, Ireland, Hungary, Romania, the Czech Republic, Slovakia, Switzerland and Georgia abolished the death penalty.
The people I lend money to never pay me back.
That is very expensive.
I'm already able to write Chinese characters.
He felled a tree in his garden.
You should be careful when you drive a car.
I feel like taking a bath now.
I met him about noon.
The teacher pointed her finger at me and asked me to go with her.
I'm going to run fifteen kilometers today!
Do you have shoes and socks?
He came to see me any time he felt like it.
Is this Tom's bag?
He asserted that he was innocent.
A burglar broke into the shop last night.
She is devoted to her children.
Tom can't manage on his own.
A metre is 100 centimetres.
She carried that habit to her grave.
He shared his soup with me.
That accounts for all of Tom's team.
They say Tom is gone.
The test samples were due to arrive three days ago.
Tom has a good chance of getting elected.
Tom had no reason to be angry.
Tom is my business partner.
The kitten couldn't get down from the tree.
This book is widely available in libraries.
To he who is sick, honey has a bitter taste.
Tom filled out the job application form.
The teacher recommended that I read Shakespeare.
Not all the houses around here were burned down in the fire.
Take care not to break the eggs.
I broke a glass when I did the dishes.
I'd like you to put me back on the list.
Wisdom cannot come without experience.
They are going to send up a rocket.
He convinced his daughter not to marry Tom.
That young man is very keen on cycling.
The reason Tom is fat is because he eats too much and doesn't get enough exercise.
He was suffering from a bad headache.
Father bought me a new bicycle.
I bought five metres of fabric in the shop.
I will wait outside.
I will wait outside.
Tom ironed his clothes.
He's in the well.
She was so curious that she opened the box.
The thought of her going alone left me uneasy.
You are free to leave any time you wish.
It snowed for many days together.
She stripped the child and put him in the bath.
He is eighteen months old.
He was English.
What is the maximum dosage for an adult?
You'd make a good diplomat.
He took a notebook out.
Time and circumstances bring wisdom.
I think it's time for me to reconsider how I've been living.
You must stick to your promise.
Your watch is ten minutes slow.
I hate mosquitoes.
I turned the lamp off and fell asleep.
Where are you having lunch today?
I dreamed that I was dreaming.
She hurried to the station only to miss the train.
The cedi is Ghana's current currency. Its symbol is "₵".
I've worked out a good plan.
She was right in the middle of cutting cucumbers.
He sent me an urgent telegram.
Never give up. Never surrender.
Please don't forget to put the letter into the mailbox.
But your wish is the most original!
He failed the exam because he had not studied enough.
The airport is over there.
The brightness of the sky showed that the storm had passed.
Mother often got angry with us.
Yamada isn't very popular with the girls in his school year, but he's popular amongst the younger students.
Oh, he was just talking about how children are the builders of tomorrow or some other bullshit.
A button has come off my coat.
You've got a great sense of humor.
I didn't feel like studying because the noise outside was getting on my nerves.
Let's get down to business.
The tap is off.
A boy ran up to me.
They visited the town every now and then.
The words themselves are on the tip of my tongue, but I just can't say it.
I watched TV during my breaks.
We were able to see the sunset from our window.
I wished him a good journey.
That girl can't ride a bicycle.
The earth moves around the sun in 365 days.
I was foiled in my attempt.
Tom was badly beaten before being killed.
They say Tom's brain isn't functioning anymore.
He is going to buy a new bicycle next week.
We ran out of gas in the middle of the desert.
Tom has low blood pressure.
We are all alike, on the inside.
She felt like giving up the plan.
Tom has a bad headache.
He almost never gets angry.
We ran out of gas in the middle of the desert.
Dr. George's secretary is Japanese.
The new secretary types faster than the old one.
Nevertheless, the topic is worth discussing.
They may have missed the train.
Tom had a big argument with Mary.
We treated him in the politest manner possible.
Which kind of player are you?
Which kind of player are you?
The new secretary types faster than the old one.
There are no signs of trauma on Tom's corpse.
Tom shakes his spear in anger at bear.
I will complete what he started.
What happened to them is still a mystery.
He learned to appreciate literature.
You alone can do it, but you can't do it alone.
I asked her to make four copies of the letter.
Iron is used in building ships.
He did not accept their invitation.
I forgot my email address.
Do you mind if I turn off the light?
That experiment was a failure.
The sentence was death, and not the manner of dying.
The King was assaulted by terrorists.
President Hoover tried to solve the crisis.
You cannot undo what has already been done.
I think we're too late.
It cannot last long.
Tom was aware of the difficulties.
I replied automatically when I heard my name.
She dressed herself quickly.
Rome is an Italian town.
He threatened me, but I didn't get scared.
The children were all tired and went to bed of their own accord.
You attach too much importance to what he says.
Wake not a sleeping lion.
My hobby is playing the guitar.
We will give them moral support.
This museum has a magnificent collection of modern art.
This soup is too salty to eat.
It took 22 years to build the Taj Mahal.
The cause of the accident is a complete mystery.
I have many discs.
She takes care of many elderly people.
When I was a child, I played catch with my father.
He has no scruples about lying.
She wears high heels to make herself look taller.
He fell short of our expectation.
She burst into the room.
Will you go shopping with me?
All the evidence points to his guilt.
The earth makes one revolution around the sun in about 365 days.
It's impossible to go out now.
He was a great statesman and was elected president.
It is no use trying to persuade him.
There was no water in the well.
We display grey sentences because they can be useful, but you should be careful. Their meaning may differ a little from the main sentence.
He claimed that he had returned the book to the library.
They passed an uneasy night.
You should acknowledge your failure.
It is no use arguing with such a foolish man.
We waited at the scene of the accident till the police came.
We're quite insignificant, but awesome nevertheless.
Tom has just finished washing dishes.
Sadly many people will believe things told to them via an email which they would find implausible face-to-face.
Tom suggested that we cancel the meeting.
He hid behind the tree.
However, there are instances in history where entire peoples were successfully exterminated.
None of the passengers escaped injury.
We at Tatoeba appreciate your cooperation.
Lightning is usually followed by thunder.
I'm exhausted! I just want to go home, take a bath, and go to bed.
I wonder if it really was a coincidence.
My friend studies Korean.
I have complete faith in my doctor.
The wind is blowing from the north.
I do not allow sleeping in class.
It doesn't matter to me whether she lives in the city or in the countryside.
He never breaks his promises.
He went to Nara.
From space, the earth looks quite small.
Tom didn't have enough experience in dealing with that kind of problem.
The ice is too thin to skate on.
The translation isn't possible.
How was your trip?
February has only 28 days.
A soccer team consists of eleven players.
How much does a kilogram of pineapples cost?
Everybody must be subject to law.
You can fool all the people some of the time, and some of the people all the time; but you cannot fool all the people all of the time.
You are not good for my health!
I am surprised that she refused such a good offer.
He doesn't take care of his children.
This is the window broken by John.
His supporters were afraid.
Do you speak Italian?
A team is composed of eleven players.
You shouldn't break promises.
You shouldn't break promises.
How come you're always so energetic?
Tom was left for dead.
She has a lot of money.
He is proud that his father was a great scientist.
I intended to study medicine in America.
She felt uneasy at the thought of her future.
Betty will be able to come before noon.
This is the window broken by John.
I really appreciate all the trouble you've gone to.
How can I get rid of him?
The fighting there lasted several days.
Since there were no customers, we closed the shop early.
Tom's parents were both teachers.
The atomic number for iron is 26.
Her bad face doesn't scare me even a bit.
I'm totally and completely in love with you.
Is this snake safe to touch?
I can do without this.
The train lurched to a standstill.
Tom took off his clothes and stepped into the shower.
I'll take them to Kate.
Please turn off your engine.
He's out for a walk.
I'm totally and completely in love with you.
I know that some people appreciate my work.
Some of the crew were drowned.
I saw somebody steal the merchandise.
Cool story, bro.
After breakfast, we went for a walk.
He is boiling with rage.
Sally made her brother clean the bathroom.
You are speaking nonsense, my friend.
A storm kept the ship from leaving Kobe.
He helped me to overcome the difficulties.
I'm looking forward to hearing from her.
You are a good cook.
I was very thirsty and I wanted to drink something cold.
Tom vomited blood.
Tom has good hearing.
Tom saw a crack in the wall.
He ate it in no time.
The idea isn't bad.
The plane was about to take off when I heard a strange sound.
I asked Tom about his new book.
He seldom gets angry.
His play was a hit.
Cover the seeds with a little earth.
When I was a child, I would spend hours reading alone in my room.
Where are you bound?
We spoke in a low voice to avoid waking up the baby.
Our factories are working at full capacity.
John tried not to wake the sleeping baby.
I prefer going by foot than bicycling.
It took me ages to pack up my suitcases.
Why don't we go to the bookstore on foot?
He is never in the office in the morning.
The police continued their investigation.
He shall be fired.
He drank a shot of whiskey.
They're professional singers.
Turn the key to the right.
He fell head over heels into the pool.
We shouldn't accept his explanation at face value.
This doll belongs to me.
Do you have a bike?
He was hurt in the accident.
Get dressed quickly.
I need a first aid kit.
We crossed the lake in a boat.
Sir, please fill out this form.
She seemed to be very surprised.
Take three steps and jump.
It is wrong for a man to conceal things from his wife.
He was jealous of my success.
It is dangerous to bathe in this river.
Tom is looking forward to taking some time off.
She is apt to lose her temper.
None of my students failed.
Tom committed suicide by jumping off a bridge.
I have visited America.
How can you make a living from selling newspapers?
His plans are a riddle.
Both of them are very cute.
They were too naive to understand the necessity of studying.
Mr. Smith established this school forty years ago.
A fire can spread faster than you can run.
We have enough time to eat.
She stared at the man in silent astonishment.
Has the house got a garage?
A fierce dog attacked the girl.
The price of rice rose by three percent.
Tom isn't old enough to understand this.
I like rice more than I like bread.
I need an envelope.
That's to me like a flower on lofty heights.
Stay at home till noon.
The place was almost empty.
How is the discovery related to the progress of science?
I went shopping with a friend.
I went shopping with a friend.
If one can say that a tiger is a big cat, one can also say that a cat is a small tiger.
The Dead Sea is a salt lake with the most saline water on earth.
I'm getting dressed.
The police balked the criminal's escape.
Tom got to the airport just in the nick of time.
Seen from the top of the hill, the island is very beautiful.
She has just finished washing dishes.
We sometimes see them.
We hold that he is not guilty.
We did not evolve from monkeys. We share a common ancestor.
Don't be ridiculous! We are not descended from apes, we only have a common ancestor.
Helen has won the prize.
There's a hole in the ceiling.
None of us are perfect.
Which schools is Buddhist thought divided into?
Nobody has been forgotten and nothing has been forgotten.
A single incident can change your life.
He who seeks to control fate shall never find peace.
I'm grateful for what she did.
I'm grateful for what he did.
They were prohibited from leaving the hotel.
You have not changed at all.
I'd appreciate it if you'd help me.
I think his novel is boring.
He has good grounds for believing that.
He has a lot of original ideas.
Since there was no bus, I had to walk.
I was agreeably surprised by the low prices.
Eat fruits!
Even though Tom still had tears in his eyes, he began to smile.
He was finally forced to resign.
We learned as much as possible about their culture before visiting them.
I have been to the post office.
The hunter shot a bear.
Blossoms develop from buds.
Then all of a sudden a good idea came to me.
He is sometimes absent from school.
The girl was gazing at the doll.
He turned off the TV and began to study.
The wind still blows strongly.
To stand on your own feet means to be independent.
Wait until I'm done eating.
There's a possibility that she'll succeed.
Could you actually eat this?
He broke the window intentionally.
Be sure to turn out the light when you go out of the room.
I'd rather die than surrender.
A captain controls his ship and its crew.
This is why he got angry with you.
The student refused to obey his teacher.
The sky suddenly began to darken.
All the children in this class are very polite.
I wish I could figure out how to make Tom happy.
We will contact you as soon as we know.
There used to be a big pond around here.
Tom was taken prisoner.
There were holes here and there.
He formed the clay into a bowl.
There is a red rose in the pot.
He may have missed the plane.
Tom hasn't been here long.
He needs discipline.
If I had known her address, I could have visited her.
He dropped a letter into the mailbox.
I like to eat Korean food.
No gift is more precious than trust.
People are given a lot of pleasure by music.
Tom's funeral will be this weekend.
He let his books fall to the floor.
Don't give up!
Yesterday I was clever and tried to change the world, and today I have become wise and started with myself.
When destiny calls, the chosen have no choice.
The policeman who is easily frightened is funny; the policeman who is indifferent to the misfortunes of others is terrible.
Skiing is very fun.
I am very pleased at the news.
How hot it is!
I will do my best to put such an idea out of your head.
The situation left him perplexed.
If that accident had happened in a city, it would have caused a disaster.
When my mother arrives, she will give me some money to buy the books.
He has a large family to provide for.
She has known him for a long time.
She thanked him for his help.
The future of humanity remains undetermined, as it depends on it.
The judge's decision is final.
From the practical point of view, there are many shortcomings in his plan.
I'm working full time in a bookshop until the end of September.
I found my father's diary that he kept for 30 years.
What platform does the train leave from?
Some say he lost, others say he won, but that's not the point.
There is little oil in Japan.
My brother uses this bike.
How much is that mountain bike?
I don't know how much those two bikes cost.
Your bicycle is similar to mine.
My bicycle was gone when I returned.
It's hard to get to by bike because it's far away.
Mayuko can ride a bicycle.
Mayuko goes to school by bicycle.
Bill can ride a bicycle.
Tom always leaves his bicycle dirty.
The little girl is not capable of riding a bicycle.
That bicycle is too small for you.
This is the same bicycle as mine.
This is Mike's bicycle.
This bicycle needs repairing.
This bicycle belongs to me.
This bicycle has been left here since the beginning of this month.
I'd like a doll, a new bicycle.....and peace on earth!
When did you come by this bicycle?
Did you buy a nice bicycle?
That is the same bicycle as I have.
The price of that bicycle was too high.
Your bicycle is better than mine.
This bicycle is old, but it's better than nothing.
I will go there on foot or by bicycle next time.
I cannot afford to buy a new bicycle.
Keep your hands off my bicycle.
My bicycle is in need of repair.
My grandmother can ride a motorcycle, and what's more, a bicycle.
My sister asked Father to buy a new bicycle.
I got this bicycle for nothing.
I usually go to school by bicycle.
I am still attached to this bicycle.
I have an old bicycle.
I have a bicycle of the latest model.
I found my bicycle gone.
I must ride a bicycle.
I rode my bicycle to the store.
Some of us went by bus, and the others by bicycle.
With a bicycle, I could reach your house in 20 minutes.
The boy riding a bicycle is my brother.
Two people riding on a bicycle at the same time is dangerous.
Don't you have a bicycle?
I will give you this bicycle as a birthday present.
Bicycles keep to the left in Japan.
Don't keep the bicycle in the barn.
It took him three months to learn to ride a bicycle.
His bicycle is different from this one.
He is very pleased with the new bicycle.
He is riding a bicycle.
He mounted his bicycle and rode away.
Can't he ride a bicycle?
He kept it secret that he had bought a bicycle for his son.
He must buy a new bicycle for his son.
She can't ride a bicycle yet.
She bought a bicycle in order to go to school.
She made an attempt to ride a bicycle.
She advised him to use a bicycle.
Some went on foot, and others by bicycle.
Clear the sidewalk of the bicycles.
My mother can't ride a bicycle.
The bicycle under the tree is mine.
I not only gave him some advice, I also gave him a bicycle.
I have a car, a motorcycle, and 2 bicycles.
I like the green bicycle more than the pink.
The purple bicycle costs less than the yellow.
I got this bicycle for free.
Please move your bicycle out of here.
You shouldn't ride a bicycle on the sidewalk.
He found my bicycle.
My father bought me a bicycle.
I was thinking that I would go there by bicycle, but it began to rain.
Get a bicycle. You will not regret it, if you live.
That bicycle isn't his.
He has no bicycle.
I broke both my legs riding a bicycle.
Bicycles are for summertime.
Her bicycle is blue.
The boy clasped the puppy to his chest.
To our great surprise, he suddenly resigned.
I think that whoever created the Universe, a hole in the sky above him, also had no idea what is the "Universe".
Destiny is not a fool, it will not make people meet for nothing ...
Stop tormenting me.
How long have you been staying in Osaka?
He is jealous of her talent.
That would be very sad.
There is a small pond in our garden.
That's right, they've been late twice already.
Tom has a beautiful wife.
Tom and I are old friends.
Turn off the TV before you go to bed, OK?
I am acquainted with the custom.
She persuaded him to do it even though she knew it wasn't a good idea.
She was caschiered in no time.
He announced the next singer.
The tall man looked at Tom and smiled.
I am prepared for the worst.
He has squandered every opportunity I've given him.
She's my professor.
He pressed his ear against the wall.
What time will be right for you?
Patience is the mother of science.
He was angry with his daughter.
The game will probably be canceled.
Last winter, I went to Canada to ski.
Get in touch with me as soon as you arrive here.
No one is allowed to translate this sentence.
My tie is orange.
You need to be more careful.
Tom gambled away a fortune in one night.
The accident almost cost him his life.
You were late for work.
I haven't met with Tom recently.
His behaviour annoys me.
She is not a nurse, but a doctor.
The toy department is on the fifth floor.
Light blue is the color of the sky and, consequently, is also the color of the sea, lakes, and rivers.
What do you have to add to 17 to get 60?
The man I was talking to is my English teacher.
Tom signed the contract.
Tom has lost interest in studying French.
You made a wise decision.
The glass is half full or half empty?
Tom is not here now.
You made me lose my mind.
Tom isn't easily surprised.
She was skiing all though the day.
I didn't turn off the light.
He acquired Russian quickly.
He went by bicycle.
I want to say goodbye.
I play the guitar in my spare time.
At that time, the train was terribly crowded.
Eventually the salesman persuaded me to buy the expensive machine.
We were impatient for the concert to begin.
Your shoes are here.
It is no use trying again.
Oh God. I'm not looking forward to cleaning the bathroom.
I'm really careful.
I need an envelope, a piece of paper, and a pencil or a pen.
I'll bring one more towel.
It's still light out.
Dress warmly.
I sometimes escape from my office and have a cup of coffee.
Don't be late for work.
We named our only son Tom after my grandfather.
It seems to me that they will be late.
He earned no more than ten dollars a day.
I learned how to ride a bike when I was six years old.
I asked Tom to open the window.
I bought this book at the bookstore in front of the station.
Turn off the light, please.
She has buried her only son.
The boy drew a picture on the wall.
I was dreaming about you.
She's seventeen years old.
I refuse to be treated like a slave by you.
Candies are not real food.
I envy him.
The monument was set up in the park.
The pigeon has flown away.
My sister can play the guitar very well.
Tom has three daughters.
What's the accusation against him?
I was happy for her unexpected visit.
In China, there's a saying that you can't judge a person by appearance.
I persuaded the policeman not to shoot the monkey.
I prefer walking to driving in a big city like Tokyo.
I'm not drunk.
You surprised everybody.
There was no taxi, so I had to walk home.
It seems that his father is a lawyer.
That nurse is very kind and polite.
Tomorrow is the last day of school!
Stop bugging me!
Kelly eats like a horse.
All of the flowers are paper.
Her decision to move to Chicago surprised us.
I am very grateful to you for what you've done for my family.
You keep out of this.
You're already big enough to do it by yourself.
I was born on February 14, 1960.
All of my friends like computer games.
I cannot fire Ken. He's a good worker.
The players marched triumphantly across the field.
Say hello to Jimmy.
I am eighty-five years old.
Immediate measures are needed.
Why is it necessary to resolve conflicts?
His sudden appearance gave rise to trouble.
By other's faults wise men correct their own.
The rice is delicious.
Birds always return to their nests.
The price of oil is going up.
Without air, nothing could live.
Thank you for your warning.
Advances in science don't always benefit humanity.
Everybody started waving his flag.
Don't hesitate to ask questions.
My bike was stolen last night.
Don't judge people by appearance.
Are you eating lunch?
He has postponed his departure until tomorrow.
If you eat so much, you'll get sick.
He knows how to make good use of his time.
He sank under the weight of age.
Your remark is irrelevant to our argument.
In fact, I should thank you for this.
We know that all men are mortal.
Tom's work environment was good.
Tom frowned.
His work is washing cars.
I have to part with my old furniture.
This shirt needs to be ironed.
I don't understand British humour.
They're late, as usual.
He has too many books.
I am Japanese.
Shit!
I won't be late.
Tom doesn't have time to talk to you now.
He put his thoughts on paper.
She asked them to take their shoes off.
He didn't do it on purpose.
So, you giving up?
The child missed his mother very much.
He was jealous of their happiness.
I wish I earned more money.
She dried her eyes.
She only reads prose.
They hated Tom.
He interpreted for me.
Tom's answer surprised me.
A. Lukashenko said that “parliament is a school, and the people who graduated from this school shouldn’t be lost”.
Kawa is an implementation of Scheme for JVM that allows to take advantage of all the Java’s libraries.
The lawyer has many clients.
How do you stand this heat?
The beauty of that country is beyond description.
The window is open.
He missed the last train.
You ruined all my plans.
It was terribly cold yesterday.
It's been a long time since we last saw each other.
MRI stands for Magnetic Resonance Imaging, whereas CT stands for Computed Tomography.
I'm beginning to lose patience.
He is in touch with all kinds of people.
Don't be late for the train.
You are a professional, but I am an amateur.
His idea doesn't make any sense at all.
The strong should take care of the weak.
Take care not to drop the bottle.
This medicine will take care of your headache.
Their child is of indeterminate sex.
I'll give you a ride home.
I like Korean cuisine.
I like reading by daylight.
She came to see me.
He fell overboard and was drowned.
This is not a tiger.
The airport is closed.
No, that's not true.
Once bitten, twice shy.
Oil and water don't mix.
We won the battle.
For nothing this wide universe I call, Save thou, my rose; in it thou art my all.
The shoes are worn out.
YouTube is the source of fame of brand new stupid singers like Justin Bieber.
One can't live without water.
I don't want to miss the plane.
I have to eat, too.
I don't know how much this motorcycle is.
I am thankful for my family.
A cat dashed out of the room.
She dashed downstairs.
His illness dashed all his hopes.
I am eating lunch with my sister.
With great effort he climbed up the tree.
We have to play fair, whether we win or lose.
The enemy launched an attack on us.
Don't tell crude jokes in the presence of my father.
You are three centimeters taller than me.
Is it true that you came by plane?
He makes three times more money than I do.
I am looking forward to your letter.
Do you have a doctor or nurse in this hotel?
Last night you forgot to turn off the radio, didn't you?
The little girl has a doll in her hands.
The administration approved the budget.
Don't take things so seriously.
I was in São Paulo in February.
If I'd known you were sick, I would have visited you at the hospital.
He'll come at noon.
Tom's mother was a wise woman.
As he was about to fall into the river, he took hold of the tree.
It's expensive though.
She takes great pride in her stamp collection.
Have you already talked with Tom?
The nurse cared for the patient very tenderly.
Not all birds build nests.
Do translators use Tatoeba?
Do you use Tatoeba when you translate?
A bad workman always blames his tools.
Tom has a pain in the shoulder.
He is now setting things in order in his room.
He is now setting things in order in his room.
I accompanied her on a walk.
I accompanied her on a walk.
My older sister plays the guitar well.
It is possible that you win the competition.
Tom is riding a bicycle.
These shoes are expensive, and what is more, they are too small.
Can you please tell me where the restaurant is?
This custom became extinct a long time ago.
That is why I am not an avid bike rider.
I admit that he is sincere.
His death was a bolt from the blue.
Next time you come to see me, I will show you the book.
We have to avoid a conflict as far as possible.
Bullshit.
The burglar gained access to the house through a window.
She was wearing a red skirt.
He barely escaped death.
The factory produces cotton goods.
My grandmother had been sick for a week when I visited her.
My grandmother had been sick for a week when I visited her.
My grandmother had been sick for a week when I visited her.
My grandmother had been sick for a week when I visited her.
They intended to increase the military budget.
It's really cool here.
The factory will begin to produce next year.
Short skirts are already out of fashion.
Short skirts have already gone out of fashion.
Short skirts have already gone out of fashion.
You must encourage him to try again.
If it gets boring, I'll go home.
He asks me to be attentive.
He asks me to be attentive.
Who was to win this match was a foregone conclusion.
School is boring.
He is always partial to the company of girls.
He is always partial to the company of girls.
I want to know who broke this window.
We got into a car.
Tom got so absorbed in his work that he forgot to eat.
Tom's decision to get married surprised his family.
He refused to believe that she was guilty.
Tom fell off his bicycle.
Somebody touched me.
She is convinced that her son is still alive.
Close the safe.
At this age, the meaning of life began to interest me.
Traffic accidents are increasing year by year.
This is the flag of Japan.
How did the secret get out?
But that isn't true.
The rainy season will be over in another two weeks or so.
Could you send it by email?
Where are my shoes? "They are under the bed."
The old man named the wooden doll Pinocchio.
A girl drowned in the pond yesterday.
She isn't surprised at all.
The boy who writes best wins the prize.
I'm afraid my child may be taking drugs.
I bought the black bike instead of the red one.
We're here to protect you.
Our garden produced an abundance of cabbages last year.
Our garden produced an abundance of cabbages last year.
I'm sure that he'll get angry.
Painters such as Picasso are rare.
Be careful when you cross a road.
Be careful crossing the street.
He hid his sadness behind a smile.
We are asked to introduce ourselves in turn.
Yesterday I was on my way home from work when I ran smack into my old girlfriend.
We will bury you.
We will bury you.
I cannot plant trees here. This land is too dry.
She didn't visit anybody.
She didn't visit anybody.
Do you know where Miss Hudson lives?
Tom drowned in Lake Superior three years ago.
Tom's mother is a very good cook.
Tom's mother is a very good cook.
The devil lurks behind the cross.
It was a complete failure.
The sea was full of boats.
Do you think Tom is guilty?
This land belongs to the Royal Family.
This land belongs to the Royal Family.
He cut the apple in half.
You never appreciated the things I do for you.
I don't want to run such a risk.
I'll bring you something to eat.
Where are my dragons?
I will not add sentences in Russian.
I am adding salt to my food.
Now let's hurry to school.
I'm just about to whack you on the ears with a spoon, you monkey.
Blood runs in the veins.
He was robbed of all his money.
It is impossible to read her handwriting.
A Frenchman, for instance, might find it hard to laugh at a Russian joke.
Don't interrupt me when I'm talking.
This word has a double meaning.
According to the weather forecast, the rainy season will set in next week.
The man who nearly drowned began to breathe.
He ate fruit and vegetables.
It's raining outside.
He has absolute power.
He has absolute power.
Take these goats to the mountain.
They eat a lot of rice.
He is always cool.
Can you name anyone that we know who is as talented as he is?
He wasn't happy in spite of all his wealth.
They have access to the library.
We drove through unfamiliar territory.
I want to get drunk.
The boy is obedient to his parents.
I feel bad about not having gone to his funeral.
We insisted on its importance.
They insisted on my attending the meeting.
I'd love to be able to spend less time doing household chores.
Do you have any idea where Tom put the keys?
Mr. Hirayama is a very good teacher.
She visits us every other day.
He was too tired to walk any more.
The seeds of evil deeds are evil thoughts.
Hold the ball with both hands.
Look at a baby sleeping in the bed.
Each of them was given a prize.
Tom bought two copies of the book.
Who stole my basket with the meat?
Who stole my basket with the meat?
I threatened to reveal his secret.
No swimming.
I'm worried about Tom.
This book is unique in many ways.
Pray forgive me!
Our project fell through.
Who is the happiest of men? He who values the merits of others, and in their pleasure takes joy, even as though 'twere his own.
I was a teacher.
I can pilot a helicopter.
I never go shopping on Saturdays.
The Netherlands is a country of cycling.
He was the brains behind the plot.
She attacked him with a baseball bat.
Was this wall built to keep people out or to keep them in?
Did I forget to write the date?
I think it's time for us to come to an agreement.
That's why I've come late. "I see"
I was afraid I'd be late.
Anger is hard to control.
I'll read a book while you're sleeping.
He survived the plane crash.
I much prefer to work with people.
I had to go there alone.
The meaning of this letter is unclear.
Are you going to take part in the contest?
You are beaten. Give up.
It's boring to stay at home.
I think they'll be late.
He didn't mean to hurt you.
Let me think it over for a couple of days.
She blushed with shame.
The hotel was burned down.
It's his favorite Italian word.
He did it, and what was more surprising, he did it by himself.
He offered his seat to an old woman.
I didn't mean to startle you.
I didn't mean to startle you.
I didn't mean to startle you.
I didn't mean to startle you.
Now, he's hiding like a mouse.
Oil has been discovered under the North Sea.
He bade us farewell, and went away.
I am not a doctor, but a teacher.
Which do you prefer, rice or bread?
You can't enter here unless you have a pass.
Mr. Obama wants to move to Tokyo from Osaka.
The singer is known to everyone.
Many young Japanese people are drifting aimlessly in life.
Shizuko composed a poem about the change of the seasons.
She tied him to the chair.
I didn't attend his funeral.
I didn't attend his funeral.
He was elected captain of the team.
At last the rats came to the river.
Wow!
Yesterday afternoon I did my homework, then I saw my friends.
Historians are not sure who his father was.
The soup is too salty.
He wouldn't harm a fly.
I'm very sleepy now.
I'm proud that my father is a good cook.
Could you get in touch with him?
I cannot but accept his invitation.
The toilet is upstairs.
Tom didn't have enough experience to do the job well.
All of our attempts failed.
All our attempts failed.
How many times a week do you take a bath?
My mother is a teacher.
Mother told me not to keep company with him.
He's an interpreter in an international bank.
There is a small pond in our garden.
At last, Mario managed to win the princess's love.
I found it difficult to please him.
He did all he could to protect his son.
She's trying to commit suicide.
She wrote down something in her notebook.
Education does not consist simply in learning a lot of facts.
Can you wrap it up for me? It's a gift.
We made camp near the lake.
Can you tell me where the restroom is?
I'm looking for Tom.
The children are building sand castles on the beach.
You aren't the only one who's in love with Mary.
Your wife is going to ask you for a divorce.
They found Tom in the crowd.
I have never translated a book.
I failed the exam.
Could you wrap them up separately?
My problems are very similar to yours.
I was a high school student at that time.
I was a high school student at that time.
Tom has good intentions.
It's a fact you can't deny.
He was among those chosen.
This shoe fits me well.
Elephants have two ears.
The woman is working at the office.
I wanted to become a philosopher.
Be careful.
Be careful.
Don't read my diary!
His story was published in a magazine.
His story was published in a magazine.
Start at once, or you will be late.
I envy him.
Beat it.
Did you see how much this phone costs? It costs an arm and a leg!
Congratulations on your promotion.
Who broke the cup?
We sometimes combine going for a drive with eating the ramen we love so.
Should we go have ramen together again?
The American flag has fifty stars.
If it hadn't been for his help, she might have drowned.
I'm thirsty.
Hey! Nobody is translating my sentences!
I think it is needless to talk about it.
Her mother is a wonderful pianist.
The trouble is that I am short of money these days.
I seldom eat dairy products.
This melody is familiar to many Japanese.
Winter is the coldest season of the year.
She has a sense of humor.
Excuse me, do you have the time?
The fruit is in the basket.
I'm a beginner, too.
She testified against him.
It's easier to make plans than to realise them.
Did you accept his invitation?
The prince thought the young girl had been eaten by a dragon.
I don't like these sweets.
Let's go to the circus tomorrow.
He broke my heart.
He left his family and went to live in Tahiti.
I haven't seen Tom since 1988.
Mother bought a beautiful doll for her.
Won't you come in for a moment?
This drug acts against headache.
His decision to retire surprised all of us.
I was quite surprised.
Call Tom and Mary this evening.
How can I get in touch with you?
The people present were surprised.
The train arrived safely at the station a few minutes ago.
The train was crowded with high school students.
Tom forgot to turn off the stove.
If you tell too many lies, people won't ever believe your words.
Tom opened his eyes and looked around.
Death is inevitable.
I am fed up with talking to you!
I'm late, aren't I?
I don't care about that.
Have a nice trip.
We visited St. Petersburg and Moscow.
I found his house with ease.
That flag is very beautiful.
We lost by a score of three to one.
The stranger challenged Tom to a streetfight.
Where in the U.S.A. is there a Swedish embassy?
I have to dismiss Ken.
Can't you ride a bicycle?
Matter, you see, disappears, only the spirit remains.
My friend is seventeen.
The Soviet people are not afraid of peaceful competition with capitalism.
Could you please tell me where the nearest church is?
This is probably a stupid question, but which is stronger, the tiger or the lion?
Most Japanese eat rice at least once a day.
Our plan has lots of additional advantages.
Please don't interrupt me when I am speaking.
We live in a democratic society.
I'm grateful for your help.
Everyone has the right freely to participate in the cultural life of the community, to enjoy the arts and to share in scientific advancement and its benefits.
The news of his death reached as a bolt from the blue.
History is repeating itself.
Russian is very difficult to learn.
Don't be too long.
I'm friends with Tom.
The surgeon forgot something inside the patient.
Elephants can't ride bicycles.
It's useless!
Circumstances forced us to put off the meeting.
Put out the light.
Catch the ball.
She poured the milk in a bowl.
Tom doesn't blame you for anything.
He sometimes comes to see me.
There are no new messages in my inbox.
You've spoiled everything.
He is an Englishman.
What size helmet do you wear?
Is the customer always right?
I don't know whether I will win or lose.
I thought about the future.
The Soviet troops started to withdraw from Afghanistan.
Tom doesn't have a pet now, but he used to have a dog.
I'm real proud of Tom.
And if everyone started jumping off the ninth floor, would you jump too?
Hope for the best; prepare for the worst.
You can add your sentences to the "favorites", and from there admire how they are translated by others.
He was always true to his promises.
You are impossible.
You broke my heart.
You don't know Tom like I do.
You must be Tom's mother.
I always take a bath before going to bed.
Arabia abounds in oil.
Hurry up, or you'll miss your plane.
Hurry up, or you'll miss your plane.
Tom has big hands.
This is a warning that we must take seriously.
What is this shit?
Her bike is better than mine.
Her bike is better than mine.
We have to figure out a way to make Tom do what we want him to do.
He gave it a new name.
Good friends, good books, and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life.
Epistemology is a branch of philosophy.
He took me for an Englishman.
Let's flip a coin.
We read newspapers so that we may not fall behind the times.
You are a small person.
We should let sleeping dogs lie.
I always kept my promises.
He likes Italian food.
Will you tell me the way to the library?
He is proud of being a British subject.
I'm grateful to you.
The author may commit suicide as he aims at the tastes of public.
I'm afraid I differ with you on this point.
We went to the mountains to ski.
Tom has a good head on his shoulders.
He refused to give them the information.
We can make shoes.
What do you plan to major in in college?
He has already eaten.
We've taken a long hard look at your sales-directed communication and decided to buy some of the weed that you smoke.
Our teacher told us that water boiled at 100 degrees centigrade.
The outside of this box is green, but the inside is red.
Leaves were whirling in the air.
Man is unable to escape death.
You've got plenty of time.
I don't know if he was praying, but he stayed the entire morning in the church.
You may be late for school.
They missed a good chance.
He came to see me.
I beg you to help me.
Tom has three brothers.
Wake up.
He often fails to keep his promise.
She decided to get married to Tom.
He is second to none in mathematics.
I would like to give you a bicycle as a present for your birthday.
It is on this point that our opinions differ.
He came to see me three days before he left for Africa.
Tom has eyesight problems.
I'll bring one more towel.
His accent suggests he is a foreigner.
Do you know if Tom has already eaten?
Has Tom already eaten?
Hang your hat on the hook.
I believe it's time to wake up Robert.
I'm learning how to type.
Tom is thinking.
Don't intrude on her privacy.
Where's the remote?
The dog chased the cat up a tree.
“I’m dying without you.” “I’ll come to your funeral.”
We have really everything in common with America nowadays except, of course, language.
Envy is one of the seven deadly sins.
A wise man would not act in that way.
I'm here to protect you.
She ran over her lines once before she went on stage.
Tie him to a tree.
We've got a lot to do.
Francesca has a fuller figure than many of the other models at the agency.
Visit us tomorrow.
He was eighty-two years old and feeling his age.
Why were you fired?
What were you fired for?
On what grounds were you fired?
I bathe once a day.
Now I realise why she was angry with me.
If I am dull, I am at least industrious.
A Japanese wouldn't do such a thing.
A Japanese wouldn't do such a thing.
Your situation is analogous to mine.
Tears fell down her cheeks.
Tom hid himself behind the curtain.
That's bollocks!
They lit the candles.
A bone stuck in my throat.
He was panting.
They were forced to withdraw.
With the coming of winter, days are getting shorter.
You are a teacher.
His wife has him under the thumb.
Are you seriously thinking about going?
I admit, I'm not the tidiest person in the world.
She is very anxious about his health.
She was the last to cross the finishing line.
The French are our friends.
One man's meat is another man's poison.
It's time to go to bed. Turn off the radio.
The dog and the cat are sleeping together in a basket.
I have high blood pressure.
I have all the time in the world.
There are a lot of fish in the lake.
There is some milk in the fridge.
He looks suspicious.
The discovery of oil was a lucky accident.
I don't find a formula.
He should thank me.
Tom can't afford a lawyer.
When she said "I missed you" she began to cry.
We must punish him severely.
Switzerland is a beautiful country worth visiting.
There's something wonderful about night walks.
That's a great poem.
Butterflies have short life spans.
Butterflies have short life spans.
I can help you learn Russian if you want.
The top is turning clockwise.
Fuck! said Tom simply, but from the heart.
Well, of course, I would never doubt that my coach is right.
One language is never enough.
Tom ran out of gas.
The collection is open to the public.
Esperanto exists despite the 'Esperantists'.
She's in the garden planting roses.
There's never a new fashion but it's old.
Walk faster, or you'll miss the train.
I have never stopped loving you.
I'm afraid to go alone.
Don't be late for work.
Resistance is futile.
What are these tablets?
The cause of his death still remains a mystery.
We have a substantial stake in the venture.
Rabid dogs usually foam at the mouth.
Did you get fired from your last job?
Don't presume to tell me how to raise my children!
How does this disease spread?
Give a man a mask and he'll tell the truth.
They communicate with each other by gesture.
I'll get in touch with you as soon as I arrive.
I'll get in touch with you as soon as I arrive.
The lawyer was expecting him.
I missed the school bus!
You must keep your room tidy.
He's got a broad Scouse accent.
They're washing their hands.
In the class, it was very noisy.
There is no limit to human progress.
Tom keeps his tools in the garage.
I thought about smashing his guitar, but I didn't do it.
We are cut from the same cloth.
I go shopping every morning.
Never talk to strangers.
Wash your hands before you eat.
How did you meet your partner?
Don't be naive.
Want to see a magic trick?
He touched my shoulder.
Get out your notebooks and pens.
We ran a hundred-meter dash.
How I miss you.
I bought a pair of gloves.
Tom fell in the swimming pool.
Can't you ride a bicycle?
Prices have soared.
Once a noob, always a noob.
John is at the airport.
I'm Japanese, but I don't live in Japan.
When well-meaning noobs start giving out advice, expect the end times.
A noob once met Betty and while desperately trying hard not to get killed, ended up killing himself.
I reckon it's time to wake up Robert.
Are you a magician?
She will be late for dinner.
To love and to be loved is the greatest happiness.
A philosopher is a man who can solve all problems, except for his own.
Get me a towel.
He earns three times more than me.
Bullshit.
I'll be at Tom's.
Tom is dumbfounded.
I'll get you a towel.
I'll get you a towel.
She misses him.
I intend to become a lawyer.
He called in to say that he'd be late.
Check with Tom.
Warn Tom.
Do you know Tom?
Do you know Tom?
Do you love Tom?
Do you love Tom?
Do you miss Tom?
Do you miss Tom?
I'm broke.
Is it hot?
It's wrong to deceive people, but worse to deceive yourself.
She loves Tom, not me.
I don't know Tom.
I hope Tom does well.
I just got fired.
I really appreciate your cooperation.
I don't care for beer.
The words of a drunk man are the thoughts of a sober man.
Life is a short walk before eternal sleep.
Milk has to be kept at a relatively low temperature.
Don't be naive.
You must be careful.
She persuaded him to do it even though she knew it wasn't a good idea.
How much does a kilogram of apples cost?
She is in love with him.
We were compelled to put off our departure.
Thoughts are expressed by means of words.
Don't listen to him, he's talking nonsense.
Forget your sorrows.
I usually keep a diary when I travel.
In a democracy, it is important for journalism to be independent.
Tom committed suicide by taking poison.
I can't give up.
I can't give up.
They're eating dinner now in the dining room.
My brother has become a priest.
From this point, we'll go on foot.
The policeman protected the witness.
I'm not English.
I'm hungry and thirsty.
It isn't enough.
I lost my balance on the muddy road.
The old man sat on the bench with his eyes closed.
Money, as such, has no meaning.
What's the name of the mountain range?
What's the name of the mountain range?
The best way to master a foreign language is to go to the country where it is spoken.
My sister washes her shoes every Sunday.
I convinced him that he was wrong.
I convinced him that he was wrong.
I convinced him that he was wrong.
Her speech moved the audience.
They were naive.
This is useless.
I miss my friends.
The DNA test cleared him of all charges.
In a time of universal deceit, telling the truth is a revolutionary act.
The bookstore is near the park.
He is very careful.
Horses are different from donkeys.
What scared you?
What scared you?
I'd like to buy a refrigerator.
I'd like to buy a refrigerator.
The airplane took off ten minutes ago.
Shit, you couldn't have told me earlier?
I'd have had a heart attack and died.
I'd have had a heart attack and died.
She was late once again.
Hundreds of people work in this factory.
She earns a living by selling her paintings.
I didn't know you were such a good cook.
I think it's dangerous for children to swim in this lake.
The box was full of books.
You are impossible.
You are impossible.
Indeed, computers are detrimental.
I want you to have a copy of this.
I want you to have a copy of this.
Don't eat me, gray wolf, I'll sing a song for you.
I told her not to let go of the rope, but she did.
The children were swimming naked.
The lawyer explained the new law to us.
Don't let your boy play with a knife.
Did you kill Tom?
Did you murder Tom?
Did you kill Tom?
Did you murder Tom?
Did you kill Tom?
This doll is a gift from my aunt.
He took off his hat and made a polite bow.
I have studied Italian for a few months.
The girl was afraid to jump down from the roof.
Tom is praying.
She likes the singer.
We shall meet again in Petersburg, as if there we had buried the sun.
Bring me a moist towel.
Bring me a moist towel.
Your son is almost the copy of your father.
It's far too dangerous.
Happiness is real only when shared.
My father goes to work by bike.
He has a great sense of humour.
Tom has a lot of free time.
Children love playing on the beach.
You should get rid of that bad habit.
I do not doubt it in the least.
Thank you for burning my shirt with your cigarette.
I can't leave Tom here.
I had a horrible dream last night.
Excuse me, could you tell me where I can find this street?
I'd like a copy of that document as soon as possible.
I'd like a copy of that document as soon as possible.
I don't want to bother you guys while you're working.
After dinner, bring your guitar along and we'll sing.
Do they take care of the dog?
Oh, there's a butterfly!
When was the last time you prayed?
When was the last time you prayed?
When was the last time you prayed?
How much longer will it take?
No one knows his address but Tom.
They can't have lost the game.
You are a singer.
I met my teacher by accident at the restaurant last night.
I met my teacher by accident at the restaurant last night.
Just between the two of us; are you in love with my sister?
People are not always what they seem.
The war had united the American people.
Finally, she chose another kitten.
You can from outside.
Tom is a winner.
He often offends against our agreement.
Living organisms had existed on earth, without ever knowing why, for over three thousand million years before the truth finally dawned on one of them.
You look as pale as a ghost.
I guess I haven't made myself clear.
You can't give up.
You can't give up.
You hate Tom, don't you?
We haven't seen each other for such a long time.
Our budget is very limited.
You like elephants.
Tom caught the ball with one hand.
Tom walks to school.
You need to save the princess.
You need to save the princess.
She doesn't have enough experience.
She was pleasantly surprised.
We have to study the matter.
Our team lost, 2-0.
Run fast, otherwise you will miss the bus.
Who took the picture?
I look forward to it.
Let's eat while the food is warm.
The woman awakens.
They will take down the house in a day.
Who's the owner of this property?
Only love can break your heart.
Only love can break your heart.
I take it as a sign of hope.
Children should obey their parents.
The rich merchant felt the hour of his death approaching.
What does breakfast include?
Where can I get stamps?
In space, no one can hear you scream.
Bill put aside a hundred dollars for his trip.
I found your diary.
I found your diary.
I really appreciate your offer to drive me to the station.
Get rid of the gun.
Get rid of the gun.
Don't be so impatient.
Don't be so impatient.
I like fruit.
I like fruit.
He surrendered.
Tom has a heavy German accent.
Tom knew the risks.
The fighting lasted one week.
You scared me, Robert!
Dispose of the old magazines.
Dispose of the old magazines.
Your language is your religion.
We are behind schedule.
We went to the beach to swim.
Isn't that skirt too short?
It's too late to apologize now.
The rumor of her death turned out false.
It's boring to stay at home.
There's an opinion that such coincidences are not coincident at all.
Do you believe in ghosts?
Do you believe in ghosts?
Tom thanked me for the gift.
He speaks Esperanto with a slight French accent.
The news spread fast.
In any case, I did my duty.
The room is very cold. The fire has gone out.
Why did you arrive late again?
Thousands of people visited the city.
I'm going out for a while.
Is he your teacher?
Nevertheless, I'm extremely proud.
I want to surprise him.
Do you know Tom well?
Tom doesn't have a bicycle.
When did she break the window?
I have a poor appetite.
We just want to talk to Tom.
We just want to talk to Tom.
Tom joined the Marine Corps.
He is a big eater.
Someone visited her yesterday.
You ran a red light.
Tom is handsome.
I could not refuse.
I'm going with Tom.
Stop calling me Tom.
She fainted when she saw blood.
I study Korean.
Why did you back away?
Have you eaten?
He is washing a car.
This hospital has a lot of new equipment.
A lot of people attended Tom's funeral.
What do you want Tom to do?
I'm ordering you to leave immediately.
I don't think he is sincere.
These shoes are too expensive.
These shoes are too expensive.
Don't you get bored when you're alone?
Deal us the cards.
I did not have sexual relations with that woman.
If you don't go skiing, I won't, either.
In Japan there are a lot of beautiful cities. Kyoto and Nara, for example.
I missed the last train.
He studied on his own.
He successfully realised his dream.
A dust storm is coming.
Please wait a minute!
I was impatient for her arrival.
Don't blame me.
The train is 10 minutes late today.
He took a picture.
Its surface was as flat as a mirror.
Do you have anything to eat?
Tomorrow is Saturday, February 5th, 2011.
Be careful about reading health books. You may die of a misprint.
The bell is ringing.
I will call you tomorrow afternoon.
Tom appealed to his mother to buy a new toy for him.
It's dangerous here.
Who broke the window yesterday?
Tom didn't know how to react.
They found him guilty.
Tom's hands were tied behind his back.
Japanese people in general are polite.
Are we alone in the universe?
This is the way they capture elephants alive.
Tom has got nobody.
Don't drop the soap.
Tell us what you know about Tom.
Do you have any idea what the population of Tokyo is?
Don't interrupt the elderly.
Why pay when you can get it for free?
Columbus was notorious for using the "wave-the-white-flag-then-open-fire" technique, and won many battles this way.
I felt disgust at his behavior.
Where is the Danish embassy?
Such work postulate a lot of patience.
I'm eighteen.
I saw some birds take off.
They can't have lost the game.
I usually wake up at 6.
He is second to none when it comes to debating.
Don't worry about Tom. He isn't a threat.
There is a lot of traffic on that street.
I can't get her out of my mind.
I'll call you as soon as I'm free.
That's insane! Your mom speaks six languages?
Please feel free to eat anything in the fridge.
I played against the champion.
He jumped into her car.
Read the newspaper every day, or you will get behind the times.
Don't break a mirror.
Osamu Dazai killed himself at the age of thirty-nine.
He always keeps his promises.
The teacher told me that Hitler killed himself.
You ruined my life.
Such a man is bound to fail.
Tom didn't have any choice.
I suppose he will be late.
She won a gold medal.
I thought you wouldn't give up.
We will be landing in 15 minutes.
Mt. Fuji could be seen in the distance.
I doubt if he is a lawyer.
His grandfather bought him the expensive toy.
We don't want to cause a panic.
We don't want to cause a panic.
When does the rainy season in Japan begin?
My watch is ten minutes late.
I forgot to turn off the television before bed.
Did you break something?
Did you break something?
Did you break something?
You surprised everybody.
Tom had no further questions.
Nobody's seen Tom.
Let's face it: this sentence is simply bad.
He touched my hand.
I don't have anything more to translate.
Don't interfere in other people's affairs.
I came near being drowned, trying to rescue a boy.
Tom misses you.
Everyone loved Tom.
It is no use arguing with him.
Please look for it.
Please look for it.
If you get into difficulties, don't hesitate to ask for advice.
No one was in the swimming pool.
This day, the living shall envy the dead.
What is music for you, listener, and for you, performer?
I tanned myself on the beach.
I tanned myself on the beach.
She listens to religious music.
He got angry with us.
Tom doesn't allow his children to play with Mary.
I'm trying to rid myself of this bad habit.
Wait, wait just a little while.
I could not persuade him that it was true.
I've been trying to get your attention.
I've been trying to get your attention.
His son wants to be a lawyer.
He married his daughter to a lawyer.
Just don't drop it.
It's so boring.
Do not talk nonsense!
Your study will bear fruit.
He offered his seat to an old woman.
Please give me some kind of medicine to curb the pain.
The doctor has given her some tablets to take away the pain.
By and large, women can bear pain better than men.
He was suddenly struck with chest pain.
Endorphines are natural analgesics.
Han shot first!
Her sudden departure surprised us all.
I will come and see you when I get well.
Where is the embassy?
I have missed you so much!
Life without love is just totally pointless.
Don't touch my bike.
It's not me, I swear!
Keep away from bad company.
The spy burned the papers.
Don't worry about such a silly thing.
It is cold outside.
I am sorry to trouble you so much.
I'm sorry for what I did.
The real estate man told lies to the couple.
I'm sorry I did you wrong.
I'm sorry. I did you wrong.
In the beginning I did not like him, but now I do.
I think I did something to make Tom angry.
Don't be angry with me, for I did it for your sake.
At any rate, I did my duty.
They were completely surprised.
The pigeon has flown the coop.
Do not translate this sentence!
I spoke to Tom last night.
Are you still working with Tom?
She's a smart and independent girl.
I lost my patience.
He contributed a lot of money.
She has gone through many difficulties.
Are you brushing your teeth properly?
He was sentenced to death by firing squad.
A bear can climb a tree.
Make sure to turn off all the lights before going out.
She wants a purple coat.
I don't blame them.
Did you thank him? Did you say thank you?
I'll miss you very much.
My shirt is red and my shoes are dark blue.
It is because you work too much that you are sleepy all the time.
I don't want to translate that sentence.
This kind of dog exists only in Japan.
I'm at the beach.
I was planning on going to the beach today, but then it started to rain.
He doesn't understand British humour.
We lost.
We lost the game.
This car has a better performance than that one.
It is a great convenience to live near a station.
It is a great convenience to live near a station.
This beer is not cold enough.
The little fridge is dirty.
The little fridge is dirty.
The differences were minor, so I ignored them.
Do you have a copy?
Do you have a copy?
Do you have a copy?
The thief broke the window.
That tradition has fallen by the wayside.
Are you still planning to marry Tom?
I'm sorry, I can't stay long.
He got angry.
Thoughts and feelings are expressed by means of words.
Judging from what she says, he's guilty.
You're a traitor.
Put me in touch with her.
I went to the airport to meet my father.
He doesn't have long to live.
I will never violate a law again.
The pilot landed the airplane in the field.
I'm fed up with your constant complaining.
Don't blame this on Tom.
I finally have time to reply to the mail that I have received these past three weeks.
We must obey the law.
I am hoping to get two copies of this book.
The Italian food was delicious.
Turn off the light - I can't sleep.
That's what troubles me.
Tomorrow never comes.
Jeff and Mia are making a last ditch effort to avoid a divorce.
Let's ditch Tom.
He is Japanese.
Don't hesitate. Speak out.
Whenever I see you, my heart tells me that I'm in love.
I'll visit my uncle next week.
I don't want to miss my train.
It's not good to wake a sleeping snake.
You have a good reason to be angry.
He was absent from school for a week.
Where are you going this afternoon?
It is probably a machine translation.
I haven't eaten yet.
Mr Sato called at eleven.
This county is poor in natural resources.
It will not be long before spring comes.
Wipe your shoes on the mat.
It is quite a sorry sight.
Quite by chance, I met my old friend in the airport.
My head still felt giddy.
I haven't had lunch yet.
If I'm late, I'll catch it.
Then she hurried home.
My name is omitted from the list.
This is the place where the battle took place.
This is the place where the battle took place.
His reply was short and to the point.
My patience is worn out.
To make matters worse, his wife fell ill.
His wife goes with him wherever he goes.
I won't put up with this any longer.
I broke the glass.
Where is the information counter?
His house stands on the hill-side and commands a splendid view.
America has the world’s largest economy, and its army is the most powerful.
All writing systems have advantages and disadvantages.
John is very careless about his clothes.
To my amusement, everyone believed my story.
This surprised many people.
I may be old, but I can still ride a bike.
The referee must be fair to both teams.
Are you threatening me?
Put away your bicycle.
He got injured in the traffic accident.
You're wearing out my patience!
I lit the match.
She's very religious.
The boy came running.
You look a sorry sight.
There are a lot of fish in the lake.
Can I pay with a travelers check?
Sorry, I missed the train.
Mr. Hoshino is hard to please.
Tom has a good job in the computer industry.
There are milliards of stars in the universe.
A centimeter is a unit of length.
It's a sign of the times.
What time do you usually get up?
Let's take a short break.
Where is the Greek embassy?
I gathered from his looks he was angry with me.
The worst thing happened.
I rode my bicycle a lot today.
Please make three copies of this page.
Tom has a good sense of humor.
Watch out! There's a big hole there.
He works in the car industry.
Each movement of the dancer was perfect.
I'm gaining weight.
It makes no difference whether you go or not.
I'm going to be late for school!
Do you understand Roman numerals?
She doesn't understand British humour.
Tom is very polite.
Julia's native language is Italian.
Add salt and pepper to taste.
The poet committed suicide in his study.
Where is the Russian embassy?
Wipe your tears.
Everyone here likes Tom.
Everyone here likes Tom.
Everyone here likes Tom.
Everyone here likes Tom.
Everyone here likes Tom.
Everyone here likes Tom.
He provided the boys with food, clothing and shoes.
A dog was run over by a truck.
Father got to his office on time.
There is a continuation.
The Allies then moved east into Belgium.
I don't ski, but I really like to skate.
Do the first example in your workbook.
He's shorter than Tom.
You have to protect your family.
I am studying to be a translator or interpreter.
We can go both on foot.
As usual, Mike was late for the meeting this afternoon.
When I hear this song, I associate it with his name.
Don't bring bad luck.
Modern technology gives us many new things.
Put the eggs in the refrigerator.
He was late to his own wedding.
Last night, my wife and I went to a friend's house for dinner.
The killers are running away!
Don't touch the pot!
This bar is a popular student hangout.
Sorry to bother you.
Please come to my office in the afternoon.
I met a famous scholar at the airport yesterday.
I'm bored and don't know what to do.
She hung up angrily.
Where is the Swedish embassy?
A boy of seventeen is often as tall as his father.
Don't scold her. She's too young to understand.
Tom wanted to become a diplomat.
His answer was negative.
I am going to do my homework when I get home this afternoon.
So the doctor started to examine her.
Tom is brushing his teeth.
Wake up.
He meant no harm.
I assume you are willing to take the risk.
How long is this pencil?
She goes to school on foot.
I have no appetite.
Who's your lawyer?
Your house is fantastic.
Each country has its own customs.
Can you take us to the British Museum?
When they are in danger, they run away.
Look for my cat under the bed.
I look forward to hearing your thoughts on this matter.
Father is trying to figure out his tax.
I don't care what you do.
The defense was pleased by the verdict.
This sort of work calls for a lot of patience.
I slept comfortably last night.
They set up a school.
He's not cut out for teaching.
Contact me by ordinary mail.
Recently, I moved to a new apartment.
Recently, I moved to a new apartment.
He took a coin out of his pocket.
What happened to Tom? Is he dead?
She despised him.
All of a sudden, the lights went out.
He worked more than five hours on end.
I received an invitation.
Put the meat in the refrigerator, or it will rot.
Television enables us to know what is happening today.
Please be sure to turn off the light before you leave.
His lectures are terribly boring.
It was an upset.
I'm looking forward to seeing you.
Contact us to check availability.
According to the weather forecast, it will clear up tomorrow.
No creature whatsoever can live in space.
Last week five students were absent from class.
None of the students were late for school.
You annoy me.
Will it take long to recover?
She came to Tokyo at the age of 18.
I don't trust strangers.
I tried to persuade her in vain.
The paper is too big for the envelope.
He went to Austria for the purpose of studying music.
Tom promised he'd be more careful.
It was Tom's idea, not mine. Don't blame me.
Sooner or later you'll get sick.
We don't trust strangers around here.
We don't trust strangers.
She is probably burning in hell.
Do not trust strangers.
Do not trust strangers.
She moved back with her parents.
He moved back with his parents.
I moved back with my parents.
I moved back with my parents.
What's the forecast for tomorrow?
There is little water in the pond.
We found it hard to change the plan.
The audience consisted mainly of students.
Is there a subway station around?
I think it's better for us to adopt his plan.
I am losing my patience with you.
Could you take me to the cinema?
She is a big eater.
She killed herself yesterday.
She killed herself yesterday.
Are you sleepy?
I feel lethargic.
You won many competitions.
He won many competitions.
She won many competitions.
They've won many competitions.
You shall have a reward.
She always dresses in black.
Newspapers, magazines, and newscasts tell what is going on in the world.
This makes absolutely no sense.
I had a good day in Austria learning to ski.
His words had a great effect on my life.
Oh, gods, my gods, poison, bring me poison!...
Everybody is subject to law.
I tried to persuade him by all possible means.
All aboard!
You will be up against many difficulties.
Get up early, else you'll be late for school.
You will be missed by your friends when you're gone.
When the program finished, we switched the radio off.
Why are you mad at me?
Tom has a private jet.
Could you tell me the way to Madame Tussaud's?
I would like to see you before leaving for Europe.
The forest contains many different plants.
Those boys are sixteen-years-old.
We ate all the candies we found in her room.
The man wore a mask of a tiger.
Our work never ends.
She tried to hide her feelings.
She prayed that her mother would forgive her.
She pleaded with him to stay.
He was the ruler of the Inca Empire.
His office is located in the center of the town.
Don't judge by appearances.
A dog can't climb up a wall.
I can't stand the cold.
Can you climb up that tree?
The monkey climbed up the tree.
Don't despise a man because he is poor.
Iran plans to launch a monkey into space.
I know how to ski.
She wanted to become a teacher.
Take the battery off the machine.
I greatly appreciate your advice.
He shows interest in winter sports.
He skis in Hokkaido every winter.
How far is it from the airport to the hotel?
Which skirt do you like?
He worked last night without taking a break.
When she was young, she was very popular.
He is Japanese to the bone.
They determined the date for the trip.
I like it when my friends translate my sentences.
All humans on Earth are descended from a common ancestor.
I recommend you to go by train.
I recommend you to go by train.
He attempted suicide.
He attempted suicide.
A gun might come in handy.
Though he is over eighty, he is still healthy.
Spring is the season for planting trees.
The number of the chairs in the hall is 80.
Didn't you get Tom's message about today's meeting?
Please cancel my order and refund the money.
Fill out the form below.
The cat ruined my sofa.
His aim is to become a professional singer.
Do you like Italian?
Don't be angry.
The town was full of activity.
Stop following me.
Why don't you stay a while?
Why don't you stay a minute?
Khabarovsk is among the largest cities of the Russian Far East.
We persuaded him not to go.
You're out of touch with reality.
He had a crush on her.
I'm never angry without reason.
How many times a day do you brush your teeth?
He succeeded in climbing the mountain.
I stand for freedom of speech for everyone.
The man attacked her with the intention of killing her.
I'm sick of listening to her complaints.
You almost gave me a heart attack.
It is no use trying to convince him of that.
You should be careful in crossing the street.
You should be careful in crossing the street.
My wife told me to do away with this old hat.
The mere sight of a dog frightens him.
Milk is a popular beverage.
Don't hate me!
His business is growing rapidly.
Tokyo is one of the largest cities in the world.
He went to America to study medicine.
You will drive me mad.
The call is free of charge.
She has a slender figure.
A refrigerator keeps meat fresh.
Water boils at a temperature of 100 degrees centigrade.
I had a seizure.
I had a heart attack.
You should not interfere in other people's business.
Time heals all broken hearts.
They don't have resources.
If a philosopher doesn't have a long, white beard, I don't trust him.
She tore a hole in her dress.
I just want to thank you for all of your help.
We may be late for school.
I'm convinced that my daughter will pass the exam.
Tom has something hidden behind his back.
I want to buy a large sized refrigerator.
I'm sick and tired of this.
The woman was so surprised as to be speechless.
The airplane was just going to take off.
It'll take at least one hour to go there.
All students have access to the library.
After your answer I am convinced that: There are many clever people in Russia.
We were caught in a traffic jam on the way.
I've learnt many things about Greek culture.
I think it's wrong to tell a lie.
I feel powerless.
I have warm feelings for that doll.
He invested a lot of money in stocks.
He explained it in detail.
If you had a time machine, which year would you visit?
Yaakov fed the sheep.
Tom opened the safe.
What exam were you taking?
He passed his property on to his son.
You crossed the line.
You crossed the line.
You must not forget your math textbook again.
We see him every day.
I'm often sleepy.
Did you take a bath?
Where are you heading?
They're walking without shoes.
The crowd acclaimed the new king.
We have a very limited stock.
Why do you have such a restricted imagination?
Why do you have such a restricted imagination?
You have lost, give up!
The airplane flies at a speed of five hundred kilometers per hour.
Viviana has important issues to discuss.
Leaning on his bone-tipped spear for support, Tom rises to his feet.
Father recovered his health.
They can't fire you.
Desperate times call for desperate measures.
I'm going to talk to Tom when he returns home.
What have you learned about Tom?
I've learned a lot by watching Tom.
Language learning never ends.
He gave a flat refusal.
The students burned their textbooks.
He is washing your car.
Where was he headed?
He has overcome many obstacles.
My house is situated near the station.
I can't reformat my harddrive. It's too big.
We survived by sheer luck.
These shoes are hers.
Is there a telephone nearby?
The new government has financial troubles.
He was a pioneer in this field.
The train will arrive at the station before noon.
The audience were excited by the show.
Teenagers often wear strange clothes.
There cannot be progress without communication.
The movie skips the whole story of the dead boy.
Where exactly is your office?
A fly is as likely to land on shit as it will on pie.
Tom has dark skin.
Tom has dark skin.
Don't interfere.
That's an interesting ad.
She grew up to be a slim girl.
In Massachusetts, a man is not allowed to marry his wife's grandmother.
Is there any butter in the refrigerator?
The news of his death spread.
He ran into debt.
They missed the train.
Tom waited outside.
Tom waited impatiently.
Tom stopped typing.
All big cities have traffic problems.
She's a cutie.
If you give up, that's the end of the match.
Please get dressed.
I was able to get my parents to consent to my marriage.
Our ancestors came here over a hundred years ago.
Grammar-Nazi-sympathizers must die too!
I am looking forward to seeing you soon.
Do you happen to have any photographs of Tom?
I think it's unlikely that plants feel pain.
She said goodbye.
Insofar as we know, he is guilty.
It's not a bad idea.
Waiter, the bill please.
Waiter, please bring me some water.
I want to be a pilot in the future.
I appreciate your support.
Such a case is not uncommon today.
I don't want to be late.
I caught the ball with one hand.
They all drowned.
Don't let children play in the road.
My daughter likes to play with dolls.
My daughter likes to play with dolls.
It's against my religion.
Rainy season has begun.
She resigned on the grounds of ill health.
He agreed to give us an interview.
Is it true that your family will travel in Hokkaido? I envy you.
I envy you your beauty.
They envy you your beauty.
Do you envy your neighbors?
I don't envy you.
The doctor bent over the sick boy.
She bent over the child.
Got into debt right up to my ears.
Got into debt right up to my ears.
He walks to school.
I prefer to walk.
Do you go shopping at the weekend?
He is a screwball.
The audience was deeply affected.
We tend to make mistakes.
He will survive.
Our world is only a tiny part of the universe.
He made a mistake and drank poison.
Come and see me whenever you are free.
He is trying to justify his act.
Stop saying that!
She is very angry with her children.
The bigger they come, the harder they fall.
I'd just like to talk with Tom before we leave.
Don't argue when you are angry and don't eat when you are full.
Stop harassing me.
My sister asked me to teach her how to ski.
Sometimes you need to have the courage to make tough decisions.
The well is in the middle of this plaza.
Tom hid under the table.
Don't get angry. It won't help you.
We accepted his invitation.
Add it to my bill.
He made a frank admission.
Her husband's success hasn't affected her attitude toward old friends.
I couldn't invite him. We're not well acquainted.
I have no acquaintance with court procedure.
I was admiring the view.
I wasn't a bit affected by the news of his death.
Once and for all, let's get this over with.
The play ran a big advertisement in the newspapers.
We acquired the property when our uncle died.
You are right, after all.
You have an advantage over him.
You have to allow for human weakness.
Cover it with a plate.
Education by the parents of their children is important.
He said: "C'est la vie"!
They don't really care.
The firemen localized the fire.
The decision was unavoidable.
The crow flew away.
The hotel's full of foreigners.
I was caught in a traffic jam.
Are you threatening me?
Please be careful.
Time heals everything.
The wall is white on the inside and green on the outside.
British English differs from American English in many ways.
Your composition is very good, and it has few mistakes.
I'm late, aren't I?
I broke up with her yesterday evening.
During a walk in the park she accidentally met her old friend.
Reading gives me great pleasure.
I'd appreciate any help you can give me.
She hates green peppers.
What did you major in at college?
We didn't choose Tom.
You won't be fired.
He looked at me in surprise.
They sell sugar and salt at that store.
A person who is born in France is a French.
A person who is born in France is a French.
We ran out of gas on our way there.
Did I miss something?
The tiger laid in the middle of the cage.
I'll wait till noon.
This play has three acts.
He forgot to turn off the light.
Stop torturing yourself.
I can't budge it.
The rocket was launched into space.
He almost drowned in the river.
She almost drowned in the river.
I would like to speak to the head nurse.
I've just arrived at the airport.
Hurry up, or we'll miss the train.
His Japanese is almost perfect.
Don't try to blame this all on me.
Do you happen to have any photographs of Tom?
The small intestine consists of three parts.
I know a girl whose father is a lawyer.
I'm tired of her complaints.
I came to this country for the purpose of studying music.
The zipper's stuck.
You didn't even say goodbye.
You didn't do enough research.
I had no time to eat.
He got over the difficulties.
What's your favorite action movie?
Every website has a unique address.
We should have been fully aware of this risk all along.
I hate my mother-in-law.
I'm letting you go.
Tom leaned over and picked the coin up.
He's popular with the students.
Is there a McDonald's near here?
Your work with these specimens was impressive.
Are you wearing face mask?
I accepted his invitation.
I accepted her invitation.
The thunder scared the children.
I have a boring job.
Cows are eating grass in the meadow.
That's avoidable.
Russian is very difficult to learn.
Take a breather.
Take a break.
Both of them seem suspicious.
Do you have any complaints?
She is an educated girl.
Tom wiped the table.
I miss this place.
The sight sent chills of delight up my spine.
He was learning a poem.
I really miss my girlfriend.
I plead guilty.
I'm not worried about Tom.
Just as she was about to leave the store, she saw a beautiful dress in the window.
They want, above all things, to live in peace.
She bought a chicken.
I didn't want to see Tom.
I didn't want to see Tom.
It's like a drug.
Deposit your money in the bank.
I asked why Tom was late.
I asked Tom what was wrong.
What do you think of the new teacher?
Without hesitation, he told his wife the truth.
They make a perfect couple.
You and Tom would make a perfect couple.
I think you know Tom.
I think you know Tom.
He traveled on business.
I got the bicycle at a bargain.
Do you think I'm crazy?
What time does the shuttle bus leave for the airport?
Do you want to eat something?
He's driving me crazy.
He's skinny.
Water, forests, and minerals are important natural resources.
I found it necessary to ask for help.
The thief cut the telephone lines before breaking into the house.
We're having lunch.
Did you see anyone on the beach?
Today I want to eat something light.
Take care of yourselves!
We arrived there before noon.
The cat caught the mouse.
I just don't know what to do.
I didn't mean to offend you.
You can't stop progress.
They haven't finished the work, have they?
A new pope has been elected.
The thief snuck in through the window.
She's washing dishes.
They drove the adults crazy.
Take care!
He must have missed the train.
They ate and drank wine.
Please turn off the television.
My upper right wisdom tooth hurts.
Tom has less money than his brother does.
Are you going to do something about it?
You cannot please everyone.
My sister washes her hair every morning.
Is there a post office nearby?
I ran into her in the street.
Tom was injured in a traffic accident.
Try to be more punctual from now on.
If you insist.
Who am I kidding?
He filled the glasses with wine.
We should obey our parents.
We're late. It's time to leave.
He is the best for this project.
They hate Tom.
We're getting out of here. The storm is coming.
Be respectful.
She persists in saying that she is right.
She persists in saying that she is right.
I apologize for what I said.
He was eager to display his new bicycle to his friends.
Tom has a high-pitched voice.
I'm surprised at your behavior.
The judge is ready to pass sentence.
He gave me a wink.
I'll ask Tom.
I'll go and ask Tom.
The room filled with laughter.
Are you done washing your hands?
The dog house is outside.
Be polite to everyone.
The museum is worth visiting.
The doctor examined the patient.
No one can stop Tom.
Exceptions prove the rule.
The accident deprived them of their only son.
Who are you trying to convince?
I always have room for dessert.
It's sad, but true.
The sky is full of stars.
She earns more than she spends.
This summer is incredibly hot.
Wait and see.
He unbuttoned his shirt.
I'm the only one who survived.
It has turned into a fashion now.
I'm responsible for that.
I'm in love.
This is a weakness peculiar to young people.
It was nearly noon.
I feel useless.
Taken by surprise, I was at a loss for what to answer.
Taken by surprise, I was at a loss for what to answer.
Visiting Tom was a mistake.
A glass of red wine, please.
Your head is empty.
How much do you make?
It is foolish of you to believe such a thing.
I have plenty of friends.
Enjoy your day.
We got caught in the storm.
Don't give up without a fight.
Tom likes all vegetables except cabbage.
It costs an arm and a leg.
Never use a cannon to kill a fly.
What should I eat?
She was engaged as an interpreter.
There could be a kernel of truth behind this legend.
I am looking forward to seeing you.
Ubuntu is a popular Linux distribution.
Tabloids assert that the killer cucumber would have sodomised the mad cow.
Here's the reason that girls like cucumbers.
This is why girls love cucumbers.
Come closer.
Kennedy Airport, please.
I appreciate what he did for me.
Hi, I'm the King of the Universe.
Tom's older daughter is still unmarried.
Whose gloves are these? "They are Lisa's."
We left the final decision to him.
A home is a once-in-a-lifetime purchase so you don't want to make any snap decisions.
Let's take a coffee break, shall we?
I want to talk to you for a minute about Tom.
I'm surprised.
The problem will resolve itself eventually.
Nobody heard Tom's screams.
You should be careful in your choice of friends.
He's incredibly talented.
It was so hot that we went swimming.
She gained weight.
The swimming pool is open to the public.
He decided to submit his resignation.
I always feel sleepy.
Horse, lion, dog, goat: these are animals.
She went to the beauty parlor.
Watch your step. The stairs are steep.
The building is surrounded by a barbed wire fence.
You'll be envied.
Tom thought he would be late.
I got the news from a reliable source.
Her silence surprised me.
I will give you a new bicycle for your birthday.
You shall have a new bicycle for your birthday.
There are a lot of trees around the pond.
The children built a sand castle on the beach.
Gasoline is used for fuel.
Some people gain weight when they quit smoking.
This puppet is my only friend.
I don't understand what's bothering you.
I warned him many times, but he won't stop talking.
I'll miss you, too.
Their names have escaped me.
Why are you angry with me?
Could you tell me how to use the telephone?
I want to know who killed Tom.
They hid themselves in the shadows.
A right angle has ninety degrees.
I wished him a good journey.
I was always good at math.
He's obsessed with cleanliness.
Nevertheless I think the experiment was successful.
She wiped her tears away.
Tom isn't here at the moment.
He finished school in March.
The art of progress is to preserve order amid change, and to preserve change amid order.
You don't work in an office.
You don't work in an office.
She put by some money for a rainy day.
She decorated the wall with pictures.
A stranger spoke to me on the crowded bus.
Among the audience, there were teachers, lawyers, engineers, and so on.
And whoever thinks otherwise gets a chance to think about it for twelve years in the open air of the Siberian woods.
You will need an armed escort.
This is unbelievable!
He was almost drowned.
The mouse is under the floor.
Take your shoes off.
She is very angry with me.
I was surprised because it was very big.
Tom looks grateful.
Reflect on advantages and disadvantages before you make up your mind.
You are very talented.
Stalin was the father of all peoples - in his own unhealthy imagination.
After this, Miki was taken to the hospital.
Air is a mixture of gases that we cannot see.
My belief is that you are right.
You've frightened me.
Lincoln set the slaves free.
Many stars are twinkling in the sky.
He asked my pardon.
The European Union has eliminated the death penalty.
We communicate by means of language.
We'll be late for class.
I feel uncomfortable with those people.
It is no use talking with them any longer.
Living in the country, I have few visitors.
I assume it was Tom's idea.
It was such a powerful explosion that the roof was blown off.
I've missed another chance.
It's dangerous!
She is peeling the potatoes.
We won't get cold.
Do you recognize that person?
Are you still sleepy?
Stop crying like a little girl.
Are you still mad at me? "No, not at all."
I love twilight.
Stars were twinkling in the sky.
I don't know how I've offended you.
I brush my teeth twice a day.
You said you didn't care.
She thanked me for the present.
Yes, mistress.
He does his duty.
Something unusual happened last night.
Nobody knows Tom like I know Tom.
It's very important for people to practice sports for free.
Where can I find a telephone box?
Are you still mad at me? "No, not at all."
She has narrow hips.
The atomic energy is expensive and dangerous.
Who's your favorite Korean musician?
Suddenly, my mother started singing.
All the most deadly poisons were in her laboratory.
Tom is not here.
My father doesn't drink hard liquor.
All I want is to get rid of you.
It was not unexpected.
Silently, she looked out the window.
Tom didn't have much time for studying.
Don't be insulted.
David Beckham is English.
My sister has become a good pianist.
Where did you bury them?
The wooden chair is expensive.
It must have taken years for such a task!
I'm just a little dizzy.
I feared the worst.
It happened at a quarter past eleven.
Promise me you'll be careful.
Love is a lie.
The masks are falling.
This decision is final.
Then Robert woke up again, and all of his limbs were hurting.
May God protect you from those who hate you!
The U.S. economy is the largest in the world.
She was naive.
An eagle was soaring high up in the air.
He's a dumb as a rock.
She became a nurse.
I'm sorry to bother you so often.
I've got some problems.
He came to see you yesterday.
That's too expensive for me.
He wants to become a cook in the future.
He annoyed us with his complaints.
Put out the light.
You're not gonna die, eh?
Tom quickly climbed up the tree.
Don't talk nonsense.
Cows eat grass.
She came to see us yesterday.
Tom certainly plays the guitar well.
He earns more money than he can spend.
The weather has been unusual this year.
Our world is only a tiny part of the universe.
I like to chew tobacco.
You should not fool with poor people.
The bucket was full of water.
What's bothering you?
I'll do it, if you insist.
He has turned 180 degrees around.
She left her gloves in the car.
“The Little Prince” is a very popular book that was translated into many languages.
My daugther wants a kitten.
I'll get rid of them.
They'll survive.
This room is for rent.
Are the drinks free? "Only for ladies."
I dream about you every night.
We went on foot.
It's suicide.
The more I thought about the problem, the more difficult it seemed.
Don't talk in the classroom.
She kicked him out of the house.
Are you enjoying the holidays?
He wore a mask so that no one could recognize him.
That's so sad.
We don't have enough information yet to make a decision.
Don't spend more than you earn.
Don't spend more than you earn.
Are you happy with your appearance?
Are you angry?
The boat was carried away with the current.
Are you still playing the guitar?
Speech is silver, silence is gold.
You are simply unbearable!
Space is full of mysteries.
You will soon be used to rural life.
He is much better than me at the high jump.
I know a good lawyer who can help you.
You need a lawyer.
You need a lawyer.
Children play with toys.
My dog is dreaming of a cat.
I don't know what you're so worried about.
I gave in to her demands.
Any murder is gruesome but this one was especially heinous.
You don't have enough experience.
If that guitar were not so expensive, I could buy it.
She wrote about it in her diary.
She took her secrets to the grave.
She quickly shut the kitten into a basket.
You look surprised.
My grandma is 75 years old.
It's been ten years since we last met.
Mice are distinct from rats.
Tom tied his dog to the tree.
Are you bored?
I thank you for your existence.
My father works at a factory.
I found a bag stuffed full of gold coins!
Did you hear about Tom's promotion?
He's always breaking into our conversation.
She spends a lot of money on shoes.
They acted immediately by agreement.
She committed suicide by jumping off the bridge.
We survived.
The tiger was killed.
Bear in mind that you're a guest here and should behave accordingly.
Don't put all your eggs in one basket.
At present, the cause of the disease is unknown.
At the age of six, I was taken to a circus for the first time.
Balls are round.
Basho was the greatest poet.
It was inevitable that they would meet.
The surgery was a success.
The little girl made a polite bow to me.
He's got terrible handwriting.
They escaped being punished.
I ate caviar.
I ate caviar.
He was sitting on a bench.
I dropped my keys.
Her name slipped my mind.
I don't know how to contact you.
Tom tried to climb the tall tree.
My father is a teacher.
I've suddenly started to gain weight.
I'm using a machine translation.
My cat came out of the basket.
Where can I develop these photos?
You're a terrible cook.
She surprised me.
There is a swimming pool and a big sports centre.
How many times have you eaten here? "Many, many times."
Was he really boring?
The cat ate the mouse.
I'll make the room comfortable.
Tom is a teacher of Chinese literature.
I'm in charge.
I'm responsible.
I'm responsible.
This is a very rare specimen.
He has not realized his mistakes yet.
He has not realized his mistakes yet.
Having failed four times, he didn't try anymore.
She often speaks with her fiancé.
She often speaks with her fiancé.
She often speaks with her fiancé.
Other peoples' expectations affect how we behave.
Other peoples' expectations affect how we behave.
We are all convinced that he's guilty.
They love Tom.
They loved Tom.
I saw Tom.
The news broke his heart.
We can't give up without a fight.
The tower leaned slightly to the left.
Tom is dealing drugs.
Tom is sweating.
I am very much obliged to you for your help.
He was sitting on a bench with his eyes closed.
It tastes a little bitter.
There are two motorcycles at the gate of the park.
I don't like teachers who like students who don't like asking questions.
I'm going to exercise every day.
I've never been so proud of Tom.
I feel like I am being forced to help her.
I will visit Kyoto.
Who fights can lose. Who doesn't fight has already lost.
She threatened him.
You must be more careful from now on.
You must be more careful from now on.
He sells cars.
He sells cars.
Bill often doesn't keep his promises.
He lost his balance and fell down.
What time should I go to the airport?
What time should I go to the airport?
You should not miss the opportunity to see it.
You should not miss the opportunity to see it.
You should not miss the opportunity to see it.
She can't ski.
She does not know how to ski.
We arrived at the office on time.
We arrived at the office on time.
They sell meat at that store.
Someone stole Tom's guitar.
Tom's bicycle has been stolen.
He hasn't told me when he will return.
Please change the flag.
Change the flag, please.
Both countries are now at peace.
What does she do in his office?
I don't mind anymore.
Let's carry on the discussion.
He rarely gives up.
Do you often take business trips?
Anger is an energy.
British Prime Minister Neville Chamberlain was forced to resign.
Brush your teeth after each meal.
I don't want to fail my exams.
This topic is appealing to many.
She greets him every morning.
It sounds dangerous.
Parliament approved the new law last week.
I will be very glad to be able to serve you.
Not a day passes without traffic accidents.
I'll give you a day to think about it.
Your success is the result of your hard work.
Why do you take such a risk?
Why do you take such a risk?
Do you think I'm handsome?
Can you break an egg with one hand?
When he was a kid, he used to catch birds and torture them to death.
She found a ball in the garden.
He is a very careful driver.
Children should obey their parents.
People have to obey the rules.
Where did you buy this guitar?
She knows how to play the guitar.
I did everything automatically.
He was late for school yesterday.
Let's raise our glasses for the master of the house!
What's the difference between faith and trust?
I don't have to excuse myself for what I said.
Don't walk behind me; I may not lead. Don't walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend.
He stood up in the room and looked around.
Tom's eyes are blue.
The bowl was perfectly round.
Classes start at nine o'clock every day.
They are bound together by common interests.
I will carry out this plan at any price.
I will carry out this plan at any price.
He will arrive on the afternoon of the 5th.
She was a bridesmaid at the wedding.
We delayed the meeting for a week.
We delayed the meeting for a week.
Our boat approached the small island.
He became a famous singer.
The cow supplies us with milk.
They're in love with each other.
Do you walk to school every day?
Do you walk to school every day?
Next year, hats will become fashionable.
You must do your duty.
We took a taxi so we wouldn't be late.
The plane will arrive at three.
My father is to arrive in Honolulu at 4:30 p.m.
It's hard to please him.
He is anxious to please everybody.
Don't make a mountain out of a molehill.
She talked him into buying a new house.
I'll be there, although I may be late.
Let's wait and see.
Look through these papers.
Are you angry with him?
But the universe is infinite.
Adherents of various religions live in Belarus.
Does he live here?
I always enjoy listening to classical music when I have some free time.
He tried to kill himself.
He tried to kill himself.
This lake abounds in various kinds of fish.
This lake abounds in various kinds of fish.
There were various objects in the room.
How can you tell them apart?
Tom appealed to his friends for sympathy.
Give me the microphone.
I've taught myself to play the guitar.
I've taught myself to play the guitar.
I persuaded him to give up the idea.
I persuaded him to give up the idea.
More than 75% of farms raised pigs and milk cows.
More than 75% of farms raised pigs and milk cows.
I have to meet Tom.
You should take account of his mental condition.
I saw Tom a few minutes ago.
I taught Tom French three years ago.
I keep this bottle separate from all the others.
Lay this aside for me.
Have you heard about the accident?
I don't mind walking in the rain.
I like the way you walk.
They made a great effort to settle the problem.
They made a great effort to settle the problem.
If you would like to have further information, please contact me.
If you would like to have further information, please contact me.
If you would like to have further information, please contact me.
Tom doesn't seem surprised.
Tom doesn't seem surprised.
The motive for the murder is not yet known.
Tom and Jim are the same height.
Now we have to be very careful.
There will be an economic crisis at the end of this year.
There will be an economic crisis at the end of this year.
I have not seen him lately.
You should try to be more polite.
You should try to be more polite.
You can now follow the Pope on twitter.
He is older and wiser now.
She is older and wiser now.
I think you should find out what happened to Tom.
Yesterday we were biking in the woods.
Yesterday we were biking in the woods.
I think you lied to me.
I think you look like Tom.
Tom decided that it wasn't necessary to go into the office today.
Tom decided that it wasn't necessary to go into the office today.
Tom decided that it wasn't necessary to go into the office today.
Bring my bags up to my room.
I lost my balance and fell down the stairs.
Pull the curtain back.
Put it into a paper bag.
The band played a march.
The children played ball.
The police held the crowd back.
This bag is not big enough.
Tom became sick from eating bad food.
We have been having awful weather.
Where is my ball?
A dragon lives inside the cavern.
Deceiving your colleagues isn't good.
Draw a circle.
Draw a circle.
Where can I do some shopping?
It caught me by surprise.
The last time I saw Tom he was as drunk as a skunk.
Has he failed again?
She works for a large American corporation.
That's a nice-looking teapot!
His story was too ridiculous for anyone to believe.
His story was too ridiculous for anyone to believe.
It goes without saying that she is an excellent pianist.
He went on a walk.
He went on a walk.
They went to the beach.
They went to the beach.
How did your interview go?
Don't touch the pot with bare hands.
I will make a bargain with you.
My car needs a new battery.
Please fill the bath half full.
Tom batted the ball over the fence.
Where can I take a bath?
You'll find many bargains there.
I think you know what Tom's girlfriend's name is.
I think you know what Tom's girlfriend's name is.
I think you know what Tom's girlfriend's name is.
I think you know that's not true.
I changed the flag.
I changed the flag.
I changed the flag.
He says he is leaving the country for good.
There was a steady increase in population.
He had returned to England forever.
He said good-bye for good.
The outlook was negative.
I think you dropped this.
Did you question Tom?
Did you ask Tom?
I think it was a mistake that you didn't take my advice.
The story ends well.
I worked hard to succeed.
I worked hard to succeed.
Tom understands what it takes to succeed.
He cared for his mother after his father died.
Did you see him go out?
Did you take a bath?
I think Tom is going to try to kill Mary.
Tom tried to kill Mary.
She tried to kill herself last night.
She tried to kill herself last night.
She tried to kill herself last night.
She tried to kill herself last night.
The art of progress is to preserve order amid change, and to preserve change amid order.
Tom prepared dinner by himself.
That's for Tom.
Tom had to do everything himself.
I'll phone you before I start.
The supplies began to run out.
They begged us to help them.
To begin with, we don't have enough money.
I've already talked to Tom.
Please beat this carpet.
There are bears in these woods.
They will be surprised to see you here.
Tom and I have been friends for many years.
Tom didn't come because he got sick.
We built a fire on the beach.
He is no good as a doctor.
The scene of the car accident was a horrifying sight.
The event was forgotten in progress of time.
Excuse me, is there a toilet nearby?
How much do ten paper plates cost?
She handed me a sheet of paper.
I have a paper glass.
Three times three is nine.
Divorce is becoming more common nowadays.
I will provide you all the necessary information.
Trust people, but don't take candy from strangers.
She was very proud of her father.
He was naive.
I didn't want to disturb Tom.
I didn't want to disturb Tom.
I just followed your instructions.
She shares a room with her sister.
We miss you a lot.
We miss you a lot.
They are gathering nuts.
I am supremely glad to hear it.
I must be away on urgent business.
You must bear my advice in mind.
He founded the school five years ago.
What he says always corresponds with what he does.
I got up early in order to attend the meeting.
He was still in his teens when he founded a company.
His daughter wants to be a lawyer.
His daughter wants to be a lawyer.
I want to know Tom's every move.
I know a place we can go.
How can I jump so high?
James Cameron created a new way to make movies.
That song's bound to be a hit.
We have to react faster.
Tom has a good side and an evil side.
She's a frequent visitor to this country.
Tom soaked in the bathtub.
What the hell does a priest know about that?
The clean towels are in the drawer.
She was careful opening the drawer.
Glasses and dishes were broken.
Find Tom before he murders someone.
Find Tom before he murders someone.
Wasn't she your girlfriend?
All is in the hands of man. Therefore wash them often.
There are a lot of fish in the pond.
There are a lot of fish in the pond.
How much will it cost to get to the airport?
From early morning I had been oppressed by a strange melancholy.
You're too skinny! You need to eat more.
Do you have a picture of Tom?
This store has a variety of spices.
This store has a variety of spices.
Do you have a smaller size?
I think we're going to be late.
I think we're being followed.
You must act more wisely.
You must act more wisely.
I think we should talk to Tom.
I think we should take Tom home.
I think we should take Tom home.
I think we should take Tom home.
Tom has a natural talent.
Tom has a natural talent.
You don't need alcohol to be happy.
I live in a rural area.
She sells flowers.
They sell fish and meat.
That store sells men's wear.
They sell sugar at the store.
Is there a restaurant close by?
That's a good buy.
The audience buzzed with excitement.
The bus went by without stopping.
The fire department has to be called out.
The machine was working at full blast.
This button has come off.
This is by far the best hotel in town.
Walk three blocks and then turn right.
Whenever you need help, feel free to call on me.
You could hear the blast for kilometers.
I don't recall.
I think we need to find out why Tom wasn't here yesterday.
I think we should all go to Tom's house.
I think we should all go outside.
Do you keep a diary?
Get out of my bed.
You're not going to make me drink alone, are you?
A butterfly's wing contains many details.
I think Tom's idea is a good one.
Don't take it so seriously.
You are late. Where have you been?
You'd better not swim if you've just eaten.
She looked at him angrily.
You're untrustworthy.
The elephant is liked by little children.
I think Tom killed himself.
I think Tom killed himself.
I think Tom isn't a very good singer.
Potato chips are not good for you.
I am an honest person.
I don't like Tom's dog.
They wash their hands with soap.
Tom makes a lot of money translating menus for restaurants.
Dry your tears.
That fox must have killed the hen.
The wind is blowing hard.
We began our work at noon.
We began our work at noon.
We began our work at noon.
His way of speaking offended me.
His way of speaking offended me.
Come home before dark.
She explained to him why she couldn't visit him.
She explained to him why she couldn't visit him.
Half the camp went on a hike.
You can't go swimming in this lake.
I think we got Tom's attention.
She always keeps her room in good order.
You must take care when you cross the road.
You must take care when you cross the road.
You must take care when you cross the road.
She's not a bad girl.
I want to be a teacher.
War is hell.
We will visit them soon.
She dived into the pool.
Hurry up or you'll be late.
Do your best whether you win or lose.
The furniture was dusty.
Tom has no choice.
Tom drank a glass of wine.
The plane began to climb rapidly.
This tool will come in handy during the trip.
That was a warning.
Do you think it's dangerous to eat genetically modified food?
The commission has promised to take action soon.
This problem comes up every day.
Tom disagreed at first, but has now come around to our point of view.
He rose to his feet to greet me.
As soon as he arrived at the airport, he phoned his office.
Tom is the one who broke the window yesterday.
Show me the stone that broke the window.
Do you understand the difficulty of my job?
Do you walk to school?
The Queen is to visit China next year.
It's awesome.
Don't resist.
Don't interrupt.
Don't interrupt.
Don't interfere.
He has recently returned from France.
I usually go on foot.
I like to work with Tom.
I'm going to work by bicycle.
He likes sweets.
I was not praying against you; I was praying for you.
You're a philosopher, aren't you?
You're a philosopher, aren't you?
What they told you is not true.
He was given a gold watch as a reward.
He was given a gold watch as a reward.
Are you willing to go to the beach?
Are you willing to go to the beach?
Are you willing to go to the beach?
I willingly join the Chinese Communist Party.
I willingly join the Chinese Communist Party.
If it annoys you so much, file a complaint.
They finally had to commit Tom to an asylum.
Tom always comments on my clothes.
What compositions will the orchestra play tonight?
I'm looking forward to going to the concert.
I envy Tom.
Tom is having trouble making ends meet.
Tom has a hard time making ends meet.
I didn't recognize him at first.
Tom cried bitterly.
It is ten degrees below zero now.
Where can I leave my bicycle?
She unbuttoned her shirt.
The team shares the opinion of their captain.
Don't be peeved.
Don't be angry with me.
No need to leave them.
Which countries have you visited?
You must show your passport.
He approached and fell on his knees.
The island lies to the west of Japan.
It is a lot of fun to listen to music.
Watching wild birds is a lot of fun.
I'm older than Tom.
You're older than Tom.
She's older than Tom.
You're older than Tom.
They're older than Tom.
Everybody started to leave.
I dream in French.
I'm Japanese, the boy answered.
I'm a French teacher.
I'm a French teacher.
They worship every Sunday.
This room is not suitable for sleeping.
I'm sick, and it's miserable!
She got on her bike and rode away.
He said that Raëlism was his religion.
He begged us to go with him.
Is it something pressing?
Otherwise we will have to cancel this order.
How far can you stick your finger up your nose?
This boat has six oars.
Tom's face is red.
The fuel level is below empty.
Leave that job to the experts!
The accident happened at that intersection.
She is in an awful mood.
He set up the school.
He had to leave the city, so he moved to Berlin.
I'm Tom's father.
I'm Tom's dad.
Why do you always talk about Tom?
Why didn't you tell me that Tom had a daughter?
Why didn't you tell me that Tom had a daughter?
Why didn't you tell me that Tom had a daughter?
Tom is good at skiing.
What's the historian's duty?
What's the historian's duty?
This factory produces CD players.
I'll monitor your progress from my computer.
I turn over a page of the book.
Tom smokes like a chimney.
The cow is a symbol of Europe.
What does this symbol here mean?
Can I catch a taxi near here?
My French teacher is the same age as I am.
A few seconds ago I was in the open air and the bright daylight, and now my eyes refuse to serve me in this darkness.
I had to wait for a long time for Tom's answer, but it was worth it.
Don't worry about that - that rule is no longer in force in our office.
Science produced the atomic bomb.
Would you mind if I took a break?
Being near the Emperor is like sleeping with a tiger.
A fed person doesn't know how hungry the hungry person is.
Shakespeare is one of the greatest poets.
Even today the temperature is below zero.
The boy put on his athletic shoes and ran outside.
I'm learning French on my own.
Each of the three boys got a prize.
How does the film end?
I asked Tom to teach me French.
I asked Tom to teach me French.
Tom carefully covered up all his mistakes.
This book covers the subject completely.
Keep up your courage.
My French is getting rusty.
Tom has a lot of French books.
Tom's French is almost perfect.
He is suffering from a headache.
He worked so hard that eventually he made himself ill.
The world needs talented people.
You killed Tom.
You've frightened Tom.
Tom didn't work alone.
That's the absolute truth.
The world doesn't revolve around you.
She's asking for the impossible.
Take care.
I'm going to take a bath.
She is angry with me.
She is mad at me.
You ought to thank him.
You ought to thank him.
You must pay attention to his advice.
You must pay attention to his advice.
I have a feeling you'll be a very good lawyer.
I have a feeling you'll be a very good lawyer.
I have a feeling you'll be a very good lawyer.
I have a feeling you'll be a very good lawyer.
You must keep your room clean.
You must keep your room clean.
I can make it work.
I can make my own decisions.
His car collided with a train.
We're surprised.
I can see Tom.
I don't like to wash dishes.
Wait one minute.
At first, I thought I was sick.
He was killed in the battle.
He was killed in the battle.
Tom is often the last one to leave the office.
Go wake Tom up.
Go wake Tom up.
Wake Tom up.
Wake Tom up.
Tom's native language is French.
Wake up, Tom.
Tom, wake up.
They can't continue without Tom.
They can't continue without Tom.
Tom was impatient and restless.
I didn't want you to miss your bus.
I didn't want you to miss your bus.
I think you might have a drinking problem.
I think you might have a drinking problem.
I think you might eventually change your mind.
I think you might eventually change your mind.
I think you might be overreacting.
I think you might be overreacting.
I think it's dangerous.
Tom isn't giving up.
Tom didn't get sick.
Tom didn't even apologize.
I got in touch with Tom.
No, thank you. I'm full.
No, thank you. I'm full.
She touched my hand.
The Foreign Minister said that war was inevitable.
I hear you're studying French with Tom.
I hear you're studying French with Tom.
I hear you're studying French with Tom.
I hear you're studying French with Tom.
I have a lot of things to do.
He's the perfect man for me.
She's the perfect girl for you.
She doesn't want to get out of bed.
I didn't need Tom's money.
I don't remember Tom's face.
I don't see Tom anymore.
I don't see Tom's car.
I don't speak to Tom.
I don't want Tom's help.
I'm not working for Tom.
I didn't see Tom today.
Tom didn't give up.
Tom tore up the letter.
He is living apart from his wife.
He is the same famous actor who recently won an award.
Almost one-third of all office workers wear glasses.
I can do this alone.
Ask Tom to clear away the dishes.
I think that'll cover all Tom's expenses.
They have a lot of confidence in Tom's ability.
This noise is driving me crazy.
Tom left work early, complaining of a headache.
That child is always fretting.
Will you take this document to the branch?
Will you take this document to the branch?
Where's my lawyer?
Don't talk to Tom about this.
Who thought this up?
He shot at me.
I'm going to work as a builder with my father.
Tom has committed suicide.
Tom killed himself.
Tom committed suicide.
Tom is my lawyer.
Where's Tom's house?
I asked Tom not to wear his sister's clothes.
I asked Tom not to wear his sister's clothes.
I asked Tom not to wear his sister's clothes.
I asked Tom not to wear his sister's clothes.
Let's look in the garage.
A new difficulty presented itself.
I like skiing.
She listened to me patiently and very carefully.
I'd like to thank you both.
I'd like to talk about Tom.
Everyone is unique.
I have to stop Tom.
I have to stop Tom.
Tom couldn't get the book he wanted.
Why did you draw a face on the wall?
Why did you draw a face on the wall?
The sheet is on the bed.
As soon as I have written the letter I will rush to the post office.
As soon as I have written the letter I will rush to the post office.
I have to go meet with Tom.
I congratulate you on your success.
I want to do it myself.
Tom speaks with a French accent.
I want a boat that will take me far away from here.
Class doesn't begin until eight-thirty.
Oh, I'm so sorry.
I have to go shopping. I'll be back in an hour.
I have to go shopping. I'll be back in an hour.
May I talk to Ms. Brown?
I have too many things on my mind these days.
I live near the sea so I often get to go to the beach.
I don't feel well.
I can place the palms of my hands on the floor without bending my knees.
I keep a diary in French.
Tom's French is really quite good.
Tom enjoys reading books in French.
They ate healthier foods.
They ate healthier foods.
To our surprise, he was defeated in the match.
To our surprise, he was defeated in the match.
To our surprise, he was defeated in the match.
The weather forecast is not reliable at all.
This girl is incredibly hot.
I'm furious.
I'm guilty.
I've failed.
I've failed.
Keep your cool.
Nobody cares.
Say goodbye.
Say goodbye.
Say hello.
Say hello.
Somebody intervened.
Tom is guilty.
Tom is beyond hope.
I have an appointment with Tom.
I've always wanted to meet Tom.
I've always wanted to meet Tom.
I've always wanted to meet Tom.
I've always distrusted Tom.
I've always distrusted Tom.
I've already spoken to Tom.
I've already spoken to Tom.
I've already spoken to Tom.
I've already spoken to Tom.
I've already spoken to Tom.
I've already spoken to Tom about it.
I've already spoken to Tom about it.
I've already spoken to Tom about it.
I've already spoken to Tom about it.
I've already spoken to Tom about it.
I've already spoken to Tom about it.
I've already spoken to Tom about that.
I've already spoken to Tom about it.
I've already sent for Tom.
I've already sent for Tom.
I've already sent for Tom.
I've already sent for Tom.
I've already given Tom a present.
I've already given Tom a present.
I've already answered Tom's questions.
I've already answered Tom's questions.
I've already answered Tom's questions.
I've already answered Tom's questions.
I have a surprise for Tom.
I have a son Tom's age.
I have a small gift for Tom.
Who's your girlfriend?
I don't like to be pushed.
I don't like to be pushed.
Don't threaten me.
Don't give up.
Don't try God's patience.
Don't waste your time on trifles.
I want her in my office.
The temperature fell several degrees.
The temperature fell several degrees.
Tom is curious.
That purchase was a good bargain.
He called his mother up from the airport.
He was surprised too.
Today's Tom's birthday.
I made a promise.
I am an Earthling.
Please tell me how to get to the beach.
Let's go and see Tom.
He is crazy.
He isn't the kind of person who steals.
He isn't the kind of person who steals.
Tom can't be that naive.
You can get it at a bookstore.
He is not Japanese.
Is French a difficult language to learn?
Tom translated the contract into French.
Tom translated the contract into French.
Tom translated the document into French.
Tom didn't have the courage to speak to Mary.
I would like to go to the beach with you but today I don't have time.
Tom didn't have the courage to speak to Mary.
Tom is looking for a suitable place to hold the meeting.
Goodbyes are always sad.
I swear to you I will never do it again.
There's a hotel across the street.
Because she is a wonderful teacher.
Where is the Chinese embassy?
How many men do you have working in the dairy now?
I met Tom the other day.
Let's go up on deck.
Tom dashed to the corner to mail a letter.
Tom's father is dead.
We're in danger of being late.
Will you go with Tom?
It's dangerous to swim here.
Don't take it too literally.
Thank you for catching me a butterfly.
Thank you for catching me a butterfly.
Exercise is vital for a dog.
It is a pity that the singer died so young.
It is a pity that the singer died so young.
I brush my teeth after eating.
I am at the end of my patience.
The rainy season starts more or less at the end of June.
She ironed her shirt.
She ironed her shirt.
I've been sitting here all night.
I've been sitting here all night.
Warn Tom.
Get out of my office.
Get out of my office.
Get out of my office.
I'm surprised no one else heard the gunshots.
I'm surprised no one else heard the gunshots.
My watch loses three minutes a week.
Different people tell different versions of the incident.
Don't let the fire die down.
I saw Tom three different times today.
This mine is 500 meters deep.
Today's paper gives further details of the accident.
Tom did it in spite of all the difficulties.
Tom loves to talk about his travels in great detail.
We defeated our opponents in the last game.
I can't stay long today.
Wisdom is better than gold or silver.
Even your silence can be a part of prayer.
Please don't forget to turn off the light before you go to bed.
Please don't forget to turn off the light before you go to bed.
I'm sure.
What nonsense!
I run ten kilometers a day.
In short, systems of morals are only a sign-language of the emotions.
Leave it in my hands.
If he came here, I would receive him with open arms.
Leave this to me.
He can speak both Japanese and English with facility.
I want an attorney.
He began singing.
Why doesn't anybody translate my sentences?
Declarations of variables are extremely important in C and C++.
Tom is turning up the sound of the TV.
Tom is turning up the sound of the TV.
Fathers and teachers, I ponder, "What is hell?" I maintain that it is the suffering of being unable to love.
Helen is seventeen years old.
Tom claimed he wasn't afraid.
Tom claimed to be Mary's son.
Tom cleaned the top of the table with a wet rag.
I really want to meet Tom.
I really want to meet Tom.
I didn't want to kill Tom.
I didn't want to kill Tom.
Do you want me to ask Tom?
Do you want me to ask Tom?
Do you want me to ask Tom?
Do you want me to ask Tom?
We want you to marry Tom.
That's my theory.
That's my specialty.
Please don't panic.
Please contact us.
Please contact us.
Pitch the ball.
Pitch the ball.
Pitch the ball.
Pitch the ball.
Pitch the ball.
Pitch the ball.
Pitch the ball.
Pitch the ball.
Pitch the ball.
Pitch the ball.
Open the gate.
Open the gate.
Open the gate.
Open the gate.
Now turn around.
Now turn around.
Nobody likes rats.
Nobody likes rats.
Nobody likes rats.
No one flinched.
No one flinched.
It's too dangerous.
It's too bright.
It's too bright.
It's so loud.
It's so peaceful.
We'll find you.
We'll find you.
We'll find them.
We'll contact you.
We'll get in touch with you.
We'll contact them.
We'll camp here.
We'll camp here.
We'll camp here.
We'll camp here.
We'll be late.
We'd better hurry.
We weren't scared.
We weren't hiding.
We were partners.
My sleigh is white.
Are all laws just?
Not all laws are just.
Look the setting of the sun.
Look the setting of the sun.
Squirrels can run really quickly.
The police covered the body with a sheet.
I'll change the sheets.
Tom is really talented.
Tom is talented.
Don't let him touch it.
Don't let her go out after dark.
I'm not at all surprised.
I like the way you dress.
I love the way you dress.
I love the way you dress.
I love the way you dress.
It might be expensive.
It might be expensive.
We dined at a restaurant.
I love the way you sing.
I love the way you sing.
I love the way you hold me.
I love the way you hold me.
I love the way you hold me.
I love the way you hold me.
Squirrels like nuts.
Squirrels like nuts.
I love sitting on the beach.
He worked both the lunch and dinner shift.
He worked both the lunch and dinner shift.
Don't you trust your instincts?
Don't you trust your instincts?
This man is good looking.
This man is good looking.
They split the bill evenly.
They split the bill evenly.
I'm going to the well to get water.
I'm going to the well to get water.
I'm going to the well to get water.
I want you to tell me everything you know about Tom.
School begins at nine and is over at six.
He's helping me.
Let's go sledding.
She touched him on the shoulder.
Don't you know Tom?
Don't you know Tom?
I'm better than Tom.
I have never stopped loving you.
She is at most 18 years old.
Don't deceive me.
Don't deceive me.
Do you miss your friends?
Do you miss your friends?
I prayed.
Think outside the box. "What box?"
Language is the means by which people communicate with others.
The doctor persuaded him to give up smoking.
The doctor persuaded him to give up smoking.
I never let anyone else feed my dog.
Rest assured that I will do my best.
I was surprised.
The movie is popular among the youngsters.
It does not worry me that people don't know me. It worries me that I don't know the people.
I lost my notebook today.
I lost my notebook today.
I've broken my arm, so I have to wear a bandage for the whole week.
She clothed herself in a new suit.
I appreciate what she did for me.
I appreciate what she did for me.
He is either drunk or mad.
Tom canceled his hotel reservation.
I never thought I'd see Tom again.
I never thought I'd see Tom again.
I never thought I'd see Tom again.
I never thought I'd see Tom again.
Policemen aren't permitted to drink on duty.
I want to ask Tom something.
I don't want to wake Tom up.
I don't want to wake Tom up.
I don't want to talk to Tom.
I don't want to talk to Tom.
What do you want Tom to do?
Tom wants to surprise Mary.
I want to hear it from Tom.
I know you want to see Tom.
I know you want to see Tom.
I know you want to see Tom.
I know you want to see Tom.
I don't want Tom's apology.
I don't want to disturb Tom.
I don't want to bother Tom.
I don't want Tom's apology.
Tom wants to go for a walk.
Tom wants to protect Mary.
I want you to talk to Tom.
I want you to talk to Tom.
I want you to talk to Tom.
I want to go with Tom.
Tom wanted a fresh start.
I want you to follow Tom.
I want you to follow Tom.
I want to understand Tom.
I want to thank you, Tom.
I want to thank you, Tom.
I want to thank you, Tom.
I want to thank you, Tom.
I want to speak with Tom.
Tom wants to protect me.
Tom wants to go job hunting.
Tom wants to go job hunting.
I want Tom to read this.
I want Tom to have this.
I don't want to sue Tom.
I don't want to see Tom.
Do you want to stop Tom?
Do you want to stop Tom?
Do you want to stop Tom?
Do you want to stop Tom?
Who would want to kill Tom?
Do you want to see Tom?
Do you want to see Tom?
I want to protect Tom.
I want to go with Tom.
I want to be with Tom.
I wanted to stop Tom.
I wanted to stop Tom.
I wanted to save Tom.
I wanted to save Tom.
I wanted to kill Tom.
I wanted to kill Tom.
Tom wants you to eat.
Tom wants you to eat.
Tom wants you to eat.
I wanted to see Tom.
I wanted to see Tom.
I wanted to see Tom.
I wanted to see Tom.
I want to thank you.
I want to thank you.
I want to thank Tom.
I want to thank Tom.
I want to thank you.
I want to thank you.
I want Tom arrested.
I just want to read.
I just want to read.
Tom's French is surprisingly good.
Tom didn't flinch.
Tom didn't flinch.
Tom didn't flinch.
You're both pretty.
You're both pretty.
We are surprised about the news.
Tom ate.
Our budget is very limited.
Tom carried two boxes into the storage room.
We have to figure out a way to encourage Tom to do the right thing.
We have to figure out a way to encourage Tom to do the right thing.
We have to figure out a way to encourage Tom to do the right thing.
We have to figure out what happened to Tom.
We've got to find out what happened to Tom.
We have to find Tom before the police do.
We've got to find Tom.
We need to protect Tom.
Tom is still angry.
Tom is still angry.
Tom is scared now.
Tom is my copilot.
Tom is leaving me.
Tom is just shy.
Tom is going nuts.
Tom has no money.
Tom has big plans.
You're hopeless.
You're hopeless.
You're hopeless.
Just to be clear, this was not me.
Just to be clear, this was not me.
I'm stuffed.
I'm stuffed.
It is frightfully expensive.
It's awfully expensive.
Excuse me, but would you please open the window?
Excuse me, but would you please tell me the way to the post office?
Tom is taking a bath now.
She picked up a coin.
Have you eaten yet?
I've ruined everything.
I ruined everything.
You thanked Tom for the present.
You thanked Tom for the present.
You've been expelled.
I got expelled.
She is busy. Wait a minute.
She is busy. Wait a minute.
He's much younger than Tom.
She is much younger than Tom.
Shall we walk?
She's incredibly talented.
What color is Tom's car?
What color is Tom's dog?
What color are Tom's eyes?
What color hair does Tom have?
He often plays guitar.
I think we're going to need Tom's help.
I think we're going to need Tom's help.
The baby is one day old.
I dream about him every night.
You can't control everything.
You can't control everything.
They were pioneers of space flight.
They were pioneers of space flight.
I ran out of the house.
He cannot play guitar.
Never mind!
I not only gave him some advice, I also gave him a blowjob.
I stopped by Tom's school on the way home.
I stopped by Tom's school on the way home.
I stopped by Tom's school on the way home.
I stopped by Tom's school on the way home.
I don't steal.
Can you play guitar?
We have supper at six every evening.
She explained to him why she was late.
I count on Tom.
Tom has a big house.
You did that on purpose.
Our fridge is broken.
Fill it up, please.
Tom isn't making much money.
He isn't perfect.
He isn't perfect.
There are no customers.
I'm not angry with them.
Tom had a cat.
Don't talk with your mouth full!
Thank you for your concern.
Thank you for your concern.
Thanks for your concern.
She wanted to get a divorce.
The boy almost drowned.
The boy almost drowned.
It's one of the basic human instincts.
They're spies.
This is very cool.
I can't imagine how I'd feel in Tom's shoes.
I can't imagine how I'd feel in Tom's shoes.
I can't imagine how I'd feel in Tom's shoes.
I can't imagine how I'd feel in Tom's shoes.
It appears the storm has calmed down.
Bad weather prevented us from leaving.
A Japanese would never do such a thing.
Tom has gone crazy.
It's not hopeless.
We had a short vacation in February.
She gave me these old coins.
She loves Tom more than she loves me.
She loves Tom more than she loves me.
Don't leave town.
When was the last time you checked your e-mail box?
When was the last time you checked your e-mail box?
When was the last time you checked your e-mail box?
When was the last time you checked your e-mail box?
When was the last time you checked your e-mail box?
When was the last time you checked your e-mail box?
I had a seizure.
The budget of the film was very limited.
He used a lot of honey.
I assure you that I won't be late.
Let's go to eat together.
Keeping a diary is a good habit.
Keeping a diary is a good habit.
We had a storm yesterday.
What do you want to eat this weekend?
How many elephants are left in Africa?
There was a bus in the way.
Justice is expensive.
There's no cause for concern.
The difference in our ages is not significant.
I'd like to see you before I leave for Europe.
I'd like to see you before I leave for Europe.
I'd like to see you before I leave for Europe.
I'd like to see you before I leave for Europe.
I didn't know you believed in ghosts.
I didn't know you believed in ghosts.
I didn't know you believed in ghosts.
I didn't know you believed in ghosts.
Emily loves sweets.
Emily loves sweets.
He's living from hand to mouth.
Get rid of those kinds of naive ideas.
Get rid of those kinds of naive ideas.
You've had enough of this riff-raff? Well, we'll help you get rid of it.
You've had enough of this riff-raff? Well, we'll help you get rid of it.
You must get rid of that bad habit.
I know a girl whose father is a lawyer.
That salesman looks pretty smart.
His mother speaks Italian.
As wisdom grows, and so does pain.
As wisdom grows, and so does pain.
She is gone shopping.
I'd have been here sooner except for some trouble on the way.
The pilot lost control and the plane went into a dive.
If we can't get fresh fruit, we'll have to do without.
I have made a careful examination of the situation.
Will you entertain the guests while I get dressed?
It's getting hard for them to make both ends meet.
It won't do any good to complain to the police.
Are you still hungry or have you had enough?
I don't want to be disturbed until ten.
How's Tom doing at his new job?
When does the performance end?
How can you endure such cold?
I've finally got my divorce.
I don't want to bother you.
Do you like the food here?
The thing still bothers me.
She must be angry with me.
We must get over many difficulties.
I like bread more than rice.
I like bread more than rice.
When did you take the exam?
Tom has had plenty of time.
I just can't seem to remember it.
Take this to your mother.
It is midday. The men are eating lunch.
Tom is not here.
This is my doll.
Tom's furious.
I'm photographing the woman.
Tom felt homesick.
Tom was a little homesick.
We are doomed.
I'll eat fish.
I made a promise.
Tom was killed by his own gang members.
I saw his car make a turn to the right.
I saw his car make a turn to the right.
We just want to find Tom.
I found the key in Tom's jacket pocket.
I found the key in Tom's jacket pocket.
She advised him to keep his promises.
Do be careful.
How are you, son?
He moved to Tokyo last month.
It doesn't seem fair.
What a show!
I was kidding.
I was kidding.
I'm efficient.
Our town does not have a corps of firemen.
I think we'll make it if we hurry.
I think we'll make it if we hurry.
They were skiing.
She was skiing.
Tom was skiing.
She has no shame.
She'd been sitting at the stop for about ten minutes till the bus arrived.
Tom is a few inches taller than Mary.
Tom is a few inches taller than Mary.
Tom is a few inches shorter than Mary.
Tom is a few inches shorter than Mary.
Tom has lots of furniture.
Tom has a grown daughter.
Tom has a grown daughter.
Tom drove Mary to work yesterday.
Tom doesn't share Mary's enthusiasm.
Tom doesn't share Mary's enthusiasm.
I've missed you so much.
Tom doesn't like talking to strangers.
Tom doesn't like talking to strangers.
Tom didn't even thank Mary for cooking dinner.
Tom didn't even thank Mary for cooking dinner.
Tom broke up with Mary today.
Tom broke Mary's heart.
Tom broke Mary's heart.
Tom broke a window in the classroom.
Tom asked Mary to wait outside.
Tom asked Mary to wait outside.
That's Tom's book.
There are three Toms in my class.
There are three Toms in my class.
There are three Toms in my class.
There are three Toms in my class.
The police suspected that Tom was a drug dealer.
The police suspected that Tom was a drug dealer.
That's what scares me.
I translated Tom's letter into French.
I translated Tom's letter into French.
Please don't interrupt me, Tom.
My family loved Tom.
Mary loves playing with dolls.
Tom translated the letter into French.
Learning French takes longer than most people think.
It seemed like you weren't interested.
It seemed like you weren't interested.
It seemed like you weren't interested.
It seemed like you weren't interested.
No one I know talks to Tom anymore.
I wrote the note.
I wrote the note.
I wrote the note.
I wrote the note.
He drove the car at eighty kilometers an hour.
Don't lie to me, Tom.
Don't ask me. Ask Tom.
Don't ask me. Ask Tom.
Don't ask me. Ask Tom.
Don't ask me. Ask Tom.
Do you think I don't care?
Do you think I don't care?
Do you think I don't care?
Do you think I don't care?
Do you think I don't care?
Do you think I don't care?
Do you know Tom's home address?
Do you know Tom's home address?
Did Tom hurt anyone?
Are you saying this doesn't matter?
Are you saying this doesn't matter?
We got something for Tom.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sure Tom didn't even notice you were late.
I'm sober.
I'm sober.
I'm sober.
I saw the way you looked at Tom.
I saw the way you were looking at Tom.
I saw the way you looked at Tom.
I saw the way you looked at Tom.
I saw the way you looked at Tom.
I saw the way you looked at Tom.
I saw the car explode.
I saw the car explode.
I saw the car explode.
I saw the car explode.
I saw the car explode.
I saw the car explode.
I saw the car explode.
I saw the car explode.
I said I'd talk to Tom about it.
I said I'd talk to Tom about it.
You're one of Tom's friends, aren't you?
You're one of Tom's friends, aren't you?
You recognize her, don't you?
You recognize her, don't you?
I take a walk every morning.
General Motors laid off 76,000 workers.
She took something out of the bag.
This is unbelievable.
Kiss Tom.
Come enjoy the snow with me!
Don't you recognize them?
Don't you recognize them?
I will devote my life to the study of history.
I was so careful.
The curtains make this room beautiful.
Tom has a nice smile.
I miss you, Tom.
I don't want to leave you.
I don't want to leave you.
I'm not surprised you don't know the answer.
He was patience itself.
I am glad to accept your invitation.
I am glad to accept your invitation.
I miss him as much as ever.
I bowed politely.
I bowed politely.
I was surprised.
Do you need an envelope?
Welcome back. We missed you!
I was threatened.
I know Tom's wife.
We see them on occasion.
We see them on occasion.
I will be free in ten minutes.
I was outside.
Tom was outside.
We were outside.
They were outside.
Be careful. We don't know what's in there.
That was a lie.
Who among us is perfect?
Surprised at her behavior, he could not say a word.
Tom had a hectic week.
Let's start the ball rolling by introducing ourselves.
You are not even man enough to admit your fault.
I'm in love with this woman.
I'm in love with this woman.
I'll visit you tomorrow.
Did you accept his invitation?
Did you accept his invitation?
My friend studies Korean.
It is hard for me to chew.
I don't know whether to turn left or right.
I don't know whether to turn left or right.
I don't know whether to turn left or right.
Do not translate this sentence!
I don't care whether he agrees or not.
I don't care whether he agrees or not.
Are you prepared for the worst?
They became lovers.
I need urgent help.
Bon appetit.
She couldn't convince him to go home.
Tom has got a large family.
You should speak with Tom.
I was a little late.
You were a little late.
He was a bit late.
She was a bit late.
We've arrived a little late.
You're a little late.
Your link isn't working.
He who is bitten by a snake fears even the rope.
Tom does not want to be late.
I was choked by smoke.
No one cares about that anymore.
In the summer, people go to the beach.
Where are the gloves?
Tom was excused from work yesterday because he was sick.
I entered Tom's name on the list of candidates.
I never expected to see Tom again.
Your handwriting is very good.
Why does your daughter dislike candies?
Please turn on the light.
Could you turn on the light please?
He kept a diary during the trip.
He kept a diary during the trip.
Get off my back.
The rich are apt to look down upon the poor.
He was so angry, he was red in the face.
Many students took part in the contest.
Many students took part in the contest.
It's already dark outside.
I'm sure he'll pass the upcoming exam.
Tom's train left five minutes ago.
Tom's train left five minutes ago.
Everybody likes polite people.
Everybody likes polite people.
I don't want you to get involved.
I don't want you to get involved.
I don't want you to get involved.
You aren't a spy, are you?
He is accustomed to working hard.
Tom has a lot of imagination.
Tom's imaginative.
Tom has a vivid imagination.
Tom has a vivid imagination.
Tom has a vivid imagination.
It took half an hour.
I haven't broken any laws.
I got stuck.
Watch your step in dark alleys.
Cybotron was composing excellent music.
I got stuck.
You don't understand British humour.
You don't understand British humour.
She visited her husband in prison.
I'll let you in on a secret.
Tom uses a spoon to eat rice, but Mary prefers to use chopsticks.
This puzzle has 500 pieces.
Put everything in my basket.
His novels are popular among young people.
There are some people who enjoy work - in fact, they love to work.
I won't lower myself to his level.
I want to be more independent.
I want to be more independent.
I don't want to hear any more of your complaining.
He took poison by mistake.
Tom tore the paper in half.
I tore the newspaper into pieces.
I tore the newspaper into pieces.
This desk is used by Tom.
The information you gave me is of little use.
I don't care what your mother said.
Can I begin?
Can I begin?
Can I finish?
Can I finish?
Can we start?
Can you cancel?
Can you cancel?
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
I get up at 6 o'clock every morning.
I want to tell you about Tom.
I'll visit him tomorrow.
I know you miss Tom.
I know you miss Tom.
I know you miss your family.
I know you miss your friends.
I missed both of you so much.
I missed both of you so much.
I missed both of you so much.
I missed both of you so much.
I really missed you.
I really missed you.
I really miss you.
I can't tell you how much I'll miss Tom.
I don't know who I'll miss more, you or your brother.
I'm the only one who survived.
She's the only one who survived.
He's the only one who survived.
Can you give him first aid?
Can you give him first aid?
He's a historian.
He turned out her father.
He made no mention of her request.
He's strong and sexy.
Tom's French is quite good.
I appreciate what you did yesterday.
You don't have to apologize.
Tom's French is better than mine.
Tom's French is better than mine.
He ordered them back to the fort.
This is a law, so it applies to everybody.
When did you come to Japan?
When did you come to Japan?
You aren't a spy, are you?
You aren't a spy, are you?
You aren't a spy, are you?
You aren't a spy, are you?
I know Tom very well.
I know Tom very well.
I know Tom is nearby.
I know Tom was angry.
I met Tom last night.
I met Tom last night.
You really exaggerate returning at this time.
Tom made a list of places he wanted to visit.
I must talk to Tom.
I must talk with Tom.
I must talk with Tom.
I must talk with Tom.
None shall survive.
The orchestra is playing.
I can't recall the last time we met.
I'm very grateful to you.
I'm very grateful to you.
I'm very grateful to you.
I'm really grateful to you.
You ate an apple, yay!
You ate an apple, yay!
You ate an apple, yay!
Tom had only one leg.
You are skinny.
You're skinny.
Tom has a very stressful job.
I need a good lawyer.
Record the broadcast on tape.
Record the broadcast on tape.
Tears rolled down her face.
He wiped her tears away.
We're running out of time.
I don't want to be late for work.
Absence of rain caused the plants to die.
Absence of rain caused the plants to die.
Animals act according to their instincts.
You can't be too careful.
My bag is empty.
I appreciate your support.
I have had quite enough of his jokes.
Tom doesn't have a sense of humor.
Tom has no sense of humor.
Production at this factory has increased by 20%.
Hurry! The concert is starting!
The Japanese eat rice at least once a day.
I'm divorced.
I'm glad you're to visit Tokyo next month.
Be at the station at 11 o'clock sharp.
Be at the station at 11 o'clock sharp.
Spread the news!
Spread the news!
Tom has 12 siblings.
His e-mail address is hirosey@genet.co.jp.
I'm Tom's supervisor.
These shoes don't fit me anymore.
I collect dolls from different countries.
I'd like to see the sixth film of Harry Potter.
I'd like to see the sixth film of Harry Potter.
It's far to go by feet! Let's take the car.
Let him do whatever he wants! Edoardo is responsible.
Let him do whatever he wants! Edoardo is responsible.
Let him do whatever he wants! Edoardo is responsible.
Let him do whatever he wants! Edoardo is responsible.
Does your brother like ice skating?
Spies make it their business to know things that you don't want them to know.
Many students go to Europe for the purpose of studying music.
Tom is sincere.
Are you surprised?
Are you surprised?
Are you surprised?
She advised him to visit that museum.
This is a silver coin.
Tom said he was extremely tired.
Tom said he was utterly exhausted.
You speak nonsense, my friend.
You speak nonsense, my friend.
She is pretty, and what is better, very kind.
I would like to eat sushi.
I would like to eat sushi.
I would like to visit you.
I would like to visit you.
I would like to visit you.
I would like to visit you.
I would like to visit you.
I would like to visit you.
There's fruit and meat in this market.
I'm shopping.
I respect Tom.
She's eating lunch right now.
Eight hobbits form one hobbyte.
I want to be that doctor's patient.
I want to go to America someday.
I want to learn how to ski.
He wanted to make singing a career.
He wanted to make singing a career.
I want to visit Korea.
They live apart.
The coin is gold.
The animals are kept in very small cages.
If there are difficulties give me a call!
If there are difficulties give me a call!
I want to talk to my lawyer.
Let's go Dutch today.
I want to visit my friend next week.
I want to visit the ruins of Machu Picchu.
I want to visit the ruins of Athens.
I want to visit Egypt some day.
There are so many places I want to visit.
I just want to be able to visit my children whenever I want to.
I just want to be able to visit my children whenever I want to.
I just want to visit Tom.
It was a nice place to visit, but I wouldn't want to live there.
It was a nice place to visit, but I wouldn't want to live there.
I want you to visit Canarsie.
The German team lost and now I am sad.
When it comes to love, women are experts and men eternal novices.
It's dangerous to swim in this lake.
She looked bored while we were making love.
There is a post office close by.
There is a post office close by.
I sent you an email.
I sent you an email.
I regret not having taken his advice.
I regret not having taken his advice.
He regretted not having taken my advice.
We should have taken his advice.
I wish he had been more careful when he spoke.
I wish he had been more careful when he spoke.
I was surprised at the news of his sudden death.
My mother was happy to see her guest eating her cakes eagerly.
What's this dog's name?
I'm going to introduce you to my mother-in-law.
I'm going to introduce you to my mother-in-law.
It will cost 500 dollars to fly to Paris.
Left alone, he began to read a book.
It's not a good idea to ask a woman how old she is.
It's not a good idea to ask a woman how old she is.
I've come to save the princess.
I've come to save the princess.
I've come to save Tom.
I've come to save Tom.
Her horse doesn't respect her.
I'm really sleepy.
I'm really sleepy.
The horse jumped over the fence.
The horse jumped over the fence.
He knows how to pilot a plane.
He knows how to pilot a plane.
She washes the car.
This bus will take you to the airport.
How many missiles can this aircraft carry?
Are there any bears around here?
No one wants to talk to Tom anymore.
I met her during my stay in Mexico.
I met her during my stay in Mexico.
I shot the horse.
I shot the horse.
I sent Tom out of the room.
I sent Tom out of the room.
I sent Tom out of the room.
I sent Tom out of the room.
I saw you yesterday at the funeral.
I saw you yesterday at the funeral.
I saw you yesterday at the funeral.
I saw you yesterday at the funeral.
I saw you yesterday at the funeral.
I saw you yesterday at the funeral.
I saw you yesterday at the funeral.
I saw you yesterday at the funeral.
I saw you with Tom last Monday.
I saw you with Tom last Monday.
I saw you with Tom last Monday.
I saw you with Tom last Monday.
He moved to Europe.
I saw you with Tom last Monday.
I saw you with Tom last Monday.
I saw you with Tom last Monday.
I saw you with Tom last Monday.
She moved to America.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you staring at Tom.
I saw you spying on Tom.
I saw you spying on Tom.
I saw you spying on Tom.
I saw you spying on Tom.
I saw Tom's father.
I saw Tom's father.
I saw Tom's face.
I saw Tom's face.
I saw Tom's face.
I saw Tom's face.
I saw Tom's father.
I saw Tom's father.
He moved to Canada.
I saw Tom's daughter last week.
I saw Tom's daughter last week.
I saw Tom yesterday and he looked sad.
I saw Tom yesterday and he looked sad.
She came to Japan for the purpose of studying Japanese.
He saved money for his old age.
The boy tried eating with chopsticks.
I can't draw a bird.
I don't know how to draw a bird.
They waved flags to welcome the princess.
He went to America to study medicine.
We went to the mountain to ski.
We went to the mountain to ski.
My son has gone to America to study medicine.
I hurried in order not to be late for school.
I hurried in order not to be late for school.
I hurried in order not to be late for school.
I hurried in order not to be late for school.
He left early in order not to be late.
I left early so as not to be late.
He ran to catch up to his brother.
I woke Tom up.
I woke Tom up.
I'll make this brief.
I'll meet Tom.
I'll meet with Tom.
I'll miss Tom.
I will stop Tom.
I'll save Tom.
I'm attentive.
I'm attentive.
I'm attentive.
I'm attentive.
I'm energetic.
I'm energetic.
I'm energetic.
I'm energetic.
Be careful, OK?
Be careful, OK?
Be careful, OK?
Bring Tom back.
Bring Tom here.
Contact my son.
Contact my son.
Finish the job.
Finish the job.
Hold Tom tight.
Hold Tom tight.
I followed Tom.
I followed Tom.
I met Tom here.
I met Tom here.
I miss my wife.
I need a break.
I punished Tom.
I remember Tom.
I started that.
I was attacked.
I was offended.
I wasn't lying.
I wasn't lying.
I'll bring Tom.
I'll thank Tom.
I'm bored, too.
Are you in love?
Are you in love?
Are you in love?
Did anyone care?
I just miss you.
I knew Tom well.
I knew Tom well.
I contacted Tom.
I know the area.
I miss you guys.
I need my pills.
I threw it away.
I threw it away.
I respected Tom.
I respected Tom.
I smell trouble.
I smell trouble.
I tried to hide.
I tried to hide.
I was terrified.
I was terrified.
I wasn't scared.
I wasn't scared.
I'd be grateful.
I'd be grateful.
There are eleven rooms in this house.
I woke up with a headache.
I woke up with a headache.
Do you really want to break my heart?
It's been three years since Tom has been to visit us.
It's been three years since Tom has been to visit us.
I'd like to thank you for coming today.
I'd like to thank you for coming today.
I'd like to thank you for coming today.
I'd like to thank you for coming today.
I'd like to thank you for coming today.
I'd like to thank you for coming today.
Do you want to learn to play guitar?
Do you want to learn to play guitar?
This clock is electric.
I go to bed at eleven every night.
Everyone looked at Tom.
He devoted himself to the study of literature.
Please wait a minute.
Wait a minute, please!
She ruined my life.
We must consider his youth.
I have bad news.
I'll be very careful.
I'll be very careful.
I have bad news.
I have bad news.
He wants to participate in the contest.
What size of collar does he take?
How high can you jump?
I'll be waiting outside.
That chef prepares different meals every day.
Is that not enough?
Tom has three older sisters.
I think it's dangerous for children to play in the pond.
Tom is ironing his shirts.
I didn't apologize.
Tom would like to see you in his office.
Tom would like to see you in his office.
Tom would never give up.
I'll miss you very much.
I'll miss you very much.
Do we need a world language?
Whether it will rain or not, the game is going to be held.
I'm a great singer.
He sank into a chair.
Women hate Tom.
Free advice isn't always good advice.
We followed Tom.
He arrived here on foot.
Petrol is no longer a cheap fuel.
Let's wind up our work.
His silence surprised me.
We're in love.
We're in love with each other.
We searched everywhere.
Tom ate as soon as the food was put on the table.
They're waiting outside.
They're waiting outside.
I was sleepy.
They shot Tom.
I don't want to go to the pool!
He is a British teacher who teaches us English.
I failed the exam because I didn't study.
I went to the library to read a book.
There is a crowd of women around Tom.
Where's convenient for you?
We surrendered.
Did you know Tom?
Did you know Tom?
Did you know Tom?
Nothing's free.
That's cool.
We bagged the fruits and vegetables.
He contributed a lot of money for the sake of art.
Tom rushed in.
The rain lasted for three days.
Tom took a walk in the park.
I'm Tom's uncle.
Please enter a valid email address.
George, if you are not listening to the radio, turn it off.
I'm not a lawyer.
The patient lost patience.
I surrender.
This stone has a hole in the center.
Tom didn't have time to think.
Tom started eating.
Magdalena is very polite to me.
He has not written to us since last February.
He is fed up with my problems.
The lid is closed.
The car turned right when it reached the corner.
There was a young fellow in to see you a half an hour ago.
Tom has an old felt hat he always wears in the rain.
It was so dark I had to feel my way around the room.
Meeting Tom was quite an experience for me.
Tom is an expert at all kinds of games.
I feel very sorry for Tom, poor fellow.
Tom hasn't got any fight left in him.
I feel a little uneasy about Tom.
I need some expert advice.
He made every effort to pass the exam.
She insisted on going there.
Tom doesn't like to repeat himself.
I will ask her about the interview.
My brother likes to wash his car on the weekend.
Some people caught rats and ate them.
Tom lost patience.
In him was life, and that life was the light of men.
Sit comfortably.
I visited American friends in Oakland.
I visited American friends in Oakland.
I wouldn't even talk to Tom if I were you.
Did Tom threaten you?
There was no chance to finish the job on time.
Could you do me a favor? Will you lend me some money?
The doctor performed the operation.
The kitten is between the puppies.
I just sang a couple of songs with Tom.
I just sang a couple of songs with Tom.
He'll come on foot or by bicycle.
Be careful not to break these eggs.
Be careful not to break these eggs.
Do you want to eat anything?
Do you want to eat anything?
I don't care what Tom did.
He carried out the plan.
Casualties were inevitable.
Missing you more than ever.
Alcohol doesn't solve any problems.
There is a tall man in the classroom.
Men make houses, women make homes.
This system has obvious defects.
This system has obvious defects.
When will your assignment be completed?
You have Jim to thank for your failure.
Your bicycle is similar to mine.
Your bike is better than mine.
There is a good chance that he will win.
Today I have a good appetite.
Don't wake her up.
What time do you wake up?
I'd like two kilos of apples.
I'd like two kilos of apples.
I see Tom.
Do you ski?
Do you ski?
I know Tom.
I miss Tom.
I miss Tom.
I was late.
I was late.
Call me Tom.
Call me Tom.
Eat with us.
I found Tom.
I found Tom.
I got bored.
I hated Tom.
I hated Tom.
I heard Tom.
I heard Tom.
I was bored.
I was bored.
I was bored.
I'd ask Tom.
I'd ask Tom.
I'm being careful.
I'm being careful.
I'm sending you a birthday present by airmail.
Did Tom pray?
I'll send the book by mail.
Hey, wake up!
Hey, wake up!
I've missed Tom.
I missed Tom.
I missed Tom.
I'll risk it.
Do be careful.
Do be careful.
Here's a copy.
Here's a copy.
Here's a copy.
I canceled it.
I canceled it.
I married Tom.
I told Tom no.
I told Tom no.
I took a bath.
I took a bath.
I was careful.
I was careful.
I was careful.
I was careful.
I was so cold.
I was so cold.
I was too shy.
I was too shy.
I was watching Tom.
I watched Tom.
I'm dedicated.
I'm dedicated.
I'm fantastic.
I'm fantastic.
I'm efficient.
Check with Tom.
Check with Tom.
Get everything.
Get everything.
Have some cake.
Have some cake.
I was upstairs.
I was upstairs.
I'll cancel it.
He must buy a new bicycle for his son.
I'll watch Tom.
I'll watch Tom.
Change is scary.
Did Tom approve?
Did Tom respond?
Do you blame me?
Do you blame me?
Don't blame Tom.
Don't blame Tom.
Double the dose.
Double the dose.
I must meet Tom.
I must meet Tom.
I'll be outside.
I'll enjoy this.
I'm enjoying this.
Today we celebrate Africa Day.
It rained for hours and hours.
I won the event.
I won the event.
I won the event.
I won the event.
I wouldn't care.
I'll allow this.
I'll assist you.
I'll assist you.
I'll destroy it.
I'll follow Tom.
I'll follow Tom.
I'll follow Tom.
I'll visit soon.
I'll visit soon.
I'm a lawyer.
Did Tom hurt you?
Did Tom hurt you?
Don't forget Tom.
Don't forget Tom.
Don't forget Tom.
Don't forget Tom.
Finish the story.
Finish the story.
Finish the story.
Finish the story.
Forget about Tom.
Forget about Tom.
Forget about Tom.
Forget about Tom.
Get Tom's advice.
Get Tom's advice.
I don't love Tom.
I heard a scream.
I heard a scream.
I miss my family.
I still love Tom.
I was waiting for Tom.
I waited for Tom.
I was half right.
I was half right.
I was so careful.
I was so careful.
I was so careful.
I will translate.
I'll do it myself.
I'll have dinner.
I'm finished now.
But I was careful.
But I was careful.
But I was careful.
But I was careful.
His name was on the tip of my tongue, but I couldn't remember it.
He ate rice twice a day for many years.
Tom is likeable.
When I was sick, she didn't come to visit me.
They seem scared.
Everybody knew Tom.
Everyone knew Tom.
I really miss Tom.
I really miss Tom.
I really miss Tom.
I really miss Tom.
I recommended Tom.
I was enjoying it.
I was enjoying it.
I went for a walk.
There is lightning.
I'll recommend it.
I'll ride my bike.
I'll sit with Tom.
I'll sit with Tom.
I'll surprise Tom.
I'm a little cold.
I'm a little cold.
I'm afraid of Tom.
I'm already bored.
I'm following Tom.
Don't pressure Tom.
Don't pressure Tom.
Empty your pockets.
I just saw a ghost.
I just saw a ghost.
I know Tom is fine.
I know Tom is fine.
I miss my kids.
I miss Tom already.
I miss Tom already.
I missed my chance.
I missed my chance.
I must contact Tom.
I must contact Tom.
I surprised myself.
I surprised myself.
I took care of Tom.
I took care of Tom.
I want to find Tom.
I want to find Tom.
I want to kill Tom.
I want to warn Tom.
I want Tom to lose.
I want you to lose.
I want you to lose.
I want you to lose.
I was asked to lie.
I was proud of Tom.
I was proud of Tom.
I was proud of Tom.
I was proud of Tom.
I was very careful.
I was very careful.
I wrote it for Tom.
I wrote it for Tom.
I'd better ask Tom.
I'd better ask Tom.
I'd better ask Tom.
I'd better ask Tom.
I'd never hurt you.
I'd never hurt you.
I'd never hurt you.
I'd never hurt you.
I'd never hurt Tom.
I'd never hurt Tom.
Tom folded the towels and put them on the shelf.
I folded the towels.
I folded the towel in half.
Greeks often eat fish, too.
I'll help find Tom.
I'll help find Tom.
I'll help find Tom.
I'll miss everyone.
I'll miss everyone.
I'll meet with Tom.
I'll miss you, Tom.
I'll never give up.
I'll stay with Tom.
I'm always careful.
I'm always careful.
I'm at the airport.
I'm at Tom's house.
I'm finishing this.
I'm finishing this.
I'm glad Tom is OK.
I'm glad Tom is OK.
I'm going shopping.
Everybody wants Tom.
Here's Tom's number.
I just spoke with Tom.
I just spoke with Tom.
I met Tom at church.
I met Tom at church.
I met Tom yesterday.
I met Tom yesterday.
Tom is trying to make the impossible possible.
I tried to call Tom.
I tried to call Tom.
I tried to find Tom.
I tried to find Tom.
I tried to save Tom.
I tried to save Tom.
I tried to stop Tom.
I tried to stop Tom.
I tried to warn Tom.
I tried to warn Tom.
I turned off the TV.
I turned off the TV.
I want a girlfriend.
I was happy for Tom.
I was happy for Tom.
I was Tom's teacher.
I was Tom's teacher.
I knew you were lying.
I knew you were lying.
I knew you were lying.
I knew you were lying.
I knew you were lying.
I knew you were lying.
I must finish my work.
I must finish my work.
I don't believe a word Tom says.
Hamlet is a play by Shakespeare.
Bend down. The ceiling is very low.
I usually walk to school.
Are you still mad?
She finished up lunch with coffee.
He provided food and clothes for his family.
I thought they found Tom.
I thought they found Tom.
I thought they found Tom.
I thought they found Tom.
I thought Tom had a date.
I thought Tom had a date.
I told Tom to be careful.
I told Tom to be careful.
I'll drive Tom to school.
It doesn't matter, right?
I sacked him.
I can't blame Tom for that.
I don't care about the law.
I missed my flight.
I didn't touch your guitar.
I didn't touch your guitar.
I didn't touch your guitar.
I didn't touch your guitar.
I don't know if I can help.
I don't think you're lying.
I don't think you're lying.
I know you miss your family.
I met Tom a couple of times.
I met Tom a couple of times.
I never liked green peppers.
I picked Tom up from school.
I picked Tom up from school.
I really appreciate it, Tom.
I'll need about five minutes.
I'll never forget Tom's face.
I'll never talk to Tom again.
I'll meet Tom at the library.
I'm at the airport right now.
I'm at the hospital with Tom.
I'm at the hospital with Tom.
I'm going back to the office.
I'm going back to the office.
I'm going back to the office.
I'm going on a business trip.
I'm going to be your teacher.
I'm going to be your teacher.
I'm going to do some reading.
I don't want them to hurt Tom.
I don't want Tom to get angry.
I don't want Tom to get angry.
I don't want you to apologize.
I don't want you to apologize.
I really want you to meet Tom.
I really want you to meet Tom.
I really want you to meet Tom.
Have both of you already eaten?
I'm going to cancel the meeting.
Find Tom before he tells someone.
Find Tom before he tells someone.
Tom appears to be wise.
I want you to make me a promise.
I want you to make me a promise.
I want you to make me a promise.
I want to talk with you about Tom.
I want to talk with you about Tom.
I was the only one who survived.
I was the only one who survived.
I was trying not to look at Tom.
I was trying not to look at Tom.
I was surprised to see you here.
I was surprised to see you here.
I was surprised to see you here.
I was surprised to see you here.
I wonder why Tom isn't here yet.
I'm asking you to do me a favor.
I'm asking you to do me a favor.
It was a fake.
It was cold outside.
It was cool.
It was unthinkable.
Tom turned the page.
Tom turned the music off.
Tom has been waiting patiently.
Tom wanted something to eat.
Tom was bored.
Tom was bored.
Tom was lying.
Tom was polite.
Tom wasn't there.
Tom wasn't with me.
Tom wasn't with us last night.
I'm very glad to hear the news.
I'm very glad to hear the news.
I am glad to hear the news.
I am glad to hear the news.
He is glad to hear the news.
Tom went shopping.
Did she write in her diary yesterday?
Did she write in her diary yesterday?
Writing in a diary is a good habit.
I must write in my diary every day.
I must write in my diary every day.
My father writes in his diary every day.
I'll talk with Tom.
I'll have to speak with Tom before I can make a decision.
I'll have to speak with Tom before I can make a decision.
I'll let you talk to Tom.
I'll let you speak to Tom.
We've hired Tom.
We hired Tom.
Have you eaten?
HTTP 2 just adds a new layer of complexity without solving any real-world problems.
It is difficult to satisfy everyone.
It is difficult for me to read the book.
It is difficult to translate a poem into another language.
I'll tell Tom that's not true.
In case I am late, you don't have to wait for me.
In case I am late, you don't have to wait for me.
I am putting on my jacket. Wait for me.
I am putting on my jacket. Wait for me.
I'm waiting for Tom.
I'm waiting for a letter from Tom.
I'm expecting a call from Tom.
I'm waiting to hear from Tom.
I'm waiting to talk to Tom.
I'm still waiting to hear from Tom.
I'm going to wait here for Tom.
I'm going to wait here for Tom.
I'm going to wait outside.
I'm going to wait for Tom.
I'm just waiting for Tom.
When I die, I want to be buried next to her.
I am not sure, but I think I want to be a teacher.
I want to be a pilot when I grow up.
Where's Tom's assistant?
Where's Tom's card?
Where's Tom's card?
Where's Tom's file?
Who kissed Tom?
Who doesn't care about money?
I can't hear what you're saying; it's too noisy here.
I can't hear what you're saying; it's too noisy here.
He just came back home now.
I know Tom better than you.
I know Tom better than you.
I know Tom better than you do.
I know Tom better than you do.
They issued a statement saying that the rumors regarding their divorce were complete nonsense. And yet, there's no smoke without fire.
I have gained two kilograms this summer.
Have you heard from him recently?
I want to tell Tom good night.
I want to tell you about Tom.
I need envelopes.
Maria asked me to help her in mathematics.
Maria asked me to help her with her math.
Tom became emotional.
Tom became curious.
Tom became curious.
Tom became suspicious.
Sheep provide us with wool.
Sheep are raised for their wool and meat.
I'm Tom's cousin.
What an ugly cat.
This is Tom's handwriting.
This medicine helps relieve muscle pain.
Don't be mad!
Tom lost more than thirty kilograms.
Tom lost more than thirty kilograms.
She visited her uncle and aunt.
I wish you would start calling me Tom.
I wish you would start calling me Tom.
I wish you would start calling me Tom.
I wish you would start calling me Tom.
I wish you would start calling me Tom.
I wish you would start calling me Tom.
I'd like to help Tom prove it.
I'd like to help Tom prove it.
I'd like to see the agreement.
I'd like to see the agreement.
I'd like to talk to Tom again.
I'd like to talk to Tom again.
I'd like you to accompany Tom.
I'd like you to accompany Tom.
I'd like you to accompany Tom.
I'd like you to accompany Tom.
I'd like you to accompany Tom.
I'd like you to accompany Tom.
I'll be careful with the kids.
I'll be careful with the kids.
I'll be careful with the kids.
I'll be careful with the kids.
I'll be looking forward to it.
I'll meet Tom some other time.
I'm aware of the difficulties.
I'm beginning to enjoy myself.
I'm glad you're enjoying this.
I'm glad you're enjoying this.
I'm glad you're enjoying this.
I'm glad you're enjoying this.
Could you be careful with that?
Could you be careful with that?
Could you be careful with that?
Did you speak to Tom yesterday?
Did you speak to Tom yesterday?
Did you speak to Tom yesterday?
Do you want this window opened?
Do you want this window opened?
Do you want to keep dating Tom?
Do you want to keep dating Tom?
Everyone watched Tom carefully.
I asked Tom to watch my things.
I asked Tom to watch my things.
I can't control what'll happen.
I can't get Tom out of my mind.
I can't work with Tom.
I don't understand their humor.
I don't really care about that.
I don't always dress like this.
I don't care what anybody says.
I don't care what society says.
I haven't actually said no yet.
I haven't actually said no yet.
I just stopped by to say hello.
I just stopped by to say hello.
I just wanted to say good luck.
I just wanted to say good luck.
I just wanted to say I'm sorry.
I just wanted to say I'm sorry.
I knew Tom better than you did.
I knew Tom better than you did.
I knew Tom better than you did.
I knew Tom better than you did.
I knew it would make Tom happy.
I knew it would make Tom happy.
I know Tom's house is for sale.
I know you want to talk to Tom.
I know you want to talk to Tom.
I thought it looked suspicious.
I thought it looked suspicious.
Don't act like a bull in a china shop.
He accelerated.
He did his duty.
I wanted to thank you for that.
I wanted to thank you for that.
I wanted to thank you for that.
I wanted to thank you for that.
I wanted to say that I'm sorry.
I wanted to say that I'm sorry.
I was just trying to be polite.
I was just trying to be polite.
I work in an office.
He acquired French quickly.
He addressed a large audience.
He addressed a large audience.
The wind is blowing east.
The wind is blowing from the west.
The wind is blowing from the west.
I'm not an expert of psychology.
The group is running on the beach.
I went to high school with Tom.
I went to high school with Tom.
I wonder what Tom's problem is.
I wonder what scared Tom.
I wonder why Tom was so afraid.
This vending machine takes only hundred-yen coins.
I was late, right?
I was late, right?
I was late, right?
I was late, right?
I'm alone with Tom.
I'm alone with Tom.
He never lies.
It's six degrees below zero.
That's a copy.
He practices medicine.
Dogs are faithful.
Everybody hates Tom.
Everyone loves puppets.
If something goes wrong, just blame it on the translator.
He answered an advertisement in the paper and got the job.
It was almost noon when I woke up.
I thought that Tom was kind.
The color is purple rather than pink.
Do you want some candy?
Do you want some candy?
Don't get mad at me.
Don't be angry with me.
Don't be angry with me.
Do you want to give up?
Do you want to give up?
Don't tell me you care.
Don't tell me you care.
I can't make Tom happy.
I came looking for you.
I came looking for you.
I came looking for you.
I came looking for you.
I destroyed everything.
I destroyed everything.
I couldn't say goodbye.
I couldn't say goodbye.
I did that all by myself.
I did it all by myself.
I don't want a divorce.
I can see myself in the mirror.
I have to take a break.
I haven't given up yet.
I haven't given up yet.
I just need Tom's help.
I just want to see Tom.
I knew Tom a long time.
I knew Tom a long time.
I must go and find Tom.
I must go and find Tom.
I said leave Tom alone.
I said leave Tom alone.
I said leave Tom alone.
I said leave Tom alone.
I saw Tom a minute ago.
I saw Tom a minute ago.
There were six sheep in the field.
I tried to talk to Tom.
I tried to talk to Tom.
I tried to protect you.
I tried to protect you.
I tried to protect you.
I tried to protect you.
I used to work for Tom.
I want to take a break.
I want to wait for Tom.
I want you to meet Tom.
I want you to meet Tom.
I want you to meet Tom.
I wanted to say thanks.
I wanted to say thanks.
I was going to see Tom.
I was going to see Tom.
I was with Tom all day.
I was with Tom all day.
I was with Tom all day.
I was with Tom all day.
I entered Tom's room.
I went into Tom's room.
I will be more careful.
I will be more careful.
I will be more careful.
I will be more careful.
I will be more careful.
I will be more careful.
I will be more careful.
I will be more careful.
I will be very careful.
I will be very careful.
I'll be very attentive.
I will be very careful.
I will be very careful.
I will be very careful.
I wish to speak to Tom.
I'd be really grateful.
I'd be really grateful.
I'd better go find Tom.
I'd better say goodbye.
I'd better say goodbye.
I'd better talk to Tom.
I'd better talk to Tom.
I'd say Tom is jealous.
I'd say Tom is jealous.
I'd say you're jealous.
I'd say you're jealous.
I'd say you're jealous.
I'd say you're jealous.
I'll be really careful.
I'll be really careful.
I'll be really careful.
I'll be really careful.
I'll be really careful.
I'll be really careful.
I'll be really careful.
I'll be really careful.
It's easier to ask for forgiveness than to get permission.
I'll meet Tom tomorrow.
I'll just wait outside.
I'll pick Tom up later.
I'll send you the link.
I'll send you the link.
I'll take Tom home now.
I'll talk to Tom later.
I'm at Tom's apartment.
I'm aware of the risks.
I'm doing it for Tom.
I am tidying my office.
They were aware of the difficulties.
Tom put the bowl into the microwave.
He has access to the American Embassy.
The last time I read classical Japanese literature was in high school.
You've already been to Berlin.
Tom often goes to school by bicycle.
Riding a horse is a lot of fun.
He began to make excuses.
He is very proud of his toy.
He has no less than three-hundred books.
A dark shadow passed behind Tom.
He is squatting.
Why don't you leave Tom alone?
I'm one of the dancers.
I'm going back to work.
I'm going back for Tom.
Everyone smiled but Tom.
I can't do it by myself.
I didn't break any laws.
I don't think that that's fair.
I have a sense of humor.
I just want to find Tom.
I just wanted to say hi.
I just wanted to say hi.
I knew you'd protect me.
I knew you'd protect me.
I knew you'd protect me.
I knew you'd protect me.
I met Tom the other day.
I met Tom the other day.
I thought you loved Tom.
I thought you loved Tom.
I thought you loved Tom.
I thought you loved Tom.
I trust Tom's instincts.
I used to work with Tom.
I want to see Tom first.
I want to see Tom first.
I want to hear from Tom.
I want to stay with Tom.
I want you to bring Tom.
I want you to bring Tom.
I want you to bring Tom.
I wanted to protect you.
I wanted to protect you.
I wanted to protect you.
I wanted to protect you.
I wanted to say goodbye.
I wanted to say goodbye.
I was going to call Tom.
I was going to call Tom.
I was just being polite.
I was just being polite.
I was just being polite.
I was just being polite.
I was talking about Tom.
I was talking about Tom.
I was talking about Tom.
I was talking about Tom.
I was worried about Tom.
I was worried about Tom.
I was worried about Tom.
I was worried about Tom.
I wish we could ask Tom.
I wouldn't be surprised.
I wouldn't be surprised.
I wouldn't recommend it.
I wouldn't recommend it.
I would do anything for Tom.
I'd do anything for Tom.
I'd like to say goodbye.
I'd like to say goodbye.
I'd rather do it myself.
I'd rather do it myself.
I'll be waiting outside.
I'll go and talk to Tom.
I'll go talk to Tom now.
I'll never work for Tom.
I'm glad Tom enjoyed it.
I'm glad Tom enjoyed it.
Are you in love with Tom?
He turned red with shame.
He bought a pair of shoes.
He bound old letters into a bundle.
He broke his promise.
Don't handle these tools roughly.
You must keep your hands clean.
Law is the safest helmet.
She was not feeling well.
My experience shows that Esperanto lets you find a new insight into many cultures formerly unknown to you, inspiring you to learn them further.
There are lots of animals in the park.
We use a lot of water every day.
I'm going out for a walk.
Vienna is the capital of Austria.
Get to work.
Get to work.
Tom had a gun.
Tom had a son.
Tom has a dog.
Tom has a gun.
Tom has a job.
Tom has a map.
Tom was a spy.
Is that a hint?
Send Tom to me.
Send Tom to me.
Send Tom to me.
Send Tom to me.
Tell us a joke.
Tell us a joke.
Tom had a beer.
Tom had a plan.
Tom has got a plan.
Tom hates rats.
Tom lost again.
You're so late.
You're so late.
You're so late.
Go wait outside.
Go wait outside.
Tom was badly in debt for a while, but he's on his feet again.
That's the first good news we've had in a long time.
Do you think this is the best form of government?
How much gas do you want? "Fill 'er up."
The president was elected for four years.
This is the final lecture of the series.
We had to come most of the way on foot.
I saw Tom yesterday for the first time.
They loaded the tank on the flatcar.
We finally forced Tom to admit it.
The plane made a forced landing.
What does Tom do for a living?
We're giving a dinner for Tom.
Tom works for a large factory.
Where did you first meet Tom?
Fill up this pail with water.
Let's swim out to the float.
Is that your final decision?
Didn't you see the red flag?
I'm looking for my gloves.
That was foolish of Tom.
Tom is surprised.
It is a pity that he has no sense of humor.
I forgot to tell you about Tom.
I forgot to tell you about Tom.
I forgot to tell you about Tom.
I forgot to tell you about Tom.
I forgot to tell you about Tom.
I forgot to tell you about Tom.
I forgot to tell you about Tom.
I forgot to tell you about Tom.
She loves Tom.
I am tired from a long walk.
I am tired from a long walk.
I am tired of listening to Tom.
I am tired of listening to Tom.
I'm tired of your complaints.
I'm tired of your complaints.
I'm tired of her complaints.
I'm tired of studying.
I'm tired of studying.
I'm tired of all his complaints.
I'm tired of all his complaints.
I'm tired of translating.
I'm tired of translating.
It's already evening, I'm tired and have to finish writing. Good night!
It's already evening, I'm tired and have to finish writing. Good night!
I'm tired of being careful.
I'm tired of being careful.
I'm tired of listening to your complaints.
I'm tired of listening to your complaints.
I'm tired of your endless complaints.
I'm really tired. Today, I walked way too much.
I'm really tired. Today, I walked way too much.
I'm sick and tired of your complaints.
I'm really tired of your complaining.
I'm really tired of your complaining.
I'm really tired of your complaints.
I'm sick and tired of being lonely.
Tom broke the window.
I can dress myself.
I can dress myself.
I feel so sorry for Tom.
I feel sorry for Tom.
Nobody will hurt you.
She bought him some candy.
She's afraid of getting sick again.
There's not enough water.
This stopped Tom.
This was Tom's idea, wasn't it?
This was Tom's idea, wasn't it?
That was Tom's idea.
This was Tom's idea.
I'm shy.
He came down the hill on his bicycle.
He came in through the window.
Each of the girls has a doll in her arms.
Tom shut the TV off.
Tom turned off the computer.
Tom shut down his computer.
Tom turned off the heat.
Tom forgot to turn off the gas.
Tom didn't turn off the lights.
When was the last time you saw Tom?
The secretary inserted the letter in the envelope.
The secretary inserted the letter in the envelope.
There are discrepancies.
He's a talented writer.
What time should I go to the airport?
He was late as usual.
He can play the guitar.
I attended Tom's funeral.
I attended Tom's funeral.
Tom acted the part of a sailor.
I’m keeping my diary on Google+ so that no one reads it.
The rain lasted five days.
However that's only for handsome men.
I'm very impatient to see the new version of Tatoeba.
This song is very popular in Japan.
Tom tried to keep calm.
This annoys me.
We drank a lot of alcohol.
It may seem obvious to Tom, but it doesn't seem obvious to me.
Books are now within the reach of everybody.
I came to surprise Tom.
You put in too much pepper.
Tom is already late.
That's the current plan.
Tom is ironing shirts.
You should not break your promise.
He chased the thief.
He comes at noon.
Hurry, or you'll miss the train.
Hurry, or you'll miss the train.
Push!
Tom's boots were muddy.
Tom's boots were muddy.
I don't care if it's a bit cold.
I almost drowned.
I almost drowned.
I almost drowned.
I'm not a teacher.
Tom is extra careful.
Your handwriting is similar to mine.
I want this fruit.
These goods are available to members only.
We rode on a boat.
We've got to hurry.
He's moved away.
It's best for Tom not to be left alone in that frame of mind.
Do you think the pond is frozen hard enough to skate on?
They held Tom for a few hours and then let him go free.
Have you framed those paintings I brought in last week?
The curtains don't go with the other furnishings.
The temperature went up to 30 degrees.
I'm looking forward to the concert.
Are you still friends with them?
You're just a little too frank.
The train is sure going fast.
Suddenly the lights went out.
The gun suddenly went off.
Let's go out for a while.
This is a free sample.
I see Tom frequently.
We cannot walk on the hot sand with bare feet.
The cat is eating the mouse.
Don't be hurt.
Mother and motherland are greater than heaven.
Death is certain, only the time is not certain.
He couldn't get his ideas across to the students.
The temperature went up to 30 degrees.
Can you hear the noise of the waves on the beach?
Tom works for the IRS.
I haven't talked to Tom.
My first day in the university was rather boring.
Ten paper plates cost one dollar.
Ten paper plates cost one dollar.
Tom is selling his sheep.
Tom is selling his sheep.
It is a moral question.
I'm angry because someone stole my bicycle.
I'm angry because someone stole my bicycle.
I have a low opinion of him.
He arrived in Tokyo yesterday.
The cat scared me.
They showed me a lot of beautiful photos.
What has happened to Tom?
Whose dog is playing with Tom?
Whose dog is playing with Tom?
You envied me.
You envied me.
We finished the work.
He dashed out of the store.
Please pass me the pepper.
Add a little more pepper.
I love green peppers.
She hates green peppers.
The teachers greeted the children.
All of my attempts have failed.
What did we miss?
This is the first time I've driven a car.
He has phoned me.
We're the champions.
The teacher opened the box and took out a ball.
The teacher opened the box and took out a ball.
I don't care about my future.
The tip of the knife is sharp.
They're attempting to contact her.
It took us half an hour to set up the tent.
That was why I was late.
I'm a Japanese teacher.
I want to commit suicide.
That is a circus!
Tom wouldn't blame you.
She was not in the mood for lunch.
I'm in a perfect world.
They are very popular among boys.
They are very popular among boys.
Tom is hard to deal with.
He uses honey instead of sugar.
You like fruit.
You like fruit.
It was some time before he realized his mistake.
The room is spacious and light.
Father made our living room more spacious.
Their dining room is very spacious.
You should be careful in choosing friends.
You should be careful in choosing friends.
His mother is an English teacher.
His mother is an English teacher.
We are all praying for Japan.
Get dressed.
We will survive.
Tom and I went to the same high school.
Life is one big circus.
We're lawyers.
I was taking a bath when you called me.
I don't have enough money.
I'm not used to walking long distances.
Laurie broke the glass.
You were late, weren't you?
Tea is a popular beverage throughout the world.
Tom's wife would probably leave him if she knew the truth.
Do you have any ID?
Do you have any ID?
They abandoned Tom.
Her unusual behavior caused our suspicions.
We don't even know Tom.
This doll was a gift from my aunt.
She cannot persuade him to buy her a new car.
I got a flat tire.
The train started before we got to the station.
Do you want to get drunk?
The hare hid behind the tree.
I don't want you to wake him up.
The sky grew darker and darker.
You don't even know Tom.
You don't even know Tom.
He didn't specify when he would return.
He doesn't know how to play the guitar.
How was the universe formed?
I had help.
Tom appreciates good wine.
I won't let anyone hurt you.
Just get inside.
The contestant made two false starts.
I can't trust my textbook.
I don't play computer games.
We must not forget our promise.
We must not forget our promise.
Tom's boss demands a lot of work.
This is absolutely true.
You've got to be more careful.
It was Angela who put William on to Steven.
My brother is two years older than I, but he is three centimeters shorter.
Why are you doing shopping here? Everything is expensive.
Surrender or die!
Surrender or die!
You need to wash your hands before a meal.
Those students are in the classroom.
Mary is mopping the floor.
I have a contract.
I thank you for your confidence.
I thank you for your confidence.
I thank you for your confidence.
We've missed our train.
I take a bath every night.
I work in a factory.
That's my province.
I can't stay long.
Expect the unexpected.
I want to thank you for what you did for Tom.
Thank you for coming in for the interview.
Thanking you in anticipation.
Write your name and address on this envelope.
He dropped in at the bookstore.
He dropped the sausage on the ground.
That's Tom's house.
There was a lot of food in the house.
That's Tom's father.
He enjoys watching baseball games on TV.
We'll ask Tom.
What time do you usually wake up?
He failed to come up to our expectations.
Please tell me the way to the XYZ store.
He will never break his promise.
Pass me that notebook.
I helped carry those bags.
I helped carry those bags.
Tie the horse to that tree.
Tie the horse to that tree.
That's just a lie.
After lunch, I returned to the office.
He finally got his wish.
I would like to thank you in advance for any help that you are able to give her.
I go to Tokyo every day.
I just want to say thanks to you all.
You've convinced me.
You've convinced me.
Plop into the water and dive.
The news surprised him as much as it did me.
You've been cleared of all charges.
Such painters as Picasso are rare.
Tom bikes to school.
The chemical formula for water is H₂O.
What is his nationality?
What's her nationality?
I'd like to stay here with Tom.
Hello. My name is John Reindle. I work at the American Embassy in Prague.
Her beauty drew his attention.
Her dream is to become a nurse.
Don't cut in while we're talking.
I missed the train. I should have come earlier.
Your English is not good enough.
My German is not good enough.
She devoted her life to helping the handicapped.
Don't thank me. Thank Tom.
Tom could no longer control himself.
I think about Tom all day.
They are considered the greatest rock band in history.
I'm Tom's friend.
I got mad.
That's Tom's voice.
Her fiancé gave her a very big ring.
Her goal is to become a teacher.
Are you coming on Skype or do you prefer to translate sentences on Tatoeba?
Take care of old people.
Enjoy your vacation.
I worked in this factory.
Some people don't believe in any religion.
Should I cancel my business trip to LA?
Tom commutes to work by motorcycle.
Tom turned on the small lamp on his bedside table.
That's unimportant.
Tom missed the last train.
I spent the entire day on the beach.
I lost my sense of direction in the snowstorm.
Tom has three months left until he graduates.
She's a talented writer.
Friendship is a matter of trust.
Did you actually see Tom?
This library has a large collection of Chinese books.
I also like candy.
Let's all get drunk tonight.
We don't know Tom.
We don't know Tom.
Please don't apologize.
The cook chopped the meat.
In the early days of American history, blacks lived in slavery.
I really miss the old days.
Tom doesn't have a job.
I enjoy his company.
The roof is going to fall in one of these days.
I haven't seen Tom for a good while.
Did you guess the end of the story?
I'm grateful to you for your help.
Tom's practice has grown rapidly.
I don't consider Tom a great man.
Their flag is blue and gold.
The crowd grew rapidly.
Shall I cut it in half?
That was a good guess.
We can't just give up.
The French are better lovers than the Germans.
Don't be so narrow-minded!
I'm sorry I was late.
I'm sorry I was late.
He will never give in even when he is wrong.
When you go to Romania, you will visit Dracula's Castle.
His eyes were blazing with anger.
I've got more money than Tom has.
I wonder what's happened to Tom.
This is the temple which we used to visit.
We should listen to Tom.
Finally they gave in to their enemy.
Tom is a rookie.
I don't want to offend Tom.
They accomplished their task without any difficulty.
Brazil is the biggest country in South America.
It works wonders.
I'm Tom's grandmother.
Merlin was a wizard.
I think we'll find Tom.
Obey your teachers.
Obey your teachers.
He brought me the news that our team had won.
He brought me the news that our team had won.
This world is but canvas to our imaginations.
Water cannot be separated by hitting it with a stick.
The war had lasted four years.
I can't excuse what I did.
His poems are hard to understand.
You don't dress yourself.
You don't dress yourselves.
I tried to convince Tom otherwise.
Have you eaten? "Yes, I have."
Have you eaten? "Yes, I have."
When was the last time you spoke with Tom?
We are still clinging to the dreams of our youth.
She was now out of danger.
We didn't find Tom.
I study Chinese every day.
I run like a hamster in a wheel.
Dust off the shelf.
Put the car into the garage.
I worry about Tom, too.
I usually take a bath after dinner.
I beg you to help us.
I beg you to help us.
I beg you to help me.
Don't give up.
Tom says he can trace his ancestors back about 300 years.
Every day I either ride a bike or get the bus to work.
That's my opinion.
Pope Francis will return to Rio in 2016.
She's a bit naive.
Nowadays more and more people prefer country life to city life.
Tom doesn't have forks or knives. He eats everything with spoons.
Turn this off.
Did you give a copy of the disk to anyone?
Fashion is not my specialty.
There are holes in the heels of these socks.
Would you like another helping of potatoes?
The telephone hasn't been installed yet.
Don't hesitate to call if you need me.
Tom is never on hand when I want him.
My shoes are worn down at the heels.
They held out against all odds.
I have a high opinion of Tom.
How did you hit on that?
Tom's field is history.
The ball hit the fence.
Can't you take a hint?
This rug is handmade.
Don't hog the road.
Don't be insulted.
Hope doesn't put food on the table.
Tom has enough time.
The pain was intolerable.
The wall has a large hole in it.
I work at the post office.
Tom talked me into going to church with him.
Hang your coat on the hook.
Hang your coat on the hook.
Hang your coat on the hook.
Give me back the TV remote.
He was the only witness of the accident.
He threw a rock into the pond.
She seemed surprised when I told her.
I'll bring Tom to you.
I'll be in the office.
Her feelings are easily hurt.
My ears are always ringing.
We are babies in his eyes.
I found your letter in the mailbox.
I found your letter in the mailbox.
I found your letter in the mailbox.
I found your letter in the mailbox.
I found your letter in the mailbox.
I found your letter in the mailbox.
How can we save Tom?
I need an envelope, a piece of paper, and a pencil or a pen.
Tom was hit by a car.
We took him to the hospital.
She was seen at a restaurant with her lover.
Few passengers survived the catastrophe.
Everybody ran outside.
I have a suspicious nature.
There is a bookstore across from my house.
I was pleasantly surprised.
Can you teach me how to steal?
I have a poor appetite these days.
I was late for the last bus.
I was late for the last bus.
Be careful!
Be careful!
Be careful!
I don't always brush my teeth after I eat.
I don't care where you're eating dinner.
Don't leave me.
Don't leave me.
I have a terrible headache!
I am seeking the path to the end of the universe.
I am seeking the path to the end of the universe.
I am invited to the end of the universe.
There are millions of stars in the universe.
How do you find food in outer space?
Excuse me?
Even the merest little thing irritated him.
Tom is washing the dishes.
I won't wash the dishes.
There is a hole in his sock.
I may have hurt his feelings.
No one suspected Tom.
No one will be fired.
No one threatened Tom.
Nobody is paying attention to Tom.
I don't know why no one saw Tom.
Tom looked around, but didn't see anyone.
Stay here with Tom.
Tom has a big problem.
Why were you late?
Why are you late?
It was so hot that I thought I was going to pass out.
Don't you recognize Tom?
Don't you recognize Tom?
Did you see the item in the paper about their wedding?
Thank you for the invitation.
They swam out to the island.
This key won't work because it's bent.
She's talking to the Russian teacher.
I'm sure that I'll miss her a lot.
They have taken her away.
I demolished the school.
He wiped the sweat off his face.
He is good-looking and smart.
Jim got a job as a waiter.
Jim dropped his pen and bent to pick it up.
When will you complete the preparations?
We feared the worst.
The cause of the fire was his cigarette butt.
This doll has big eyes.
Where is the Australian embassy?
Tom just got fired.
Somebody killed Tom today.
Someone is watching Tom.
Someone turned Tom in.
Tell us about Tom.
Tell us about Tom.
That made Tom smile.
There were few people on the beach.
How do you know Tom?
I'm not angry with you.
We're planting seeds.
I don't want to talk to you, because you broke my heart.
She has a daughter who is a pianist.
I'm not in love with anyone.
I'm not in love with anyone.
I couldn't stop Tom.
I couldn't stop Tom.
Many Chinese people consider red to be the best colour.
As soon as a man is born, his path already leads to death.
I didn't kill Tom.
She's talking to the Russian teacher.
It's too far to walk.
A coin dropped out of his pocket.
I almost dropped the plates.
I almost dropped the plates.
Did you see yesterday's episode?
Did you see yesterday's episode?
Are you going to record today's episode?
Where is the French embassy?
Can you tell me how you get to the American Embassy?
She has a pretty doll.
You must carry out your first plan.
What's the name of the joint we went to last night?
Even Tom's enemies admit he's a just man.
They made a joke of the whole thing.
The hall was jammed with people.
My watch has seventeen jewels.
My job is to wash the dishes.
Don't judge Tom too harshly.
Tom is always telling jokes.
My joints ache.
We must tear down this house.
I regret kissing Tom.
She wasn't polite to him.
I probably won't ever see Tom again.
We've just run out of salt and pepper.
He is the lawful owner of the company.
She became a teacher when she was twenty.
I am familiar with the way he asks questions.
How long will it take to get there?
Tom keeps every letter his mother sends him.
I asked Tom where he'd been.
My mother works at an office.
My uncle is a veteran of the Vietnam War.
You have to share the cake equally.
Whoever says so, it is not true.
I am keeping a diary every day.
The kitten is taking a nap.
Why don't you come visit us?
I'm afraid of asking her to dance and being turned down.
Look out the window.
At what time do you exit from the office?
It's deserted.
She's here to protect you.
The hen has laid an egg.
You can't change Tom.
You can't change Tom.
Eat bread, drink water, you shall leave without grief.
We should protect the forest.
You must not give up.
Can you ski?
I found my shoes.
Don't take Tom too seriously.
Don't take Tom too seriously.
We can't leave Tom alone.
I can't leave Tom.
I can't leave Tom behind.
We can't leave Tom here. He won't survive on his own.
She kicked me out of the house.
She kicked her boyfriend out of the house.
What are the positive aspects?
Meg was happy about meeting Tom again.
Tom plunged into the water.
Fear crept into my heart and settled there.
The doctors are examining my stomach.
What children! You send them to get candy and they return with a dog!
Don't you have enough shoes?
Baku is the capital of Azerbaijan.
I live in Baku.
Her statement was false.
It's eleven o'clock.
We may fall ill at any moment.
He ran onto the field.
Can I have a paper bag?
Tom broke one of the rules and was kicked out of school.
Who's doing the dishes?
The child is stroking a cat.
How many times a year do you go skiing?
I'm going to miss you a lot.
Don't do it! It's stupid and dangerous.
Tom usually wakes up at about six-thirty, but he doesn't usually get out of bed until seven.
Tom wakes up at six-thirty every morning.
What time do you wake up every day?
Are you still with Tom?
Are you still dating Tom?
I think you need a lawyer.
I think you need a lawyer.
Her voice still rings in my ears.
I go to the library at least once a week.
Kindly mind your own business.
I'm thankful for your kindness.
I'll be a bit late. Keep dinner warm for me.
I knew Tom very well.
Do you know Tom by sight?
Did you have any trouble keeping up with the others?
Tom's father is a famous artist.
I have been instructed to take you to the airport.
The skirt is long.
It's no use complaining.
It's useless to talk to Tom.
The crowd assembled in front of the post office.
I know what happened with Tom.
I like honey.
He earns a living.
I wasn't going to give up.
Are you still dating Tom? "No, we broke up at the beginning of last month."
Is there an ATM nearby?
He was very gifted and talented.
I'll drive you to the airport.
I didn't see Tom.
Will you take me home?
I've written his address on the back of the envelope.
Here he began to recount his misfortune in detail.
There were flowers everywhere.
We can't protect Tom.
They have a sense of humor.
She has a lover.
I am sorry to trouble you.
This flag is very pretty.
Do you think we can solve this problem without Tom's help?
Can you ski?
The old man could not bear his misfortune.
I frighten easily.
It's totally dark outside.
Did you know the dead man? I asked him on the way.
Your skirt is out of fashion.
Today I visited a museum.
Today I visited a museum.
She has a perfect body.
He didn't even dream about that.
We're out of gas.
Turn right at the next intersection.
I'll give you a ride home.
I'll give you a ride to our home.
Always forgive your enemies. Nothing irritates them more.
How well do you know Tom?
Don't cry.
Tell me about the incident.
I turned it off.
It'll take some time to shovel all the snow off the roof.
Creationism is bullshit.
It freaks me out.
Am I annoying you?
Stop following me.
You're breaking the law.
I need these shoes in size ten please!
Do you have more than one copy of this key?
Dark clouds are hanging low.
The North won the Battle of Shiloh.
I acted as interpreter at the meeting.
The idea isn't bad.
You should be grateful.
In 2014 Scotland may become an independent state.
I never saw Tom again.
I never saw Tom again.
I never worried about Tom.
Tom has been caught.
There's a complete record of the storm in the ship's log.
The plane didn't have enough lift to get off the ground.
We'll send the textbooks in three different lots.
We can work outdoors only as long as it's light.
You have lost a good opportunity by delaying.
Can you locate this place on the map for me?
We're looking forward to our vacation.
This book's success lies in its humor.
It was very lucky that you came today.
Tom had a great love for his country.
Tom bought a lot at the edge of town.
There's a loose button on your shirt.
The bookcase is level with the table.
Tom's lack of knowledge was obvious.
Tom lumbered along like an elephant.
Tom's letter really gave me a lift.
Tom has an unpleasant, loud voice.
The singer has a very low voice.
The bullet lodged in Tom's lung.
We need lumber to build a barn.
I can't help looking up to Tom.
When will they start logging?
The play is three hours long.
That plane is flying too low.
Tom lost his foreign accent.
I have a low opinion of Tom.
Tom has a light complexion.
I don't like Tom's looks.
Tom has a lot of books.
I prefer low heels.
Don't stay away too long.
Look for it among the loose papers on my desk.
The old are not always wiser than the young.
He shot him in the knee.
Tom threw a stone into the pond.
Murder is punished by death.
Do you have any queries before I start the interview?
Tom has a lot of money.
I begged him to stop using drugs.
I begged him to stop using drugs.
I'm going to be late.
The teacher asked me a difficult question.
We intend to take away their power to make war.
How much do you make a month?
The heat's driving me crazy.
Tom made a bookcase.
I study for many hours at night.
Stay away from the pond.
Tom said goodnight to Mary.
I'm going to miss you.
She put down her pen.
I'm going to miss you.
You are certainly homesick.
You can't cling to the past.
Promise me you'll be careful.
Promise me you'll be careful.
Sing me a song, Tom!
You hugged your backpack.
This knife is not sharp enough.
She's seventeen.
My friend is seventeen years old.
Are you boring? Sorry, are you bored?
I caught a beautiful butterfly.
Tom's great-great-great grandmother lived in Scotland.
Mrs. Jones counts sheep every night to go to sleep.
Who killed Tom?
They had to start from scratch.
Do you want to read this magazine?
Do you want to read this magazine?
He was angry at himself.
I am full.
Buy the elephant! - "What elephant?" - "Everybody says 'what elephant', but you buy the elephant!"
Can you drive me home?
Can you take me home?
He failed to see the stop sign at the intersection and hit an oncoming car.
The train is about to leave.
The sweets are on the table.
Finding her office was easy.
I don't have all the details.
I don't have all the details.
I don't have all the facts.
Tom's friends called him Mr Money Bags.
I saw Tom in my dreams.
I stared at the man.
How can I get rid of him?
Why don't you ask Tom?
Why don't you ask Tom?
Why don't you ask Tom?
Why don't you ask Tom?
Tom hid himself behind the tree.
I am looking forward to seeing you.
They're working upstairs.
Who's your favorite teacher?
The guests won't arrive for an hour. In the meantime, we can set the table.
I can't quite get the meaning of this poem.
Tom is making a success of his business.
It was a miserable day for a walk.
Do you think I'll miss my train?
Where can I get a good meal?
What does that poster mean?
I missed Tom at the hotel.
I met Tom on the street.
They made Tom chairman.
They can't fire you.
Do not put new wine into old bottles.
Let's go to lunch.
Let's go eat.
They asked Tom to play the guitar.
You asked Tom to play the guitar.
You are right, after all.
Why is it so popular?
She loves flowers and plants.
She was planting roses when he came.
She had been planting roses for two hours when he came.
She has been planting roses since 12 o'clock.
Did you eat at home before you came here?
Doctors and nurses must preserve life at all costs.
He's here to protect you.
He's here to protect you.
She's here to protect you.
I'm here to protect you.
We're here to protect you.
We're here to protect you.
Don't be late for school again.
I would appreciate any help.
I am laughing at Tom.
Tom is a dancer.
Somebody killed Tom.
Did you drop it?
Did you drop it?
Please look for it.
Please look for it.
I want to be a nurse.
I have a student visa.
I look forward to that.
I'm looking forward to it.
I was ten minutes late for school.
Could you do me a small favor?
You did it on purpose, didn't you?
Tom was sent on a mission.
Tom replied in the negative.
Tom has been neglecting his work lately.
The whole neighborhood supported the drive.
The truck just missed hitting the boy in the street.
The need for more foreign language teachers here is becoming urgent.
Mix this powder with a cup of water.
Tom has a Pikachu pillow.
She didn't last long.
Let me tell you why I don't like Tom.
A car is faster than a bicycle.
Our teacher sometimes speaks too fast.
Tom introduced himself.
Mice like cheese.
Tom does not have friends.
Tom eats alone in front of his computer.
Don't hesitate to ask your teacher a question.
I was beside myself when I heard the news of my father's sudden death.
Don't throw rocks into the river.
His name is on the tip of my tongue.
Don't cheat him.
An elephant has a long nose.
My hard drive is almost full.
I attended his funeral.
Don't talk about Tom.
Don't always take Tom's side!
The silence of the library provided the perfect environment for studying.
Tom earned money by playing his guitar on street corners.
Does that price include breakfast?
I'm eating my lunch.
Those who are terrorists for some, are resistance for others.
I've put on weight recently.
I am sixteen years old.
I am sorry to have kept you waiting so long.
I am sorry to have taken up your valuable time.
You dislike Tom, don't you? "It's not that I dislike like him, it's just that I kind of have trouble dealing with people like him."
He wiped the sweat from his brow.
I'm grateful for what she did.
There is a TV remote control under the couch.
I'm taking a bath.
The colors of the American flag are red, white and blue.
The cook prepares different dishes every day.
They were surprised by what they saw.
Here is my bicycle.
You're both very polite.
He doesn't lie.
Hurry up, or we'll miss the train.
The hail cracked the window.
What ails you?
You were late for work.
Tom's grandmother is a very old woman.
Tom went on an errand.
The drinks are on the house.
I wear my old coat in weather like this.
Give your seat to the old man.
Are you open on Saturday?
The bookstore is open.
My father listens to classical music.
It is bad to steal.
Her mother died when she was a teenager.
Tom hasn't mentioned you.
I'm taller than Tom.
Thanks for your patience.
Thanks for your patience.
These are the rules.
They jumped into the water one after another.
I'm not an expert of psychology.
You did it on purpose!
Why does Tom have a gun?
I'll be late to work.
Tom switched off the light.
Did you go to Tom's funeral?
Did you go to Tom's funeral?
I went to the hospital to see my uncle.
I'm fed up with your stories!
We tend to make mistakes.
I am not a professional.
I won't betray Tom.
Who were the original people here?
I have a very good opinion of Tom.
That's an original idea.
Hurry or we'll be late.
What does Tom have in his hand?
Tom is suffering from a nervous disorder.
Yesterday the club elected its officers.
A new president has just been elected.
This is a new experience for Tom.
Can you see the nest in the tree?
Tom must have nerves of steel.
I hope I haven't offended you.
I'm new at this kind of work.
Did Tom offer any resistance?
Tom didn't mean any offense.
Tom's figures were way off.
Neither statement is true.
See me in my office.
Are you angry?
Are you angry?
Absolutely nonsensical things happen in this world.
Absolutely nonsensical things happen in this world.
I think Tom is in love.
I think Tom is in trouble.
I hate lawyers.
I think Tom is up in the attic.
I hate paperwork.
I hate the weather here.
Sign the contract.
I want to marry Tom.
Take the cat to my room.
Everyone is scared.
My shoes are worn out.
There's food in the fridge.
Tom tried to explain the situation to Mary.
No attention was paid to his warning.
Vanity of vanities, saith the Preacher, vanity of vanities; all is vanity.
Tom, you traitor!
What is your favorite vegetable?
I wanted to read a book.
He's older, but no wiser.
She didn't want him to leave the room.
The children are pretending to brush their teeth.
The patient's in the hospital.
In a word, she is guilty.
Does Tom have a girlfriend?
Do you know Tom's address?
We've already eaten.
Where is my car? "It's in the garage."
I bought five ten-yen stamps.
We can't leave yet. We need to wait for Tom.
Is there a hospital around here?
Could you come here for a minute?
Could you come here for a minute?
You will pay for this!
My older sister Angelina is sixteen years old.
You risk losing my trust.
You risk losing my trust.
I think you still love Tom.
Betty likes classical music.
How old are you? "I'm 16 years old."
I think it's dangerous to walk alone at night.
I think it's dangerous to walk alone at night.
He cut the advertisement out of the newspaper.
She ironed his shirts.
Planting trees at this age!
It was a wise decision.
How long will you stay?
How long will you stay?
Mike and Ken are friends.
He jumped onto the table.
I visited Dan.
I know you miss them.
I eat fruit.
The idea is not bad.
I've missed you so much.
What time do you get up on Sundays?
This costs too much.
Do you like playing computer games?
Do you like playing computer games?
Do you like playing computer games?
Do you like playing computer games?
Give me your opinion, please.
Tom isn't available at the moment.
We heard the tree fall with a crash.
He might have missed the last train.
It's boring to wait for a train.
Are you brushing your teeth properly?
Tom has a three-month-old baby.
I was dreaming.
I prayed.
I gasped.
The furniture was dusty.
The performance lasts two and a half hours.
Don't you care what happens?
Don't you care what happens?
Don't you care what happens?
Don't you care what happens?
I am not thirsty.
I can't get in touch with Tom.
I can't convince Tom.
I can't do it alone.
School begins at half past eight.
Don't be late to school.
Why do you accuse my son?
The book paints a fine description of the customs of the country.
It's a bit noisy, but otherwise it's a nice apartment.
Several hundred men were packed into the boat.
Please don't throw the bottle out the window.
I didn't realize that Tom's bill was overdue.
I wouldn't part with that book at any price.
Tom kept a pair of rabbits for breeding.
Here's a brief outline of my speech.
Put a pan of water on the stove.
Tom almost fell over the cliff.
Who does Tom pal around with?
When is the performance over?
Tom is an outstanding actor.
The train was packed.
They're panning for gold.
We parted at the corner.
Who owns this property?
Now the secret is out.
They voted Tom out.
Is this our cabin?
He handed in his resignation.
Tom has a heart of stone.
Were he to see you, he would be surprised.
The wind is blowing hard now.
The wall is white on the outside and green on the inside.
He doesn't show any interest in science.
Tom and I both miss you very much.
Is the museum visited by many people?
I'm not jealous of your life at all.
You're never at home.
What kind of meal did you eat?
Did you arrest Tom?
Did you arrest Tom?
Did Tom threaten you?
They moved a year ago.
My mother set the table.
I stole this from Tom.
Push!
What a scoundrel you are!
It's time to eat lunch.
Tell me about Tom.
Tell me about Tom.
It's a typo. Sorry.
The captain controls the whole ship.
The captain controls the whole ship.
I hear footsteps outside.
Mr. Shoval submits plenty of sentences to Tatoeba.
I bought this book at the bookshop in front of the station.
Father bought me a new bike.
I talked Tom into doing it for me.
I talked Tom into doing it for me.
Tom has three sisters.
I can't stand babies crying.
When's the funeral?
Don't push me!
Don't push me!
Keep the kids inside.
Keep the kids inside.
I want to go abroad.
I had never seen a real elephant.
His dad calls him Tom.
Don't miss this opportunity.
Don't waste the opportunity.
I'll be praying for you.
I'll be careful.
I'll be careful.
That's my final answer.
The box has holes in it.
She rents a room to a student.
I have something to ask Tom.
I have something to ask Tom.
What did Tom have in his pocket?
Don't forget to turn off the light before you go to sleep.
Don't forget to turn off the light before you go to sleep.
Tom doesn't have a home.
He sleeps with his shoes on.
Can he fulfill his dream?
The woman tests the rice.
I saw Tom on TV.
I saw Tom on television.
Folks, let's live as good friends!
Tom reeked of alcohol.
He's a bit younger than me.
I completely trust your abilities.
Tom doesn't care what happens tomorrow.
If this train is delayed, we shall miss our connection at Kobe.
We were rowing against the current.
I've got an Italian handbag.
I assume you've heard about Tom's promotion.
I assume you've heard about Tom's promotion.
She is disgusted with the job.
He decided to write in his diary every day.
Without hearth or home.
Penny saved is a penny got.
I don't go to church.
How about a kiss, for luck?
Do you agree with Tom?
I will sleep until it is half past eight.
Tom has time.
Her son's death broke her heart.
What happened at that intersection?
He must be Tom's brother.
Did you see Tom?
Did you see Tom?
Where did you find Tom?
I don't need a break.
I don't need a lawyer.
There's a big hole.
I'm no quitter.
A sudden illness prevented him from going there.
The snow has begun melting.
What's your favorite commercial?
Turn off the TV.
Last winter, I went skiing in Canada.
Do tigers purr?
Why aren't you helping?
Who's your favorite composer?
I'm not surprised you don't remember.
I'm not surprised you don't remember.
I'm not surprised you don't remember.
I'm not surprised you don't remember.
I'm not scared of dying.
I share his opinion.
Tom was standing outside.
We can find friends wherever we go.
I love chili.
I love chili.
I love chili.
Tom said he was in love with you.
Tom started to empty his pockets.
Tom usually walks home from work.
Summer is the warmest season of the year.
We hate Tom.
In recent years, science has made remarkable progress.
I easily found his office.
Rules are made to be broken.
What he said bears out my assumption.
My father is on the wagon.
Tom is naive.
Tom doesn't like to share.
I'd like to share my secret with you.
He likes to share his pleasure with his friends.
She was in love with me, but I wasn't in love with her.
I haven't seen Tom today.
He doesn't have enough money to go travelling.
I'll miss all of you.
They were scared.
He had to save the princess.
Eighteen minutes later, the battle was over.
This woman is over eighty.
I have known Tom since I was a little boy.
I have known Tom since I was a little boy.
The agent was able to squeeze a confession out of the terrorist.
I don't know the exact length of this bridge.
Can you count in Italian?
Tom has been struck by lightning three times.
His parents go to church every Sunday.
The soldiers guarded the bridge.
She forgot to turn off the light.
Are we humans alone in this infinite universe?
Tom's life's in danger.
No, I am an Englishman.
This is my notebook.
I didn't want to alarm you.
The picture I took of you last week turned out very well.
At last, we've got a little peace and quiet in the house.
You'll need a photograph of yourself for identification.
We haven't yet learned the particulars of the accident.
Tom's sister paved the way for him to become a lawyer.
Tom has been performing before large audiences lately.
My partner and I have been winning every game today.
Tom is careless in the performance of his duties.
There was a brief pause and then the music began.
Tom could have phrased his answer more politely.
The pilot wasn't injured when the plane crashed.
We ought to pay Tom a visit before he leaves.
Tom wore a patch on his eye for several days.
Tom is very particular about his appearance.
Tom studied philosophy at the university.
We can divide the work into three parts.
Take the path that runs along the river.
Tom picked up a good bargain yesterday.
See if you can persuade Tom to come.
The worst part of the trip is past.
We piled the wood in the backyard.
Tom is a very peculiar person.
Did you pass Tom on the road?
Pass me the pepper, please.
I wouldn't put it past Tom.
It's past noon. Let's eat.
Tom has plenty of money.
Throw me the ball.
Tom is a complete stranger to me.
How considerate of you!
We can't blame them.
She almost fainted.
The kettle is boiling.
Then, I'll be leaving you.
Tom has a sore knee.
You don't look like a priest.
He made a polite bow to his teacher.
Go wake Tom up.
Go wake Tom up.
You would make a good diplomat.
You would make a good diplomat.
I have no time to explain this in detail.
I missed you too.
I was in a hurry in order not to miss the train.
Contact me tomorrow.
Contact me tomorrow.
Why do people tell lies?
I don't want to intervene.
I've never seen a red refrigerator.
If you're bored, you can contribute to Tatoeba.
I only had two glasses of wine.
His income is larger than that of his wife.
I'm not mad anymore.
I handed the mike to him.
Father often tells me to keep things clean.
Don't be late.
I hope you're not mad at me.
I don't think that Tom was hiding.
I've decided to marry Tom.
What time of year do you usually like to spend time on the beach?
My room is upstairs on the left.
Our teacher is a sincere person, so I look up to him.
Tom bores me.
Tom has no brothers.
Bear his advice in mind.
The plants are growing.
We have to defend our country at any expense.
What's your favorite kind of candy?
I wanted to help you, I really did, but then I thought I'd rather take care of my own life.
He wrote about plants and trees.
Take things a little more seriously.
Do you have a garage?
Those who don't smoke or drink will die healthy.
I agree completely.
You have a sense of humor. I like that.
We were quite shocked by her sudden death.
Why doesn't he eat lunch with me anymore?
He always tells vulgar jokes.
All of the boys were wearing gloves.
There's no reason to get angry.
Tom has three older brothers.
Speaking about a daughter's success, you can't but mention her mother.
What a failure!
Mr. Suzuki is an outstanding scientist.
He ran so fast that he was out of breath.
He failed the exam.
The patient didn't have a fever.
A girl appeared before me.
I need to say goodbye.
I need to protect myself.
Fire!, he cried.
Tom has straight hair.
It was very painful.
Sympathy is a human emotion.
All doctors say what their patients want them to.
He did it himself.
Her hobby was to collect ancient coins.
I swear to God.
Nobody here lives an atheistic life. During disasters and during fortunes everyone relies on God.
He got up to see if he had turned off the light in the kitchen.
That's Tom's apartment.
He's washing your car.
When I saw it, it took my breath away.
Tom had some questions he wanted to ask.
I'm waiting for Tom to return.
She isn't good enough for him.
She laughed nervously.
I'm always surprised at the way he talks to girls.
As far as I know, I'm in perfect health.
I'm going to miss my bus if I don't hurry.
Oil is scarce in this country.
The boy threw stones at the dog.
I tried talking to Tom last night.
I tried talking to Tom last night.
I'm going to visit Tom.
Please tell me what I should do in this situation.
I have decided to retire.
Tom doesn't have enough money yet to buy the car he wants.
In the sunlight my head started to spin, and I lay down to have a rest on the grass.
Son, don't rack your brains over this problem, we'll solve it on our own.
People with no humour are like meadows without flowers.
It's been five years since I last saw you.
I saw my reflection in the mirror.
When was the last time you cleaned the sitting room?
I didn't donate blood.
His face turned red with anger.
When did you last see Tom?
I asked her to wait a minute.
In China there are seven large independent languages spoken by millions of people.
Are you bored here?
Tom has friends in high places.
It is impossible to read her handwriting.
This beach is a paradise for surfers.
This beach is a paradise for surfers.
I hope I didn't offend anyone.
I'll leave that up to you.
I'll leave that up to you.
Let's get this over with.
I wasn't the only one who made promises.
The sky is obscure, I can see no star.
Why did God offend us like this? What sin is upon us?
If you know that something unpleasant will happen, that you will go to the dentist for example, or to France, then that is not good.
Children are our shift, our future, the continuation of the people's life.
You won't be late, will you?
You dropped your pencil.
You dropped your pencil.
As there was no taxi, I had to walk home.
It's on the house.
I'll do my best on the test.
This is a catastrophe.
I've got to hang up now. Someone is waiting to use the phone.
I want to go shopping.
May I have a road map, please?
Why are you so angry with him?
I'm finishing my homework.
I'm finishing my homework.
She had a crush on him.
How much money do you make?
If you intervene, they will also intervene.
This office has very modern furniture.
Loneliness is the fate of all outstanding people.
I want to meet with Tom.
Your story is boring.
This river is deep enough to swim in.
You can always contact me.
You must be new around here.
Although I received pills at the hospital, I never took them properly.
It took me several hours to repair it.
You and Tom are good friends, right?
This region is located in a valley.
You're testing my patience!
He was angry, but he listened to me patiently.
The users of Tatoeba don't want Tom to die.
Tom has acquired a serious opponent - John.
I'm envious of you because you have a good boss.
Elephants are several times the size of mice.
They want to talk about religion.
He went out, yielding to a sudden impulse.
Where's my other shoe?
There is the possibility of what he said being true.
He unbuckled his belt.
My father was already at home when I came back.
He is playing music.
Easy to plan, hard to realize.
The leaves fell.
The train will come in at platform ten.
I hear from him once a month.
It's very cold here in February.
You have to obey the law.
Let's hope the government respects our agreement.
I'll explain in detail next week.
I'll explain it in detail next week.
You're the champion, aren't you?
Let's take a little break.
The patient seemed to be healthy.
I have to be careful.
I've got to be careful.
As a teacher, I hate having to get my students' attention.
I will go cycling even if it rains.
Tom said he was in love with Mary.
The wind is blowing from the east.
The wind is blowing.
My son is my biggest headache.
I looked out the window.
I don't like to swim in the pool.
Hurry up, otherwise you'll be late.
I have gas.
I was too surprised to speak.
Don't scare me like that!
Every nunnery has its own rules.
I'm not sure, but I think I hate Tom.
She won the beauty contest.
Tom decided to give up playing guitar professionally.
You're asking in vain for forgiveness; your act can't be forgiven.
He was wearing a mask.
He was wearing a mask.
We elected Tom captain of the team.
Tom doesn't look like a scoundrel.
I got you, rascal!
The injured man moaned quietly.
Let's go straight to the beach.
Let's go straight to the beach.
We protected ourselves against danger.
Our refrigerator isn't working.
That family has lost its social position.
If Tom had money problems, I think he'd let us know.
I don't want to marry Tom.
Is that a complaint?
Fill the pot with water.
She didn't want to get involved.
That's convenient, isn't it?
I would like to visit New York.
Earth is not the centre of the world.
That's not the worst-case scenario.
I learn the language by myself.
She is living in the middle of nowhere.
Except for leap years, February has only 28 days.
I've seen Tom at work.
My bicycle has a flat tire.
A unicycle has one wheel.
I'm still thinking about the riddle.
Tom has bad eyes.
You've frightened Tom.
Google Translate can't translate phrases or give definitions of individual words.
How can I translate words that don't exist in any language besides my own?
Do you want to go have a meal together later?
Where's the nearest telephone booth?
Did the interview go well?
It is rude to point at others.
Hurry up, girls.
Hurry up, girls.
My younger sister didn't say "hello."
I'm not your doll.
I'm not your doll.
This is an outright lie!
The tank is full.
My parents have gone to the airport to see my uncle off.
He is utterly impossible.
He is utterly impossible.
I'd like to leave a message for Tom.
Because of TV, boys and girls don't want to read books.
It took the police a lot of time to get to the island.
They say that Liisa's summer house burned down.
I was startled beyond speech.
I wanted a key to Tom's house, but he wouldn't give me one.
She is in a temper, because she missed her usual train in the subway and had to walk to work.
I'm not willing to take that risk.
I appreciate your kindness.
I plan to stay there one week.
We parked our car in a free parking lot.
I like classical music more than modern music.
You should prepare a room for the visitor.
The Japanese team won the gold medal for this competition.
I'm a certified translator.
Did you grow up near a beach?
Did you grow up near a beach?
Very many religions promise life after death.
I've kept my promise.
How many times a day do you look at your reflection in the mirror?
There is one significant difference.
The mic is yours.
I bade him goodbye.
She still plays with dolls.
She is still playing with a doll.
Turn right at the intersection.
I looked through the garage window; what I saw surprised me.
I think it's important for us to stay calm.
I'm annoyed about them forgetting to pay.
We broke up the morning after.
I told him that those ten thousand oaks would look grand in thirty years.
If Sam had woken up earlier, he wouldn't have missed the bus.
David has just published a new book on philosophy.
Not even you can dampen my spirits right now!
He took advantage of the opportunity to visit the museum.
My blood type is A positive.
Take it upstairs.
Take it upstairs.
I really miss them.
That skirt's too short, isn't it?
We don't have enough information yet to make a decision.
We have to reduce the cost to a minimum.
This is no accident.
Tom was fired without notice.
And I testify that this is the Son of God.
That sound annoyed me at first, but now I've gotten used to it.
Let's go to the pool.
Leave it to the pros.
These keys are Tom's.
That's Tom's job.
What would you do if you were in Tom's place?
I was with Tom last night.
Mary's dog follows her everywhere.
The British had more troops than the other side.
She moved to the USA because her father died some months after you went to France.
The sun at dusk is red.
I take a bath almost every day.
He jumped into the water.
They're everywhere!
What he said surprised me.
His words surprised me.
Are you Tom's daughter?
Are you Tom's daughter?
Tom took off his gloves.
Was Tom at the funeral?
Take us to the hospital.
Turn on the lights.
Tom's house was on fire.
Tom's house was on fire.
You're three hours late.
Why aren't you with Tom?
Are you Tom's girlfriend?
Are you Tom's girlfriend?
Do you have Tom's number?
They're friends of Tom's.
Tom and I are both going.
This was in Tom's closet.
The time has come to say goodbye.
It wasn't that expensive.
Tom is the traitor.
Tom has no enemies.
Tom didn't have much money.
Otsvoyen decided to attract the guy's attention at any price.
We were surprised by his behavior.
Thanks for the translation. But please choose another flag!
I'm bored at home!
I didn't believe a word my grandfather said.
I think you're telling lies.
I didn't ask Tom to come here.
The plane disappeared in the twinkle of an eye.
Sulphur is a chemical element with the symbol S.
I want a book. Where is the bookstore?
Many decisions are not closely related to life.
Electric cars are getting popular.
The war's been going on for years.
After being away for a long time, Osyp changed markedly.
I like a spring evening with a quiet sunset.
From time to time lightning flashes, and thunder rumbles dully.
I like short poems.
Tom's uncle keeps a lot of sheep.
I don't mind the cold, but I can't stand the heat.
I don't care about your past.
I was as surprised by Tom's arrest as you were.
I was as surprised by Tom's refusal as you were.
I was as surprised by Tom's death as you were.
Tom has no choice but to leave.
The weather was perfect.
We'll go after we eat.
No doctor is perfect.
He's not mature enough to live alone.
You're so skinny.
We have one advantage.
He killed himself at the age of thirty.
The younger a country, the more vigorously it tries to acquire its history.
This singer has a beautiful voice.
She shook hands with a co-worker.
I don't feel sorry for Tom.
If you need me, I'll be somewhere around.
All employees had to memorize the access code.
My sister likes classical music no less than I do.
She misses her family a lot.
It's still obscure to me.
The dish is too sweet for Tom.
Are you jealous of her?
Tom and Bill arrived at the conclusion independently of each other.
Tom cut the apple in two.
She left me simply because I had a small income.
Maybe I took something wrong, so I'm not going to insist.
Don't forget to turn off the light before you go to sleep.
Her health seemed to suffer.
Tom got rid of his old books.
Tom doesn't want to give up.
Tom isn't angry.
I've never been so glad about the spring's coming.
This stone is too heavy for me to move.
If I had time, I'd visit you with great pleasure.
I don't have to apologize for what I said.
Air is a mixture of several gases.
Air is a mixture of several gases.
I have the right to call my lawyer.
I'm a plain dealer, I look on life plainly, I think plainly, I speak plainly.
Since he didn't know what to say, he remained silent.
She visited the school, despite a pain in her right arm.
It was a nice day to go to the beach.
With all her merits she was not proud.
On my way home, I fell asleep on the train and rode past my station.
The supermarket is open all days except Sunday.
The salad is very salty.
My grandfather on my mother's side is celebrating his 60th birthday tomorrow.
I hardly ever walk to work.
The price of rice rose by more than three percent.
Is it true that Tom has a twin?
Do not threaten me.
I miss my friends.
Tom is still not here.
Why did you scare my wife by suddenly jumping out of the cupboard?
What complications can occur with such an operation?
Englishmen differ from Americans only in the language they speak.
Englishmen will never be slaves. They will always be free to do what the government and public opinion demand from them.
Old people have two great advantages: they no longer have any toothaches, and they don't hear all the nonsense that is said around them.
Do you remember what Tom was wearing?
When will you be free?
When will you be free?
It's good that you've noticed the elephant!
Italian television is useless.
What's your shoe size?
You should be careful with knives.
I wiped the dirt off my pants.
Tom won't be missed.
Supplies of oil are not infinite.
I guess everybody thinks that I'm in love with Mary.
I miss my parents.
This disturbs him.
He's written a lot of good material that has never seen the light of day.
Jack insists that he has nothing to do with the crime.
I can't get this silly tune out of my head!
It is our custom to take off our shoes when we enter the house.
We will take off in a few minutes.
Rather than putting off this meeting, why don't we just call it off?
I was allowed to go off by myself provided that I promised to be careful.
I shoved my hands into my pockets.
Tom shoved his sunglasses to the top of his head.
It's still unclear to many, especially to those who half destroyed it and surrendered it to Iran, whether Iraq should be pronounced e-rack or aye-rack. But, after all, is it necessary to know how to pronounce a country's name before whacking it ?
A single ray of sunlight shone through a chink in the shuttered window.
Sorry, I can't stay for long.
Tom's answer shows that he's missed the whole point of the story.
I'm sure I've met Tom before, but I can't quite place him.
Did you find the plot of the play difficult to understand?
That's an interesting remark, but it's beside the point.
Tom plunged into the water and swam to the other side.
What's the name of the piece the orchestra's playing?
The play was presented by a group of young actors.
Help yourself. There's plenty more in the kitchen.
This publisher has put out some very good books.
I have a simple plan for getting Tom to agree.
I have a few purchases to make in this store.
I disagree with your argument on every point.
The point of this pencil isn't sharp enough.
One of the players was hurt during the game.
This assignment presents many difficulties.
Tom plunged the hot metal into cold water.
Let's put off the decision until tomorrow.
I got a lot of pleasure out of seeing Tom.
Tom's comments are always to the point.
You'd better prepare Tom for the news.
We pleaded with Tom not to go there.
You can't put anything over on Tom.
I left my coat at home on purpose.
The news put an end to our hopes.
Playing with fire is dangerous.
What kind of plants are these?
Refer to my previous article.
They prepared to go abroad.
Tom pleaded not guilty.
That's a pretty tune.
Tom has good taste in music.
Only Takeuchi did not accept the invitation.
The teacher pointed her finger at me and asked me to come with her.
Your collar has a stain on it.
Please see to it that the child does not go near the pond.
If I were you, I wouldn't think two times, but three times!
That whoever believes in him shall not perish but have eternal life.
The man looked at Tom, then vanished through the stage door out into the dark London street.
I cannot get rid of it.
His son is serving his sentence.
Hi, Harry! "Tom... Tom Riddle!" "Ha, no!" "What?" "I am you!" "Are you a ghost?" "No, I'm a cook!" "What?"
I did it on purpose.
I'll ask Tom.
History tends to repeat itself.
Is it dangerous to take a subway alone?
Shell after shell smashed into the fort.
I don't know the mayor but I'd like to meet him.
I don't know what happened to Tom.
Yes. I was very surprised at the news.
In fact, he can't swim well.
What's Tom's plan?
What's Tom's plan?
Where's Tom's computer?
I had a puppy when I was a boy.
I never got an answer from Tom.
This year, we'll be flying to Thailand.
I know who killed Tom.
I'll show you where we can hide.
Tom fainted.
He likes collecting old coins.
Tom took the key off of the hook it was hanging on.
You and Tom are exactly the same.
Tom's room was very small.
Why would there be trouble?
Why is Tom not here?
Why is Tom hounding me?
Why don't we take Tom there?
Why did you get involved?
Why aren't you taking notes?
Why aren't you at your office?
Why are you so surprised?
Why are you so popular?
Why are you out of breath?
Tom's wife picked him up.
We care about each other.
I was close to Tom.
We're all beginners here.
We're almost out of fuel.
Were you and Tom friends?
What was in the envelope?
This book is too boring for me.
Tom must be at least thirty years old.
You just look at that Tom - as foolish as they come.
The coin is silver.
A diplomat is someone who can tell you to go to hell and make you eagerly anticipate the trip.
Should we arrest Tom?
Tom is not fast enough.
The boy was gazing at a school of carp in the pond.
His explanation is too obscure to understand.
Beautiful girls dream of him.
His remark seems to be off the point.
She's obviously prettier than me.
You are a hopeless idiot.
How deep is the hole?
History tends to repeat itself.
The coin is silver.
The old man is wise and knows many things about life.
I'll miss you, too.
You told me I was a princess.
The wedding was canceled at the last minute.
There's no reason for concern.
What am I being accused of?
Can I speak with Tom?
Tom has a beautiful garden.
Mathematics is the language with which God has written the universe.
Gee, it sure is boring around here!
What's the difference between faith and trust?
Tom hasn't got much money with him.
I met Tom this January.
You must know Tom pretty well.
You must know Tom pretty well.
You must know Tom pretty well.
I'm not angry at you.
Tom's dad is very strict.
Can I offer a suggestion?
Don't give up halfway.
You're the same age as my girlfriend.
Tom lost his favorite toy.
Tom has never dated a girl whose name ends with an "s."
I've always wanted to learn how to skate.
Don't be shy. Talk to me.
Do you think that e-book is going to replace paper one?
I don't see eye to eye with my father.
I'm going to talk to Tom.
I went to Tom's apartment.
We decorated it.
We decorated it.
Have you seen hell?
Windows is a type of computer operating system.
Our plane took off at exactly twelve o'clock.
You don't have enough faith in yourselves.
I'm not cool enough to know of all those other bands.
Her lover is a spy working for the British government.
Tom is suspected of being a Russian spy.
I should have listened to Tom.
If you recognize this person, call 110!
Don't put all your eggs in the same basket.
Yesterday I ran across him at the station.
Yesterday I ran across him at the station.
I will teach you Hausa and you will teach me Korean.
The stranger invited me to a nearby café.
I don't want to live in a big mansion.
Tom has trouble admitting that he's wrong.
Do you miss your friends?
Tom refused to give up.
You'd better say nothing! Do you know how much a single word is worth?
The Japanese are very cute and kind people.
She hung beautiful curtains over the window.
Please insert a coin.
How much was Tom making on his last job?
Save it on the external hard drive.
He was at a loss as to which faculty to choose.
You work in an office? I suppose most people do, don't they? Is it fun? No? Oh well.
How many times do I have to say I'm sorry?
How much do you know about Tom's job?
How much did you lose this time?
How much did you lose this time?
She described the scene in detail.
You're polite as fuck!
We'll have to do a bit of walking to get from here to the bank.
My father manages a store.
He kicked the bucket.
He kicked the bucket.
I'm not proud.
It's on the tip of my tongue.
We should see each other more often.
Tom has no interest in science.
What are some good books to read?
It gets boring after a while.
I have a private teacher.
Not complying with the naming conventions will result in parse errors.
Worry not, comrade, for I have a plan! - "That worries me..."
The church is on the other side of the street.
Tom's best friend is a mouse named Jerry.
Is the rat alive or dead?
Is the rat alive or dead?
I'm trying to help you.
Do you think that e-books will replace paper books?
I don't want to get out of bed.
I don't want to lose this match.
Chicken, please.
If you do like this, you won't justify your friends' trust.
Korean food is generally very spicy.
Tom has a rash.
The motorcycles are very cheap.
Times are troubled now.
Who am I actually: a monk dreaming he's a butterfly, or a butterfly dreaming it's a monk?
It cost no less than fifty dollars to get home from the airport.
Thinking about it still makes me angry.
Why did you buy a British car?
It's easy to lose your footing on loose gravel.
The soldiers narrowly escaped death.
The main secret of thoughts is where do they come from? It is impossible to catch a thought until it comes to your mind. That's why I take my own thoughts as a gift that I'm happy to use.
If it were not for books, life would be boring.
Thank you for building this wall.
I ran into a friend of mine on the bus.
Why on earth are you still angry at me?
The short man wears a black suit.
I have a few books.
Don't hesitate to ask for advice.
Don't hesitate to ask for advice.
Don't hesitate to ask for advice.
There's a storm coming.
Pigs cannot run the nations.
There were no customers, so we closed the shop early.
There's free food.
There's free food.
Tom appealed to his mother to buy a new toy for him.
Would you mind watching my suitcase for a minute?
I don't share your opinion.
Tom put his clothes on.
Don't fellow me.
All those I didn't call by name, go outside.
Don't take what Tom says at face value.
Here the fall came.
What a surprise!
Advertisement is a skill of convincing people to spend money they don't have on things they don't need.
This man is my immediate superior.
You guys are pathetic.
The moon was dim.
Don't take it seriously.
I think I've been brainwashed.
Tom always seems to get his own way.
Tom and John roomed together at the academy.
Tom and I were roommates in college.
Tom and I roomed together in college.
Something is going on here.
What time do you take a bath in the evening?
We welcomed their decision.
Green plants carry out photosynthesis.
I couldn't persuade Tom to wait.
This box is green on the outside and red on the inside.
My parents are divorced.
Such plant can be found in Brazil only.
Tom eats eggs without salt or pepper.
Tom gently kissed his daughter on the forehead.
I help Tom almost every day.
They murdered Tom.
Have you talked to Tom? "Everybody's name is Tom here! Which one do you need?" "The one that is Mary's friend!"
This sentence is boring.
Tom entered the office carrying an armload of mail.
I met Tom there.
I met Tom for a few drinks after work.
He's really popular, and I'm not.
How much longer do you think it'll be until the job is finished?
How much of this is Tom's fault?
You can't please everyone.
Tom is very skilled at manual labor.
Tom is very skilled in manual labor.
Do you still suffer from headaches?
I would like to thank you for accepting my invitation.
In the end, Tom had to bite the bullet and take responsibility for his actions.
Tom had to bite the bullet.
Only prayers keep him alive.
No matter how hard you try, you won't be able to do it.
All medals have two faces.
Tom kept his cool.
He touched her hair.
You're such a weirdo.
You've aroused my interest.
You and Tom were childhood friends, right?
There were several couples on the beach.
I'm in love with a wonderful girl.
Do all plants carry out photosynthesis?
What're you planning to do after you retire?
The strong wind died away at night.
Why don't you take off?
Why don't you take a hike?
A groan escaped him.
The kitty is trying to hide from the rain.
I've told you not to call me Tom.
What happened between you and Tom?
Did something happen between you and Tom?
Fill the bottle with water.
Fill the bottle with water.
He leaves a widow and a daughter.
He leaves a widow and a daughter.
I have a tip that will make every cake successful.
Tom got sick because he ate too much.
Tom's illness resulted from eating too much.
She is at the office.
Alcohol took me to the brink of despair.
What can you lose by showing yourself to others? "My advantange over them."
If you treat a customer well, he'll be a customer for life.
Tom's socks don't match.
I couldn't make myself clear enough I guess.
After the meeting was over, everyone said goodbye and returned to the mystery of their private lives.
Where do you want to eat? "I don't know. You choose."
A good deed is its own reward.
School is over at 3:30.
A beard doesn't make a philosopher, nor does wearing a cheap coat.
Tom is enrolled in a magnet school.
I'll always remember the first time I saw Tom.
Read the instructions carefully.
Markku seemed pleasantly surprised.
The date today is 11.12.13. This won't happen again this century.
I feel dizzy. I think I'm going to faint.
Language textbooks often feature only good people.
Upbringing is what remains when one has forgotten everything one has learned.
The root cause of any divorce is marriage.
Tom admitted that he had stolen the bike.
New roads were constructed one after another.
I met Tom this January.
Less than a week after school started, Tom already had a hundred friends.
What's the difference between religion and philosophy?
They will contact us before midday today.
Hey, why is the window open? "I just opened it to let in a little air. If you're cold, feel free to close it."
I've missed you.
Tom hid himself under the bed.
Tom hid himself under the bed.
I'm sorry for my late response.
I apologize for not replying right away.
I apologize for not replying right away.
There are rats in the kitchen.
There's no cure for stupidity.
Tom lost 30 kilograms.
Don't worry. I'll be careful.
Don't worry. I'll be careful.
Don't worry. I'll be careful.
Don't worry. I'll be careful.
Why isn't Tom wearing a name tag?
You all remember Tom, don't you?
Do you really hate Tom that much?
Do you really hate Tom that much?
I tied my dog to the tree in the yard.
Gee, it sure is boring around here! "Yeah, you're so boring I could die."
He and he love her and her, respectively.
I think this bishop is a wolf in sheep's clothing.
I'll get in touch with you soon.
The pool is full of clean water.
Tom unbuttoned his shirt.
If you can't get a lawyer who knows the law, get one who knows the judge.
I like that my sentences are translated.
It's a pity that Mary has no sense of humor.
Tom ruined my weekend.
Tom found a dead body on the beach.
She's strong and sexy.
Alcohol does not solve any problems, but neither does milk.
I do this work for free, simply for the pleasure of doing it.
Tom is driving me mad.
Harry fell seriously ill.
I bet you're in love.
I'm bored to death.
They were almost run over by a truck.
We all know that no one is perfect.
All men are mortal. Tom is a man. Therefore, Tom is mortal.
Tom opened the safe and took out his passport.
And that's your gratitude for all I've done for you? "Your past services won't be forgotten, Tom, but your present mistakes won't be forgiven."
This is a road map.
Seventeen people were killed in the mass shooting rampage.
I'm looking forward to meeting Tom again.
In spite of all his efforts, he failed the exam.
If it weren't for modern medicine, I'd be dead right now.
Tom couldn't control himself.
I thought you and Tom were friends.
I thought you lived with Tom.
Be a good listener!
Gratitude should always be sincere.
Her penmanship is horrible.
Changes in the country are inevitable.
The city has wonderful places to walk with children.
The city has a wonderful place to walk with children.
You mustn't require what is impossible.
I hope we can realize these plans next year.
We should leave something for our children.
You might want to steer clear of Tom.
I am not in the least surprised.
Don't talk about Tom like that.
I don't like roosters.
I visit him often.
We could see the sunset from the window.
I don't want to discuss Tom's problems.
You look younger than Tom.
There are too many commercials on TV.
Three things cannot be long hidden: the sun, the moon, and the truth.
Old men are dangerous: it doesn't matter to them what is going to happen to the world.
Laura and Sarah are sisters of twelve and eight years respectively.
You have no idea how tired I am of all this complaining.
I would like to introduce myself.
I use it every day.
He has helped the poor throughout his life.
He gave me a push and got ahead of me.
My father takes a walk every day.
Tom's handwriting isn't very good, but it's easy to read.
Why's he outside? Invite him to come in!
People are waiting for the sunset.
The sky is waiting for sunset.
I'll ask Tom to wait.
She has no reason to be angry.
I took Tom to a hospital.
Don't be so glum.
The derivative of a constant function is always zero.
He spoke with an American accent.
Don't ask for the impossible.
I'm looking forward to tomorrow.
I didn't want to interrupt the discussion.
Las Vegas was great!
Yelling and screaming is not going to get you anywhere.
Tom is an experienced salesman.
I can see right through you.
There is no one to attend to that patient.
There is no use waiting for her any longer.
I just realized how stupid I am.
Never give up!
Never give up!
I think it's time for me to change jobs.
There are rumors that he will resign.
All eyes turned towards him.
That motor doesn't have enough power.
Tom got very sick and almost died.
Can you answer this riddle?
Can you solve this puzzle?
Can you solve this puzzle?
You've had plenty of opportunities.
You're scaring the kids.
You're scaring the kids.
You're ten minutes late.
You're ten minutes late.
You're the only one to survive the attack.
You're the only one to survive the attack.
You're the only one to survive the attack.
You're the only one to survive the attack.
You're the only one to survive the attack.
You're the only one to survive the attack.
You should've heard the family's reaction when I told them the good news.
Will you relieve me while I go downstairs for a minute?
What was the real reason for Tom's refusal?
We refused to accept Tom's resignation.
We reasoned with Tom until he changed his mind.
We made a resolution to increase production.
We haven't been able to get anyone to replace Tom.
We enjoy the quiet of the country.
Tom's speech quieted the crowd.
Tom's response to the medicine pleased the doctor.
Tom's new play got a warm reception.
Tom's letter relieved me of a lot of worry.
Tom's directions had us puzzled.
Tom was well received in the club.
Tom was racked with pain.
Tom rents rooms to students.
Tom recovered his balance immediately.
Tom quarters are near the camp.
Tom hates the whole human race.
Tom has quite a lot of money in the bank.
Tom has many good qualities.
Tom has a criminal record.
Tom had a good reason for wanting to leave the house.
Tom belonged to a religious order.
This is third-rate tobacco.
This is the regular procedure.
They reported Tom to the police.
They had to call the police to restore order.
There was no way of reaching Tom.
The temperature went down ten degrees.
The soldiers were quartered in an old house near the fort.
The soldier raised the flag.
The question of Tom's ability came up.
The power rests with Tom.
The play was rather long.
The patient didn't respond to treatment.
The movie was quite good.
That was quite an experience we had yesterday.
Please read the instructions.
My father flew into a rage when he found that out.
Look what a long reach Tom has.
Keep a careful record of all expenses.
It's rather cold on deck.
It's quite clear that Tom is going to be late.
It was a real pleasure to meet Tom.
I've read somewhere that it's not true.
I'm ready to forgive Tom.
I'm quite satisfied with Tom's answer.
I refuse to reply to these charges.
I recognized Tom by voice.
I just got a few interesting books on religion.
I have reason to think that we'll never see Tom again.
How long did it take you to recover from your operation?
Complaining won't remedy the situation.
After much reflection, I decided not to accept the offer.
The Dead Sea lives: it attracts tourists from all corners of the world.
I'm not as slim as my older sister.
I want it for my puppy!
Tom keeps a diary in French.
Many tales of alchemy show up in "Journey to the West".
There weren't any other elephants nearby.
Fill it up.
We should tell the children how to defend oneself.
They killed a goat as a sacrifice to God.
I like to visit cemeteries. Is that normal?
Several ships are stuck in sea ice in Antarctica.
He's having dinner now.
I am fully aware of Tom's activities.
Tom got off the bike and started to run.
He knocked my books out of my hands!
Do you think there's a hell?
Tom sounded slightly panicked.
Were there any customers while I was gone?
Tom was among the few who survived.
Tom was a professional magician.
Tom walked to the edge of the pool.
Tom walked down the path, whistling a tune.
I invested my money in a bank.
My pain is excruciating.
They earn enough money in one week to buy a house.
They should give me the right amount to buy a big car.
Tom tossed and turned in bed, unable to sleep.
I miss you like the deserts miss the rain.
I don't want you to see Tom anymore.
Ken put on his clothes.
Tom provided evidence.
Alas, I was late.
Unfortunately, I'm late.
Was Tom caught?
Has Tom been fired?
Tom wanted to say goodbye.
I know Tom has a pool.
I know Tom well.
I know Tom's widow.
I know Tom's wife.
I know very little about classical music.
You're in love.
You're incredibly stupid.
You're incredibly talented.
You're interrupting me.
Why doesn't she hug me anymore?
Were you really boring?
I obey only reason.
Fill in the blanks.
Don't faint! Not until you sign the contract.
I like to wear my skirts knee length.
Tom's wife had a baby girl yesterday.
Tom's actions aren't predictable.
Tom wondered why everyone was staring at him.
You're doing it wrong! Wear just one eyepatch!
The words in my head form streets and buildings, entire cities. I want to take you there.
You are twenty-one already, and still you are enjoying the reverses! "I just..." "Styopa, I didn't mean you!"
Tom was very careful.
Her skirt is long.
Tom is a pilot.
I've eaten already.
Nobody appreciates me.
My friends call me Tom.
I have complete confidence in Tom.
He's very polite.
How come you know so much about Tom?
Please be careful.
Tom screamed and ran out of the room.
Fill it, please.
Fill it, please.
Tom is a bad influence.
Tom is to blame for all of this.
I'm losing my patience.
Tom is in love with you.
Why is she your friend?
He's tall and slim.
He's tall and slim.
You're a disgrace to this family!
You shouldn't have read Tom's letter.
Do you want me to get rid of this?
Obey your father.
Science explains many things that religion never could explain.
I was looking for Tom, but Tom found me first.
I just emailed you.
I just emailed you.
The snow is melting.
It's so bitter.
Am I clear?
Kuala Lumpur is worth visiting.
I didn't know that Tom had a brother.
Wars don't simply start like winter starts, but rather it is people that start a war.
I think this is too expensive.
I did not check their mail box.
I did not check their mail box.
Tom's feelings were not reciprocated.
On the night of the murder, when was the last time that you saw Tom?
Tom takes a bath almost every evening.
Did Tom have any enemies?
I went to the airport to meet him.
You can buy it at any bookstore.
We need a contract.
Tom is having a panic attack.
The wound stopped hurting after he put a band-aid on it.
The ballon burst.
Don't you find it unpleasant walking in the rain?
My sister is playing with a doll.
We moved into a new house.
It's going to blow up!
It's going to blow up!
The cold is intense.
My sister plays with dolls.
It is no use asking me for money.
My love for irony is growing by the minute.
The boy is not tall.
I'm sure the guy you saw wasn't Tom.
Tom has decided to give up.
I hope nobody got hurt.
You should wash your hands before you eat.
You won't drown if you learn how to swim.
Young children can be very loud.
He got dressed and went outside.
Tom could barely hide his excitement.
I asked Tom for advice.
I asked Tom what he'd advise.
Tom could barely hide his smile.
I asked Tom how much time he thought it would take.
Tom convinced me that I was wrong.
Tom convinced me that it wasn't his fault.
I asked Tom when he had started studying French.
Tom confessed that he had broken the window.
The glove has a hole in the thumb.
You can add sentences that you can't translate yourself. Maybe someone else can translate them!
There are Russians who believe Russia is not taken seriously by the rest of the world.
She gave me access to her records.
My dog goes everywhere with me.
The best way to write letters is to put down whatever is in your mind.
Siberia is one of the earth's "green lungs".
We're going to have to be very careful.
We're going to have to be very careful.
This man is a merchant.
Tom has three thousand books.
Tom is a professional dancer.
Tom has a pretty good memory.
Tom is playing with his toys.
Tom has cancer.
Tom's birthday was yesterday.
Why do you hate Tom so much?
The shop on the corner sells fruit at a very good price.
The shop on the corner sells fruit at a very good price.
Tom has a loud voice.
I have a pair of shoes.
World War I lasted from 1914 until 1918.
Tom's got a big mouth.
She will protect you.
Tom broke his promise.
Tom has broad shoulders.
Tom has narrow shoulders.
Tom's hands are small.
Tom drowned in the ocean.
His mother died when he was eleven years old.
I can't agree with Tom.
This country is poor in natural resources.
Tom dove into the swimming pool.
Tom's proposal is worth considering.
Tom wasn't at the meeting.
Tom remained silent.
I didn't know you were a surgeon.
Tom has a weak heart.
That's Tom's family.
That's Tom's brother.
This car is Tom's.
That's Tom's decision.
That's Tom's decision.
We'll visit you.
Do you really love Tom?
Tom's a typical Englishman.
Do you know Tom's real name?
Tom has a good memory.
I agree with Tom.
I agree with Tom.
Tom has three kids.
Tom's native language is French.
Tom is washing the car.
Tom lives from hand to mouth.
I've learned a lot from Tom.
How long have you known Tom?
How long have you known Tom?
I can't follow Tom's logic.
Tom likes Italian food.
Tom will make a good doctor.
Tom lost his balance and fell down.
Tom postponed his departure till Sunday.
Tom lives in a fantasy world.
Tom is in the kitchen washing dishes.
Are these Tom's shoes?
Are you afraid of Tom?
Are you angry at Tom?
Are you angry with Tom?
Are you thinking about Tom?
Are you thinking about Tom?
Are you worried about Tom?
Can you call Tom?
Do you have Tom's address?
Tom put the envelope on the table.
Hand me a towel.
I was talking to Tom the other day.
Would you please turn off the TV?
Can you drive me to the station?
Can you drive me to the station?
Can you please help me carry my bags?
If I see Tom, I'll tell him that you're looking for him.
Tom asked us not to wear shoes in his house.
We can't survive without food.
We can survive without food... just not for too long.
There are some differences between British English and American English.
You're bound to succeed in the long run.
You could see the look of scorn on Tom's face.
When is school out?
We suddenly sighted a school of fish.
We need new curtain rods.
Tom's schoolbooks cost a lot.
Tom's rough manner frightened the children.
Tom was run down by a truck.
Tom is running around with the wrong crowd.
Tom is busy running an errand for his father.
Tom gets a lot of satisfaction from his work.
Tom doesn't act like the typical college professor.
Tie Tom up with this piece of rope.
The sea is pretty rough today.
The museum took down the picture of the royal family.
The ball rolled down the hill.
Save your voice.
Put your mind at rest. Everything will turn out all right.
Please put this in the safe.
My money is running low.
It was a rush job.
Is the bridge safe?
I'm not satisfied that Tom is guilty.
I get more homesick as the months roll by.
Here's a sample of the material I want.
Could you save this dress for me?
Can you ride without a saddle?
As soon as you round the corner, you'll see the store.
At once the birds left their nests.
How is Tom doing?
Is everything OK with Tom?
Did you turn off the stove?
Tom often breaks his promises.
She can play the guitar.
Tom is wearing thick glasses.
Tom explained the matter in detail.
Some people gain weight when they quit smoking.
Lithuania is joining the European Union.
I gained two kilos this summer.
The plane still hasn't taken off.
If you're not watching the TV, I'll turn it off.
May I turn off the TV?
I'll go and look for Tom.
I am confronted with a difficult problem.
I'm not Tom's sister.
The moment of truth has arrived.
I won't tolerate any mistakes.
Everyone except Tom was wearing a tie.
Traveling educates young people.
I like reading by daylight.
You made a promise.
I went to the hospital to see my wife.
I ran a red light in my car, because I was in a hurry.
TV's boring today.
The president put off visiting Japan.
You remember Tom, don't you?
I would like shoes like that.
She's very polite.
We missed the last train.
I'm new.
I was late for school yesterday.
Despite all his wealth, he is stingy.
Drop by my office this evening.
Don't drop cigarette ash on the carpet.
This car runs on natural gas.
You're a teacher.
He thanked me for coming.
That textbook is out of date.
As far as I know, Tom doesn't have a girlfriend.
The king ruled on the island.
No matter how old you are, it is still possible to learn.
Everyone looked at Tom again.
I apologize if I offended you.
Tom said that he wasn't angry.
I'm eighteen.
Tom said that he was angry.
I'll bring the glasses.
I skied for the first time.
I was a little bit surprised.
I was a little surprised.
I think a bit of anger is better for you than worry.
A perfect day is one spent in the garden.
Are you talking about Tom?
Are you talking about Tom?
What rude language he uses!
Nobody stayed in my country.
My heart was filled with sorrow.
Never have I dreamt such a strange dream.
This will take time, money and patience.
Playing with fire is dangerous.
Why did you lie to Tom?
We're celebrating Tom's birthday.
We can't find Tom.
This argument is totally ridiculous. Forget it!
I appreciate your time.
Tom stopped reading.
I love him, but he's in love with another girl.
This argument is totally ridiculous. Forget it!
Swimming in the pond is dangerous.
Don't blame others for your failure.
I love her, but she's in love with someone else.
It is clear that he is guilty.
We'll go see Tom.
I promised to obey him.
I promised to obey him.
I promised to obey him.
I promised to obey him.
We'll go visit Tom.
Everything he says upsets me.
He attached great importance to the event.
He engaged her as an interpreter.
Someone tried to kill Tom.
Tom said that he was thirsty.
Everyone looks scared but Tom.
Tom's son's name is John.
Everyone is staring at Tom.
He won't be missed.
Don't fear a knife, but fear a fork - because one stab can make four holes!
He is hopelessly romantic.
What a collection!
Someone just turned off the lights.
Go and apologize to Tom.
He realized the magnitude of his crime.
Read these instructions.
I always listen to Tom.
Yoko translated some poems from Japanese into English.
That's utter nonsense.
That's utter nonsense.
That's utter nonsense.
The first thing Tom does every day when he gets home is turn on the TV.
The police arrested the person they think killed Tom.
The last time I saw Tom, he was on a stretcher.
The last time I saw Tom, he was on a stretcher.
We all like to be appreciated.
We all know how dangerous that can be.
We appreciate your cooperation in this.
We can do this without Tom's help.
We captured some of the terrorists.
We could freeze to death.
We did what we had to to survive.
I can't believe nobody has put this song up yet on all of YouTube.
Go and say goodbye to him before he leaves.
Go and say goodbye to him before he leaves.
He carved me a wooden doll.
We were wasted.
Do you have a favorite singer?
Do you have a favorite singer?
Kittens are curious.
You may have a slight fever.
If a woman has the choice between love and wealth, she always tries to choose both.
The balloon will burst.
She did it on purpose.
Tom did that on purpose.
He begged us to go with him.
You know how much I appreciate your expertise.
They demanded that President resign.
She tore the letter into pieces.
My friend Tom has twice as many stamps as I do.
I am as much in love as on the first day.
An elephant is a strong animal.
She heard Tom.
I was naive.
I was naive.
We are left with having to postpone our departure.
We have to postpone our departure.
We can't avoid postponing our departure.
We can't avoid postponing our departure.
It seems to me that this is too expensive.
She can skate.
She doesn't want to play with her toys.
How long are they?
What do tigers eat?
It is interesting for me to read my old diary.
Tom brushes his teeth after every meal.
It's all over with poor Tom.
I'm sick and tired of your complaints.
Let's go and talk to Tom.
Talk to Tom.
Talk to Tom.
Turn the page.
We contacted Tom's family.
What're you going to do about it?
Why did you kill Tom?
Why would someone kill Tom?
Tom has a lot of will power.
Tom is a young and talented dancer.
What's Tom's profession?
Tom lit the candle with a match.
Tom lit the fire.
You need to swallow your pride.
I beg your pardon. What did you say?
Tom has a strong sense of responsibility.
I beg you.
I beg you.
Tom has high blood pressure.
Small children are very curious.
I hope I'm not interrupting anything.
I don't care what you say.
Tom's room isn't very large.
I spent the whole morning studying English.
Whether you like Tom or not is irrelevant.
I forgot about Tom.
I forgot about Tom.
Tom doesn't want the truth to come out.
Tom has no idea what to do with all the junk in his garage.
Please visit us in our new office.
Oh shit! I've lost my keys!
Tom cares about his health.
The judge started to read the sentence.
I'm smarter than Tom.
This cat doesn't chase rats.
I've had a headache for three days and I can't get rid of it.
Do you know why Tom is absent from school?
Tom is often absent from school.
I came to apologize for what happened yesterday.
She bought a toy for the boy.
Ken collects old coins.
Don't be late for the train.
I explained the procedure to him.
I was a teacher for fifteen years.
How much per kilo for excess?
Seemingly impossible things sometimes happen.
Have you known Tom long?
How many samples?
They ate lunch together.
An enemy of an enemy is not necessarily an ally.
This box is green on the outside and red on the inside.
It cost me a lot of money to build a new house.
I'll miss you after you've gone.
Are you Tom's brother?
Where are Tom's keys?
Tom has a decent salary.
Where would you be if you were Tom?
Where did Tom get that?
He breathed his last breath.
What will they do with Tom?
I'm not the least bit interested in what Tom thinks of me.
Tom doesn't like washing windows.
I don't think this is anything you'd be interested in.
What makes Tom so special?
What makes you think that we would be interested?
Hurry up, or you will be late.
What do you think they'll do to Tom?
What do you think they'll do to Tom?
What do you think of our collection?
Tom called off his trip.
Tom canceled his trip.
What can you do for Tom?
What can you do for Tom?
What can we do for Tom?
What are we going to do with Tom?
Wait a minute, will you?
I loved Tom like a brother.
I loved Tom like a brother.
I swear I won't tell anyone.
Tom reached into the fridge and pulled out a bottle of beer.
Tom is one of our best singers.
This isn't about Tom.
He was killed in the avalanche.
The fire has gone out.
The fire went out.
Tom dove into the water and swam as fast as he could.
Tom fooled all of us.
Tom eats rice at least twice a day.
Tom filled Mary's wine glass to the rim.
Would you like another glass of wine?
He was killed in a car accident.
I've been in love with you since kindergarten.
I don't want to play with Tom.
It is wrong to tell a lie.
I want to catch the 11:45.
How can you tell them apart?
Will you do me a favor?
Could you do me a favor?
My wisdom tooth hurts.
We need to be cautious.
We have to be careful.
There's no talking to him when he's angry.
You looked scared.
Tom gambled away everything he had.
Don't send me home, please.
Don't send me home, please.
This is all hypothetical.
You have no legal right to seize my property.
Where did you buy that skirt?
What size are these shoes?
We sat up all night talking.
Tom's hair is all silver.
Tom's grandfather was a slave.
Tom wears simple clothes.
Tom wears silk ties.
Tom suddenly sat up in the chair.
Tom slaves all day at the factory.
Tom returned the ball with a forehand smash.
Tom ran a hundred meters in twelve seconds.
Tom has very white skin.
Tom came here on a secret mission.
This is the first volume of a series on modern philosophy.
This is the best season for hiking.
They settled on the terms of the contract.
The seat of my pants is torn.
The rainy season set in early this year.
That totally slipped my mind.
Tell Tom to take a seat.
Send Tom in.
My watch is an hour slow.
May I have a second helping?
Is this sterling silver?
I've looked everywhere, but can't find it.
I'd like to see more of you.
I need a secretary.
Are you good at ice skating?
Get your skates. The lake is frozen.
Do you have a complete set of Tom Jackson's works?
Did you make a serious attempt to find Tom?
Could you do me a small service?
I can't eat or drink very hot things.
Tom is a good surgeon.
The Smiths moved to Ohio.
What do you think of the way Tom has been behaving lately?
They became famous after the accident.
I thank you very much for your help.
She's very curious.
I have never seen Tom so happy.
Well, you've convinced me.
Well, you've convinced me.
Nothing lasts forever.
I decided to be a lawyer.
I was surprised by it.
We're here because we want to talk to Tom.
I made Tom leave his suitcase behind.
You have a sense of humor. I like that.
He is in love with her.
He is in love with her, but he tries to conceal his feelings.
Military toys are abundant in the shops.
An Englishman's home is his castle.
Tom was killed in the avalanche.
Don't leave us.
Don't leave us.
Why did you get so angry?
They wash their car every Saturday.
I'm not accusing Tom of anything.
The map on page 11 looks very strange. Turn it upside down. Then it becomes a familiar map to you.
He did not cry at her funeral.
Wish me luck.
The school year is almost over.
Tom is getting dressed.
Tom is throwing up.
I am brushing my teeth.
I am swimming in the lake.
The patient's life was in danger.
Hit Tom.
Hit Tom.
Hit Tom.
Your kiss is sweeter than honey.
I want to thank you again.
Why is Tom so gloomy?
We're snowed under by invitations.
Tom sang in a soft voice.
Tom is too soft to be a good executive.
The lake is frozen solid.
The ice is solid enough for skating.
Thanks ever so much.
That's not so! "It certainly is so."
So far, I'm bored.
Not so much pepper, please.
Could I have some towels?
And so you think that's a good idea, huh?
Tom knew it was dangerous.
He has woken Tom.
Tom is ready for the worst.
Tom and I were kids together.
Tom and I grew up together.
I don't care about your past.
The car is not available today.
He failed in the examination because he had not studied.
I'll try not to make mistakes next time.
There are a lot of deer in Nara.
Are you still working with Tom?
I must visit my friend in the hospital.
Plants grow quickly after rain.
The more I studied psychology, the more interesting I came to find it.
I don't remember you asking me to do that.
They are having dinner.
Tom didn't turn around.
You must control yourself.
You must control yourself.
I thought you wouldn't give up.
Tom is shopping.
It's poison.
Take your pills.
Take your pills.
Tom missed you.
Tom missed you.
Tom missed you.
She did her duty.
Tom did his duty.
I did my duty.
Tom lost the bet.
Put this book on top of the others.
He asked his teacher several questions.
It doesn't matter whether he comes late or not.
Can you do some shopping for me?
Tom felt awkward.
I asked Tom to come with me.
Is your head full of straw?
She was the only one to survive the crash.
She was the only one to survive the crash.
I want to file a complaint.
The police couldn't find any footprints outside Tom's bedroom window.
You'll miss me.
You'll miss me.
I missed it.
We must cling to our faith.
It's raining non-stop.
I've never been skiing before.
I've never been skiing before.
I'm proud to be a part of this project.
I'm proud to be a part of this project.
Bring your student ID!
Where did you buy that skirt?
Tom has already set the table.
Do you wash your dog every day?
Do you wash your dog every day?
I admit I was surprised.
I admit I was surprised.
Tom and I have a plan.
I think Tom must be pretty sleepy by now.
Tom has a rare disease.
Put down your name on the list and pass it on to the next person.
Put down your name on the list and pass it on to the next person.
Could I have some towels?
Is this a puzzle?
You need to be careful.
You need to be careful.
You have to be careful.
You have to be careful.
You need to be careful.
You must be careful.
Whose bread I eat, his song I sing.
Did you speak with Tom?
She was panting.
Mark graduated from Harvard in 1991.
We didn't kill Tom.
We don't really care.
We won't surrender.
My mother bought some apples at a fruit store.
Apples are the best fruit.
An apple is a tasty fruit.
I'll be with you in spirit.
Tom is a good pilot.
Tom is adding sentences to Tatoeba.
The lake is completely frozen over.
Are you good at ice skating?
Except for Tom, I didn't know anyone there.
Except for Tom, I didn't know anyone there.
Wasn't Tom in his room?
I wish I could buy a motorcycle.
What's Tom's theory?
Have you seen Tom today?
Have you seen Tom around?
Have you heard Tom's music?
Have you guys seen Tom?
We stop loving ourselves when no one loves us.
Have you found Tom yet?
How can I find Tom?
How can I find Tom?
Do what's best for Tom.
Give this copy to Tom.
We have families we have to take care of.
I'll contact you.
I'll contact you.
Can plants feel pain?
The liquid gave off a strong smell.
The liquid gave off a strong smell.
Can plants feel pain?
I thought Tom had a dog.
The earth is small in comparison with the sun.
If the universe is an answer, what is the question?
Tom has gained a lot of weight recently.
Do you recognize these?
I like this office.
Please wait a minute.
Tom eats too much junk food.
We have more music coming up, so stay tuned.
Tom is too nosey.
Osamu Dazai committed suicide.
Place the words in the appropriate order to make sentences.
They caught Tom.
We won't be late.
Tom was very late.
Tom says it's hot.
Tom says it's crowded.
I hope that isn't true.
I think you know that's not true.
What you said is not true.
I hope it's not true.
Did you know that Tom has three children?
I think you both know Tom.
I think you both know Tom.
Tom has a longer beard than John does.
It took me a long time to get used to the noise.
My boyfriend met a gay friend at the beach.
He didn't tell John about the accident.
He didn't tell John about the accident.
It is irrelevant what you think.
It's not Tom I'm worried about.
They shook hands when they met at the airport.
I awoke three times in the night.
You're the only person that can persuade him.
I happened upon her.
Tell me what you know about Tom.
Tell me what you know about Tom.
How well do you know Tom?
How well do you know Tom?
Tom knows it's a lie.
I'll never forget Tom's smile.
Please don't translate this sentence.
Don't translate this sentence.
Do you make your bed every morning?
You gave me quite a start.
Who spread that rumor?
Try to sound Tom out on the subject.
Tom's peculiar attitude on the matter doesn't spring from any one cause.
Tom's height makes him stand out in a crowd.
Tom's clothes make him stand out in a crowd.
Tom spoiled all my plans.
Tom is a nice guy in spite of the fact that he has a lot of money.
Tom has had special training in this field.
Tom comes from the southern part of France.
They hired Tom on the spot.
These hot spells don't last long.
There's a south wind blowing.
The actor walked on stage carrying a spear.
Our backyard is twenty meters square.
My new shoes squeak.
Let's split the profits.
Let the milk stand overnight and skim off the cream.
It sounds impossible.
If we don't stand up for Tom, nobody will.
I've spared no expense in building the house.
I'm worried about the state of Tom's health.
I understand that they're going to increase the staff.
I refuse to pay more than standard rates.
I nearly split my sides laughing at Tom's stories.
I don't believe Tom is a spy.
Do you think they gave Tom a square deal?
I'll do it when Hell freezes over.
The objection is overruled.
The list is endless.
I fell in the pool.
I fell in the pool.
I'm very comfortable.
I didn't have much time so I just skimmed through the article.
She is not scared of taking big risks.
She is not scared of taking big risks.
There's a good chance that Tom won't like the kind of music your band plays.
He tried to persuade her.
I always thought Tom was a complete idiot.
I've never been so proud of Tom.
I don’t give a fuck about what you think.
She said she was sick yesterday, which was not true.
Tom is in a bad mood right now.
The possibilities are endless.
The possibilities are endless.
I'm going back to my office.
It's snowing outside.
Tom bought three kilograms of apples.
Tom has been taken to a hospital.
Tom has been taken to a hospital.
I'm sorry to call you so late at night.
How long are you here for?
How long are you here for?
How long are you here for?
How long are you here for?
Why is your skirt so short?
Are you angry at me?
My mother is a lawyer.
Tom hopes he doesn't flunk out of school.
Can you ice skate?
Everything's free.
This is a flag.
Where did you procure the information?
Can you guess which cooler is the most efficient?
Efficient machinery replaced manual labor.
He put his arms around her.
Butterflies are beautiful.
The waiter was downstairs.
Tom's cat likes the song "Eye Of The Tiger."
Are you comfortable?
Are you comfortable?
I will become angry.
I've come up with a brilliant idea.
The medicine is hard to swallow.
Are they cute?
Tom wasn't murdered.
Tom wasn't murdered.
Soldiers must follow orders.
Let Tom carry it.
Tom has money.
They handcuffed Tom.
Take Tom's place.
Take Tom's place.
Take Tom's place.
Take Tom's place.
Stop scaring Tom.
Stop scaring Tom.
Stop scaring Tom.
Tom looked around.
Tom had a heart attack.
Tom had a heart attack last year.
Tom had a heart attack last year.
Tom had a heart attack.
Tom had his car key in his left hand.
I'm at Tom's house.
Tom has long legs.
Is Tom guilty?
The guards didn't see Tom.
The guards didn't see Tom.
The guards didn't see Tom.
My hobby is collecting old coins.
Tom wiped his forehead with a handkerchief.
Is this Tom's?
Tom kept writing.
Tom kept working.
Tom isn't there.
Don't call Tom.
Don't call Tom.
She's hopelessly in love.
He's hopelessly in love.
Tom eats anything.
Tom didn't win.
Tom approached timidly.
They arrested Tom.
They're watching Tom.
They're going to find Tom.
They surrounded Tom.
That's Tom's watch.
That's Tom's signature.
That's Tom's seat.
That's Tom's office.
That's Tom's mother.
That's Tom's boat.
Someone attacked Tom.
Set Tom free.
Set Tom free.
Please find Tom.
Please find Tom.
Please call Tom.
Please call Tom.
Look at Tom.
Look at Tom.
Let Tom out.
Let Tom out.
I was hoping to surprise Tom.
She wants to take her anger out on someone.
Did you take Tom's advice?
Did you take Tom's advice?
What would you buy if you had 19 billion dollars?
We both love Tom.
We both love Tom.
This is a fantastic place.
Is it already open?
It's already open.
He was tall, slim and strong.
He threatened me, but I wasn't scared.
He threatened me, but I wasn't scared.
Tom, get out of the shower!
Get out of the shower!
Who will win the gold medal?
She's with Tom.
Write down your date of birth here.
Write down your date of birth here.
The reason for your failure is that you did not try hard enough.
I am unconcerned with the problem.
No, he said in a decided tone.
I have a feeling that something dreadful is going to happen.
The forest is full of trees.
The priest pronounced them man and wife.
All this is strange to me.
Are you surprised that I came?
Be careful not to tear your clothes on that nail.
Be careful when you cross a road.
How does Tom's suggestion strike you?
I can only walk about three kilometers at a stretch.
I got it at the hardware store down the street.
I had dinner with a total stranger.
I hope you tore up my last letter.
I ran into Tom on the street the other day.
I struck Tom in self-defense.
I'll make sure we never see Tom again.
I've stopped worrying about it.
It strikes me as a bit unusual.
Look how the trees sway in that wind.
Our soccer team won every game last season.
State your business.
That suit doesn't fit Tom very well.
The road is straight for three kilometers.
There was a terrible storm here last week.
They struck oil here recently.
They surrendered to the Allies.
They've been teasing Tom about his accent.
This material seems to change color when the light strikes it.
Tom was summoned to appear in court.
Tom works about nine hours at a stretch.
Tom's father was very strict.
We finally struck a bargain.
We plan to tear down that old hotel soon.
We're putting our furniture in storage for the summer.
When do you stop work?
Who is that stranger?
Who taught you how to drive a car?
Who's the lawyer handling the suit?
You can get a streetcar on this corner.
Tom is in the bathroom brushing his teeth.
He has quite a novel idea.
Tom's dream is to live in a small town in the south of France.
All the passengers died, but he survived.
He has done that on purpose.
Why do we have dreams?
True friendships last forever.
Why aren't you with Tom?
Success is never blamed.
Tom seldom wears a hat.
That's Tom's horse.
I love twilight.
I called Tom to thank him.
She will report directly to me.
The governor of Texas was furious.
Heaven and hell exist only in the human heart.
Still sleepy, right?
Still sleepy, right?
I'm allowing you to go.
I'm allowing you to go.
Your stupid remark just added fuel to the flames.
You have lost, give up!
You have lost, give up!
You're repeating yourself.
Tom's explanation was too complicated.
Tom had no more water.
The film lasted 2 hours.
I have a business partner.
We talked quite frankly.
Tom walked to the window and looked out.
Tom unbuttoned the top button of his shirt.
Tom unbuttoned the top button of his shirt.
My hobby is collecting coins.
My sister usually walks to school.
She had a dream about coming naked to the office.
Tom is waiting for us in his office.
You don't have to worry about Tom anymore.
He then bound his son, and took up his sword, in order to sacrifice him in the ancient manner.
He proved to be an ideal husband.
Do you want anything to eat?
She couldn't convince him to buy her a new car.
Tom winked.
There's a slight difference.
Have you forgiven Tom?
Have you forgiven Tom?
Have you forgiven Tom?
She wants to be more independent.
He wants to be more independent.
She's overconfident.
When did you realize something was wrong?
I've seen Tom.
I'm with Tom.
I'm watching Tom.
I'm watching Tom.
I'm Tom's wife.
I'm Tom's son.
I'm Tom's sister.
I'm Tom's neighbor.
I'm Tom's mother.
I'm Tom's mother.
I'm Tom's lawyer.
I'm Tom's grandfather.
I'm Tom's girlfriend.
I'm Tom's daughter.
I'm Tom's doctor.
I'm Tom's driver.
I'm Tom's brother.
I'm Tom's boss.
I'm Tom's bodyguard.
I'm Tom's assistant.
I'm Tom's fiancée.
I'll warn Tom.
I'll teach Tom.
I'll find Tom.
I'll call Tom.
I'd ask Tom.
I'd ask Tom.
It's a unique situation.
Her work is to wash the dishes.
I'm trying to get someone to help me.
Won't you come in for a minute?
Who's the fellow that just said hello to you?
Where's my towel?
When was the last time you saw Tom?
What's the theme of the novel?
Toss the ball to Tom.
Tom's remarks touched off a violent argument.
Tom was dying of thirst.
Tom left a widow and three children.
Tom is always thoughtful of his parents.
Tom has a very thick accent.
Tom had an unusual thirst for knowledge.
These shoes are too small.
There's a gang of tough kids on this street.
Their house is near here.
Sometimes you try my patience too much.
Is the ice thick enough for skating?
If you don't care for Tom, don't toy with his affections.
I know the tune, but I don't know the words.
I didn't care for the third act of the play.
I can't thank you enough.
Do you have title to that property?
Can you get there by car?
Buy some toys.
Am I too late?
My wife talked me into buying a new car.
I thought you'd be grateful.
I thought you'd be grateful.
I thought you'd be grateful.
I thought you'd be grateful.
I thought you'd be grateful.
I thought you'd be grateful.
This is the American Embassy.
I'm just trying to survive.
There are many rats on the ship.
There are many rats on the ship.
He moved out of his parents' place.
She moved out of her parents' house.
This is my I.D. card.
What you say is neither here nor there.
They dream of the day when they'll be rolling in money.
Is there a McDonald's near here?
Don't judge people by appearance.
I'm at Tom's house.
I never wanted to hurt Tom.
I never wanted to hurt Tom.
His job is to negotiate with foreign buyers.
I don't feel so hot today.
I was stuck in traffic.
Even though English is his native language, Tom doesn't know the difference between "lose" and "loose".
I had no idea you were so good at playing the guitar.
I had no idea you were so good at playing the guitar.
I had no idea you knew Tom.
I had no idea you knew Tom.
I had no idea you knew Tom.
Tom has three younger sisters.
Promise me you won't get mad if I tell you.
Promise me you won't get mad if I tell you.
He has a lot female friends.
I don't have an accent!
I don't have an accent!
I didn't mean to offend you.
I've been working with Tom for three months.
Their daughter is a nurse.
Save for the cold in the hall, the gig was good.
Spain controlled Florida.
The situation was hopeless.
Don't worry. I'll talk to Tom.
Don't worry. I'll talk to Tom.
I was thinking of Tom.
I was thinking about Tom.
I wasn't looking for Tom.
His mother was a school teacher.
Stop whimpering.
Stop your bellyaching.
Would you recognize Tom if you saw him?
Would you recognize Tom if you saw him?
I can't help feeling something's not quite right.
He said that he takes a walk every day.
The police found a hidden camera in Tom's living room.
Sam is two years younger than Tom.
You are two years younger than Tom.
You are two years younger than Tom.
How about something to eat?
You have to eat something.
You have to eat something.
You should eat something.
You should eat something.
You have no right to interfere in other people's affairs.
You have no right to interfere in other people's affairs.
You will soon be able to ski well.
I clean my teeth before I go to sleep.
This can't be avoided.
President Roosevelt was furious.
He explained why the experiment failed.
I asked Tom to describe it.
I've tried to contact Tom.
I have Tom's address.
I have Tom's address somewhere.
I've told you not to call me Tom.
I have to talk to Tom now.
I have to go talk to Tom.
I have to go pick up Tom from school.
I have to go get Tom.
I have to find out who killed Tom.
I have to earn a living.
I have to admit I was worried about it.
I have to admit I was worried about it.
I've taught Tom everything I know.
I was never mad at you.
I haven't talked to anyone but Tom today.
I haven't spoken with Tom yet.
I haven't spoken with Tom yet.
I haven't talked to Tom.
I haven't spoken to Tom since.
I haven't spoken to Tom since.
Why is Tom hiding?
Do you recognise the person in this picture?
Do you recognise the person in this picture?
I saw you with Tom.
I've seen you with Tom.
Tom is very naive.
I haven't seen Tom.
I haven't seen Tom.
I haven't seen Tom this morning.
I haven't seen Tom this morning.
I haven't seen Tom since.
I haven't seen Tom since.
I haven't seen Tom since he left.
I haven't seen Tom since he left.
Tom filled the glass with water.
I haven't seen Tom all day.
I haven't seen Tom all day.
I've received another message from Tom.
I've received another message from Tom.
Do you have a bike?
I have no intention of apologizing to Tom.
I have no idea what Tom's problem is.
I've never seen Tom wearing a tie.
I've never seen Tom drunk before.
I've never seen Tom like that.
I've never seen Tom so angry.
I've never seen Tom drunk before.
I've never forgotten Tom's birthday.
I've never forgotten Tom's birthday.
I've never broken the law.
I've never been to a circus.
Three times four is twelve.
A big wave turned the ferry over.
You should change the sentence.
They bumped against each other.
He climbed up the tree like a monkey.
He climbed up the tree like a monkey.
Is it true that you are in love with me?
Is it true that you are in love with me?
I work at an embassy.
We have broken off relations with them.
Tom is happy with his new bicycle.
You're too polite.
You're too polite.
You're too polite.
You're too polite.
You're too polite.
Your kindness overwhelms me.
I've never been good at this.
I've missed you so much.
I've missed you so much.
I've met the perfect woman.
I've managed to persuade Tom to come.
I've lost the will to live.
I've lost my appetite.
I've known Tom since he was born.
I've known Tom my whole life.
I've known Tom my whole life.
I invited Tom to dinner.
The Japanese take off their shoes when they enter a house.
I can't bear the pain anymore.
Tom is not religious.
Tom has three cats.
The kilt is not a skirt.
Tom's French is almost perfect.
Tom has money, but I don't.
Waiter, I'd like to order.
The dragon saw her.
He described exactly what happened.
What is your opinion about language preservation?
Words are for lovers. I want to see action.
My health is my only capital.
We didn't see Tom's face.
I almost called off the wedding.
I agreed to have a drink with Tom after work.
I agree with Tom on this.
I agree with this statement.
Tom was pleasantly surprised.
Tom has a photographic memory.
Tom really is quite talented.
Tom made me something to eat.
I know you're angry.
I didn't think you'd be so late.
I didn't think you'd be so late.
Does your husband walk to work? - "Yes, he likes walking."
I appreciate what Tom did for me.
You are under arrest for the murder of Tom Jackson.
You're beginning to try my patience.
This is a picture painted by him.
I dropped by the bookstore and I bought an interesting book.
Did you draw this yourself?
My Internet connection is slow.
I have an appointment with him at noon.
Tom was wearing a mask.
Tom was killed in the avalanche.
Tom has dirty hands.
Tom's shoes are dirty.
Tom's shoes are dirty.
Tom's hands are dirty.
The crafty thief hid in a tool shed.
Have you spoken to Tom yet?
Have you already talked with Tom?
Do you know why Tom wasn't at school today?
Do you know why Tom wasn't at school today?
How did you know we were at Tom's house?
How did you know we were at Tom's house?
How did you know we were at Tom's house?
How did you know we were at Tom's house?
Admit it, Tom, you're still in love with me.
It soon became clear that things would take a dangerous turn.
Your face died, and I will replace your face with the greatest face in Koridai!
I've been looking all over for you.
I've been looking all over for you.
I've been looking all over for you.
The ship abounds with rats.
I just found Tom. He's dead.
I just found Tom. He's dead.
He's a good actor and he's really cute too!
Do you eat out often?
Tom is working at the garage.
Get Dressed!
Get your clothes on.
Get your clothes on.
How could you do this to Tom?
How could you do that to Tom?
How could you do this to Tom?
What kind of nonsense is that?
Come to my office any time.
Call at my office at any time.
Water boils at 100 degrees Celsius at sea level.
I lost a bet.
I don't envy you.
I don't envy you.
Well, let's talk turkey.
Did you break the window on purpose or by accident?
I've been living in Milan for ten years.
Tom creeps me out.
You should not judge a man by his appearance.
Unfortunately, few passengers survived the catastrophe.
I'm not a traitor.
We'll sleep embraced.
Italy has two mountain ranges, the Alps and the Apennines.
Venice, Italy is one of the wonders of the world.
I miss Italy.
Absolutely!
I have a message for you from Tom.
Tom's had a lot of girlfriends.
I'm not sure Tom is going to survive.
Ask Tom and he'll tell you the same thing.
Ask Tom and he'll tell you the same thing.
That's the worst thing you can do!
The colors of Italian flag are white, red and green.
She was overwhelmed with emotion.
Tom's mother died young because she drank and smoked too much.
She surprised her husband.
That's the worst thing you can do!
That's the worst thing you can do!
Tom misses his wife.
You have to learn more.
There is a hospital nearby.
I didn't mean to wake Tom up.
I didn't mean to frighten you.
I didn't mean to frighten you.
I didn't want to worry you.
I didn't want to worry you.
I didn't make any promises.
Humans generate more than 1 million tons of hazardous waste every day.
Tom lit the match.
He was reading a textbook on American history.
They will tear down the old building in two days.
How about asking her to join our trip abroad?
I can't endure the noise.
This popular German singer only sings in English.
Tom can't turn Mary down.
Everyone laughed, except Tom.
I saw Tom before he saw me.
Tom wasn't here last week.
You've spoiled everything.
You made things worse.
Don't forget that it's Tom's birthday tomorrow.
Don't forget that it's Tom's birthday tomorrow.
The meeting dragged on.
He showed no gratitude for the offer.
How many times a day do you brush your teeth?
There's no more room in hell.
How did you know Tom would be late?
How did you know Tom would be late?
It is a kind of orange.
Does Tom have a key to your apartment?
Does Tom have a key to your apartment?
I don't know if Tom has a girlfriend or not.
I didn't even know Tom had a girlfriend.
OK, I'm persuaded.
Well, you've convinced me.
Well, you've convinced me.
I need to talk with you about Tom.
I need to talk with you about Tom.
You can't make Tom help if he doesn't want to.
Tom has a family.
I've got Tom's phone number.
I've got to try to find Tom.
I've got a lot more experience than Tom.
I've got a hunch.
In case of fire, break this window.
In case of fire, break this window.
I've forgotten Tom's wife's name.
I haven't forgotten Tom.
I can't wait to meet Tom.
Everyone is looking for Tom.
Go and ask Tom.
Go and ask Tom.
Go and ask Tom.
Go and ask Tom.
Go and talk to Tom.
Go and talk to Tom.
Go and look for Tom.
Go and look for Tom.
Go and find Tom.
Go and find Tom.
Something must've happened to Tom.
Something must've happened to Tom.
I wonder why Tom wasn't at school today.
Why not ask Tom?
Why not ask Tom?
Why is it so popular?
I don't know how to ride a bicycle.
Hurry up, or you won't catch up with him.
Tom won't back down.
I wouldn't bet on it.
I'm just being polite.
Tom went back outside.
I was right behind Tom.
Is Tom doing OK?
The bird is in its nest.
The bird is in its nest.
If there was less sympathy in the world, there would be less trouble in the world.
I don't want to hear it, begone with you!
I fell into a hole.
Tom felt helpless.
She has very nice-looking handwriting.
Words are not created by academies. They are born together with thoughts.
We got dressed.
Tom can't let go of the past.
Be quiet for a moment.
Everyone is staring at Tom.
I've decided to forgive Tom.
I miss my boyfriend so much!
The others paid no attention to her warning.
They saw Tom.
What an oddball he is!
Do you know how to eat with chopsticks?
Do you know how to use chopsticks?
The wind is blowing and the fruit knows: It's time to fall down.
That country has natural resources.
That country has natural resources.
My roommate is so disgusting.
Tom is already getting dressed.
We have a very good chef.
Tom was sick, so he couldn't come.
Tom almost convinced me.
She almost convinced me.
He almost convinced me.
I forgot it was Tom who taught you how to play the guitar.
We eat rice.
You are victors!
I will play the guitar for you.
I will play the guitar for you.
Tom is skiing.
You can't have too much of a good thing.
I don't have a picture of Tom.
Do you want some chicken?
I saw my reflection in the window.
Learning a foreign language requires patience.
He always adds new information in his translations.
She always adds new information in her translations.
I suggest you hurry.
I suggest you hurry.
You and I will survive.
I don’t understand this poem.
Let's be honest!
Something terrible has happened to Tom.
Who is born to be hanged will never be drowned.
You're wasting your time trying to convince him.
You're wasting your time trying to convince him.
The criminal gave himself up to the police.
Did something happen to Tom?
Did something happen to Tom?
Has Tom received an invitation yet?
Tom walks to work.
He sometimes eats lunch there, too.
I appreciate everything you've done.
I appreciate everything you've done.
Tom found dragon eggs while spelunking.
It's time to work now. Let's get down to business.
Look at the picture which he painted.
I took him to the hospital.
Mastering a foreign language calls for patience.
Have you chosen a major yet?
I hope to become a singer.
That patient may die at any time.
It takes you an hour to go to the station on foot.
It takes you an hour to go to the station on foot.
There was not enough fuel.
He broke a window.
I broke the window.
He is looking forward to it.
If it had not been for his help, I would have failed.
Tom stayed up all night studying.
I've been thinking a lot about Tom lately.
Tom's office isn't where I thought it was.
We really missed you.
Do you prefer white rice or brown rice?
Do you prefer white rice or brown rice?
Do you prefer white rice or brown rice?
How much does an entrance ticket cost?
Such things as television and computers could not have been dreamed of fifty years ago.
Did you know that Tom doesn't have a driver's license?
Have you known Tom for a long time? "No, I've only just met him."
Have you known Tom for a long time? "No, I've only just met him."
I won't stoop to his level.
Their baby has just started to crawl.
My mother is indifferent to politics.
Would you explain it in more detail?
Would you explain it in more detail?
We only lack a few details to precisely reconstruct the crime scene.
They have got to abide by the rules.
She's a basket case.
Feel free to contact me.
Eleven o'clock is my regular time for going to bed.
I like taking care of animals very much.
The library is on the 4th floor.
Are you mad at me?
I never do anything crazy.
I don't have Tom's number.
I'm good at skiing.
If you see a suspicious person, please inform the police.
If you see a suspicious person, please inform the police.
If you see a suspicious person, please inform the police.
Tom has a solution for everything.
Perhaps the train has been delayed.
There were fifteen persons injured in the accident.
It was nearly noon.
Whaat.. It's already 11? I thought it was still 9'o clock.
I want to go to Australia one more time before my passport expires.
Do you recognize anyone?
Do you recognize anyone?
I don't want you to lose.
I don't want you to lose.
I don't want you to lose.
I don't want you to lose.
It seems that Tom only eats fruits and vegetables.
Please speak in a low voice.
I can't drive Tom to school today.
Your secretary seems to know the truth.
I'd rather die than surrender.
It's no use asking him for help.
It's no use asking him for help.
Tom has friends all over the world.
Please tell me why Tom was fired.
Please tell me why Tom was fired.
Tom never drinks alcohol.
Don't be so impatient.
Don't be so impatient.
Don't be so impatient.
Let me call my lawyer.
Just a minute.
They abandoned Tom on the island.
I'm easily influenced.
He's familiar with the city's mayor.
I'd like to eat.
I saw Tom at the bar last night.
Both types have advantages and disadvantages.
Short skirts are already out of fashion.
Tom had no children.
She has a double chin.
We're not terrorists.
I could not refuse.
What's Tom angry about?
She threatened to kill me.
She threatened to kill me.
I want to eat ice cream.
You should not judge a man by his appearance.
I don't want to be a nurse any more.
Could you all turn off the lights?
We admired the beautiful sunset.
Tokyo is surrounded by many satellite cities.
I'd like to rent a house.
I didn't get a chance to introduce myself to her.
Tom doesn't use drugs.
We have bigger things to worry about.
The coach's advice saved us.
I must apologize to Ann.
I don't want to let you go.
I don't want to let you go.
I want you to get started right away.
I want you to get started right away.
Tom clenched his teeth.
Do you know Tom's blood type?
Do you know Tom's blood type?
I am peeling apples.
Protect me!
Tom takes good care of the birds.
Don't get taken in by their advertising; I don't see how they can sell something like that for that price.
There was thunder and lightning last night.
Something's bothering Tom.
It seems to me the flag is correct.
I'm learning Chinese on my own.
Everybody just stared at Tom.
Come to my office any time.
Not a single person arrived late.
He left the water running.
He must have left the water running.
Tom's doctor advised him to stop drinking.
I helped him carry his desk.
How many pairs of shoes have you got?
He put the blame upon me.
It seems that his father is a lawyer.
Tom is a hopeless idiot.
Fortunately, no passengers were injured.
On his arrival in London, he sent me a telegram.
Tom has a sister who is a lawyer.
Is that expensive, so expensive or too expensive?
I broke her heart and made her cry.
My mother has sold everything that is dear to her.
Don't throw away this magazine.
Tom needs a good lawyer.
Tom thinks that his computer is possessed by an evil spirit.
I persuaded him to give himself up to the police.
Tell me the reason why Tom was fired.
He is not man to lose heart at a single failure.
They did not clap for us.
I am going to the post office.
Where's the airport?
Why don't you follow Tom's example?
They're traitors.
You have to hurry if you want to go with them.
Simone, please go and set the table.
I didn't want to scare Tom.
The pond is 3 meters deep.
Let's eat.
Whose sheep are these? "They are mine."
Bush is not a fascist.
I'm sure Tom will be late.
Your life is so perfect.
Tom and I were business partners.
One of Serbia's allies was Russia.
The interview began at 10 o'clock.
How often do you eat caviar?
Why do you want to see Tom?
My inbox is full.
You recognize Tom, don't you?
The rabbit hid behind the tree.
Do you know whose handwriting this is?
Do you know whose handwriting this is?
I'm very grateful for your support.
I'm very grateful for your support.
I hope we find Tom.
I'll ask Tom.
I think Tom is in love with you.
Tom has a wide range of interests.
Our hens laid a lot of eggs yesterday.
What came first? The egg or the hen?
We don't have a pool.
The best things in life are free.
It is dangerous for children to go out alone at night.
That was a good joke. Tell us another one.
There's only one egg left in the refrigerator.
It was me who killed Tom.
Tom, you look very sleepy.
Tom, you look very sleepy.
Tom looked very sleepy.
Tom's house was struck by lightning.
That was the last time I saw Tom.
When was the last time you saw Tom?
When was the last time you saw Tom wear a tie?
He is the boy who painted this picture.
Tom can't ski.
Tom is able to skate.
I miss Tom. I hope he comes back soon.
The taller a tree is, the harder it is to climb.
My office is on the fourth floor of that gray six-story building.
Why is Facebook so famous?
I must know the truth about Tom.
Tom swears he's telling us the truth.
Tom insists he's telling the truth.
Tom kept the truth from us.
It's embarrassing.
She has a distinct English accent.
Forgive me if I have offended you.
Tom bikes to work.
I want to be a goat.
He drove me home.
It's open.
Tom checked his mailbox.
I don't know where my French textbook is.
Have you talked to Tom about that?
Have you talked to Tom about that?
Tom's house burned down.
Tom looks very sleepy.
Don't you worry about Tom?
Bring me something to eat.
Bring me something to eat.
We crossed the frontier yesterday.
If I had known that you were sick, I could have visited you in the hospital.
I didn't know that you were sick, so I didn't visit you in the hospital.
If I had known about your illness, I could have visited you in the hospital.
Tom caught the ball with his right hand.
I want you to turn off the radio.
I want you to turn off the radio.
Have you missed me?
I've been trying to contact you all week.
Where did you take your shoes off?
Where did you take your shoes off?
Where did you take your shoes off?
You forgot to divide by X here.
I think Tom is too outspoken.
I made her my secretary.
Tom has big problems.
I love butterflies.
Tom made a fortune in oil.
Tom lost his colleagues' trust.
The troops refused to obey the command.
We jammed into the elevator.
She looked out of the window.
I will need some help.
The earth came into existence about five thousand million years ago.
Tom has more important things to worry about.
I'm very worried about my weight.
Water and oil are both liquids.
Father bought me a motorcycle.
Tom turned off the sprinkler.
Tom drove me home.
I think it's time you and Tom went home.
Would you mind leaving us alone for a minute?
Would you mind leaving us alone for a minute?
In art, as in love, instinct is good enough.
You must obey your parents.
You must obey your parents.
You must obey your parents.
Give him the benefit of the doubt.
I heard Tom's car drive up, but he hasn't come in yet.
I thought you missed your train.
Tom lowered the bucket into the well.
I've done crazier things than this.
I don't really care.
I forgot to turn off the lights.
We may have missed the bus.
He tied the dog to a tree.
He was too curious.
I thought you were a nurse.
Tom frightens me.
Tom's hair is always greasy and dirty.
A satellite was launched in Russia last year.
I'd like to have a glass of wine.
He may miss his train.
Einstein regarded himself a philosopher.
Hence, I shall have to stay here.
Tom is more experienced in business than me.
Ask Tom again.
She bowed deeply to me.
Where is the Mexican embassy?
I have plenty of money with me.
I must see Tom.
I must see Tom.
The news surprised us much.
Try not to be late for supper.
Do you know any good restaurants near here?
Is there a toilet near here?
Never have I seen such a beautiful sunset.
The sea was as smooth as glass.
The sea was as smooth as glass.
The first thing you have to do is take a bath.
The lake froze over.
I'm cold.
I'm cold.
I'd rather walk than wait for a bus.
I might be a few minutes late.
She plunged into the water.
Learning a new language is fun.
If you hurry up, you will be in time.
The current college works by presidential fiat.
You despise Nick, don't you?
Your accent is top notch!
We interrupt this program for an urgent message.
The economy is deeply connected to politics.
I can't see the road signs in this fog.
There are times when you need to fight for what's right, even at the risk of your own life.
Tom did it easily.
What do you think about Tom?
Tom's mother told him to turn the TV off and get on with his homework.
Trust your instincts.
Trust your instincts.
Call me after you talk to Tom.
Call me after you talk to Tom.
It's do or die now.
Tom might have missed the train. He hasn't arrived yet.
I tend to agree with Tom.
I don't know why Tom wasn't invited.
I have to put a stamp on the envelope.
I suspect that Tom doesn't do his homework by himself.
I can see Tom, but he can't see me.
Don't you think you're putting the cart before the horse?
If you tell your teacher you lost your homework, she won't believe you.
Do you think he will really give up?
It has been over three years since I moved here.
I'm sorry, Tom. "Why are you apologizing?" "I was just thinking that I might be bothering you." "No, you aren't bothering me at all."
I don't want to take care of a dog.
The two men accused each other.
As long as you're here, you'd better take a bath.
Flexibility is one of the many advantages of working from home.
I want a bath.
How many e-mails do you write every day?
Is the patient prepared for surgery?
I'm thinking of going to Paris.
The reason Tom is fat is because he eats too much and doesn't get enough exercise.
Tom has trouble reading.
Who was that girl you were with at the beach today?
She offered her seat to an old woman.
She offered her seat to an old woman.
She asked him to help her father clean the garage.
This fish is free from poison.
Tom often cries when he's drunk.
I was slightly surprised.
I am doing shopping at the market.
I can touch the sky with you.
They arrived at twilight.
We'll miss you.
I want the same guitar as John has.
Tom has three sisters.
What's the difference between a village and a city?
Never tell a lie.
It'd be a disaster.
I'm Tom's roommate.
No one's injured.
I'm on my break.
I don't give a damn about it.
I don't give a damn about it!
Where is the American embassy?
Please call before you come.
Please call before you come.
Please call me before you come.
Please call me before you come.
They lost again.
They lost again.
I have blue blood in my veins.
I know you think this is too expensive.
Tom wants to be popular at school.
If the universe is a cosmic egg, who laid it then?
The towels are dirty.
She knows nothing about the birds and the bees.
Light is no less necessary to plants than water.
Tom has no close friends.
What is philosophy?
My mother knows Tom's mother.
School bores me.
Tom, have you eaten yet?
We'd make a perfect team.
I've heard nothing but good things about Tom.
I have known Tom since I was a little boy.
Everyone smiled but Tom.
I hope you can avoid making all the stupid mistakes that I made.
Life is not perfect.
We're stuck.
We're winners.
We're partners.
We're bored.
Never give up.
It is love that rules the world.
Don't take off your shoes!
Tom's upstairs.
That's very dangerous.
Can you sit up?
It is this window that he broke.
Make a copy of this report.
Could you put those bags in the car for me?
He is a good athlete.
Did you make this doll by yourself?
They're 30 minutes behind schedule.
Tom has a new car.
Television and newspapers play complementary roles.
I can't stop thinking about Tom.
They live close by the airport.
Jason was caught in the rain and ruined his new suit.
It just doesn't count.
Jason was caught in the rain and ruined his new suit.
Without her advice, he would have failed.
How much money does Tom have?
Tom ruined my life.
I know he's still in love with you.
She put on dark glasses to protect her eyes from the sun.
You are not in a position to defend yourself.
Please sit still.
Tom ruined my life.
Now you've ruined it.
It'll ruin everything.
This river is very dangerous to swim in.
Did I ruin your plans?
You're going to ruin it.
You could've ruined everything.
You could've ruined everything.
Are you trying to ruin my life?
Are you trying to ruin my life?
Are you trying to ruin my life?
Are you trying to ruin my life?
You're going to ruin everything.
Tom and I often give each other presents.
That could literally ruin my life.
Is Tom trying to ruin our evening?
Is Tom trying to ruin our evening?
I won't allow you to ruin your life.
I won't allow you to ruin your life.
I won't allow you to ruin your life.
I won't allow you to ruin your life.
Now you've gone and ruined everything.
If you do that, you'll ruin everything.
If you do that, you'll ruin everything.
If you get sick, it'll ruin your vacation.
Something like this could ruin your career.
I hope nothing ruins our last day together.
If you did that, it would ruin our friendship.
We'll share.
I want a puppy.
Tom ruined our camping trip by forgetting to put the tent in the car.
Tom ruined his favorite shirt by washing it in water that was too hot.
Tom always says the best way to ruin a good cup of coffee is to put cream and sugar in it.
I should've followed Tom's advice.
No animals were harmed in the making of this film.
You can't hit Tom and expect him not to hit you back.
You are not old enough to go swimming by yourself.
Sally and I work in the same office.
There are no real Japanese in North America.
I would often take naps on Sundays.
Do you have the brains to realize it and the guts to act on it?
We've got a pool.
I think we should ask Tom where he wants to live.
The whole city is in panic.
I have more experience than Tom.
I'm going to be late for work.
I informed her of my arrival.
What time is good for you?
We're divorced.
I really missed you when you were in France.
I can't wait to get a copy.
I had difficulty in solving this problem.
I wanted sympathy.
Some people are difficult to please.
It rained five days on end.
I think that's why Tom doesn't have any friends.
He arrived by sea but left by air.
I can go there by foot.
It may be dangerous.
How was Tom murdered?
The cat is playing with the ball.
I weigh about 60 kilos.
Recently, there have been signs that the economy is picking up steam.
What's your favorite fruit?
What's your favorite fruit?
What's your favorite fruit?
My upstairs neighbors are very noisy.
My father doesn't let me drive.
The art of being wise is the art of knowing what to overlook.
Tom is tired of all your complaining.
The most important thing you can do now is to remain calm.
Don't forget your student ID.
My computer crashed.
This may be your last chance to see Tom.
They were prohibited from leaving the hotel.
This intersection is dangerous.
Hard work has brought him where he is.
I brush my teeth every morning.
Don't look at Tom. Look at me.
He was lucky and won the competition.
That's not true!
Tom seems surprised.
We've got to go warn Tom.
The clock has just struck three.
He made a sharp turn to the left.
He made a sharp turn to the left.
We could've saved Tom if we'd arrived just a few minutes earlier.
The doctors are still trying to save Tom.
Tom had no reason not to do it.
Let's not go over that again.
We'll save this piece of cake for Tom.
I was working late.
After eleven seconds they can cross the street.
They managed to save Tom.
We've got to save Tom.
I don't know whether Tom has a bicycle or not.
What have you done with Tom?
What do you like about Tom?
Why does everyone hate Tom?
She called him to say that she'd be late.
She called to tell him that she'd be late.
She called him to say that she'd be late.
Americans have lost their confidence in Toyota.
He was framed for murder.
He was framed by his wife.
I was framed.
I framed Tom.
We were framed.
I was nicely framed.
Tom was framed.
Tom told the police he had been framed.
He's not perfect, but I love him anyway.
You remind me of Tom.
You remind me of Tom.
His socks are purple.
This kitten wants to sleep.
Who is playing the guitar?
Do you have Tom's picture?
I would lodge a complaint.
I want to lodge a formal complaint.
Talk to my lawyer.
I've never been absent from school.
Give me another minute, OK?
This will take some time.
Don't translate this sentence.
Do you have Tom's address?
He tried to make both ends meet.
This is so pretty.
Let's put off the meeting until next Friday.
I have a fine contempt for him.
Watch Tom.
I wrote a letter to my teacher.
Why does the US government let people have guns?
I could just refuse to help Tom.
Bill can ride a bicycle.
Tom switched off his walkie-talkie.
I saw a flock of sheep.
Can you ride a bicycle?
He's never been in love before.
Tom and I helped each other.
It must have slipped my mind.
She has never visited him.
Keep your hands off my bicycle.
You'll get there in time, as long as you don't miss the train.
You'll get there in time, as long as you don't miss the train.
Don't forget to turn off the gas before you leave the house.
Don't forget to turn off the gas before you leave the house.
How long will you be staying?
How long will you be staying?
Robert has not yet been late for a meeting.
I am going to the swimming pool.
I am going to the swimming pool.
I'll be late for school!
Stop Tom.
Tom is now the proud father of a healthy baby girl.
Tom is in excellent health.
Tom is always blaming things on me.
I'll blame it all on Tom.
I blame Tom for all of this.
I could sure use your help.
Tom has two brothers.
Tom has two computers.
Tom has only one squirrel.
Thank God, the worst is behind us.
Tom doesn't have very many friends.
Tom missed the last train and spent the night at an Internet cafe.
Tom has a headache.
Tom woke up with a headache.
Tom woke up with a terrible headache.
Ask Tom to help you.
Can we call Tom now?
Can you contact Tom?
Cherish this moment.
Cops are everywhere.
Did you speak to Tom?
Didn't you hear Tom?
Do you like walking?
Do you remember Tom?
Does Tom have a car?
I'm mean.
Don't call Tom that.
Don't get emotional.
Don't interrupt Tom.
Don't throw it out.
Don't use that word.
Everyone loves Tom.
Get Tom's attention.
Get dressed.
Go jump in the lake.
Have you called Tom?
I always take notes.
I asked Tom to come.
I've asked Tom to help.
I asked how Tom was.
I bought Tom a gift.
I came to apologize.
I came to thank you.
I can deal with Tom.
I can get you fired.
Be fair.
Be fair.
Be fair.
I can take Tom home.
I can't eat chicken.
Back off.
I can't look at Tom.
I can't talk to Tom.
I could go with Tom.
I want to walk.
I want to walk.
I'll leave that to you.
I'll leave that to you.
You ruined my birthday party.
You ruined my birthday party.
Turn in your homework.
Turn in your homework.
Turn in your homework.
Time has no end. It's endless.
Tom will protect you.
Not everyone agrees with you.
Tom's kids have got lots more toys than he had when he was young.
He walked before me.
I like to dress this way.
I like to dress this way.
At the crossroads, turn left.
They are jealous of us.
I can't talk to you here. It's too dangerous.
I could talk to Tom.
I couldn't find Tom.
I couldn't save Tom.
I couldn't spot Tom.
I decorated my room.
I did that on purpose.
I didn't attack Tom.
I didn't invite Tom.
I didn't lie to you.
I don't agree with Tom.
I don't mind at all.
I feel kind of sick.
I feel like walking.
I found Tom's diary.
I gave Tom a choice.
I had a bad feeling.
I had to arrest Tom.
I had to let Tom go.
I have a headache today.
The temperature of the oil went up to 165 degrees Celsius.
I have work for Tom.
I haven't asked Tom.
I didn't have lunch.
I heard Tom's voice.
I hid behind the tree.
I hope I don't lose.
I hope I'm not late.
I hope you find Tom.
I hope you find Tom.
I've come to pick up Tom.
I've come to pick up Tom.
I know that you love Tom.
I know you're a spy.
I like taking walks.
I just wanted to calm Tom down.
I just wanted to calm Tom down.
I see Tom every day.
I still respect Tom.
I stole it from Tom.
I think this is fair.
She looked around.
She looked all around.
I was taking a bath.
I was taking a bath.
Excuse me a moment.
I won't pay for Tom.
I won't tolerate this.
I'd better warn Tom.
I'd like a city map.
I miss Paris so much.
I miss summer!
Tom likes skiing, too.
Are you sick?
I'll go and see if Tom is OK.
You don't look too surprised.
You didn't look surprised.
I did everything I could to save Tom.
They ruined my life.
He sat in front of me.
I don't care for wine.
I don't care for wine.
Have you finished dressing?
Tom just moved into a new apartment.
I couldn't kill Tom.
I came here with Tom.
I would like to see Tom.
I'll be responsible.
I'll drive Tom home.
He built the doghouse himself.
You're worried about Tom, aren't you?
Tom plans to buy a new motorcycle.
Tom needs a new pair of shoes.
I'll check upstairs.
Tom climbed into his truck.
Tom has good eyes.
Tom's eyesight isn't as good as it used to be.
I think I can help you find Tom.
I think I can help you find Tom.
I was kicked out of school.
Tom tried to keep calm.
I'll be with Tom.
I'll take it inside.
I'll take it to Tom.
I'm Tom's counselor.
I'm making pancakes.
I'm not the least bit tired.
I'm not apologizing.
He was staring at her.
She wakes him up every day at 6:30.
How many different schools have you attended?
Have you heard from him?
Have you heard from her?
Have you heard from him?
Have you heard from her?
I found it in the attic.
I found it in the attic.
I found it in the attic.
Tom died when he was seventy years old.
Tom died in his seventies.
I saw Tom naked.
Tom died of a heart attack.
Life is a circus.
The doll lay on the floor.
The doll lay on the floor.
Isn't it incredible?
It looks suspicious.
Do you miss Tom?
Does Tom have any medical problems?
Just stay objective.
The light went out by itself.
They left very early in the morning.
Tom sounded slightly panicked.
I'm in the attic.
I don't believe in magic.
I recorded the interview.
I was eating dinner then.
I was eating dinner then.
She has a bike.
What's your destination?
Which CD do you want to listen to?
Which CD do you want to listen to?
You thought I was talking about Tom, didn't you?
You thought I was talking about Tom, didn't you?
Nothing disturbs her.
There are five tragedies in a man's life. Unfortunately, I don't know which ones they are.
My notebook is pink.
Open your notebooks.
Please don't be mad.
He never brushes his teeth.
Roll the ball to me.
I'm calling to thank you.
I'm calling to thank you.
She painted a wall.
Everyone but Tom was at the meeting.
The plane made a forced landing.
Her words were completely meaningless.
What would you want to eat?
Tom has a daughter who is a musician.
This is my new guitar.
This is a new approach.
I've got a brand new bike.
Do you like my new shoes?
I've turned over a new leaf.
I need a pair of new shoes.
Have you read Tom Jackson's new book?
I bought a new chair for my office.
I bought a new chair for my office.
We visited Corfu.
The situation is hopeless.
The situation is hopeless.
Should I let Tom go?
Should we intervene?
Stop making excuses.
Ghosts are real for those who believe in them.
It's comfortable.
This is a snapshot of my wife on the beach.
That sounds amazing.
That was unpleasant.
The impending examination loomed large in her mind.
Are you Japanese?
How did you and Tom become acquainted?
How did you and Tom become acquainted?
Tell me a joke.
My glasses are on my nightstand.
We're always careful.
There's someone out there.
How did you and Tom become acquainted?
Tom killed himself three years ago.
I thought he'd apologize at least, but no.
We look forward to seeing you.
Tom was kept in hospital overnight for observation.
Why don't you ask Tom yourself?
You're disgusting.
You're disgusting.
The doctor informed his patient of the name of his disease.
Tom's not much of a cook, but at least he gives it a go.
I'm sure that he will take part in the contest.
Don't tell on me.
I don't find Tom particularly interesting to talk to.
Tom is at his office.
I meant it as a joke.
I meant it as a joke.
You can't count on Tom's help.
Do you want your money in coins?
He started washing his car.
He started washing his car.
I'd like to change my room.
I'd like to change my room.
I played trumpet in our high school band.
He left in the blink of an eye.
Do you want to come back to my office?
It's a miracle that he survived the accident.
No matter how hard you try, you can't finish it in a day.
Tom didn't eat lunch.
You're just wasting your time.
That was a complete waste of time.
Let's not waste time talking about Tom.
You've wasted enough of my time already.
We'll mail it to you.
They are in the way.
I have to buy a new battery for my car.
I can't give you that information.
We want to be fair.
Tom has this exact same coat.
Tom has this exact same coat.
It is an extremely expensive store.
A spark would be enough to burn a forest.
They looked around.
They look surprised.
Tom has something on his face.
It's a small noisy apartment, but it's where I live and I call it home.
It's a small noisy apartment, but it's where I live and I call it home.
I'm so in love!
They shared glances.
They should sue Tom.
It is impossible to put the plan into practice.
I didn't know you even knew Tom.
Miracles, in the sense of phenomena we cannot explain, surround us on every hand: life itself is the miracle of miracles.
He cut himself free with his knife.
Excuse me. Is the supermarket open?
Cats were sacred animals in ancient Egypt.
By noon he had finished his work.
Tom's father is not listed on his birth certificate.
The problems are inherent in this system.
I like butterflies.
How is it that you're always so full of energy?
You should've declined the invitation.
I didn't add this sentence.
The blue bicycle is new.
We've got to talk to Tom before he does something stupid.
We've got to find Tom before he does something stupid.
I hope you can avoid all the stupid mistakes that amateurs usually make.
We will exempt you from attending.
I don't want to do it because it's dangerous and it's stupid.
Tom has a bad heart.
It's Tom's group.
I got drunk last night and did something stupid.
Tom was caught in the rain and his new suit got ruined.
The police have taken Tom into custody.
The researchers have created kittens that can glow in the dark.
Friendship is magic.
I love buying on eBay.
She looks like a teacher.
She met him on the beach.
She met him on the beach.
She met him on the beach.
You shouldn't swim in that pool.
He admitted that he was guilty.
He pleaded guilty.
She persuaded him to marry her.
There are holes in the roof.
Smoke weed every day-themed remixes are very popular around the web.
He taught himself French.
You must show respect to your guests.
He took care of his mother after his father's death.
They'll be grateful.
A puppy followed me wagging its tail.
Let me think a minute.
Let me think a minute.
The capacity to produce novel utterances is an attribute of every natural language.
I wonder if I hurt Tom's feelings.
They're moving away.
I just can't work out what makes Tom tick.
My friend talks too much and she's driving me crazy.
Don't back down.
I was conscious that something was missing.
He bought an English book at a bookstore.
He bought an English book at a bookstore.
He bought an English book at a bookstore.
It seems that the rich part of humanity doesn't care much for the problems of the poor part.
Tom doesn't have much longer to live.
Tom doesn't have long to live.
We appreciate your hard work.
This is my I.D. card.
Tom had a rough childhood.
Tom's eyes were red from crying.
They hugged Tom.
I heard screams.
I surrender.
They're not bad.
They missed Tom.
They missed Tom.
They're in love.
Aren't you late?
Aren't you late?
Let's get it over with.
It's too low.
We'll bring Tom.
We'll catch Tom.
We've found Tom.
Are you bald?
Tom wasn't bald.
Tom is bald.
You'll love Tom.
You'll love Tom.
You'll miss Tom.
You'll miss Tom.
Take a break.
I won't lose!
Is that fair?
It's so rare.
He mentioned it.
She has a swimming pool.
He has a swimming pool.
I miss you so much.
I miss you and think of you so much.
I knew you'd find Tom.
The worst is still to come.
Tom didn't mention why he couldn't come.
Don't you think it's creepy?
This transparent liquid contains poison.
The fountain sends hot water to a height of 170 feet.
Get out of the car.
Ken drove Tom to the hospital.
I like the slow rhythm of that song.
Mom is washing the dog because he's dirty.
He made a mistake on purpose.
Please don't interrupt me.
It was difficult to convince him to cancel the trip.
Let's hurry.
It's instinct.
Tom's missing.
I'm a stranger in these parts.
The clinical records in most hospitals are kept in alphabetical order.
How often do you brush your teeth?
How often do you brush your teeth?
Will you go with Tom?
I miss my cat.
I miss my cat.
I'm a patient.
What's your lawyer's name?
I don't think that's fair.
May I call you Tom?
Don't be mean.
I missed my train.
Being poor is expensive.
I will miss Moldova.
Speech is silver, silence is gold.
I made a deal.
I made a deal.
Tom and I didn't speak to each other for three years.
I was hoping we could eat early tonight.
It has nothing to do with Tom.
You are incredibly naive!
You are incredibly naive!
Whose notebook is that?
Absolute truth does not exist.
She shot him with a pistol.
The fridge is empty.
Who took this picture?
Who took this picture?
The tourists visit the museum.
I appreciate your help.
I play a little guitar.
I'm not giving up.
This land is sacred to my people.
It seems to me we need to talk to Tom.
Tom was trying to control his anger.
I'm going shopping.
I'm comfortable here.
I'd suggest the following change.
Teenagers want to be independent of their parents.
I walk in the forest every day.
Little presents keep a friendship alive.
Tom taught his son how to ride a bicycle.
Tom taught his son how to ride a bicycle.
You were right about Tom.
You were right about Tom.
You were right about Tom.
Tom has more money than I do.
Why do you always take Tom's side?
Why do you always take Tom's side?
She plays the guitar very well.
Tom suggested that we surprise you.
Good girls go to heaven, bad girls go everywhere.
Bill Clinton denied the accusation.
Good girls go to heaven, bad girls go everywhere.
Call Tom.
Call Tom.
I didn't know Tom had a sister.
I didn't know that Tom had a brother.
That would be my guess.
I was surprised to see an old friend of mine there.
I was surprised to see an old friend of mine there.
I was surprised to see an old friend of mine there.
The failure in business left me penniless.
Everybody makes mistakes, don't they?
Instead of studying Italian, I'm wasting time on a bunch of nonsense.
She nearly fainted when she saw the blood.
Is this book boring?
Is the book boring?
Keep sight of the flag.
Ned held the flag erect.
The national flag of the USA is called the Stars and Stripes.
I'd like you to talk to Tom.
I'd like you to talk to Tom.
I'd like you to talk to Tom.
The cat caught the rats.
The cat caught the rats.
I came on foot.
Haters gonna hate.
He showed me the camera which he had bought the day before.
It's your turn to wash the dishes.
I study English every day.
Tom will make a good teacher.
Don't talk about Tom.
He found it impossible to go there on foot.
I'm not denouncing you.
She lives by her pen.
Tom doesn't have a driver's license.
Did I hurt his feelings?
Give me the microphone.
Tom doesn't have a cat.
The Battle of Gettysburg lasted three days.
The Battle of Gettysburg lasted three days.
Why don't you ask Tom?
Why don't you ask Tom?
Why don't you ask Tom to sit with us?
Why don't you ask Tom to sit with us?
I don't know. Why don't you ask Tom?
I don't know. Why don't you ask Tom?
Why don't you ask Tom yourself?
Why don't you ask Tom yourself?
Why don't you ask Tom yourself?
Why don't you ask Tom that?
Why don't you ask Tom to do it?
Why don't you ask Tom to do it?
Why don't you ask Tom that?
Why don't you ask Tom to do it?
Why don't you ask Tom to do it?
Why don't you ask Tom yourself?
Why don't you ask Tom yourself?
Why don't you ask Tom yourself?
Why don't you ask Tom that?
Why don't you ask Tom that?
Why don't you ask Tom to go with you?
Why don't you ask Tom to go with you?
Why don't you ask Tom to go with you?
Why don't you ask Tom to go with you?
In all probability, we'll arrive before them.
She could not bring herself to jump into the water.
I hate silent movies.
Fortunately, they escaped the danger.
I only look like Tom. I'm not Tom.
This skirt is a little too tight.
Do Japanese eat a lot of fish?
I want to eat some cheese.
When the Englishman heard this last question, he could not believe his ears.
Don't resist us.
She earns 30 dollars per day.
What a beautiful sunset.
He likes to sing in the bathtub.
We've run out of gas.
I sat next to Tom.
You forgot to mention that.
Which is your guitar?
You have already eaten.
You have already eaten.
He is out of the office.
My accent is probably strange.
A national flag is often considered a unique symbol, but many pairs or groups of countries have incredibly similar flags to each other.
Nepal is currently the only country with a non-rectangular national flag.
We're going to watch the game together in Tom's basement.
We have a freezer in the basement.
Is there a bank nearby here?
He was very specific about it.
What happens to babies who are born at sea?
She was blind, deaf, and dumb.
Tom crawled under barbed wire.
Can I finish talking even once, or do you want to keep interrupting me?
We'll have to come back.
Mr Turner bade farewell to his colleagues.
Mr Turner bade farewell to his colleagues.
I said that I didn't go shopping with her.
I said that I didn't go shopping with her.
I said that I didn't go shopping with her.
I said that I didn't go shopping with her.
As I told you before, Tom can't be trusted.
As I told you before, Tom can't be trusted.
Do you consume liquor?
It all seems pointless.
Tom is the one I saw.
George felt the train begin to move.
Almost every European country has abolished the death penalty.
The sea was white with foam.
The sea was white with foam.
Please do not think of a pink elephant right now.
What are you doing in my office?
They captured Tom.
I'm the one who has to do that if I can't convince someone else to do it.
I don't feel comfortable with that.
I can't remember ever being so bored.
How long does it take from here to your house on foot?
Tom can't be saved.
Tom told a joke.
The helmet will protect your head.
I'm responsible for everything.
I'm responsible for everything.
I got rid of all the books.
I got rid of all the books.
No one is perfect.
Shopping malls are popular among teenagers.
We must carry out this plan by all means.
Jump as high as you can.
The garage is at the side of the house.
The coach gave him some good advice.
In the end, the diligent person succeeds.
I read about the accident in the newspaper.
She borrowed the book from him many years ago and hasn't yet returned it.
Are humans mortal?
Get me a lawyer.
I have a prior engagement.
I have a prior engagement.
The cart was in the shed.
We've got to fill this hole with something.
Recently, I've been having trouble sleeping.
As far as I can tell, Tom's French is pretty good.
He has recently made remarkable progress in English.
Your patience irritates me.
He cannot appreciate friendship.
I beg your pardon. I didn't know this was your seat.
I'll never see Tom again.
I'm not living with Tom anymore.
I don't know Tom anymore.
This snake's venom is very potent.
This snake's venom is very potent.
This snake's venom is very potent.
I have to solve the problem myself.
I feel dizzy every time I get up.
Resentment is like drinking a poison and waiting for the other person to die.
I have made a resolution to keep a diary this year.
Tom said that he doesn't care what other people think of him.
I didn't send Tom anywhere.
He's quite formal when he meets a stranger.
That game is boring.
I can operate a crane.
Let me tell you about the origin of this school.
Be polite to our clients, then they will pay you.
I've decided to answer all questions publicly.
Both of Tom's sons died in the war.
Judging from his accent, he is from Kansai.
Sharapova's shots are very fast but...a fast ball means that it will come back that much faster.
I left my gloves in the library.
It's a miracle that you were able to survive.
With Esperanto you can communicate equally with people from other countries.
The clerk induced her to buy the dress.
That's how the pros do it.
Get in the van.
Love and hate are opposite emotions.
What did you talk to Tom about?
How about adding a touch of pepper?
His eyes shone with excitement.
I was kicked off the team.
Tom's trip lasted three months.
Contact the appropriate customer service helpline if the device does not operate properly.
Tom and I are just friends.
You must be careful in choosing your friends.
I'm sure that they will get angry.
The meat was very tender inside.
People were removing the snow on the street.
People were removing the snow on the street.
I used to work in a noisy room.
He helped me carry the chair.
I hope we survive.
I hope we survive.
Do you have any books to read?
Are you surprised to see me here?
This makes my blood boil.
It took Tom an hour to get to school.
Tom's eyes are open.
Turning to the left, you will find the post office.
We should always keep our promise.
Tom and I are newlyweds.
I asked Tom to wait for a few more minutes.
Ford won by one hundred-seventeen votes.
Dinner is probably ready, so we had better hurry home.
The street was full of advertisements.
I have no control over what happens.
There is evidence to the contrary.
I would be more careful if I were you.
He paid no attention to my warning.
The interview is in German and I can't understand a word of it.
What he said was not true.
Acids act on many things including metals.
He lost all of his money gambling.
We will be able to raise cows and sheep, too.
She felt something touch her hand.
He is rather hard to please.
Don't you move or I'll shoot.
The train for Cambridge leaves from Platform 5.
I met Tom three years ago.
What's your favorite fruit?
We could meet downtown. Would that be convenient for you?
Can you tell me what happened to Tom?
No, I'm not, replied the Englishman coldly.
I am looking forward to seeing you again soon.
I should've talked to Tom first.
All the houses were shaking and alarms were ringing everywhere.
When ice melts, it becomes water.
Something terrifying happened that day.
I supposed a ghost would appear.
I took my shoes off and put them under the bed.
We visited our father's grave.
I got home and the first thing I did was taking my shoes off.
I took my shoes off and threw them out the window.
I'll pay double.
The squirrel climbed the tree.
I'll take you to Tom.
I swear I didn't see Tom.
I swear I didn't see Tom.
We had the luck to win the battle.
He prefers the quiet.
I published one.
There couldn’t be a more ideal solution than that.
Don't look directly at Tom.
Do you have any idea who'd want to steal Tom's car?
I hesitate to ask Tom to help.
If you continue with the pointless arguments here...it'll end up as a repeat of yesterday.
It's almost impossible to read Tom's handwriting.
I broke his heart, but I love him.
I haven't seen Tom since his birthday.
Your sons are quite handsome.
Where's Tom's mother?
Tom's doing very well.
It is a nice initiative.
I'm only eighteen.
I didn't know Tom had a cat.
You're mad at Tom, aren't you?
At first, he seemed like the perfect guy.
The radio broadcast the news in detail.
I want to look like Tom.
His remarks had the opposite effect.
His remarks had the opposite effect.
Sometimes, life is difficult and painful.
Have you got your ID with you?
Have you got your ID with you?
When Mary told her parents that she wanted to marry Tom, they said that they wouldn't attend the wedding.
I don't want you to date Tom.
Are you dating Tom?
I thought you were dating Tom.
I'm not dating Tom.
She broke the window on purpose.
Tom's homesick.
Tom and I are getting married in May.
Would you mind if I record this conversation?
Would you mind if I record this conversation?
I remember the man's face but I can't call his name to mind.
There was no one on the beach.
I'm in love. His name is Tom.
Tom is in a foul mood today.
This is a hard language to learn.
It's the perfect number.
Be careful with him. He's a Don Juan.
I must work hard to pass the test.
It's hard to master English.
We can solve this problem easily.
Tone of voice can indicate anger and irony.
You are a beautiful butterfly.
Tom put the food on the table and told everyone to start eating.
Your father would have been very proud of you.
He bought a pair of black shoes yesterday.
Is that Tom's bedroom?
Tom has three tickets in his hand.
I like Elvis Presley. What singer do you like?
Tom had a back up plan in case something went wrong.
From the buyer's point of view, the prices of these CD players are too high.
We can't change history, but we can learn from it.
You're being very rude.
Do you want to go shopping?
You'd better get dressed.
You'll thank me later.
This is where the historic battle is said to have taken place.
The police think that Tom was stabbed before his throat was slit.
I need to get another lawyer.
You need to be more careful from now on.
The butterfly landed on the hand.
I couldn't sleep well because it was noisy outside.
I couldn't sleep well because it was noisy outside.
This drawer's stuck.
After the intersection, drive onto the highway.
How did Tom manage to do that?
Do you know what Tom's secret is?
Would you like to have a bath before going to bed?
A promise is a debt.
They don't despise you.
I assure you we're doing everything we can to find Tom.
I like classical music.
Tom, what's your problem?
Tom thought it was a stupid plan.
I'm a translator. I translate books.
I attended the meeting in place of him.
He tells us secrets.
You're a good listener.
What was the final score in today's game?
Nobody swims in this pool after 8:00 p.m.
All of the balls are yellow.
All of the balls are yellow.
There is no reason why he should resign.
Are you still seeing Tom?
Tom put on his backpack.
Some people shouldn't be allowed to drive.
I'm busy with homework.
Lord, I wonder what fool it was that first invented kissing.
We were looking at the ruins of the old fortress.
When it had stopped raining, he went for a walk.
Why don't you put some clothes on?
You look scared.
You look scared.
You'd better take Tom home.
It's a fruit.
The entire statement is in need of explanation.
I should cancel the trip to LA.
He reacted furiously.
It's too soon to think about marriage, we're still getting to know each other.
I have Tom's picture right here.
When hell is inside the soul, death is not fearsome.
I don't care what Tom says.
It doesn't hurt at all.
Animals can't distinguish between true and false.
Animals cannot distinguish right from wrong.
Be careful with Tom.
I wasn't fast enough.
How long does it take for light from the sun to reach the earth?
I want to sign the contracts.
It's pitch black outside.
I'm going to check upstairs.
They finished building the bridge on time.
He helped me to carry the bag.
We're all very proud of you.
You've asked me that three times already.
I suggested to my father that Kumiko study in China.
I suggested going for a walk.
She advised him of the date for the next meeting.
You can't leave Tom behind.
Have you hidden anything?
Tell me how to find Tom.
It's my duty to protect you from danger.
He suddenly fell ill.
Take it to a mechanic, and get it fixed.
Take it to a mechanic, and get it fixed.
Let us talk to Tom.
At last, we got rid of him.
If two past lovers can remain friends, it's either because they are still in love, or they never were.
I thought Tom liked riddles.
I want to talk frankly with him.
He took offense at his daughter's behavior.
What is your specialty?
All of us like Tom.
Tom helped his son get dressed.
We can make peaceful use of atomic energy.
She's the French ambassador to Portugal.
Nobody's taking a bath right now.
I think you'll be surprised.
Tom has a good job.
If Tom is the problem, maybe you should get rid of him.
If Tom is the problem, maybe you should get rid of him.
You can't stay for long.
I found an envelope for my letter.
John can't bear the noise.
Tom had no way of verifying the information.
I don't believe you! "I swear!"
Tom was sent to Coventry.
I really liked attending to that school. Every day, Gustavo would bring the guitar for us to play and sing during the break.
That's just not enough.
You look like a lawyer.
You look like a lawyer.
You broke your promise.
He was fed up with life in the city.
You're violating my civil rights.
The priest took the sick man's place.
Tom asked his girlfriend to pardon him for forgetting her birthday.
She wouldn't harm a fly.
You turned off the computer.
You turned off the computer.
You turned off the computer.
She switched off the computer.
Please fill up the bottle with water.
Please fill up the bottle with water.
I filled the pail with water.
Many teachers have a problem with Tom.
The pioneers have overcome a series of obstacles.
Tom doesn't have either a cat or a dog.
Many promises had been made.
Where was the princess?
I would not go skating today.
I would not go skating today.
She decided to keep a diary.
She decided to keep a diary.
The moon was completely hidden by a big black cloud.
We'll be late for dinner.
I don't think Tom has too many friends.
We rode a boat to the island.
This is suicide. We shouldn't be attempting to do this.
He solved the problem with ease.
What's the square root of 100?
Joking apart, you ought to see a doctor about your headache.
What was Tom's last name?
What was Tom's last name?
I'm not frightened.
I'm not helpless.
I'm not mad.
He went into the water before me.
No one succeeded to survive.
Tom certainly knew that what he was doing was illegal.
It is essential that every child have the same educational opportunities.
Wait a moment.
We must try to conserve our natural resources.
Let's not talk about Tom.
You're very wise.
You're very wise.
You're very wise.
What's Tom's dog's name?
You're wise.
You're too skinny.
You're Tom's friend.
You're the cook.
He's an Italian teacher.
I love Italian food.
That sounds incredible.
I think we should ask Tom why he left his last job.
Do you want us to take you back to your house?
No one has the right to control your life, tell you what to do, or tell you when to do it.
Don't hesitate to ask questions if you don't understand.
The dog came running to us.
The dog came running to us.
I can't play guitar very well.
You will be punished.
I enjoyed working with Tom in Berlin.
At this very moment, you're reading and translating this.
It's a short walk.
It was hot outside.
Is the window open?
Why were you fired?
We can normally conceal our thoughts from others.
Tom concealed the fact that he had been in prison.
Tom concealed the fact that he had been in prison.
What language do you usually use when talking with Tom?
I learn the language by myself.
He remained silent like a stone.
We don't live in a perfect world.
I didn't tell Tom about it because I didn't want to ruin his day.
Tom begged me to go with him.
He begged me to go with him.
She begged me to go with her.
They're not just roommates. They're also lovers.
They're not roommates. They're lovers.
You bet I'm angry.
You got very drunk.
We postponed the event.
We postponed the event.
I saw Tom. He was with another woman.
Please wash your hands after using the bathroom.
Where's my elephant?
Tom's friends laughed at him.
Tom and I go to the same high school.
You were late, weren't you?
We got drunk together.
We got drunk together.
Any night the sun can come out.
Many restaurants now have free Wi-Fi.
What time did you see Tom?
Time is of the essence.
Time is of the essence.
I'm not gullible.
The universe is a large school.
It's a necessary evil.
Are you mad at me?
It's my left eye that's bothering me.
Tom's a glass half full man.
Tom's a glass half full man.
Don't worry. We have plenty of water and food.
I feel at one with the universe.
Women are often judged by their looks.
I'm not much of a singer.
While he was studying, he fell asleep.
We pitched our tent under the shade of a large tree.
We pitched our tent on the bank of the river.
We pitched our tent in a field.
He claims to have been a business associate of my father.
When Tom looked at his watch, he was surprised to see how late it was.
Tom won the award for "Best Male Performance."
Just say "Bonjour!" and they'll think that you're French!
What a dump.
We have to call Tom.
I feel energetic and happy.
Go!
She fainted.
I hope Tom isn't angry.
I hope Tom isn't angry.
I hope Tom isn't angry.
I hope Tom isn't angry.
I hope Tom isn't angry.
I hope Tom isn't angry.
I hope Tom isn't angry.
I hope Tom isn't angry.
She admired herself in the mirror.
Would nine o'clock be convenient for Tom?
Tom likes classical music.
I counted to three and then plunged into the water.
The truth was that he was already in love.
You let Tom down.
Don't miss out on this opportunity.
The rumors were false.
Never make predictions, especially about the future.
Never make predictions, especially about the future.
He'll soon catch up with Tom.
His name has completely gone out of my mind.
You made Tom cry.
Tom climbed into the truck.
Tom makes a lot more money than I do.
Tom makes a lot more money than I do.
Tom makes a lot more money than I do.
Tom makes a lot more money than I do.
The children solved the problem for themselves.
I got a flat tire on my way home.
Tom is available.
Do you want to know why Tom isn't here today?
Are you a lawyer?
I don't think that country is dangerous. You can go there without fear.
You've got my helmet.
You've got to hide.
You can't fire me.
You can't fire me.
Who did you go to the beach with?
Who did you go to the beach with?
I'm bald.
Please don't leave me.
Please don't leave me.
Tom turned off the radio.
We have to assume the worst.
Don't cheat.
Get word to Tom.
Perhaps, it's the best word that describes my condition.
Tom is a bit naive.
The results were negative.
Tom has a couple of weird neighbors.
Do you want to eat now or not?
Tom tore a page out of his notebook.
Our office used to be on Park Street.
I'm still in love with him.
Tom may not be at home now.
Tom has already left the office.
Tom isn't a good person.
I'm beginning to understand why you don't like Tom.
When did America become independent of England?
When did America become independent of England?
Does it have too much salt?
I'll be in my office.
Tom and I haven't seen each other for a long time.
Please remain seated until the aircraft arrives at the gate.
I have a diploma.
Is there anything unusual about that?
Tom has just been told that he's been fired.
I found his office easily.
Tom's house has only one bedroom.
This is Tom's bedroom.
The bedrooms are upstairs.
Did you just call me Tom?
Did you just call me Tom?
Why can't vacation last forever?
I tried to find out how many people really live in this town.
The eagle is white.
Will you tell me the way to his house?
The animals were scared by the thunder.
He moved the desk to the right.
The snow melts in spring.
I was as surprised as you were.
You're boring me!
You're boring me!
You're boring me!
She has already left the office.
She has already left the office.
Are these all your belongings?
He finally became the president of IBM.
I'll lend you the book as soon as I'm done reading it.
You let me down with your refusal.
Tom had a happy childhood.
What were you dreaming about when I woke you?
Tom can't be stopped.
She has got over her illness.
When mother scolds you don't answer back.
Tom's main problem is he has no sense of humour.
He filed a complaint.
The game lasted too much.
It is the photo of my new house.
I think you're very talented.
I think you're very talented.
You traitor!
I found her letter in the mailbox.
I found her letter in the mailbox.
You have a way with women.
I'm all for it.
We are the pioneers of this new branch of science.
I have to fire Tom.
Tom is washing your car.
Do you want it to eat here, or take away? "Eat here please."
What were you just doing? "I was talking to Tom."
He caught the ball with his left hand.
He caught the ball with his left hand.
I'm off beer.
I want to kill Tom before he kills me.
We almost froze to death.
I want to come back.
Dwarves called Mithril 'the true silver.'
Tom didn't get hurt.
That looks suspicious to me.
I met Tom at a club.
The dove is a famous symbol for peace.
The wall had a crack in it.
How many people live in Australia?
Tell him to call me tomorrow at noon.
Tell him to call me tomorrow at noon.
I talked to Tom on the phone.
They will hide it.
Tom thinks that his life is boring.
That club is way too big.
I saw a mouse!
Do I have to insert coins first?
It goes without saying that Tom is in love with Kathy.
That's a crazy idea.
Do you know the boy in the picture?
Where is the center of the universe?
By the way, how many of you keep a diary?
By the way, how many of you keep diaries?
By the way, how many of you keep a diary?
People should do their best.
I'm younger than Tom.
The teacher reads the book.
Tom and I have to leave.
What do you think of her poem?
Mary earns a lot of money and has a glamorous lifestyle.
He cut the envelope open.
He is not wise but clever.
This is very important meeting. You ought not to miss it.
We should not lose patience.
Tom makes lots of promises he doesn't keep.
My friend doesn't use sugar.
Tom thinks that he's the center of the universe.
Do we have to do this every day?
Please take Tom with you.
Please take Tom with you.
Could you recommend a nice restaurant near here?
We'll miss you when you're not here.
I love this photo.
Tom has been waiting patiently in the lobby for three hours.
Tom learned how to ride a bicycle from his older brother.
There are some people who sleep in the daytime and work at night.
You're so attentive.
You're so attentive.
You're so attentive.
You're so attentive.
Tom plays the guitar very well.
A wise man would not say such a thing.
A wise man would not say such a thing.
She was hurt to find that nobody took any notice of her.
I hope it won't be long before I hear from her.
What have you done with Tom?
When was the last time you had a bath?
When was the last time you had a bath?
When was the last time you had a bath?
Tom was unable to hide his reaction.
He studies hard every day.
I ate some crisps.
Tom gave us permission to leave.
Our teacher is someone who likes precision, and always demands precise answers of her students.
I prefer to do it on my own.
I prefer to do it on my own.
Dwarves called Mithril 'the true silver.'
There are rumors in the air that he was fired.
There are rumors in the air that he was fired.
Is Mr Jones in the office?
Are you still having difficulty with physics?
Rumor says he resigned.
I consider Tom an idiot.
When I first got to New York, I was in a daze.
I plead you to tell me the truth.
Desperate men do desperate things.
A doctor's instruments must be kept absolutely clean.
I carried out Tom's instructions.
I dress lightly all the time.
She goes to the bookstore once a week.
She goes to the bookstore once a week.
They sell textbooks at the bookstore.
They sell textbooks at the bookstore.
Was I really boring?
Was I really boring?
All these movies are boring.
I was bored because I had seen the movie before.
I was bored because I had seen the movie before.
The toy store is closed.
I forgave Tom.
He has good chances of being chosen.
The president was visiting France that month.
The president was visiting France that month.
If Tom had money, he wouldn't be here.
Give him back the ball!
Give him back the ball!
Give him back the ball!
Are you one of Tom's relatives?
He begged me to stay.
He hurried so as to be in time for the train.
I miss my elementary school teachers.
Something terrible happened to Tom.
Tom is in love with another woman.
Tom is a talented writer.
Modern technology has made our lives more comfortable.
There are plenty of fish in this river.
It's so expensive!
The trees have begun to bud.
I finally bought the toy.
Tom was unable to conceal his surprise.
Tom is angry with us.
Information is given in English at every airport.
When do you want to meet Tom?
She screamed with terror.
She screamed with terror.
This plane flies nonstop to Tokyo.
I'll take it inside.
I'll take it inside.
I'll take it inside.
Here's Japan's flag.
This is the flag of Japan.
Who took part in the contest?
What a hype!
Don't mess around!
Don't mess around!
I was caught in a traffic jam.
Tom is stuck in traffic.
Tom got caught in a traffic jam.
No matter.
Are you Chinese, sir?
Don't let your emotions rule you. Be calm!
Tom's hands were dirty.
There are a lot of people who want to talk to Tom.
We have to assume the worst.
He shook hands with the famous singer.
Is that Tom's MP3 player?
Read instructions before use.
The product should be used according to the instructions for use.
Store in a cool and dry place.
Tom dozed off sitting in the sun on his front porch.
It seems to me that I heard a noise in the attic.
Tom was guilty.
Many foreigners also come to Japan to learn Japanese.
We are heading North.
Do not make any sudden or violent movements.
She's always grumbling.
Did you like the bicycle?
The nurse can tell you how to do it.
The bus was totally full.
I didn't pull the trigger.
You are the man behind the curtain.
As far as I know, the rumor is not true.
I'm not strong enough to do that.
My shoes are old, but his are new.
She's a nice and intelligent person.
I don't care what he says.
I was very much surprised at the news.
No ambiguities are allowed in a contract.
Who do you think will win the gold medal?
I like eating.
Tom just missed the train.
The book consists of thirty chapters.
Tom nodded nervously.
My father's already been to space.
The dog kept me from approaching his house.
The dog kept me from approaching his house.
They missed the last train.
Children filled the room.
No need to apologize; I understand.
Speak the truth, even if your voice shakes.
I was at the library.
He ran out of the room in anger.
I'm sorry to interrupt you.
I love sunsets.
Father, why are you putting on clean clothes? "Because I'm going to church."
He doesn't know even the proper way of greeting people.
Are you recording us right now?
I am as happy as a cat in pajamas.
I'm sorry, I didn't mean to offend you.
Did you and Tom have a fight?
All human beings have brains, except Tom.
Will you take the red pill or the blue pill? "I think I'll just go home."
No one ever notices second place. Either you're a winner or you're nobody.
She was too proud to ask him for help.
We're not giving up.
She was too proud to ask him for help.
Ask Tom to come tomorrow.
Ask Tom to come tomorrow.
The main purpose of propaganda is to convince no matter what.
The player attacked the referee.
You should've listened to Tom.
Tom earns a lot of money.
What's in the envelope?
What are Tom's chances?
Tom has no answer.
Tom has dark hair.
Tom has got a problem.
Tom had to resign.
Tom had a problem.
Was that an invitation?
Tom was wearing gloves.
Tom was very attentive.
Tom swallowed the pill.
He forgot his promise to go there.
The risks are too great.
Tom went to buy another pair of shoes.
Tom just had a stroke.
Tom just had a stroke.
Don't give up now.
Don't give up now.
We ran out of gas in the middle of the desert.
You're a very curious guy, aren't you?
Make way, please.
Clever ideas often chase me, but I'm faster!
A good education doesn't imply a good upbringing.
I'm not interfering.
I won't interfere.
She hit the ball hard.
She hit the ball hard.
We can't get close to the enemy.
We can't get close to the enemy.
The soul is immortal.
Tom drove me to the airport.
Tom asked me to meet him at the airport.
Tom asked me to meet him at the airport.
Tom asked me to meet him at the airport.
Tom asked me to meet him at the airport.
Here the copyright comes into play.
You have to work hard.
Please take care of yourself.
I couldn't stop myself from laughing.
Your shoes are wet. Put them near the fire.
This bookcase is easy to assemble.
They set the time and place of the wedding.
The match didn't take place.
He's eleven years old.
I'm short.
Yesterday I saw a man crying bitterly.
My answer is final.
It's easy for my sister and me to go shopping together, seeing as how we're both "winters."
Tom drank three glasses of wine.
If you listen, you can hear her breath.
Tom was fired from his job.
You lost your chance.
You lost your chance.
He was elected mayor.
He was elected mayor.
Tom is indisposed at the moment.
Tom is taking a nap.
It's not good.
I made a few modifications.
The noise startled Tom.
We both knew the risks.
He is eighteen weeks old.
The army has lost control over the international airport.
You're a dead man.
Tom noticed a big difference in power between his old four-cylinder car and his new six-cylinder one.
Tom's death was an accident. "Are you sure?"
Get me something to eat.
Get me something to eat.
Study will do you good.
I'm getting along with my mother-in-law very well.
Tom's death was an accident.
It is a black hole.
If you read ten pages every day, by the end of the year you'll have read eighteen books of two hundred pages each. How would those books change your life?
The last time I spoke to Tom was last Monday.
I can't remember the last time I spoke to Tom.
Tom started to speak, but then decided to remain silent.
He has a perfect body.
I don't owe you an explanation.
I don't really care where Tom has been.
I'm sure Tom will get through it.
We moved last year.
Russia is the largest country in the world.
Russia is the largest country in the world.
He is a teacher of English.
I really miss her.
What do we know about Tom?
Tom can make himself understood in French.
I must have expressed myself badly.
Tom Jr. is Tom's only son.
He writes in his diary every day.
We heard gunfire.
We love puzzles.
Nope, not at all.
Make yourselves comfortable.
Tom is very popular.
I don't care anymore.
It's dangerous to play in the street!
Don't make me lose my patience.
Don't make me lose my patience.
Film is one of the three universal languages, the other two: mathematics and music.
There are almost seven billion people in the world.
This plan, while looking great on paper, turned out to be a disaster.
We are not equipped to handle it.
How many stamps do you have in your collection?
I got this CD player for free.
Doctors removed the bullet.
Students have access to the library.
He is studying agriculture.
Tom is a very good dancer.
You have to overcome the difficulties.
I'd like to see Tom at 2:30.
I don't envy her.
Tom wasn't invited.
I think it's around here.
I didn't get fired.
Tom pushed his nose against the window.
I'm going to visit Tom in the hospital.
Tom must've had his reasons.
She has him under her thumb.
She has him under her thumb.
Tom said he wasn't surprised.
Tom said he wanted to call his lawyer.
Tom said he had a lot of money.
Tom said he was going to take a bath.
The kid is a pain in the neck.
What's Tom up to?
Tom has his own room.
Tom has his own room.
Do you have a moment?
Do you have a moment?
Do you have a moment?
I miss you a lot.
Dogs can't distinguish colors.
There is an urgent message for you.
There is an urgent message for you.
I'm not an expert in this field.
Ice melts in the sun.
I came in through the window.
I didn't give up.
I didn't mean to wake you.
I didn't mean to wake you.
Each of us has to be careful when driving.
I wonder if exchange students can join this club.
Tom must've had an alternate plan.
Tom has never swum in our pool.
They are well looked after.
We returned to Osaka on April 2.
OK, I'm convinced.
I suggested that the plan be postponed.
Good hunting.
Tom began to miss Mary half-way, and turned back.
Tom's father never came back home before nine or ten.
Tom's father was never around.
I can't believe that Tom has children.
I can't believe we've finally finished the project.
I can't believe your parents let you come here by yourself.
I can't believe your parents let you come here by yourself.
I can't believe your parents let you come here by yourself.
I can't believe your parents let you come here by yourself.
My sister has very good handwriting.
I can't do this alone.
I can't believe I finally found Tom.
I can't ask Tom for that.
I didn't ask Tom to wait for me.
I know where you can find Tom.
I know where you can find Tom.
I know where you can find Tom.
I know where you can hide.
I know where you can hide.
Tom lives a few blocks from here.
I know why Tom was arrested.
I know why Tom was fired.
I know why Tom was killed.
I know you can't stop Tom.
I know you can't stop Tom.
I know you can't stop Tom.
I know you can't stop Tom.
I know you didn't mean to hurt Tom.
I know you didn't mean to hurt Tom.
Tom pressed his nose against the glass.
They won't find Tom there.
I know you hate funerals.
I know you hate funerals.
I apologize. It was my mistake.
I wonder why the train is late.
Where do you keep your textbooks?
Where do you keep your textbooks?
We'll look for it.
We'll look for it.
We'll look for it.
Tom's face is dirty.
I'm never going to talk to Tom again.
The bike's mine.
Why do women want to sleep in a man's embrace?
I don't even want to talk to Tom.
Tom refused to sign the contract.
Tom is about the same age as I am.
Don't worry about Tom.
Don't speak to Tom.
Don't speak to Tom.
Don't worry about Tom.
Do you understand Tom?
Do you understand Tom?
Do you remember Tom?
Did you love Tom?
Did you love Tom?
Did you meet Tom?
Did you meet Tom?
Can you contact Tom?
Can you bring Tom?
Can you bring Tom?
I always go to the beach.
Can I bring Tom?
Can I bring Tom?
Tom is not in.
Tom greeted everyone.
Tom has the information you need.
Tom has the information you need.
Tom has brown hair and blue eyes.
There are only 28 days in February.
Have you found Tom?
Have you found Tom?
His name isn't Tom.
I barely knew Tom.
I call him Tom.
I called him Tom.
I called Tom's sister.
I've come for Tom.
I came with Tom.
I dialed Tom's number.
I didn't ask Tom.
I didn't find Tom.
I don't see Tom.
I don't understand Tom.
I don't understand Tom.
I don't hate Tom.
I followed Tom there.
I heard about Tom.
I've just seen Tom.
I know about Tom.
I listened to Tom.
I live with Tom.
I look like Tom.
I looked at Tom.
I must find Tom.
I've got to find Tom.
I need Tom's signature.
I never met Tom.
I started dating Tom.
I've talked to Tom.
I started dating Tom.
I was with Tom.
I was watching Tom.
I work for Tom.
I work with Tom.
I'm going to work with Tom.
It worked for Tom.
I'll dance with Tom.
I'll need Tom's help.
I'm not going to wait for Tom.
I'm here with Tom.
I'm responsible for Tom.
I'm talking about Tom.
I'm taking it to Tom.
I'm Tom's older brother.
I have Tom's keys.
I've never understood Tom.
Isn't his name Tom?
They stared at Tom.
They're staring at Tom.
They're talking to Tom.
This is from Tom.
When was the last time you saw Tom alive?
When was the last time you saw Tom alive?
I accepted his invitation.
I accepted her invitation.
Tom is mad at us.
Tom is mad at me.
I'm sure Tom is mad at me.
Tom is mad about you.
Tom is mad about you.
She is mad at you.
She is mad at you.
The worst has happened.
Tom loves going to the beach.
Tom isn't here. "Then where is he?"
Do you happen to know Tom?
Do you happen to know Tom?
Did you happen to see Tom?
Did you happen to see Tom?
Let's go and say hello.
Let's go and say hello.
Let's forget about Tom.
Tom and his friends sat on the beach and watched the boys swimming.
I'll go talk to Tom.
I'll go and ask Tom.
I'll do it for free.
I'm not denouncing you.
Can you protect us?
Can you protect us?
You're too naive.
You're too naive.
You're too naive.
You've got to hide.
You've got to hide.
My religion is better than yours.
My religion is better than yours.
Ask Tom if you don't believe me.
I have a slight headache.
The problem was we didn't have enough time.
We're Tom's family.
Everyone but Tom ate fish.
Tom was stabbed.
Let's give Tom some room.
I swear what I told you is true.
He hid his toys under the bed.
They have eaten.
They have eaten caviar.
We'll pray for you.
Handmade goods are very expensive nowadays.
Handmade goods are very expensive nowadays.
Why do you keep calling me Tom?
Tom isn't afraid of snakes at all.
I must refuse.
I asked Tom where he had been.
It would've been better if you'd stayed with Tom.
Everybody knew Tom was a negro, though he tried his best to conceal it.
Intonation is very important. It can completely change the meaning.
How do you know it was Tom who broke the window?
How do you know it was Tom who broke the window?
How do you know it was Tom who broke the window?
All my friends have bicycles.
Tom checked the equipment.
Tom doesn't care what other people think.
We went shopping.
Tom made rice.
I don't have money to buy a new bicycle.
Why is this so expensive?
Tom and I work at the same company.
Tom and I were very busy last week.
Tom and I often eat lunch together.
Tom and I often eat lunch together.
We searched everywhere.
I can't make any promises.
Do you have any film for this camera?
Is it true what they're saying about Tom?
I think you'll be pleasantly surprised.
I think you'll be pleasantly surprised.
I think you'll be pleasantly surprised.
He was pleasantly surprised.
You are adorable.
He ruined my life.
They carried the injured player away on a stretcher.
Emily was surprised.
One should keep one's promise.
I have worst job in the world.
Be careful when you cross the street.
Be careful when you cross the street.
Nobody has the right to control us.
Tom put on rubber gloves.
You can ski on that hill.
You said the same thing about Tom.
You said the same thing about Tom.
Tom knows it's useless.
Where's there a supermarket around here?
I looked out the window.
Unfortunately, I broke my leg, so I can't go skiing with you this weekend.
Tom glanced at his watch, and frowned.
He says that if he were a bird he would fly to me.
It is said that Japan is the greatest economic power in the world.
Where's there a supermarket around here?
I'll go see if Tom is OK.
Mom, Tom won't share with me!
Tom was nowhere to be found.
Tom was nowhere in sight.
He did not resist.
She did not resist.
They did not resist.
I did not resist.
I did not resist.
Tom did not resist.
Mom, Tom won't share with me!
I forgot to turn off the television before going to sleep.
This ends here.
She laid the table for six.
I'm not that desperate.
We broke up.
My ears are ringing.
Tell our enemies that they may take our lives, but they'll never take our freedom!
I have to go ask Tom.
I have to go ask Tom.
I'll take Tom with me, OK?
Tom unzipped his pants.
I can't translate this contract. It's in Italian.
Tom was late for school.
Don't draw unwanted attention to yourself.
Did you see Tom today?
Did you see Tom today?
Tom waited patiently for three hours.
I'm meeting Tom next Monday.
Tom took a book off the shelf and handed it to Mary.
Tell me everything you know about Tom.
Tell me everything you know about Tom.
We got up at dawn to avoid a traffic jam.
I love the food here.
Tom showed up 30 minutes late.
Our stay in London was too short.
Tom turned into a parking lot.
Tom is a patient of mine.
I have many coins in this box.
I weigh 70 kilos, give or take a few kilos.
I weigh 70 kilos, give or take a few kilos.
Are you really a princess?
I did not see her much.
I want to become a singer.
Let's hope for the best but expect the worst.
I wish I were what I was when I wished I were what I am.
What's wrong with Tom?
Tom was angry at himself.
Tom works for an Italian company.
By the way, I saw Tom last night.
I will not give up!
I must've missed something.
We must have missed something.
It all comes down to a question of time.
It all comes down to a question of money.
We've got to conserve water.
I've been searching for my puppy for weeks.
I'm jealous of you.
I envy you.
I'm jealous of you.
I envy you.
Don't get ahead of yourself.
Do you think there's a hell?
Tom worries too much.
I ran out of the house.
She is making a mountain out of a molehill.
She is very talented.
The Soviet Union launched Sputnik I in 1957.
It's cold out there.
Nothing scares me.
I'm calling my lawyer.
There is a lot to do.
Should Scotland be an independent country?
We'll all miss you when you leave.
We'll all miss you when you leave.
I'm responsible for Tom's safety.
I'm responsible for Tom's safety.
Do you have Tom's phone number?
Do you have Tom's phone number?
Do you have Tom's phone number?
Do you have Tom's phone number?
I'll give you Tom's address.
I'll give you Tom's address.
By the way, the joke really was not funny. "Thanks for rubbing it in."
Was there an investigation?
How did the interview go?
Tom asked me to pass him the salt and pepper.
Tom asked me to throw him the ball.
That's nothing to be sorry for.
I asked Tom why he never remarried.
You talk about Tom too much.
You talk about Tom too much.
Tom was late for the bus.
He's going to work by bicycle.
Tom used to have a sports car.
Would you like to walk to the station with me?
Why don't you walk to the station with us?
Tom will probably be late for dinner.
I have moral standards.
I'm so glad you got rid of him. "Me too."
Tom's mother died when he was young.
Have they found Tom yet?
Do you have a pass?
We'll finish later.
We'll finish later.
Have you finished eating?
Have you eaten yet?
Tom is hardly ever at home.
Tom ran out of the classroom.
Why do women speak in riddles but expect clear answers?
A stranger came up to me and asked the way.
I never knew about Tom.
We saw the tower in the distance.
My mother is a psychology teacher.
We're looking for Tom now.
We visited the museum last week.
Tom bought an expensive guitar.
I'm not in love with you.
I'm not in love with you.
I'm not in love with Tom.
I'm not the least surprised.
I'm late again, aren't I?
I'm going to the airport.
Tom didn't have the time.
Tom didn't mention it.
Tom didn't stay long.
Tom doesn't have any kids.
Tom is a spy.
Tom is a teenager.
Tom is a terrorist.
Consider this a warning, Tom.
Consider this a warning, Tom.
We know so little about Tom.
Tom will need a good lawyer.
Tom was hit by a truck.
I'll set the table.
Tom ran out of the house.
Russia is the homeland of the elephants.
Does Tom have your phone number?
Does Tom have your phone number?
The elephant's skin is very tough.
She loves listening to classical music.
She enjoys listening to classical music.
Life without love is meaningless.
I didn't even realize Tom had a sister.
Half of the world’s population lives in cities.
I'm not tall.
Tom has big eyes.
My favorite team lost yesterday.
She does not understand modern technology.
Tom probably needs to work next weekend.
Tom's computer made a strange noise and then went dead.
Do you know Tom Jackson?
Does Tom believe in magic?
Iceland has an area of about 103,000 square kilometres.
I almost drowned.
Is there a picture of Tom in that album?
Tom has been murdered.
I'm saving this seat for Tom.
I've told you not to call me Tom.
I've told you not to call me Tom.
She was convinced that Pierre knew more than he wanted to confess.
Tom's death came as a surprise.
She's going through a midlife crisis.
He's going through a mid-life crisis.
Are you angry at me? "How could anyone ever be angry at you?"
So don't hesitate.
So don't hesitate.
Tom's diet is deficient in protein.
I'm no longer working for Tom.
Tom isn't my patient.
Tom isn't afraid.
That store sells newspapers and magazines.
I think something terrible has happened to Tom.
Let's just get it done.
I think it's very dangerous.
I think it's Tom's motorcycle.
I think I've persuaded Tom to help us.
Good riddance!
The landscape is unfamiliar to me.
Tom and I have a lot in common.
Are you really a princess?
I appreciate your trust in my abilities, but I'm afraid I'm no longer that good.
I taught him to ride a bicycle.
I taught her to ride a bicycle.
Does Tom have any brothers?
Did you know Tom had a twin brother?
It's Tom's turn to deal the cards.
I see you've got your appetite back.
The world does not revolve around you.
How did you persuade Tom to come?
Few Japanese can use English well.
I miss my little sister.
Tom didn't break any rules.
Tom didn't have a girlfriend.
Tom doesn't have a brother.
Tom doesn't have a family.
Tom doesn't have much choice.
Tom doesn't have that problem.
Tom doesn't share his food.
What's in the basket?
Don't mind Tom.
Don't pay attention to Tom.
Don't mind Tom. He's a little retarded.
They don't respect Tom.
They won't find Tom.
They won't hurt us.
They won't hurt you.
They won't hurt you.
Tom didn't commit suicide.
I have post-traumatic stress disorder.
What were you dreaming about when I woke you?
I admit that he is right.
Say hello to your friends.
She took my hint and smiled.
The weather is becoming cooler.
He jumped into water without removing his clothes.
He jumped into water without removing his clothes.
I still can't believe you invited Tom.
I think you should ask Tom.
If I'd known you were sick, I would have visited you at the hospital.
We're Tom's parents.
I'm the one who rescued Tom.
Tom wanted to surprise Mary.
Tom is chopping firewood.
Do you think Tom killed himself?
Do you think Tom killed himself?
Tom's new wife is younger than his daughter from his first marriage.
I turned on the lights.
I turned on the lights.
He was re-elected mayor.
I drink it, because it's liquid. If it was solid, I would eat it.
I hope Tom doesn't get sick.
It's Tom's dream to live in the mountains.
If you don't want to do it for Tom, then do it for me.
If you don't want to do it for Tom, then do it for me.
I thought you didn't know Tom.
I thought you didn't know Tom.
I thought you didn't know Tom.
I thought you didn't know Tom.
Nobody's blaming you.
Nobody's blaming you.
Do you play the guitar?
Do you play the guitar?
I play the guitar.
This guitar belongs to Tom.
I thought I'd never see Tom again.
That will do.
The project is underway.
The project is underway.
Are you Tom's lawyer?
They were going to kill Tom.
I'm the one who rescued Tom.
I hope you're not mad at me.
They tried to walk past Tom.
An assertion isn't a proof.
I think we'd better talk to Tom.
I was in Australia with Tom.
Where did you meet Tom?
Where did you meet Tom?
Where did you meet Tom?
Where did you meet Tom?
Don't try my patience.
Don't try my patience.
Tom is out of town.
They were trying to kill Tom.
You'll ruin everything.
The liver is no longer functioning.
They all stopped and looked at Tom.
They all turned and looked at Tom.
They both turned and looked at Tom.
Are you Chinese?
Are you Chinese?
Are you Chinese?
I'll certainly miss her.
I'll certainly miss him.
We plunged into the river.
Look at Tom's shoes.
It's the worst thing that could happen.
The only way to find out what happened is to ask Tom.
The only way to find out what happened is to ask Tom.
The police said they were going to release Tom.
You promised me you'd talk to Tom.
You promised me you'd talk to Tom.
The speech deeply affected the audience.
We haven't been able to get in touch with Tom.
I'm really grateful.
Do you really think I should marry Tom?
I'm not going anywhere with Tom.
You were the only person who talked to Tom.
Our ship wasn't damaged in the battle.
She is buying books in the bookstore.
We never got a clear explanation of the mystery.
Were you friends with Tom in college?
He's shaking his head as if he had water in his ears.
Our pointer took off after a big deer.
Where can I buy a brush?
Word up, breda. Long time no see. Whatchu been up to?
We must not give up.
I'm not saying I'm better than Tom.
Are you still in love with Tom?
Why didn't you stay with Tom?
I want to spend more time with Tom.
I want to spend more time with Tom.
I'm not sure I can convince Tom.
She sold a refrigerator.
Tom and I are childhood friends.
I am an English teacher.
Tom persuaded me to do it.
I'm going to visit Tom in jail.
I'm going to visit Tom in jail.
There's no way to avoid it.
What can I do about it?
You should talk to Tom about it.
You should talk to Tom about it.
There's someone outside.
These horses are Tom's.
No one's going to find Tom.
Have you seen the news? Horrible stuff has been happening.
I told you that I wasn't going to give up.
Tom can't control himself.
Tom can't control himself.
Okay, I give up.
What's Tom's full name?
The class were noisy today.
Tom's master didn't let him eat without his permission.
What would we do without Tom?
Knit your eyebrows!
Do you know how I can get in touch with Tom?
Do you know how I can get in touch with Tom?
What am I going to do without Tom?
Do you know how to contact Tom?
Do you know how to contact Tom?
Have you tried talking with Tom?
Have you tried talking with Tom?
Have you tried negotiating with Tom?
Have you tried negotiating with Tom?
It's not bothering anyone.
I don't always follow instructions.
I bumped into him at the station.
I'm simply obeying orders.
He was attacked as he was returning home late at night.
That was totally my fault.
Do you have a coin?
Thanks a lot, you just ruined my life!
I've got to be very careful, Tom.
Tom lit the candles.
Instead of waiting for Tom, let's eat now before the food gets cold.
I'm reading. Turn the television off.
Did you actually talk to Tom?
Tom lit the candles.
Instead of waiting for Tom, let's eat now before the food gets cold.
I'm reading. Turn the television off.
Did you actually talk to Tom?
Is it so difficult to choose between heaven and hell?
Is it so difficult to choose between heaven and hell?
You always want to control everything.
I hadn't planned on staying so long.
I almost had a heart attack.
I can teach you how to pray.
Thanks for the invitation, Tom.
Students stand up when their teacher enters.
Tom seems bored.
She's sexually frustrated.
We introduced ourselves in turn.
The prisoners were trying to escape.
You're trying my patience.
You're trying my patience.
Having studied French for three years, Tom can speak it quite well.
If that happens, I will rip up and burn everything I have written.
Tom's dog swims quite well.
They were stuck in the elevator for two hours.
The audience roared with laughter.
Add my name to the list.
A Japanese would never do such a thing.
I cannot send you the invitation.
I'll be brief.
Learning languages comes easy to her.
British scientists have established that if you turn the flag of Japan upside down, you get the flag of Japan.
I am planning to visit Kyoto, and Nara as well.
During the game, it suddenly began to rain and it thundered, too.
I need an envelope and a piece of paper. I also need either a pencil or a pen.
The doctor is gentle with his patients.
I do not interfere there.
Control yourself!
They missed their stop.
Tom is a lifeguard at the local swimming pool.
Go wash your hands.
Go wash your hands.
Tom has terrible handwriting.
Tom has very nice handwriting.
Tom has the keys.
I wake up early.
They argued about the sentence.
Is the milk from this deer really good?
She is always polite!
Tom has good handwriting.
Tom has very bad handwriting.
It doesn't matter what we do.
The squirrel ate the hazelnuts.
Do you know Tom's secret?
Do you know Tom's secret?
Do you know Tom's secret?
Do you know Tom's secret?
Do you know Tom's secret?
Do you know Tom's secret?
That was Tom's fault.
I asked Tom to come in.
When exactly did you see Tom?
When exactly did you see Tom?
Looks aren't important to me.
You don't have to apologize to me.
You don't have to apologize to me.
You don't have to apologize to me.
You don't have to apologize to me.
I don't remember the names of the beaches.
It was a real pleasure to work with Tom.
How far is it from here to your school? "It's about ten minute's walk."
Stop being so naive.
Stop being so naive.
Tom was killed by lightning.
I'm sure we can come to an agreement.
I won't let anyone hurt Tom.
I'm trying to impress Tom.
I can't live without Tom.
I totally agree with Tom.
I never worked with Tom.
I wasn't looking at Tom.
I'll be waiting for Tom.
I'll never forgive Tom.
I wanted to marry Tom.
I have to warn Tom.
I'll come with Tom.
I didn't see Tom.
I can't protect you here.
Tom set me up.
They were traitors.
Talk to my lawyers.
I'll be brief.
None of it matters.
Is this Tom's room?
Is that not enough?
I fell off my bike.
I can't forget Tom.
Hide in the closet.
Hide in the closet.
Does Tom have children?
Describe Tom to me.
Describe Tom to me.
When did I realize I was God? Well, I was praying and I suddenly realized I was talking to myself.
You could ask Tom.
You could ask Tom.
You could ask Tom.
You could ask Tom.
Rights are not given, they are fought for.
John began learning English at the age of seventy-five.
I turned off the computer.
You like classical music, don't you?
She laced her shoes.
You've got no right to talk to Tom that way.
You've got no right to talk to Tom that way.
I've seen the way you look at Tom.
I've seen the way you look at Tom.
I can't remember when I first met Tom.
I can't remember when I first met Tom.
You're talking too fast.
I came to talk to you about Tom.
She was brought up by her grandfather.
Hell is a place where it smells bad and nobody loves anybody.
I want you to meet my friend, Tom.
Where were you on the night of October 20th?
You haven't spoken to Tom about this yet, have you?
You haven't spoken to Tom about this yet, have you?
Cats kill rats.
Sometimes it's too late to apologize.
If you do not surrender, you will die!
If you do not surrender, you will die!
How often do you wash your hair?
If you have any questions, don't hesitate to ask.
You have totally lost your mind.
What time are you meeting Tom?
What time are you meeting Tom?
Tom and I became best friends.
I want to thank you for that.
I want to thank you for that.
I'm the only one still in contact with Tom.
His parents were furious.
My parents were furious.
The children were sitting on the floor in front of Tom.
I'd like a hot tea with honey.
I'd like a hot tea with honey.
I love Tom.
What should I do if I'm attacked by a grizzly bear?
I wonder why we haven't heard from Tom yet.
It's Tom's birthday today!
Today's Tom's birthday.
This is the man that I see every day on the train.
Tom persuaded her into going to the movies with him.
Tom is a fascist.
Tom has a poor memory.
Tom has limited free time.
I've decided to fire Tom.
Eleven o'clock is good for me.
Maybe you should just fire Tom.
This is very difficult for Tom.
The weather forecast says that it's going to snow this evening.
What makes you think I'm going to follow Tom?
Everything I did, I did for Tom.
I'm sorry if this is a stupid question.
We all felt sorry for Tom.
Everyone felt sorry for Tom.
I'm starting to think I'm never going to meet Tom.
I'm sorry you didn't get a chance to meet Tom.
Did you really threaten to kill Tom?
I did my best to protect Tom.
I just moved here, so I don't know anyone yet.
Tom made a strategic error.
What are Tom's true intentions?
What are the terms of the contract?
It's easy to see why people like Tom.
Can we hide in your basement?
They're not roommates. They're lovers.
Do you think that the police will find Tom?
Do you think that the police will find Tom?
Call me as soon as you find Tom.
Call me as soon as you find Tom.
Do you have any idea where we could find Tom?
Maybe you can tell me where I can find Tom.
Failing the exam was a sore point that he did not like to talk about.
How did you know where to find Tom?
They're not roommates. They're lovers.
It shouldn't take long to find Tom.
It took me a while to find Tom.
We're doing everything possible to find Tom.
Should we go and try to find Tom?
I've never taken drugs.
Your sentences are too difficult to translate.
One way or another, we'll find Tom.
Tom got very angry.
Tom tried to commit suicide.
Tom has tried to kill himself.
As far as I know, Tom has never tried to commit suicide.
I've filled a glass.
They will protect you.
They will protect you.
I'm not a spy.
I'm not a teenager.
I'm not an invalid.
I'm not a monster.
Mom bought a pretty doll for me.
There was an ominous silence.
I miss you already.
I miss you already.
I watched Tom carefully.
She works as hard as any other student.
Norway surprised me.
Tom came to our house uninvited.
Tom was moaning in pain.
She had to share a bedroom with her sister.
He had to share his bedroom with his brother.
She had to share her room with her brother.
He had to share his room with his sister.
That's incredibly boring.
He turned off the light.
They don't think therefore they aren't.
He plays the guitar well.
Only monsters don't cry.
I flunked out of school.
I dream about you every night.
Does Tom have a fever?
Does Tom have a fever?
I don't want to go to the pool.
I saw Tom at the funeral today.
I don't want to hurt anyone.
I became a champion.
Every now and then they went shopping together.
Tom looked a little surprised.
He had to share his bedroom with his brother.
Atomic energy can be used for peaceful ends.
You can't blame me for that.
You can't blame me for that.
I was very surprised.
I don't know what happened, but there are feathers all over the place.
My mother has gone to the beauty shop.
Tom has something in his hand.
Tom got rid of his old car.
We'll protect you.
How does the film end?
Tom has a six-figure salary.
Are you sure we can count on Tom?
A button has come off my raincoat.
You look great in this picture.
You look great in this picture.
It was the most popular sport in this country.
We have played at this beach.
The doctor examined over fifty patients that day.
Tom wants a divorce.
I'm not from here.
I'm not from here.
I am good at history.
If you had helped me I would be grateful.
He lost his temper and shouted at me.
Tom wants to go to the beach.
What do you think Tom's shoe size is?
Your philosophy of life varies from mine.
I thought Tom had a day off.
Why are textbooks so expensive?
Tom doesn't have any freckles.
Tom has freckles.
Tom threw a rock at me.
Tom threw a rock at the dog.
Tom threw a rock at the dog.
Textbooks are expensive.
He thinks that I am in love with her.
He thinks that I am in love with her.
What do they have in mind?
She has no opinion about religion.
I was at Tom's house. Where were you?
Perhaps you'll see Tom there.
Tom handed Mary a sheet of paper.
Everyone in the room looked at Tom.
It's not rocket science.
We must separate politics from religion.
Maybe I can talk Tom into going camping with us.
I got a bonus.
I made Tom cry.
Would you please fill out this form?
If you're bored, you can contribute to Tatoeba.
You should have introduced yourself.
I don't remember Tom's face.
Tom probably won't be able to cope with the problem by himself.
I have rather a busy afternoon in front of me.
I'm not persuaded.
This textbook is too hard for me.
She swallowed a coin.
They passed out.
She turned him down.
He's a singer that's loved by everyone.
Do you think they'll find him guilty?
She gave us some useful information.
Why is everyone so concerned about Tom?
Stop being nosey.
My lover doesn't love me.
Why should I worry about Tom?
Did you watch the match of yesterday?
Did you watch the match of yesterday?
We have to get you to the hospital.
We've got to get you to a hospital.
We've got to get you to a hospital.
We've got to get you to a hospital.
This year has been a lucky one for him.
How did you make a living in Tokyo?
How did you make a living in Tokyo?
Turn everything off.
Turn everything off.
The plane took off exactly at six.
Tom explained in detail what he had seen.
He managed to make both ends meet.
Do you want me to turn off the lights?
Do you want me to turn off the lights?
Do you want me to turn off the lights?
I assure you I'm in perfect health.
I assure you I'm in perfect health.
I also like this singer's voice.
Sorry to trouble you, but can you help me?
It was bitterly cold outside.
It was bitterly cold outside.
Don't you want to talk to Tom about it?
Don't you want to talk to Tom about it?
No one seems to care.
That was the last time any of us ever saw Tom.
Mosquitos love me.
I can't stand her.
The nurse has very gentle hands.
Why don't you ask Tom for help?
My watch gains ten minutes a day.
Some people have no patience.
Some people have no patience.
You should be more careful with your money.
Do you still love Tom?
Do you still love Tom?
You can let Tom go.
You missed the point.
Were you a friend of Tom's?
Were you a friend of Tom's?
I borrowed Tom's car.
I'm not skinny.
His words are meaningless.
At least thirty students were absent.
I think that I was a princess in a past life.
Just don't surrender.
Just don't surrender.
I don't like visiting big cities.
I finished reading this novel in three days.
We want to go to the beach in his car on Saturday.
They did not like the way he gave orders to everyone.
How are you going to stop Tom?
Get out of my apartment.
The two boys began to blame each other.
Stand up and introduce yourself, please.
She didn't try to hide the truth.
The stakes were high.
The stakes are high.
The writer George Orwell was watched for about twelve years by the British police.
Tom can't make his own decisions.
If you really want to know, why don't you ask Tom?
We wanted to wish you good luck.
We wanted to wish you good luck.
Tom's mother still buys his clothes for him.
It's been over a week since I last saw Tom.
Tom looked out the window.
I think they were talking about Tom.
We need to warn Tom.
I can't take my eyes off Tom. I can't stop looking at him.
Do you have any other pictures of Tom?
Do you have any other pictures of Tom?
I asked Tom if he liked Chinese food.
There are many different types of German bread.
I know why Tom isn't here today.
All we know is that Tom is coming to our office at 2:30.
Tom looked for his name on the list.
They decided to pull down the old building.
Turn off the light and go to sleep.
Don't you want to visit Tom?
I think Tom has serious problems at home.
I didn't lose. I just couldn't win.
Many Russians have dashboard cameras.
I don't want Tom to give up.
The house is being built now.
You have nothing to apologize for.
Tom has a swimming pool.
It's cold out here.
Which ball is white?
Fruits have seeds in them.
Fruits have seeds in them.
They bought a basket of fruit.
How can you be so indifferent to your wife's trouble?
Get me my pills.
Can I have a minute?
Tom doesn't have a house to live in.
Can we turn the TV off?
Can I see Tom a moment?
I want to make a complaint.
Can you make me a copy?
I can't protect Tom.
I would die for Tom.
I met Tom after work.
I'm not done with Tom yet.
I'd love to meet Tom.
I'll defend Tom.
I'll see Tom today.
I'll see Tom today.
Can't we fire Tom?
Tom had an idea.
I'll miss Tom, too.
I was happy to see Tom.
I was happy to see Tom.
I'm never going to forgive Tom.
I like being with Tom.
I have to warn Tom.
I'm coming for Tom.
I'm not angry at Tom.
I can protect Tom.
I'll pray for Tom.
A belt keeps your pants from falling down.
The English ambassador demanded to meet with the President directly.
The English ambassador demanded to meet with the President directly.
I hate Tom's parents.
I wasn't careful.
If we unite our efforts, we will be able to finish this.
I'm not bald.
A good translator translates not words, but sentences.
I like Tom's attitude.
We have lost a battle, but we will win the war.
Lions are colorblind.
You shot Tom twice.
You may call me Tom.
I asked Tom to play the guitar.
Tom and I have big plans.
The pond is very deep.
Everyone ran outside.
I take care of Tom.
This is the window which was broken by the boy.
I asked Tom if he was busy.
It's a pity we didn't visit Tom when we had the chance.
We are under his command.
We looked for it here and there.
We looked for it high and low.
The mother missed her daughter who was away at college.
It's Tom's birthday tomorrow.
Is this an invitation?
You can trust her, she always keeps her promises.
Where's Tom hiding?
Tom is in the attic.
I cannot chew. I do not have teeth.
We have lots of time.
I heard an unusual noise.
She was almost late for school.
We won the match.
I'm afraid we'll lose the game.
This will not be tolerated.
We must keep our hands clean.
We should be very careful.
We have to cancel our trip to Japan.
We regard him as the best player on the team.
We should cancel the hike.
We should cancel the hike.
We're able dancers.
We'd better cancel the hike.
How is your mother?
The newspaper says that he committed suicide.
My mother took me to the park.
According to the newspaper, he committed suicide.
I suppose you've heard about Tom.
I'm sorry, I didn't mean to frighten you.
I'm sorry, I didn't mean to frighten you.
I wasn't the one who broke the window.
I wasn't the one who found Tom's keys.
I wasn't the one who found Tom's keys.
Will you go on foot or by bus?
Will you go on foot or by bus?
Will you go on foot or by bus?
Will you go on foot or by bus?
This is a daily occurrence.
You're three hours late.
English is difficult to learn.
I ran into him yesterday at the airport.
The Grassland theme in Heroes of Might and Magic II is my favourite terrain theme in all of HoMM.
She grabbed her towel and headed for the beach.
I never dream. Is that normal?
Show me your papers!
Show me your papers!
Show me your papers!
I don't want to pay through the nose for a hotel room.
If you take four from ten, you have six.
I can't do this without Tom.
You'll have to drive us there.
I wonder what made Tom do that.
Tom doesn't have time for that.
Tom doesn't usually dress like that.
Tom didn't know how to react to that.
I don't talk to Tom anymore.
They will have difficulty in achieving their goal.
Don't tell me you've never heard of Tom Jackson.
This is standard procedure.
That's reason enough.
What more can you tell us about Tom?
What more can you tell us about Tom?
What else can you tell me about Tom?
What else can you tell me about Tom?
Have you told Tom why you were late?
You didn't tell me that you knew Tom.
You didn't tell me that you knew Tom.
You didn't tell me that you knew Tom.
You didn't tell me that you knew Tom.
Tom's wife told me he wasn't at home.
I didn't understand Tom.
Never mind what she said.
Tom made me promise not to tell anyone.
He was killed at the battle of Little Bighorn.
He was killed at the battle of Little Bighorn.
I'm surprised Tom doesn't have a bicycle.
We talked about poetry and literature.
I regret kissing Tom.
We have to find Tom before it gets dark.
You look skinny.
You look skinny.
You look skinny.
You look skinny.
You look skinny.
I wanted to see the elephant first, but Tom wanted to see the monkeys.
I lunch in that restaurant every day.
There's lots of people at the park.
Everyone here is afraid of Tom.
Tom isn't your name, is it?
Don't mix energy drinks with alcohol.
I should've listened to Tom more closely.
You should've never interfered.
You should've never interfered.
We should've stayed with Tom.
You should've declined the invitation.
Do you believe in magic?
Be patient.
What did I miss?
She never saw Tom again.
He never saw Tom again.
He got into bed.
That boy speaks like an adult.
I'm convinced that this job is perfect for you.
Tom usually listens to classical music.
I just want to be perfect.
I just want to be perfect.
One way to lower the number of errors in the Tatoeba Corpus would be to encourage people to only translate into their native languages.
Night came on.
Where can I find Tom?
Where can I find Tom?
I'm not angry!
Europe is in crisis.
I've been fired.
A huge monster is coming down the mountain.
The tank is empty.
I only did my duty.
Teenagers often argue with their parents.
She bought a toy for the kid.
Blood was everywhere.
Don't forget to call Tom.
He got up and left in the middle of the discussion.
It'd be better if you didn't associate with men like that.
Tom has a black cat.
Lincoln was elected President of the United States in 1860.
We're going to have to ask for Tom's help.
We need your help finding Tom.
We need your help finding Tom.
Are there any cute girls in your class?
I know all about Tom.
I know how close you are to Tom.
I know how close you were to Tom.
This cat is Tom's.
I know I probably don't say it often enough, but I love you.
That's the reason she's late.
My father has five siblings.
You don't give orders here.
I moved last month.
I know it's difficult to believe, but it's the truth.
I've given up on the idea of buying a house.
I know that's not true.
The refrigerator is dirty.
I know Tom better than he knows himself.
I know Tom better than he knows himself.
I know Tom better than anyone does.
I know Tom better than anyone.
We can help you find Tom.
We can help you find Tom.
Can you help us find Tom?
Can you help us find Tom?
That's a fake beard, isn't it?
A bad workman blames his tools.
You would make an excellent spy.
Tom would make an excellent spy.
Tom is not a very good dancer.
Tom broke my heart.
Do you know where Tom's car is parked?
Do you know where Tom got this?
Do you know where Tom bought his bicycle?
Do you know where Tom bought his bicycle?
Tell me why you were fired.
Is that why you were late?
Is that why you were late?
Explain to me why Tom isn't here.
Explain to me why Tom isn't here.
He was born on the twenty-second of February.
Tom kept a diary.
Tom has a theory.
Tom has a lawyer.
Tom had a weapon.
I want you to help us find out who killed Tom.
I want you to help us find out who killed Tom.
I wasn't very hungry, so I decided to eat later.
She accepted our invitation.
Tom put the butter back into the refrigerator.
I'm really thankful to you. "Once again?"
That boy looks a little bit like Tom.
That boy looks like Tom.
That's not important now.
Kosovo is now an independent country.
Perhaps he missed the train.
My parents prohibited me from seeing Tom again.
My parents didn't allow me to see Tom again.
What is the temperature of the water in the pool?
It's all Tom's fault.
What is the temperature of the water in the pool?
Tom's hair is chestnut brown.
Tom has a great sense of humour.
Tom had no food.
When did you first meet Tom?
You must be polite.
I've known Tom longer than you've been alive.
Tom took the butter out of the refrigerator.
Tom put the milk back into the refrigerator.
Tom and I had a fight.
Do you feel like eating something?
Do you feel like eating something?
I brought you some fruit.
I brought you some fruit.
I called my lawyer.
I called Tom's parents.
Would you like to talk to a lawyer?
You're a really good cook.
The weather is perfect today.
She obeys him.
She told him a joke.
She visited him on October 20th.
I have to check my mailbox.
I bought a red diary.
Would you like to travel to the United States?
Who is the wisest person you know?
Soldiers must obey their commanders.
The smell was offensive.
Tom is sick, but it isn't serious.
Don't miss this amazing opportunity.
Tom begged Mary to forgive him.
Don't give in to Tom's demands.
I came to say goodbye.
I came to support Tom.
I came to talk about Tom.
I came to talk about Tom.
I came to talk with Tom.
I came to talk to you about Tom.
I can ask Tom to help.
The portions are huge at this restaurant.
I can defend myself.
I'll be a half hour late.
I'll ask Tom if you like.
I'll ask Tom if you like.
I won't let Tom go there.
Food is fuel for our bodies.
Food is fuel for our bodies.
You can get it for free.
He swims in the river.
Could you please pass me the pepper?
I like watching baseball games.
Nobody can control us.
As far as I know, he is a person who keeps his promises.
My father is going for a walk in the park.
May I take a photo?
Who painted that?
I made a doll for Ann.
I made a doll for Ann.
Since he was very drunk, he couldn't drive his car home.
She was run over by a car.
Miss Sato is the president's new secretary.
We saw a lot of yellow butterflies today.
We saw a lot of yellow butterflies today.
The butterfly flew.
The butterfly flew.
Talk is cheap, but thought is free.
It's a secret from Tom.
She saw him break the window.
She started pursuing him before he became famous.
She startled him.
She talked him into accepting the bribe.
She talked him into quitting his job.
He envies all his friends.
I'm not trying to impress Tom.
I know very little about Tom.
That was Tom's choice.
This gift is from Tom.
How do you stand this cold?
How do you stand this cold?
How do you stand this heat?
Didn't you eat lunch?
That's not what worries me.
That really scares me.
Are you waiting for Tom?
It's dangerous to climb this mountain.
Tom's son was killed in a traffic accident last winter.
That's why I want to talk to Tom.
That's why I want to talk to Tom.
How do I get in touch with you?
How do I get in touch with you?
That's what worrying me.
We all jumped into the water at the same time.
That's a wise decision.
I'm sure Tom misses you.
Watch Tom carefully. He's dangerous.
Watch Tom carefully. He's dangerous.
Tom only listens to classical music.
Tom has more important things to do.
Tom caught the ball with both hands.
Tom and I work at the same hospital.
Tom and I both want you to be happy.
Tom and I both want you to be happy.
Tom and I both want you to be happy.
Math is like love - a simple idea, but it can get complicated.
Sit back and enjoy it.
Sit back and enjoy it.
Sit back and enjoy it.
Sit back and enjoy it.
He sells fruit.
I sell shoes.
I'm not sure if I'm in love with her.
I'm not sure if I'm in love with him.
Tom's parents weren't home.
The plane took off at seven.
He is a waiter and also an actor.
Swimming at night is dangerous.
Promises are made to be broken.
Keep your room clean.
I always have a notepad.
The sand on the beach was white.
I think she is sick. She has a temperature.
She bent down and picked up the coin.
She prayed for her son's return.
She gave me a doll.
She seems to be in love with my brother.
This tastes like chicken.
She went shopping at a supermarket.
She read the poem aloud.
Her friend is a singer.
She takes care of my children.
She stayed in the house all day.
I'm trying to get in touch with her sister.
They defended their country.
They are singers.
He is afraid of becoming sick.
He washes the bike every week.
He washes the bike every week.
He lives apart from his parents.
He moved to Tokyo.
He is one of the greatest scientists in Japan.
He asked her to marry him, but she refused.
Tom knows what I do for a living.
The committee is discussing social welfare.
Tom and I are getting married.
Thanks for the warning.
They'll be so grateful.
The policeman looked at Tom suspiciously.
This was in Tom's desk.
This was on Tom's desk.
Tom and I were friends.
A young boy, who couldn't have been more than five years old, asked Tom how to get to the post office.
I was born in a small town called Nara.
He's perfect at everything.
He has learned to be patient.
He fixed his eyes on me.
He stared at me.
He was working at the office yesterday evening.
He lives far away from his hometown.
He is a good singer.
He put his hands in his pockets.
Plant trees!
Are you questioning my authority?
We're three hours behind schedule.
He had no difficulty in explaining the mystery.
He made up the whole story.
He is a waiter and an actor.
He tried to get rid of the ants.
I mentioned your name to him.
He moved into my neighborhood.
I saw him wash the car.
There is a doll in the box.
I received an invitation from him, but didn't accept it.
I stayed at home all day instead of going to work.
Bringing up a baby is hard work.
This sounds fishy.
The new museum is worth visiting.
Fresh fruit is good for you.
Miss Kanda can swim well.
People are saying that the crisis is over.
The elephant was killed by the hunter.
The elephant was killed by the hunter.
The situation calls for drastic measures.
Accidents are inevitable.
I always take a bath in the morning.
Tom doesn't have a dog.
Tom got bored and left.
Tom had a very bad day.
He contributed fifty dollars to the project.
In spite of his anger, he listened to me patiently.
I heard a call for help.
I don't want to eat lunch now.
I went swimming in the sea.
I just moved.
I am not good at sports.
I have turned twenty.
My grandmother can ride a motorcycle.
My job is taking care of the baby.
Why are you mad at Tom?
Tom will drive you home.
Tom will drive you home.
We have lunch at noon every day.
We will visit our teacher next week.
Our office is on the northern side of the building.
Fortunately, nobody was injured.
A stranger came into the building.
In 1860, Lincoln was elected President of the United States.
It is ten minutes before eleven.
Tom isn't at the hotel.
Tom isn't here any more.
I need Tom's address.
Let me drive you home.
Tom called to say he'd be late.
Tom broke the window on purpose.
Tom broke the window on purpose.
She is wiser than I am.
I never even saw Tom.
I never got a chance to say goodbye to Tom.
I never got the chance to thank Tom.
I never got to talk to Tom.
I never had any reason to doubt Tom.
It's thirty degrees below zero.
Are you waiting for Tom?
Are you waiting for Tom?
I have been hoping to hear from you.
I wish you had come to see me yesterday.
Do you let your children drink coffee?
Dutch is closely related to German.
My uncle runs a hotel.
Karen is angry with me.
There are some good apples in the basket.
I dislike living in such a noisy place.
This is a hazard to your health.
Sam went skiing in January.
John broke the window yesterday.
Please iron the shirt.
Do you mind waiting for a minute?
Does it bother you?
The basket was full of apples.
The dog came running to me.
The meeting has been canceled.
The meeting has been postponed.
The gun went off by accident.
I saw the boy in brown shoes.
The only thing he cares about is money.
Tom wiped his tears away.
My uncle is the only person who uses this word.
We have a lot of snow in February.
What was Tom's last name?
I feel powerless.
Where can we find Tom?
I thought Tom would give up.
I thought Tom would give up.
How long did you go out with Tom?
How long did you go out with Tom?
I won't do to Tom what he did to me.
I'm not going to force Tom to do that.
If you wait right here, I'll go get Tom.
I'm sure Tom has some questions he wants to ask you.
I'm sure Tom has some questions he wants to ask you.
I'm sure Tom has some questions he wants to ask you.
I'm sure Tom has some questions he wants to ask you.
I don't let my kids watch TV.
I need you to tell me the unvarnished truth.
You can use the hotel's swimming pool.
I'm surprised by her lack of responsability.
You could've ruined everything.
I graduated from Harvard.
How did you find out it was Tom who stole your bicycle?
We'd like to speak with Tom.
These are Tom's glasses.
I feel as if I've known Tom for years.
I asked Tom if he had any suggestions.
Tom has been suffering from a headache all day.
Will Iran attack Israel?
That street is very noisy.
That street is very noisy.
There is one big difference.
It's a TV.
Buying such an expensive car is out of the question.
It took many years to build it.
You'll need a special tool to do it.
You should eat something before you go.
Which shoes are you going to put on?
I'm good friends with Tom.
Tom was late for dinner.
Throw the ball back to me.
The ball hit him on the left side of the head.
The headlight doesn't work.
That's too much.
I want more detailed information.
Rome is a city worth visiting.
Except for Tom, the family was all watching TV in silence.
We are waiting for Tom.
My shoes are brown.
Tom is still in his office.
Don't be so naive.
Tom put gas in the car.
Tom put gas in the car.
Tom rewound the tape.
Tom seems to be in love.
We must work hard to complete the project.
Our new head office is in Tokyo.
I wish I could break the habit of smoking.
It may sound strange, but it is true.
I will be very happy to accept your invitation.
I ran into an old friend.
If we hurry, we'll make it.
The sky has become overcast.
You could ask Tom.
You could ask Tom.
You could ask Tom.
You could ask Tom.
How rude of you!
Do I need a lawyer?
This knife was very useful to me.
In my country the customs are different.
White carpets are very hard to keep clean.
The nurse is ill.
Tom was a good pilot.
You're the only one who can protect them.
You're the only one who can protect them.
You're the only one who can protect them.
I'm very grateful to you for your advice.
We're grateful to you for all your help.
There's no reason for you to apologize.
There's nothing to apologize for.
It's no use trying to persuade Tom.
I can see Tom, but he can't see me.
Have you known Tom for a long time?
Have you known Tom a long time?
You must be Tom's younger brother.
You must be Tom's younger brother.
Are you Chinese or Japanese?
I weigh 58 kilograms.
My weight is 58 kilograms.
Tom has a wife and a young child.
There's nothing to apologize for.
Oh no! Our patient is dead.
I'm three years younger than Tom.
I'm three years younger than Tom.
I'm fed up with your complaining.
I leaned out of the window.
I leaned out of the window.
I can't help thinking about Tom.
You'll miss me when I'm gone.
You'll miss me when I'm gone.
What's Tom's brother's name?
I used to keep a diary in English when I was a student.
That was my idea, not Tom's.
It's getting dark outside.
I'm almost as tall as Tom.
Tom can't ride a bike.
It's still light out.
Tom is washing his hair.
I'm the same age as Tom.
She's eleven years old.
What is the difference between a bookshop in a small town and in a big city?
That man was wearing a tiger mask.
You gave up.
You gave up.
Tom is young and naive.
Did you turn off the gas?
Did you turn off the gas?
It doesn't matter, Tom.
I'll see Tom next week.
I'll ask Tom tomorrow.
Tom climbed the tree.
We should never have given up.
I talked with the Polish ambassador.
I'm homesick.
Chopin is my favorite composer.
Tom is eager to impart his knowledge.
Life is full of surprises.
Go figure.
Jim isn't a lawyer, but a doctor.
I told you it was dangerous.
I told you it was dangerous.
This is Tom's room.
We should eat something.
I won't tolerate that.
I've always hated Tom.
Please don't be offended.
Please don't be offended.
The rest doesn't matter.
They haven't found Tom.
I'd do anything to protect you.
I'd do anything to protect you.
You can't cancel the meeting.
A single death is a tragedy, a million deaths is a statistic.
That is why I am angry with him.
That is why I am angry with him.
I'll make Tom do it.
The boy washing the car is my brother.
I live next to Tom.
I don't want your gold or your silver.
Some precious stones are very similar to gold.
Do you know where Tom was hiding?
It will take him two hours to finish the work.
Flowers are growing in the meadow.
Her puppy is clean.
He worked too hard, and became sick.
Do you know Roman numerals?
Tom closed his eyes and began to count sheep.
We asked if we might smoke during the break.
You might find Tom in the library, but I doubt it.
The attempt failed.
I don't care about Tom.
I like puzzles.
Like I care!
My music teacher was surprised to know I know how to cook.
When was the last time you rode a bicycle?
When was the last time you rode a bicycle?
Tom couldn't hide his anger.
No one takes Tom seriously.
I'm not old enough.
Tom has his reasons for not doing that.
I may be able to find Tom.
I'm not fooling anybody.
You should only believe about half the things Tom says.
They've already eaten.
I want to go outside.
May I visit you tomorrow?
You won't be needing that again.
I think we're going to need more time.
The sand on the beach was white.
I really do appreciate it.
I don't scare that easily.
I'm not scared of Tom.
I hardly know Tom.
I can't believe we're going to lose.
We should ask Tom.
We should be partners.
We should be with Tom.
It bothers me a lot.
Do you and Tom spend a lot of time together?
You'll never find Tom.
You'll never find Tom.
You'd better find Tom.
You'd better find Tom.
You shouldn't try to do that by yourself.
You should follow Tom's example.
I live near the sea so I often go to the beach.
Tom threw the ball.
I'm staying at Tom's house.
She tossed a ball to Tom.
She can't ride a bicycle.
Can't he ride a bicycle?
Don't you have a bicycle?
Can't you ride a bicycle?
They're afraid of Tom.
They ran past Tom.
She lit the candles.
He lit the candles.
In the summer I go to the pool every day.
You haven't seen Tom today, have you?
I can't recall all their names.
She got married at seventeen.
Would you like to hear more?
You can't lose.
Don't give him any ideas.
I appreciate that.
Trees are plants.
You look a sorry sight.
Tom didn't have time to watch TV yesterday.
They are both talented.
They are both talented.
You're so talented.
You're so talented.
You're so talented.
You're incredibly talented.
You're incredibly talented.
You're talented.
You're talented.
You're talented.
They tied him to a tree.
The cat climbed up the tree.
The cat climbed up the tree.
I'm bald.
Weather forecasts are rarely accurate.
The squirrel climbed the tree.
I was forgotten.
Are you stalking me?
Why are people afraid of Tom?
Where do you want to eat?
What's wrong with Tom?
The light bulb burst.
Tell me why you didn't ask Tom.
The two of you have ruined my life.
You should eat.
This is the guitar that Tom gave me.
Tom has already eaten.
I don't even have time for reading.
Did you read all of it?
I went not once, but twice.
I'm new here.
Tom tied his shoe laces.
History is a set of agreed upon lies.
Something seems to be bothering Tom.
Now it's Tom's turn.
Please call me Tom.
I'd better go look for Tom.
I'd better go look for Tom.
What else does Tom want to know?
I swear to God.
Who else do you want to visit?
Who else do you want to visit?
Tom has a beautiful voice.
The pain is unbearable.
Tom kicks a football with his left foot, but writes with his right hand.
You can't help but like Tom.
Divide the cake among the three of you.
What does the earth look like from space?
He has very bad handwriting.
Tom's car needed a wash, so he left it out in the rain.
Tom's so unfit he couldn't run out of sight on a dark night.
Where's the catch?
You have to talk to Tom.
This was too much for Tom.
I'd like to meet Tom.
I never heard from him again.
Tom thinks his country is the greatest country in the world.
You can eat very well there.
Change is inevitable.
I spent the whole evening talking to Tom.
It's a nice country to visit, but I wouldn't live there.
May I eat something?
Tom has lots of friends.
Tom doesn't have a problem with that.
Why are you visiting us?
I thought she was in love with Tom.
My heart is French, but my ass is international!
Tom's hands trembled.
He was trembling with rage.
I swear it's not my fault.
When are you going to move?
Not being tall isn't a disadvantage.
I heard laughter in the next room.
My new shoes are comfortable.
It's my fault that you were fired.
It's my fault that you were fired.
She does her homework on Fridays to save herself from the drudgery of having to do it during the weekend.
I can't just abandon Tom.
Nobody cares about you.
It's Tom's idea.
They released Tom.
Maybe you're in love.
Maybe you're in love.
Take your shoes off.
Take your shoes off.
Take your shoes off.
Take your shoes off.
I want to eat something that's not spicy.
I can't be late today.
Why was Tom fired?
Who do you want to win?
He was extremely happy at having successfully solved the problem.
Who do you want to win?
I can't drink this stuff.
I need to go eat something.
What kind of book do you want?
I don't have enough money at the moment.
I'm sitting next to Tom.
Tom is outside.
You can ask Tom for help.
I need to get something to eat.
Tom is nearby.
She visits him quite often, but never stays very long.
I saw my friends yesterday.
Tomorrow I'm going to visit my mother in the hospital.
Tom is in my office.
Tom is at the office.
Tom is at the airport.
Tom is in your office.
Tom is in your office.
It's extremely important that we speak to Tom.
Don't get ahead of yourself.
That sounds like a good idea.
We'll come and visit you.
I asked him if I could read his book.
Can I get something to eat?
Would you be friends with me?
There are still some savage tribes on that island.
No matter how hard she tried, she couldn't please him.
She's not prettier than her mother.
English is a global language.
I was delayed by a traffic jam.
Come on, who would believe that crap?
They want me to talk to Tom.
Where did you buy this guitar?
I greet you.
I want to visit you.
I lit the candles.
I lit the candles.
Light the candles.
Light the candles.
Tom wants you to do him a favor.
Does he speak with an accent?
Lots of people in Japan are indifferent to politics.
You know that Tom is in love with you, don't you?
He said that English was his maternal language, but his accent was a dead giveaway.
He said good night to his parents.
He stays a long time every time he comes.
He can't stay long.
He can't do this kind of work, and she can't either.
Do you often hear from him?
I really appreciate it.
A man cannot be judged by his appearance.
Tom acted without thinking.
Tom majored in French in college.
I remember mailing the letter.
I asked her if I could read the book.
They were seen to go out.
I hear from him every now and then.
I have not heard from her for a year.
You've taken everything.
May I eat a little of it?
It's a tiny country that most people have never heard of.
I had never seen a more beautiful sight.
Are you still around?
Life begins when we realize who we really are.
When did you get a motorcycle?
She gave him all of her silver.
Try to control yourselves.
The spy made contact with the enemy.
When I was a kid, I often went to the beach to go swimming.
The children are playing marbles.
You aren't perfect.
I've given it a lot of thought.
The papers didn't print this story.
He threw a punch at the thug.
We can't just fire Tom.
We can't just fire Tom.
Are you going to eat here or do you want us to wrap it?
Tom is wearing a new pair of shoes.
How many kidneys does a human have?
Action speaks louder than words, but not nearly as often.
You can't fire me because I quit!
I watch my feet for the cracks in the pavement.
You Russians are really wonderful people. Instead of accepting help and advice you're blaming me for the alleged mistakes I've made.
We see each other once a month.
Tom wanted to punish me.
Tom wanted to thank you.
Tom wanted to thank you.
You must keep your shoes clean.
We want to speak with Tom.
Tom wanted to get out of the car and walk.
Sorry to interrupt you.
He showed me his collection of stamps.
He showed me his collection of stamps.
I like to eat.
He's better than me at math.
Please don't interrupt me when I am speaking.
Japanese tourists can be found everywhere.
Tom won't be long.
We can't fail.
I appreciate that.
The boy is playing with his toy soldiers.
Try to control yourselves.
Without your help, I would fail.
How did we miss it?
Tom has an old car.
Our neighbor has broken a rib.
I'm going to Berlin to visit my friend.
I don't want any fruit.
What a bummer.
Why don't you wait outside?
I am boring.
I am boring.
The urban population of America is increasing.
Tom has a beautiful car.
I don't care what others think about me.
Politicians should keep their promises.
The rainy season begins towards the end of June.
It was ironic.
He hurried so he wouldn't miss the train.
Tom's favorite movie is Dumbo.
I take everything back.
He often forgets to keep his promises.
I don't want to cause you any trouble.
No one told me that he had failed.
No one told me that she had failed.
I have one thousand and five hundred cows.
We are on the wrong track.
I think that maybe I won't be able to make myself understood in English.
Old people are usually very wise.
Never mind. Anyone can make mistakes.
Let me tell you my side of the story.
I can't find him anywhere. It's driving me mad!
Tom has an American accent.
I just wanted to talk to Tom.
I just wanted to talk to Tom.
Tom is very polite.
I am deeply grateful to you for your kindness.
Tom is in the kitchen cooking us something to eat.
That lady is over eighty.
He flew to New York on business.
I knew this moment would come.
Tom doesn't have much free time.
This table's surface is smooth.
I graduated from the University of Kyoto.
The boy passed the examination with success.
The beauty of the lake is beyond description.
I was surprised by the news this morning.
He doesn't have enough money to go travelling.
I always add a spoonful of honey to my tea.
I always add a spoonful of honey to my tea.
Fear left him speechless.
A bunch of people were standing outside waiting.
A bunch of people were standing outside waiting.
Would you please take off your shoes?
Can you show me where Tom Jackson's office is?
I revere this book.
This product has significant shortcomings.
Your hypothesis is correct.
Your hypothesis is correct.
He's a ghostwriter.
I'll fire Tom.
I warned Tom.
I understand Tom.
I fired Tom.
Do you know if my father is still in the office?
I postponed the event.
A doctor tried to remove the bullet from his back.
Did Tom eat?
Did Tom drown?
Ask Tom yourself.
Ask Tom yourself.
Ask Tom yourself.
Tom wasn't at home.
Is it difficult eating with chopsticks?
The teacher is going to start learning English this year.
He impressed me with his magic tricks.
I'd prefer to die rather than give up.
There aren't any fish living in this river anymore.
We suddenly realized what was happening.
I only have butter in my refrigerator.
She tattled on me to her teacher.
He's the type of guy who doesn't take women very seriously.
Life in a small town is boring.
Tom's dream is to go to a university in England.
Tom won a free car.
Tom's father is in prison.
Tom is upstairs doing his homework.
She went shopping elsewhere.
A childhood illness left her blind.
The best player of all times was Pelé.
She would love to go back to the days of her youth.
They're having a break at the moment.
Are you sure this is Tom's house?
Are you sure this is Tom's house?
Tom said I had no sense of humor.
Tom has a very vivid imagination.
Tom filled the bathtub with hot water.
What did you want to talk to Tom about?
What did you want to talk to Tom about?
I fired Tom.
I got to know Tom when I was in college.
He doesn't want to admit that he has a drinking problem.
Tom wanted to go, but he had lots of things to do.
I really want a motorcycle.
Both my parents came to see me off at the airport.
They just missed the train.
He's very good at playing guitar.
We have to make the most of this situation.
Who fired first?
That might be the most painful experience in my life.
That place is worth visiting twice.
It's very important to respect the rules.
This CD belongs to my son.
You can't have left it at the airport.
I'm an avid reader of biographies.
Mrs Klein is over 80, but she's still very active.
He had a new idea.
Humans generate more than 1 million tons of hazardous waste every day.
She was on the verge of killing herself.
How long does it last?
You must keep your promises.
John likes the nurse.
He is at his office.
That team has strong players.
The red skirt is new.
I know an English language instructor who comes from Canada.
I already have an envelope.
It is not for beginners.
What did you do with Tom's keys?
What did you do with Tom's keys?
What did you do with Tom's keys?
I don't like being controlled.
Tom and I were both invited.
Tom and I were busy all day.
I'm retiring.
My dream is to go to Japan.
May contain nuts.
This elephant is loved by small kids.
I think you'd be surprised.
A sailor saw his friend drown from exhaustion.
My bicycle needs to be repaired.
Do you think he's in trouble?
How much do you like Tom?
How much do you like Tom?
I am afraid I ate something bad.
It was a busy day.
I've done half the work, and now I can take a break.
Stop poking me.
He spoke to the teacher.
He spoke to the teacher.
I don't have the patience for this.
Tom parked his car in an underground parking garage.
You forgot to wake Tom up, didn't you?
You forgot to wake Tom up, didn't you?
Tom is an expert watchmaker.
Are you looking for Tom?
Tom is very religious.
Tom's truck just pulled up outside.
I can't remember where I first met Tom.
I have a slight headache today.
Tom had big blue eyes.
Tom died from pneumonia.
Tom didn't have a dog.
Tom cried out in pain.
Tom is always grumbling about something.
I want to talk to Tom now.
I made no promises.
No one misses you.
No one misses you.
She's wearing high heels.
Tom has lots of acquaintances but very few friends.
You're lucky Tom is your friend.
The new waiter should be much more competent.
Even the moon was jealous of her beauty.
Have you lost your tongue? Why don't you answer?
What's his professor's name?
She gave her seat to a senior citizen.
She gave up her seat for the old person.
She came very near to being run over by a car.
Some children are swimming in the river.
Don't talk rubbish.
There sure are a lot of people at Sensouji.
I recommend Maui.
The train came to a smooth stop.
Did you get an answer from Tom?
Only Takeuchi didn't accept the invitation.
We were very sleepy the next morning.
Tom phoned to say he would be a little late.
What about Tom?
What about Tom?
That's sad.
The queen visited the museum.
Come in for a minute.
Come in for a minute.
He earns not more than 50 dollars a week.
He earns not more than 50 dollars a week.
It was my error, not Tom's.
He saved money for the trip.
You're not giving up, are you?
I want to thank you for all your help.
How much does Tom earn a month?
My dream is to become a very strong mahjong player.
Rice is grown in many parts of the world.
The patient is now out of danger.
My father often takes me to baseball games.
She did not visit me on Sunday but on Monday.
She has a negative attitude toward life.
She is singing the latest popular songs.
She took the tablecloths to the laundry.
How do I turn this off?
Fill the bucket with water.
Fill the bucket with water.
Their daughter claims to see monsters.
Tom turned on the tap.
At what time do you eat lunch and supper?
At what time do you eat lunch and supper?
At what time do you eat lunch and supper?
Her mother is a good pianist.
She as well as her friends is fond of music.
It is absurd to try to persuade them.
They assigned the task to us.
He was in the habit of taking a walk after supper.
He tried to unify the various groups.
He likes to sing popular songs.
He turned off the light and he went to bed.
He looked for every possible means of escape.
He hovered between life and death.
He's the kind of guy who doesn't take women seriously.
He listened to my opinion.
He rushed out of the office.
He expressed himself clearly.
He found me a nice tie.
He works as a teacher, but actually he is a spy.
He realized his dream of becoming an artist.
He is by far the best student.
It scared the daylights out of him.
He didn't participate in the discussion.
You'll recognize Tom.
You'll recognize Tom.
Who found Tom?
Who hit Tom?
Where're Tom's things?
Where's Tom's office?
We're friends of Tom's.
We're ignoring Tom.
We're ignoring Tom.
We're embarrassing Tom.
We're avoiding Tom.
We'll miss Tom.
We're going to find Tom.
We'll follow Tom.
We'll meet Tom.
We'll convince Tom.
We'll get in touch with Tom.
We tricked Tom.
We surrounded Tom.
We saw Tom.
We saw Tom.
We recognized Tom.
We miss Tom.
We miss Tom.
We loved Tom.
We love Tom.
Who hired Tom?
We caught Tom.
We arrested Tom.
Wait for Tom.
Wait for Tom.
Tom's wife called.
Tom's bed's empty.
Both of Tom's parents died when he was just a baby, so he doesn't remember either one of them.
I have heard nothing from him for five years.
Is there any possibility that he'll win the election?
Please pour him a glass of beer.
Why doesn't that bother you?
Japanese has something in common with Korean.
It took us two hours to get to Tokyo by train.
It makes no difference who I meet.
Would you draw me a map?
My grandfather died of a disease at eighty.
Watch your toes.
I swear I will never do such a thing.
Never trust a stranger.
Don't apologize.
Would you like to eat with us?
I want a book to read in the train.
I persuaded him to be examined by the doctor.
I informed him of her arrival.
Tom wasn't there yesterday.
Tom was absent yesterday.
Do you talk to your plants?
Do you talk to your plants?
At the next intersection, take a right.
A true love story never ends.
You scared us.
You've frightened us.
You've frightened us.
You scared us.
You scared us.
You scared us.
Can I have a towel, please?
Tom has a horse.
Tom and I haven't seen each other since we were in kindergarten.
This rule applies to all cases.
Does that scare you?
Does that frighten you?
Obey your parents.
Obey your parents.
Nobody was around.
Nobody asked Tom.
Nobody asked Tom.
We're going to miss you.
We're going to miss you.
Listen to your mother.
Listen to your mother.
I have a very pretty girlfriend.
Princess Diana's tragic death shocked the world.
I had it in the hand luggage.
You don't know where Tom's home is, do you?
I'd like to speak with my lawyer.
I'd like to speak with my lawyer.
Tom doesn't want to eat lunch now.
I surrendered.
We didn't want to worry you.
It does bother me.
You're going to lose.
You're going to lose.
Tom's computer is not responding.
No, I'm not sleepy.
He thought he met his match at last.
Hatred doesn't just appear out of thin air, it usually starts from envy or fear.
Tom and his wife have three children.
Tom has a large closet in his bedroom.
Is Tom injured?
Explain your idea more clearly.
Mother was surprised at the news.
Tom's hair is long.
OK, I think I get it.
What's Tom's address?
I didn't get an invitation.
I didn't get the invitation.
I remonstrated with him about his treatment of his children.
National pride counts among those things which I don't understand.
I don't want you to panic.
Their job is to iron clothes.
I iron my clothes almost every day.
Tell her that I am ironing my clothes.
She finished ironing the clothes a few minutes ago.
When was the last time you ironed your clothes?
Tom ironed his clothes.
Texting while driving is very dangerous.
That would be a tragedy.
That would take hours.
That would take time.
That's all we know about Tom.
I appreciate everything you've done for me.
I appreciate everything you've done for me.
I appreciate everything you've done for me.
You were in love.
She was surprised at his appearance.
Tom has no right to say that.
They've had plenty of time.
Did you speak to Tom today?
How can I get to the nearest post office?
Here is a basket full of vegetables.
My beloved friend: no matter where you go, I will find you.
I don't know whether Tom will eat with us or not.
Make haste, or you will be late.
It's your body. Take care of it.
Her way of speaking irritates us.
You have a very nice smile.
I want to kiss Tom.
I want to kiss Tom.
I was listening to my iPod, so I didn't hear the fire alarm.
I was confronted with many difficulties.
I met a friend of mine at the airport.
I caught the man stealing the money.
I'd like to read some books about the Beatles.
I don't want to share the hotel room with a stranger.
I read all kinds of books.
I couldn't meet him at the station because my car ran out of gas.
My house is on the skirts of the town.
What's in your backpack?
Children should be taught not to tell lies.
The supplies are beginning to give out.
Which of the composers do you like best?
Tom didn't have the courage to go there alone.
The trouble is that it costs too much.
Have you heard from your sister lately?
She was very bored during the lecture.
You should be careful what you say.
Kenji decided to become a cook.
Look! Two boys are fighting.
Tom is taking a bath.
Tom is taking a bath.
There's no more butter in the fridge.
You should wash your hands.
He had some urgent news to tell me.
Tom came out of the bathroom with only a towel on.
Just a second. This call might be important.
John lit a match.
He went to the hardware store to get a shovel.
I can tell by his accent that he is German.
Ai and Mariko are close friends. They go everywhere together.
Tom bought a mask and a snorkel so he could go snorkeling with his friends.
I need some answers from Tom.
We all know that you're angry.
We all know that you're angry.
No one informed me of his failure.
Look at the top of that tree.
I found the book at that bookstore by chance.
When was this car washed?
It was not until I visited Australia that I realized how small Japan was.
Could you bring this flower to Kate?
Could you put my name on the waiting list?
Where does Tom shop?
This table has a smooth surface.
This computer runs on batteries.
This mushroom is not good to eat.
This smell disgusts me.
You can't use this faucet. It's out of order.
This plant is good to eat.
Slip on your shoes.
A computer is an absolute necessity now.
I don't drink before noon.
Air is a mixture of gases.
Jack isn't here. He may have missed his usual bus.
In Singapore, it is a crime to spit on the ground.
Jon is far more attractive than Tom.
Everyone should exercise their right to vote.
The remark was aimed at you.
It will take an hour to get there.
Did you pay for those shoes?
How does the song go?
The young woman was carrying an infant in her arms.
The meaning of this sentence is obscure.
The author doesn't display much talent in his book.
I spent the whole evening reading the poetry of Kenji Miyazawa.
I got it for free.
The train was ten minutes behind time.
Do not give in to those demands.
It gave me the creeps.
The influence of TV on society is great.
Tom stood on the platform in Westminster Underground Station.
Tom is liked by his friends.
I'd rather walk than take a bus.
If you go by bus, you can get there in about one-third of the time.
I'm not going to turn Tom in.
I'm not going to talk to Tom.
She's way out your league.
I felt the wind blowing on my face.
If it were not for plants, we wouldn't be able to live.
We are subject to the laws of nature.
The doctor continued to observe the patient's behavior.
It seems that the rainy season has set in.
Space travel was thought to be impossible.
Learning English is hard work.
When is it convenient for you?
We were worried we might miss the train.
We communicated with each other by gesture.
The fire was extinguished at once.
Call me at my office.
I suggested that we bring the meeting to an end.
A nurse wears white.
I am tired of eating at the school cafeteria.
Kyoto is worth visiting.
What are you learning from the teacher?
There is a hole in your sock.
You and Tom were happy together, weren't you?
He may not have known the formula.
I want you to work with Tom.
He advised me on my study.
He advised me on my study.
Here, have some candy.
I have to make sure Tom is OK.
Tom is heading home.
We're heading home.
I'm heading home.
The fever has abated.
They lost again. "You don't say. What's that, eight in a row?"
Tom always hugs his son when he returns from work.
Rice is a grain that feeds billions of people.
China is the world's leading producer of rice.
China is the world's leading producer of rice.
I have lived many shameful events during my life.
They cost too much.
That's what scared me.
We were having lunch.
It's not the volts that kill you it's the amps.
Dr. Johnson is a professor at the university.
There are a lot of eggs in the basket.
Where did you get all this wisdom?
Don't throw stones at the dog.
Don't throw stones at the dog.
I don't want to interrupt Tom while he's speaking.
What we're doing now is very dangerous.
She moved to Paris in 1906.
The battalion surrendered to the enemy.
That coin is counterfeit.
Swallow it. Don't chew it.
It was a very fortunate meeting.
I'll make an effort to complete the work today.
Friedrich Nietzsche was a German philosopher.
Let me have a talk with Tom.
Let me have a talk with Tom.
It's useless talking to Tom.
I heard you and Tom talking.
I can talk to Tom for hours.
I usually wake up at 6.
We're celebrating Tom's birthday.
Tom often dreams of his girlfriend.
What a shame!
We're celebrating Tom's birthday.
Are we to remove our shoes before entering the house?
Tom is good at it.
Please don't translate this sentence.
She's very religious.
He's very religious.
She was wearing a fur coat.
This is a public beach.
Tom didn't have a sore throat.
I begged Tom to stay.
We could go eat together.
Tom respects his parents.
Tom is in charge of the barbecue.
I am not available.
Who's your favorite Japanese singer?
What's your favorite poem?
I don't live with Tom.
Tom's house must be around here somewhere.
Tom ate a Japanese-style breakfast for the first time yesterday.
Did you know I'm French?
She sat and lit a cigarette up.
What is Tom's girlfriend's name?
I swear I'll stop you.
I swear I'm telling the truth.
I swear it was Tom.
I swear it wasn't me.
I swear it wasn't my fault.
I swear it's the last time.
I swear to God I didn't kill Tom.
Tom's letters stopped coming.
Tom just contacted us.
There are two cars in his garage.
He's a car salesman.
I'll call you later from the office.
Meat is very expensive nowadays.
You should conform to the rules.
You should conform to the rules.
Tom's parents are divorced.
I'm looking forward to seeing you as well.
I think Tom has a plan.
You've told me that joke before.
You've told me that joke before.
We tried to make the best of it.
She has a small advantage.
He has a small advantage.
Tom is in a panic.
Tom's eyes are shut.
It's dangerous out there.
Tom doesn't even have a pencil.
We can't do this ourselves.
Tom has got some bad news to tell you.
Tom is looking forward to seeing you.
Tom narrowly escaped death.
We raced toward the fire.
Tom has a beard.
Tom has a long beard.
Tom has a thick beard.
Tom has a beard now.
The peace talks failed again.
I have a package for Tom.
In Japan, are nurses high on the social scale?
Have you talked to Tom's parents?
Have you talked to Tom's parents?
Did you talk to Tom about me yet?
Did you talk to Tom about me yet?
Tom earns a good salary.
Tom kept his true feelings hidden from everyone.
Tom kept his true feelings hidden from everyone.
Maybe we should talk to Tom again.
Is now a good time to talk to Tom?
Are we talking about the same Tom?
I want to talk to Tom after school.
Her father was a diplomat in Kenya.
Tom talked me into joining his club.
I don't want to talk to Tom anymore.
I don't want to talk to Tom anymore.
How did Tom ever talk you into this?
Did you get a chance to talk to Tom?
Did you have a chance to talk to Tom?
How did you talk Tom into doing that?
How did you talk Tom into doing that?
You'll have to talk to Tom about that.
You'll have to talk to Tom about that.
You asked me to talk to Tom, remember?
You asked me to talk to Tom, remember?
Wake up, Tom. I've got to talk to you.
Tom and I didn't get a chance to talk.
Tom and I didn't get a chance to talk.
What do you and Tom usually talk about?
King Solomon was known for his wisdom.
The patient is always complaining of a headache.
The patient is always complaining of a headache.
Have you tried talking to Tom about that?
Have you tried talking to Tom about that?
Have you had a chance to talk to Tom yet?
Have you had a chance to talk to Tom yet?
Do you want me to talk to Tom about that?
Do you want me to talk to Tom about that?
We know it was you that killed Tom.
We know it was you that killed Tom.
Tom and I talked about this three weeks ago.
How long has it been since you talked to Tom?
How long has it been since you talked to Tom?
Tom reached for a towel.
Bricks consist mostly of clay.
Tom smells weird.
You're weird - I like you.
Tom came 30 minutes late.
He opened the bag's zipper.
What would you do if you were in Tom's place?
What would you have done in Tom's place?
What would you have done in Tom's place?
The curtains are closed.
I heard about what happened to Tom.
We've done the impossible.
We've got to find somewhere to hide.
We've got to find Tom first.
We've never seen Tom like this before.
No, Tom, that's too dangerous!
I'll get my diploma in two years.
That factory manufactures toys.
That factory manufactures toys.
That factory makes toys.
Tom didn't mean to insult anybody.
Does anybody else have a complaint?
Tom dried his face with a towel.
When are you going to talk to Tom about that?
When are you going to talk to Tom about that?
I wonder why Tom was late.
I won't obey those orders.
I won't let you ruin this.
I won't leave without Tom.
Tom's funeral is on Monday.
We stopped at the monastery and went inside.
Send Tom home.
I want to know who is in charge.
Can you do me a favor? "It depends."
You must convince Tom to stop smoking.
You must convince Tom to stop smoking.
You must convince Tom to stop smoking.
Tom had a look of desperation on his face.
Everyone laughed at Tom.
You aren't perfect.
You aren't perfect.
I'm not a connoisseur.
You intimidate Tom.
You're scaring Tom.
You're so naive.
You're so naive.
You're so naive.
You're so naive.
You're so naive.
You're talking nonsense.
Isn't it time for lunch?
Tom asked me where I had bought my bicycle.
Tom tried to act normal, but you could tell from his facial expression and demeanour that he was seething with rage.
There's still some cream in the fridge.
There's still some cream in the fridge.
Ask Tom to explain it.
We have failed.
Do you feel like eating?
Tom's house is easy to find.
Tom's eyes are bloodshot.
I caught a very beautiful butterfly.
It is better for the health to live in the country than in the city.
Nowadays, books are accessible to everyone.
We hope for the best but expect the worst.
We may fall ill at any moment.
Tom's nose was red.
Tom isn't home yet.
If we don't end war, war will end us.
Put the tables end to end.
Put the tables end to end.
The store was relatively empty.
It was a sight to see.
You can always rely on Tom.
I knew I shouldn't have talked to Tom.
I thought you'd already talked to Tom.
Stop worrying about what happened to Tom.
Tom was unable to hide his tears.
Guinness is my favorite beer.
Those people are political allies and will help each other.
I dropped her a broad hint, but she didn't catch on.
Tom is playing it cool.
Youth is always right. Those who follow the counsels of youth are wise.
I often have bad dreams.
Could you describe Tom's demeanor?
Tom is a rug dealer.
Tom has ants in his pants.
Tom is hard of hearing.
Do you feel any attraction for this book?
According to the police, no one was injured.
He finished this work by himself.
I'm making a doll for Anna.
Do you want to eat now or later?
I thought you'd already talked to Tom.
It only takes a little to make you feel at home.
Ken knows Tom.
You hid the truth from me.
I was offended by his behavior.
A swarm of mosquitoes followed him.
A swarm of mosquitoes followed him.
Zainab is very fat. She eats five meals a day. Zainab's weight is 100 kg.
We can't stop Tom.
We can't stop Tom.
I thought it was the perfect time to leave.
I thought it was the perfect time to leave.
Do you recognize this key?
Do you recognize this?
It's really annoying.
Did you kill Tom?
Stop making such a fuss!
The little girl managed to keep silent, having been terrified by the lightning.
Tom has a lot of great ideas.
How can I stop Tom?
I'm so grateful.
Tom was grateful.
The general lived the rest of his life peacefully after his retirement.
The victory excited us.
I have a picture of the airport.
No matter what happens, I'll support you.
No one is more determined than I am.
Can you remember the first time you swam?
We advertise our products on TV.
My relationship with Tom isn't your concern.
I'm just happy for Tom.
The fact is we don't know what's going on around us.
I have butterflies in my stomach.
Instead of ink, there was some unidentified liquid in the bottle.
Are you sure you don't want to go shopping with us?
I don't have an office in this building.
I won't let Tom down.
Tom's great-great-grandfather was a slave.
Take me to Tom.
Take me to Tom.
We all hated Tom.
I recognized Tom.
Are you sure you don't want me to take you to the hospital?
Are you sure you don't want me to take you to the hospital?
Hasn't anyone seen Tom?
He is dead to all sense of shame.
It was so cold that I stayed at home all day.
Watch out! The car almost ran over you.
I'm very popular.
Mary missed Tom.
My hands are cold.
Where did you pick up that accent?
Tom has no right to give me orders.
Tom has no right to give me orders.
Get rid of him.
Get rid of him.
Tom's daughter was murdered.
This isn't possible without Tom's help.
I lit the candle.
I've danced so much that I'm dizzy.
We ate fish and rice.
I don't want to hear any complaints.
Tom and I are not a couple.
That's a total lie.
You should've followed Tom's orders.
Tom wants to eat with us.
You should've seen Tom's face.
You should've asked Tom for advice.
You should've talked to Tom first.
I should've been more polite.
Do you think we should've talked to Tom about this?
I should've been more careful.
I should've stayed with Tom.
You should've asked Tom first.
You should've asked Tom first.
You should've asked Tom first.
The situation has come to the point where we either sink or swim.
Go along this street and you'll come to the post office on the left.
I learn Esperanto almost every day.
They've fired him.
Tom already has plans for this weekend.
Antibiotics were discovered at the beginning of the twentieth century.
Tom has a son.
A lady's imagination is very rapid; it jumps from admiration to love, from love to matrimony, in a moment.
The world is running short on the oil.
The money was put into a special fund to buy books for the school library.
I'll be back as soon as I find Tom.
You'd better go with Tom.
Get dressed quickly.
He wrote example sentences all night.
I won't take up too much of your time.
You have a mosquito on your right forearm.
We look for good luck, bad luck looks for us.
Don't stoop to Tom's level.
I'm still in love with Tom.
My aunt had been in the hospital for a week when I visited her.
He just had food, he cannot be hungry.
They found it difficult to earn a living.
I haven't found a good place to pitch our tent yet.
Does Tom have long hair?
You're very efficient.
There's nothing the matter with Tom.
It's nice to see Tom so happy.
We'll look into these problems.
I can't make Tom stop.
They agreed to give us an interview.
He went ballistic.
The boy took no notice of his father's advice.
I always list what I need before I go shopping.
My son is apt to be absent from school.
I don't drink alcohol.
Tom is an interesting fellow.
I know how much you meant to Tom.
He resembles his father in his way of talking.
I progress steadily. My efforts are paying off.
I'll grab a taxi and be right there.
This is the couple who showed me the way.
I think you dropped this.
The young men of Japan are apt to jump on the bandwagon.
She has good handwriting.
It's obvious why your stomach hurts.
Tom really does hate dogs.
I think we've made some real progress.
It seems rather expensive to me.
More than a billion people live in China.
What did the racing driver say?
I think you've hurt Tom's feelings.
Tom only has five health points left.
Money doesn't excite me. It calms me.
No offence. "None taken."
No offence. "None taken."
Why do you always take Tom's side?
It's just an expression.
Tom looked into the fridge.
Tom has never been to a circus.
Tom has a list of things to do.
That bothers me.
They're always careful.
Tom never washes his car.
How many of these pills did you take?
I'm taking Tom to the hospital.
I'll never listen to Tom again.
If the medicine isn't working, maybe we should up the dosage.
Tom is the name of Tom.
We look forward to seeing you again.
Winners don't use drugs.
This is the most recent picture of Tom I have.
I think I may have a picture of Tom I can show you.
She begged me to come.
Tom begged me to come.
She came home crying.
Tom picked up the remote control.
The law is not always fair.
The mother wakes up her daughter.
I've loved you since we were teenagers.
He stepped into dog shit.
Tom was stumped by the problem.
Since he did not fit within any preexisting religion, he decided to establish his own.
It was wrong. I should have told you the truth.
I know who stole your diary.
You shouldn't spend more money than you earn.
I don't say goodbye, I say "until next time."
I can't give you any more details at this time.
Do you like the frame on this painting?
Tom doesn't even have a pair of shoes.
That was very rude.
The doctor thinks Tom's problem is psychological.
Tom has a serious problem.
Tom already has a plan.
Tom covered his head with his pillow.
I spoke to Tom last night.
I spoke to Tom last night.
I spoke to Tom last night.
That's not a good sign.
Tom is your guitar teacher, isn't he?
The notebook is lying on the table.
They were attacked.
Did you do that purposely?
Did you do that purposely?
One of them is a spy.
I'd never hire Tom.
His accent suggests he is a foreigner.
She misses him.
I want to get rid of it.
I want to get rid of it.
I've always wanted to go to another country.
I've always wanted to visit another country.
How did you kill Tom?
How did you kill Tom?
How did you kill Tom?
I'll be outside if you need me.
I've never been skiing.
China has more than a billion inhabitants.
How can I reach you?
I enjoy long walks on the beach.
Tom hasn't been in school.
I've been thinking.
Tom was in pain, but tried to hide it.
I've got no secrets from Tom.
Usually, Greek tragedies don't end well.
Tom quickly got dressed.
Something offended her.
Anyone can wrong a painter.
Her attitude irks me.
Her attitude irks me.
You'll find another buyer.
I look forward to it.
Everybody knows I hate Tom.
Tom has the same birthday as me.
The hotel cancelled Tom's reservation.
It's impossible to dine at this restaurant without reservations.
Why would Tom take that risk?
Tom's mother and sister had breast cancer.
Do you know Tom's full name?
Tell Tom to come to my office right away.
This bicycle is mine. Yours is over there.
The thunder was so loud that we could barely hear each other.
Sing us a song in French.
He's a member of the Royal Society for the Protection of Birds.
It's Friday! Time to get drunk.
It's Friday! Time to get drunk.
She's waking up.
Thank you for your purchase!
The stone is perfectly smooth.
Her skin is perfectly smooth.
I hardly recognized Tom.
I hardly knew Tom.
I hardly recognized Tom.
I hardly remember Tom.
Tom doesn't need a lawyer.
Tom got out of bed and got dressed.
I don't translate for free.
We needed a break.
Tom went out for a walk.
I should have taken the blue pill.
Tom has an iPhone.
The refrigerator is open.
I don't keep a diary.
Tom is in the other room getting dressed.
Tom is in trouble.
Tom is missing a finger.
Ken visited his teacher yesterday.
Tom is wearing a mask.
Everyone but Tom is wearing a hat.
I need to make a copy.
This is going to take some time to explain.
Are you angry at me? "You bet I am!"
Are you angry at me? "You bet I am!"
Freedom weighs more than silver and gold.
You despise Tom, don't you?
Tom receives more than 50 emails a day.
Tom drew a spaceship.
Tom is wearing a blue bandana on his head.
You've got nothing to apologize for.
The tragedy happened suddenly.
Tom is our best pilot.
Tom leaned back in his chair.
Tom never lets his children watch TV after 10:00 p.m.
She should not have married Tom.
Hello, may I speak to Tom?
Tom passed away.
Tom passed away three months ago.
Tom shot me in the leg.
His name has slipped my mind.
I forgot to bring the book. It just slipped my mind.
Tom took off his bicycle helmet and put it on the table.
Tom wasn't at home yesterday.
Who gave you this envelope?
Who gave you this envelope?
Why does the donkey have such long ears?
I wasn't careful enough.
Tom crossed the room.
Tom committed suicide by jumping off a cliff.
I want to stay home and read a book.
He did not respect the rules.
Change underwear daily.
It's a miracle! The link works!
I know you're worried about Tom.
Don't interrupt me when I'm talking.
Thanks for translating my sentences.
They struggled to make ends meet.
Tom carried the boxes upstairs.
Tom carried the tool box into the garage.
Tom confessed that he had broken the window.
Tom could go to jail for this.
Tom could go to jail for three years.
Recently, everything seems boring to me.
Tom left his textbook in the car.
We forgot all about Tom.
We forgot all about Tom.
The nurse gave you a sedative.
The teacher wrote something on the blackboard.
Tom and Mary were in love with each other.
That skirt is long.
I'm Tom's new secretary.
I won't take those pills.
Tom shares an apartment with three friends.
Tom can't tell the difference between cheap and expensive wine.
I prefer translating old sentences to adding new ones.
I'm fully aware of that.
I'm glad I ran into you.
I'm glad I ran into you.
Do you miss me?
Have you missed me?
She's eating fruit.
I apologize again.
Tom lost his French textbook.
We are faced with new kinds of diseases.
Are you and Tom still together?
You forgot to turn off the lights.
You forgot to turn off the lights.
The enemy attacked us at night.
There is cat hair all over the place.
Tom has a wife and kids.
Tom has a wife and kids.
Tom has health problems.
Tom has family problems.
Tom changed the sheets on his bed.
Be sincere with me.
May I have your email, please?
Now it's time for the weather forecast.
Now it's time for the weather forecast.
Have you talked to Tom yet?
Tom and I are separated.
All of our blood goes through our kidneys about sixty times a day.
Maybe you didn't understand Tom.
I am as much in love as on the first day.
I was surprised Tom wasn't here yesterday.
She is gaining weight.
The statement is not wholly true.
Tom seems to be anxious to get going.
The red light has gone off.
She will follow Tom.
You cannot translate the sentence word-for-word.
I must ask you about Tom.
I have to walk to school.
Don't go anywhere without Tom.
Tom is making great progress in French.
We're running short of food.
The world needs to develop new energy sources in place of oil.
I've been studying French with Tom.
Tom was suffocating.
Mr. Suzuki persuaded his son to drop his plan to study abroad.
Do you want to live like slaves?
Did you remember to thank Tom?
Tom told me you were retired.
I was impressed with Tom's French.
I'd like to meet Tom's sister.
Armin broke the window.
She is not a nurse, but a doctor.
I saw many tourists on the beach.
Keep working hard!
Meg has a facility for languages.
Tom barged into the room.
We're wasting precious time.
Tom's plan is perfect.
Wait for me outside.
Wait for me outside.
Meet me at my office.
You may be right. But it doesn't matter.
If you don't believe me, ask Tom.
If you don't believe me, ask Tom.
If you don't believe me, ask Tom.
If you don't believe me, ask Tom.
No one is there but Tom.
I left a message for Tom.
Tom struggled frantically.
Tom has very little experience.
I saw you outside.
My father had a heart attack yesterday, but he was lucky to have a clinic close at hand.
Perhaps Tom is guilty.
I met with Tom today.
Please make yourself comfortable.
I'd like to take this opportunity to thank you for all the trust you've placed in us.
There are sentences whose translation into certain languages doesn't make sense and, therefore, should be avoided.
There are sentences whose translation into certain languages doesn't make sense and, therefore, should be avoided.
I ran outside.
I ran outside.
Please set the table.
Please set the table.
At this rate, we're not likely to be done before the end of the week.
It's Tom's birthday next week.
I read jokes almost every day.
OK, I'm persuaded.
We are faced with a host of problems.
I never told anybody about it, I swear.
Put everything in my basket.
Put everything in my basket.
Tom's funeral was three days ago.
The two candidates are neck and neck.
The system is under maintenance.
He is running around like a headless chicken.
A very well known wine is produced in that region.
I miss you so much.
I miss you badly.
I'm going to miss you so much.
I'm going to miss you so much.
I'll miss you very much.
Don't you recognize me?
Don't you recognize me?
You don't recognize me, do you?
You don't recognize me, do you?
Tom has a new car.
This explains it without a doubt.
I got rid of my old fridge.
She's rolling in money.
The little girl has a doll in her hands.
Please call Tom.
It's human nature.
Tom's behaviour is unpredictable when he's drunk.
Tom's behaviour is unpredictable when he's drunk.
Someone is in the kitchen with Tom.
Tom and I are brothers.
They saw a mouse.
They saw a mouse.
We'll need to ask Tom for permission.
Tom can play the guitar.
The teacher made the students do a lot of homework.
I asked Tom not to overreact.
It is no use trying to solve the riddle.
The prince and the princess fell instantly in love.
The princess fell in love with the prince instantly.
The beautiful princess fell in love with the prince.
I thought Tom had given up.
I couldn't think of anything worse.
We are looking forward to seeing you and your family.
The doctors were treating the wounded.
This one is free.
They despise Tom.
I saw Tom again last night.
I saw Tom again last night.
That was Tom's mother.
You're bugging me.
What did Tom go outside for?
Don't break the branches.
Don't break the branches.
This might be Tom's desk.
Can you stay till 2:30?
You can always try doing it by yourself.
You shouldn't try to do everything by yourself.
Laws are there to protect people from themselves.
The forest is home to many different kinds of plants and animals.
Tom lost his voice.
Tom isn't at home now.
Tom is trying to do the impossible.
We have every advantage over them.
Tom wants to say goodbye.
You're just a little homesick.
How long is this movie?
Tom doesn't have a computer.
Perhaps we should take a short break.
Tom had a good idea.
We're resigning.
It's not at all uncommon.
I want to reserve a first-class stateroom.
Let's explore the possibilities.
Tom ate pancakes for breakfast.
This land is ideal for farming.
We have plenty to talk about.
Tom misses his family a lot.
Here's something to think about.
It's eleven and he's not coming.
I couldn't get Tom to wake up.
I couldn't get Tom to wake up.
Please try to stay calm.
Isn’t love supposed to last forever?
Someone has stolen Tom's guitar.
This car is Tom's.
It's Tom's phone.
Tom's room is empty.
The credit is all his.
That's Tom's daughter.
She loves poetry and music.
She liked poetry and music.
I'm pretty sure I won't see Tom again.
I'm pretty sure I won't see Tom again.
I'm pretty sure I'll never see Tom again.
Catch it and bring it to Darwin.
Catch it and bring it to Darwin.
Catch it and bring it to Darwin.
Catch it and bring it to Darwin.
Maybe I shouldn't have given Tom my old bicycle.
It's a mixture of culture, language, and religion.
It's extremely dangerous.
That's extremely dangerous.
She was surprised to learn this.
He was surprised to learn this.
If there's anything I can do for you, don't hesitate to let me know.
There was a bullet hole in the windshield.
Tom is exuberant.
Please get the clothes in before it rains.
I went out for a walk.
If you can't explain it simply, you don't understand it well enough.
I spent the whole afternoon trying to avoid Tom.
Look, it's a save point! You know you want it!
Draw me a seven-pointed star.
Draw me a seven-pointed star.
I think Tom is objective.
It's the least I can do.
Eventually, he hit the target.
Eventually, he hit the target.
He's a fantastic person.
She's a fantastic person.
She is a reflection of her mother.
The management said that a wage increase was out of the question.
It was really annoying.
Tom said you were angry.
Tom said you were angry.
Tom probably thought I was angry.
I feel dizzy every time I stand up.
Tom is going to be angry.
We need to be more careful.
We need to take a break.
It's going to take a little time to explain it all.
They're allies.
This girl has a pretty face. My heart melts from looking at it.
She is gentle to animals.
She is gentle to animals.
I promise I'll take good care of your dog.
An elephant is an enormous animal.
I'll be upstairs if you need me.
The cat has hidden under the bench.
The cat has hidden under the bench.
Solitude is independence.
Tom raised the three children by himself.
Don't put so much pepper in the soup.
What killed Tom?
We took a long walk.
I told him to come visit us.
I told her to come visit us.
We must find a more efficient method.
We are going to visit Versailles.
Tom is tone deaf.
Tom is tone deaf.
The police are following us.
Your watch is five minutes slow.
Your watch is five minutes slow.
The food is terrible.
Quite the contrary, I'm the one who must ask for forgiveness.
By the age of 25, she had lived in five different countries.
Gas is an important natural resource.
With a little more patience, you would have succeeded.
Is this your office?
I'm terribly hungry.
How did you survive?
Tom was hiding in the mountains.
He was easily influenced.
She's easily influenced.
Tom is easily influenced.
He was a great influence on me.
The girl was given a prize for good conduct.
We don't even know how to contact Tom.
I have the word on the tip of my tongue.
Tom is my patient.
Look around.
Look around.
He looked around uneasily.
Tom looked around carefully.
Your handwriting is messy.
Your handwriting is messy.
Your handwriting is messy.
This movie is boring.
It's very sexy.
I hate ironing.
But how does this story end?
It's not true!
When did you meet Tom?
I read Tom's diary.
I hate being bored.
He graduated from Harvard.
I want you to make me a promise.
You can't put a "thank you" inside your pocket.
Everything she does shows that she has character.
He wrote a biography of a famous poet.
I wash my car almost every day.
Have the guests eaten?
I need to warn Tom that there may be a few problems.
That's why Tom doesn't have a girlfriend.
Tom and I weren't friends.
The scenery is really splendid.
She is very careful, so she seldom makes mistakes.
It's difficult to please Tom.
I haven't asked Tom yet.
It looks like we're running out of water.
War is very profitable for the neocons. A war in Ukraine and against Russia can only be a great opportunity for business to them.
Turn off the water.
Shut off the water.
You give up too easily.
How much time do you spend on homework every day?
Tom offered to carry my suitcase.
I didn't know there was a pond here.
Tom and I'll wait for you.
Did you see yesterday's match against Australia?
Did you see yesterday's match against Australia?
You must work hard, if you want to succeed.
I am going to get dressed.
Do you think they'll find Tom?
He presented an argument for the war.
Don't you know how dangerous it is to go swimming by yourself?
Don't expect me to do it for you. It's your baby.
I wish I'd never been born.
Pure mathematics is religion.
May I turn off the lights?
The evidence is questionable.
At the time I was convinced that was the case.
I'm supposed to do everything by myself.
I was supposed to meet Tom here yesterday.
Tom was supposed to be here all afternoon.
You are supposed to be back by noon.
How are we supposed to find Tom?
Tom was supposed to be our lawyer.
Excuse me. Who are you?
Days go by and still no sign of Tom.
I don't give a damn what people think about me.
The reason for this is obvious.
Tom has a guest.
You are the fifth wheel on the wagon.
I am the chosen one.
Did you taste the rice?
Did you taste the rice?
Did you taste the rice?
I recommend studying French.
Do you know how to start a fire using just sticks of wood?
I wonder why they chose Tom.
Tom didn't really know what to say.
I just wanted to protect you.
I only wanted to protect you.
Are you sure you don't want me to talk to Tom?
Tom is away on business.
Tom has been arrested.
None of it matters.
I now understand that the woman I thought was a nurse is a doctor.
Were you born in the twentieth century?
Please get out of the pool.
Tom's voice quavered, betraying him.
How easily one acquires bad habits!
Ask Tom instead.
Ask Tom instead.
Ask Tom instead.
Ask Tom instead.
I shouldn't have asked Tom to help.
I shouldn't have asked Tom to help.
Tom hung his diploma on the wall.
Tom and I want you to come with us.
Tom and I want you to come with us.
She makes more money than I do.
You make more money than I do. "That's because you don't have a job, Tom!"
You agree with Tom, don't you?
You agree with Tom, don't you?
When you see Tom, you'll understand.
When you see Tom, you'll understand.
Don't let go.
Everybody calls me Tom.
I didn't know much about Tom.
The pain went away because I took the pills.
Say it isn't true.
Tom doesn't look very well. Is he sick?
Tom doesn't like washing dishes.
It was Tom's idea to try it this way.
He lost the game.
He lost the game.
Tom is perfect.
She fainted at the sight of a tiger.
It's very convenient.
Tom sat patiently.
Have you lost your tongue? Why can't you answer a simple question?
I'd be careful with that if I were you.
I'd be careful with that if I were you.
I missed you for all this time.
I missed you for all this time.
Do you want to see some magic?
Want to see a magic trick?
Want to see a magic trick?
I'll see Tom tonight.
He had handsome dark eyes with long lashes.
Tom closed his textbook.
I have a dim memory of my grandmother.
These towels are different colors.
I go to bed after I study.
That could come in handy.
That's all I worry about.
That's all I care about.
He got what he deserved.
I thought you were working for Tom.
I am badly in need of your help.
I don't want to cause you any trouble.
The street lamps don't give enough light.
Soon the same waiter came back to pick up the dishes.
Don't grow old, grow wise!
This sentence doesn't make sense.
My predictions were accurate.
My ears are still ringing.
My van doesn't have a back seat.
But wasn't it expensive?
But wasn't it expensive?
We waited outside.
My customers never complain.
My instructions were clear.
My strength isn't back yet.
Don't ever wear that tie again.
Don't ever wear that tie again.
Don't ever wear that tie again.
Don't ever wear that tie again.
It's useless to argue.
I'm a little dizzy.
I can ride a bike.
I can ride a bike.
I don't have a bike.
I can't buy a bike.
Where's the mail box?
Tom isn't strong enough to lift that.
My decision is final.
Where are you headed?
Where are you headed?
Why am I so sleepy?
The wind is blowing from the south.
Look around you and tell me what you see.
Look around you and tell me what you see.
I hope this doesn't ruin our friendship.
My brother isn't waiting for the bus, he's going by foot.
Where's your friend?
You should be brief.
She advised him to go by bicycle.
Who's Tom's girlfriend?
What kind of nonsense are you talking about?
It's not the fidelity that bothers him.
Nonsense.
Tom never breaks promises.
You broke your promise.
You made a promise.
You made a promise.
They made a promise.
Tom made a promise.
Do you realize what this means?
Do you recognize this key?
Do you recognize this?
I don't think we have enough food.
The plane took off at 11:00 a.m; thirty minutes later than scheduled.
We have to be very careful.
We have to be very careful.
When was the last time you brushed your teeth?
When was the last time you brushed your teeth?
I know you don't know Tom.
I know you don't know Tom.
I know you don't know Tom.
I know you don't know Tom.
Tom isn't cut out to be a teacher.
Don't scare the children.
Don't scare the children.
Give me something to eat.
Tom breaks the rules.
Tom and I are related.
I ought to punch you for saying that.
I saw Tom there.
I won't be bothering you anymore.
I won't be bothering you anymore.
I'm a lousy cook.
Everyone is looking at Tom.
Are you related to Tom?
He is proud of his collection.
Don't give up so easily.
I know how it ends.
We can't do the impossible.
We have plenty of food.
It's the least we can do.
I'd like to read it.
It's the least we can do.
I want to read it.
They surprised me.
It's still too cold to go to the beach.
Tom wasn't here when I came in.
Tom tried to persuade me to go with him.
I don't know Tom that well.
I don't know much about Tom.
Let me go with Tom.
Let me go with Tom.
I don't know what kind of car Tom has.
I don't know what kind of car Tom has.
I don't know what to do about Tom.
I don't know what's wrong with Tom.
I confiscated Tom's knife.
I consider Tom my friend.
It's strange that Tom isn't here yet.
Do you want the same thing to happen to Tom?
Do you want the same thing to happen to Tom?
The driver accelerated his car.
2015 is the year of the wood sheep.
2015 is the year of the wood goat.
Many people around the world celebrate the Chinese New Year.
You're different with Tom.
You've got to find out what happened to Tom.
You've got to find out what happened to Tom.
Don't blame yourself for what happened to Tom.
Don't blame yourself for what happened to Tom.
Don't blame yourself for what happened to Tom.
They will demolish the building and replace it with a park.
Do you want to talk to a lawyer?
Do you want to talk to a lawyer?
You can ask Tom.
You can ask Tom.
You can ask Tom.
We ran short of food.
All plants need water and light.
Brush your teeth after eating.
He has too much pride.
I'm in love.
Experience brings wisdom.
Tom plans to break up with his girlfriend.
I have access to this library.
I'm grateful for your help.
Tom wanted to be a lawyer.
It's very expensive.
I didn't know that you knew Tom.
I didn't know that you knew Tom.
I didn't know that you knew Tom.
I didn't know that you knew Tom.
I'm getting bored.
Smoking in bed is dangerous.
Is the drawing quite explanatory?
My father often washes the dishes.
Atom bombs are a danger to mankind.
Why do people envy each other?
He thought someone had put poison in his soup.
He thought someone had put poison in his soup.
I find it difficult to tell Tom I miss him.
I like to listen to Italian music every night.
Impossible things sometimes happen.
Tom knows this isn't good.
I can't go there unless I go with Tom.
Tom's mother always told him he should eat more vegetables.
He's always very polite.
The bank is three blocks away.
No one was killed in the fire.
She was so beautiful that anyone could see that she was a real Princess.
So what do we do if Tom shows up?
Are you rushing to finish the project?
Your plan failed.
This is an unusual situation.
I spent this morning on the phone with Tom.
This is an unusual situation.
We're looking for a place to eat.
Be careful with that, Tom.
It's rather ironic.
I can see that bothers you.
The mayor didn't like what the journalists wrote.
I'll ask Tom if he needs any help.
I thanked Tom for his help.
I will go to the beach.
Tom took off his jacket and hung it on the back of a chair.
December 3 is the International Day of Persons with Disabilities.
You agree with Tom, right?
Mary always yells when she's angry.
Tom had something else on his mind.
It's no use your saying anything.
I envy the friendship Tom and Mary have.
Tom doesn't get emotional.
You said you wanted to spend time with Tom.
The patient is unconscious.
The story ends with his death.
The police found a truck matching that description.
There is little food in the refrigerator.
Do you know what Tom's last name is?
I would rather walk than go by taxi.
She killed herself at the age of thirty.
Whatever she said, it's not true.
I can't fancy going out in this weather.
I wish I hadn't kissed Tom.
I wish I hadn't kissed Tom.
The police have arrested Tom.
We all loved Tom.
I thought I'd never find Tom.
You're the only one who can convince Tom.
I tried to convince Tom.
I was glad to see Tom.
That's why I don't like Tom.
I can't forgive Tom.
Reading between the lines, it's clear that Tom isn't having such a good time in his new job.
You're stronger than Tom.
I hate funerals.
How deep is this well?
How deep is this well?
None of Tom's classmates liked him.
Liquids are heavier than gases.
You didn't tell me you worked for Tom.
Tom has no desire to go to the movies.
She has a large office in this building.
Tom had ulterior motives.
I killed the mosquito.
Italian cuisine is popular around the world.
I miss the good old days.
He thought maybe this was a trick.
If you have questions, don't hesitate to ask them.
She stared at him in astonishment.
Our plane was dangerously approaching the Turkish Airlines airliner.
I am the boss in my office.
I am the boss in my office.
It's always a pleasure to talk with Tom.
How did your date go with Tom?
Eat fruit!
How was your date with Tom?
I was looking for Tom.
The drinks at Tom's daughter's wedding cost him a bundle.
Tom gave me something to read.
I hid myself under the bed.
We'll wait patiently.
You speak English like a native.
Who cares what they think?
Tom is taking his final exam.
Why didn't you warn Tom?
Why didn't you warn Tom?
He proposed that we take a small break.
Can I speak with Tom?
Don't throw it out.
She is swimming in the river.
I think we can do this by ourselves.
I think we can do this by ourselves.
My favourite colour is orange.
They obeyed orders.
We have to obey orders.
Are you getting bored?
It's been a long time since I've seen Tom.
She has a crush on Justin Bieber.
They wash their hands.
The train went off the rails.
Dinner was incredibly boring.
The life span of a butterfly is short.
Tom's room is ready.
We usually have lunch at noon.
I don't think television will take the place of books.
The nurse handed Tom some pills and he took them.
My wife arrived in the airport at seven o'clock.
I know that's not enough.
I recommend you look on the top shelf.
Why is it dangerous?
Don't read my diary!
It's me Tom has a problem with.
It's Tom I have a problem with.
I was planning to go there by bike, but it rained.
Where did you and Tom first meet?
Where was Tom found?
When were you fired?
When were you fired?
Do you go to school on foot or by bicycle?
Tom tore out a couple of pages from his notebook.
My headache is completely gone.
Tom and I are almost the same weight.
Where's the ball?
I'll come by bicycle.
The United States Ambassador in Syria left the country for security reasons.
It's official.
Tom was wounded in a street fight.
The kitten is playing in the rain.
I was diagnosed with pneumonia.
Come down for a minute.
He hasn't changed a bit since I saw him.
They fell asleep in each other's arms.
Do you have any pictures of Tom?
Do you have any pictures of Tom?
Do you have any pictures of Tom when he was a kid?
Do you have any pictures of Tom when he was a kid?
Do you have any pictures of Tom when he was a kid?
Do you have any pictures of Tom when he was a kid?
So, what happened to Tom? "He disappeared." "Reeeally?"
I asked Tom to play my favorite song.
I dreamed of my native village.
Tom committed a series of murders.
Tom was taken to a psychiatric hospital.
The soldiers led Tom to where he would be executed.
Don't hit me, I'm a translator!
This will teach you not to annoy other people.
My friends call me Tom.
It's one of the largest cities in the world.
Fifteen times five equals seventy-five.
Fifteen times five equals seventy-five.
He missed his chance.
She missed her chance.
I filled the pool with water.
My business trip was canceled.
My business trip was canceled.
She whispered it in my ear.
Isn't that Tom's dog?
Why were you asking me all those questions about Tom?
Why were you asking me all those questions about Tom?
Tom can't stay long.
Let's wait for Tom.
I'm going to invest money in this business.
Click on the link.
Is Tom well?
The product carries a high price tag.
I wanted to ask you some questions about Tom.
I wanted to ask you some questions about Tom.
I swam in the river.
He had lost all political power.
Tom was arrested by mistake.
I've thought long and hard over this.
The people of Atlantis had advanced technology.
Did you take your pills?
It wasn't upstairs.
It wasn't upstairs.
Do you recognize them?
Do you recognize them?
This is what scares them.
Tom was a good friend, and I'll miss him.
Hurry up, girls, you're going to be late.
You should apologize.
You should apologize.
Can you make yourselves understood in English?
I don't care what people think about the way I dress.
Tom has a terrible temper.
Take them to the station.
Take them to the station.
Take him to the station.
Take him to the station.
Take her to the station.
Take her to the station.
Take them to the hospital.
Take them to the hospital.
Take him to the hospital.
Take him to the hospital.
Take her to the hospital.
Take her to the hospital.
Take them home.
Take them home.
Take him home.
Take him home.
Take her home.
Take her home.
I don't know Tom's last name.
I don't know Tom's last name.
We'll take them home.
We'll take him home.
We'll take her home.
I saw Tom, but he didn't see me.
I'll take them home.
I'll take him home.
I'll take her home.
I'll take you home now.
I'll take you home now.
I'll take them home now.
I'll take him home now.
I'll take her home now.
I would like to ask for a translator.
I would like to ask for a translator.
Should I go talk to Tom?
I like to finish what I start.
Why did you leave Tom alone?
Let me go talk to Tom.
Bill and Joan divided the candy between them.
They'll never give up.
Are you in love with her?
How long has Tom been in love with you? "Tom is not in love with me. He's my friend."
You're quite an artist.
I thought Tom was a complete idiot.
I shook hands with Tom.
Tom only had three hundred dollars.
Tom makes more money than I do.
Tom's son is getting married.
Tom's daughter is getting married.
Something very weird happened to Tom.
Something very weird happened to Tom.
I'm not breaking the law.
Does Tom have a cat?
Are you in debt, yet?
This was avoidable.
I recommend this book.
I have no complaints.
You drive me crazy.
Everyone went crazy.
We have to get dressed.
I don't think we'll be able to solve this problem by ourselves.
Tom has good manners.
He was surprised by the sudden appearance of his friend.
I convinced everyone.
I convinced everyone.
Are you handicapped?
Ask Tom to bring his guitar.
I don't want to see Tom again.
Tom would make a good teacher.
You're better than Tom.
You're better than Tom.
I miss him terribly.
I work from nine to five every day.
Tom had always wanted to study French and he finally got his chance to.
I've seen Tom do the impossible.
I've seen Tom do the impossible.
Were you drunk when you hit Tom?
I'm very grateful to you for everything.
I'm looking at my reflection in the lake.
She sells shoes.
We lost our chance.
Fool me once, shame on you; fool me twice, shame on me.
You knew Tom better than I did.
You knew Tom better than I did.
Were you with Tom that evening?
Were you with Tom that evening?
Express your idea clearly.
We're historians.
We almost drowned.
He quickly mastered Russian.
Tom spent all day on the beach.
Tom has never had a girlfriend.
What could've happened to Tom?
Tom has everything under control.
Where are the singers?
If you don't eat, you'll get sick.
Where are my shoes?
Why do boys and girls like different toys?
Tom doesn't have any time to watch TV.
I don't allow my kids to watch TV on school nights.
The ☭ is a symbol of communism.
Tom had a narrow escape.
Tom majored in music education.
Tom picked up his toys and put them in a box.
Tom is going to resign.
Tom is wearing a white shirt.
Tom was worried that he might be late.
Tom is going through a midlife crisis.
Tom seldom goes hiking by himself.
Tom tried to kill himself yesterday.
Tom patted himself on the back.
Tom killed himself last night.
Tom killed himself on his thirtieth birthday.
Tom crushed the box with his foot.
We've heard those promises before.
Patience is a remedy for every grief.
I've been trying to call Tom, but I keep accidentally calling you instead.
Tom tried not to react.
My car is a gas-guzzler.
Almost everyone was late.
This is my fiancé.
The story doesn't match the facts.
His happiness lasted only a short time.
I learnt Catalan very quickly.
I learnt Catalan very quickly.
This is unusual weather.
I used to play guitar in a band with Tom.
I just got off the phone with Tom.
I just got off the phone with my lawyer.
I knew I was wasting my time trying to convince Tom.
I expect to see Tom again next month.
I'm friends with Tom's sister.
I will sit here until he sings.
Georgina bit her lips until they bled.
I was at home until noon yesterday.
I gripped your arm until it reddened.
I should wait until Tom gets here.
You will remain silent until further instructed.
The meeting was adjourned until the following week.
You prayed that your children would forgive you.
We adjourned the meeting until the following Friday.
The game was postponed until next week.
He worked and worked until he fell ill.
Our professor postponed the exam until next week.
Swimming here is very dangerous.
I did everything all by myself.
I would like to read books on Japanese history.
I'm in charge until Tom gets here.
When do you usually eat lunch?
When do you usually eat lunch?
When do you usually eat lunch?
You did a great job with Tom.
I became a lawyer to help people.
I'll get you another lawyer.
You've dropped your pen.
I meant to thank you for your help.
Tom gave me a wink.
You've dropped your pen.
Tom likes playing with cars.
Tom likes playing with cars.
I'm Tom's partner.
Tom and I work in the same department.
Tom and I work in the same department.
She is wise beyond her years.
He is wise beyond his years.
I don't want you to give up.
I don't want you to give up.
I don't want you to give up.
I don't want them to give up.
I don't want him to give up.
I don't want her to give up.
I don't want you to get sick.
I don't want you to get sick.
I don't want you to get sick.
I don't want them to get sick.
I don't want him to get sick.
I don't want her to get sick.
I don't want them to get hurt.
I don't want him to get hurt.
I don't want her to get hurt.
I'll call them and apologize.
I'll call him and apologize.
I'll call her and apologize.
I don't want them to get angry.
I don't want him to get angry.
I don't want her to get angry.
I don't want you to get angry.
I don't want you to get angry.
I don't want you to get angry.
I don't want you to be angry.
I don't want you to be angry.
I don't want you to be angry.
I don't want them to be angry.
I don't want him to be angry.
I don't want her to be angry.
Tom said goodbye.
I didn't want them to bother me.
I didn't want him to bother me.
I didn't want her to bother me.
I want you to apologize.
I want you to apologize.
I want you to apologize.
I want them to apologize.
I want him to apologize.
I want her to apologize.
I'm going to visit them.
I'm going to visit him.
I'm going to visit her.
Tom has long hair.
Tom broke a glass.
Tom broke the glass.
Tom has a bicycle.
I haven't seen Tom for over three months.
I greeted my neighbors.
Tom is a good dancer.
Welcome back, Tom. We've missed you.
We work for Tom.
We stayed behind to help Tom.
I heard what happened to Tom.
I suppose you didn't even talk to Tom.
I recommend that you ask Tom.
I swear to you I didn't kill Tom.
I think we shouldn't make a decision until we hear from Tom.
I should probably spend more time with Tom.
I heard you arguing with Tom.
I heard you arguing with Tom.
I heard you arguing with Tom.
I had an interesting conversation with Tom.
I had an interesting conversation with Tom.
I want you to stay here and watch Tom.
I totally disagree with Tom.
We forgave Tom.
I thought I'd be able to recognize Tom.
I'm learning Irish slowly.
I think we're going to have problems with Tom.
Everybody knows we hate Tom.
I think we impressed Tom.
I think you impressed Tom.
I don't think you're trying very hard to find Tom.
I've got three hours to find Tom.
We still haven't found Tom.
I did the best I could to convince Tom.
I went to the hospital to visit Tom, but I wasn't allowed to see him.
Tom's brother looks a lot like him.
We really fooled Tom.
Tom is swimming in the pool.
I heard they offered you Tom's job.
Tom is extremely strong.
Tom went skiing.
We're no longer working for Tom.
Tom always seems to be mad at everyone.
She cannot have broken her promise.
She cannot have broken her promise.
You've got to apologize.
You've got to apologize.
We're going to wait here for Tom.
We have to wait here for Tom.
We have a package here for Tom.
I have a message for Tom.
We've been waiting for Tom.
I'm still waiting for Tom.
We're going to wait for Tom.
We don't work for Tom.
We were just looking for Tom.
We've been looking for Tom.
I bought these for Tom.
I wrote this poem for Tom.
We'll never work for Tom.
We used to work for Tom.
We have work for Tom.
We'd better go look for Tom.
I wrote this song for Tom.
We're going to wait for Tom.
I'll just sit here and wait for Tom.
I think you should wait for Tom.
This isn't for Tom.
Is this a declaration of war?
We have information for Tom.
We couldn't wait for Tom.
We didn't wait for Tom.
We're not going to wait for Tom.
We can't forget Tom.
We will never forget Tom.
I have to go meet Tom.
I'm really going to miss Tom.
I wanted to kiss Tom.
We really want to impress Tom.
We're not trying to impress Tom.
We're trying to impress Tom.
I don't want to testify against Tom.
I wouldn't want to go there with anybody except Tom.
We had to let Tom go.
Can you give me Tom's address?
Can you give me Tom's address?
Tom's wife is also a scientist.
We were trying to impress Tom.
Did you get Tom's message?
Tom has access to the information we need.
You can ask Tom yourself.
I'm sure he'll pass the coming exam.
We're both professionals.
Can you drive me to the airport?
Is this your equipment?
The poet writes poems.
Tom translates slowly.
There will come a day when you regret it.
I've never heard of him before.
Tom has a great sense of humour.
Tom has a great sense of humour.
You don't have to do that if you don't really want to.
I didn't know what was in the envelope.
How many people have you had sex with in the last year?
I got cold, so I turned on the heater.
I've got a hunch something might be happening tonight.
You'll have to stay in the garage.
Remember your promise.
Remember your promise.
I go to the beach almost every day.
You'll be late for work.
You'll be late for work.
We both miss you.
We miss you, too.
How did your date with Tom go?
What's Tom's blood type?
Tom wouldn't harm a fly.
Why are you being so noisy?
You're curious, aren't you?
Tom jumped off the roof.
What were you talking to Tom about?
She's tall and slim.
Let's go find Tom.
Tom doesn't even own a suit.
Tom doesn't let his children drink wine.
Tom blames us.
Tom and I have a lot more in common than I thought.
Tom and I get along fine.
That's what I like about Tom.
My car got stuck in the mud.
Modern art doesn't interest Tom.
I'm sure that we'll all miss her.
Tom is very difficult to get along with.
Just talk with Tom.
Just talk with Tom.
Tom has a stomachache.
Tom spends a lot of time on the beach.
Did you buy anything to eat?
Did you buy anything to eat?
Did you buy anything to eat?
Did you buy anything to eat?
I can't solve this problem on my own.
We're having some equipment problems.
If you need me, I'll be in my office.
You've given me a lot to think about.
You didn't mention that on the phone.
You didn't mention that on the phone.
You didn't mention that on the phone.
I was very concerned for your safety.
I was very concerned for your safety.
Can you tell the Jackson twins apart?
In case of fire, telephone the fire station.
I was on a bike.
It's just a toy.
I'm disgusted.
I'm really going to miss this place.
I'm going to surprise him.
The boy put his hands in his pockets.
A coin dropped out of his pocket.
Was that a guess?
I assure you that isn't necessary.
Tom carefully removed the letter from the envelope.
You are always finding fault with me.
He killed himself.
Tom killed himself.
It's almost noon.
He won't leave us alone.
Tom is peeling the potatoes.
Tom doesn't allow his son to eat ice cream.
This child aspires to become a laywer in the future.
Do you want to see Tom again?
The entire house has burnt down.
Somebody has to stop Tom.
Somebody has to stop Tom.
Every year, Hawaii moves ten centimeters closer to Japan.
Everyone was looking at Tom curiously.
Now it is official.
I was having lunch.
Why is space black?
I am fed up with this wet weather.
I eat live rats.
Let's pitch the tent while it's still light.
Let's pitch the tent while it's still light.
Just don't drop it.
It's in the fridge.
Have a look around.
Would you pass the salt and pepper?
Would you pass the salt and pepper?
I don't know how big Tom's office is.
That clock is slow.
I don't remember seeing you before.
Something's worrying her.
I asked Tom where he had bought his boots.
Why was Tom fired?
Protecting the environment means saving ourselves.
That's what makes me nervous.
I don't know how to contact you.
You're a talented writer.
I learned to drive a car and got a driver's license when I was eighteen.
Tom is extremely outspoken.
Tom is extremely outspoken.
The weather is very cool here because it rains often.
The crime was almost perfect.
Tom dressed like a girl for Halloween.
He put on his gloves.
Forgive me if I have offended you.
Forgive me if I have offended you.
Forgive me if I have offended you.
Be careful with that knife.
Be careful with that knife.
Be careful with that knife.
I thought it would be better to remain silent.
I'm sure Tom is grateful for your help.
I'm sure Tom is grateful for your help.
He brushes his teeth.
Tom is a good singer.
This place is too noisy for me.
I thought you were going to hurt me.
It's an unusual name.
That's an unusual name.
Can we visit the villages where your language is still spoken?
Tom told me how he got his nickname.
I gave her some candy.
The last time I saw Tom was yesterday around lunchtime.
They've taken Tom home.
Please don't lose patience.
Tom was hard to convince.
I've only seen Tom once.
The place was empty inside.
I didn't know where to hide.
We suspect that someone murdered Tom and just made it look like suicide.
We suspect that someone murdered Tom and just made it look like suicide.
I think you've got a really bad attitude.
We'll meet you outside.
Let's see what's happening outside.
There's someone waiting for me outside.
Tom doesn't like milk in his coffee.
You're perfectly safe.
You're perfectly safe.
I still think we're safe.
Tom doesn't have a wife.
I was impressed by Tom's courage.
Nobody ever came to see me in the hospital.
Nobody ever came to see me in the hospital.
Don't throw away this magazine.
Don't throw away this newspaper!
Tom thanked me for changing his life.
Who is playing the guitar?
The lights went out.
What exactly was Tom doing in the Australian Embassy?
I can't wait to die.
She translated a poem.
He had a classic education.
Tom has a message for you.
The landing was perfect.
It is said that time heals all the wounds.
I'd like to cook chicken tonight.
Admission was free.
I really appreciate your support.
I really appreciate your support.
He got very drunk.
My sister didn't say hello.
You can't give me orders.
You can't give me orders.
Do you want to see my stamp collection?
Do you want to eat with us?
Do you want to eat with us?
She solved the problem with ease.
They have escaped.
We have to protect each other.
Tom spends less time studying French than I do.
Be careful what you do.
He wanted to destroy it.
Waiter, I need a spoon.
They lost the war on the eastern front.
Look into the well.
I'm not a weirdo.
I'll be around for three weeks.
The pain was excruciating.
Tom values your friendship.
Tom values your friendship.
Tom walked away in disgust.
Tom is hard to live with.
Tom is just fucking around.
We could ask Tom not to go.
Are you ready to die for your ideals? "Not only that! I'm willing to live for them."
Is there a chance we'll lose our jobs?
Tom put off his trip to Australia.
Tom still isn't totally convinced.
Why was Tom arrested?
Let me take it from here.
You said you wouldn't talk to Tom.
Let's just all go talk to Tom, OK?
Tom speaks five languages, but doesn't know how to be polite in any of them.
You're not a lawyer.
Why are you giving up so easily?
Why are you giving up so easily?
I dreamed I was flying.
Never interrupt a woman.
Never interrupt a woman.
You play the guitar very well.
You play the guitar very well.
Tom couldn't contain himself any longer.
I'm still a little woozy.
This is a magic wand. "Are you sure, Tom? It just looks like a regular stick."
This is a magic wand.
Do you want to see my magic wand? "You have a magic wand, Tom? Really?" "Yes, I'm a wizard!"
We have to get to work.
Tom's body was never found.
You and Tom belong together.
Tom stormed into the office.
Tom taught himself how to ski.
Math is fun. "No, it's not."
You have to defend yourself.
You have to defend yourself.
Draw a picture of yourself.
Draw a picture of yourself.
Who's going to hurt you?
Who's going to hurt you?
You're Tom's daughter, aren't you?
Tom taught himself how to ski.
Turn off the TV, will you?
Why did they attack you?
Why did they attack you?
Did I surprise you?
Did I surprise you?
Am I being accused of murder?
How long did it take you to write this report?
How long did it take you to write this report?
How long did it take you to write this report?
How long did it take you to write this report?
Excuse us for a minute.
Tom couldn't protect me.
Help me find Tom.
Help me find Tom.
The circus has a wonderful collection of wild animals.
The medicine had a wonderful effect on him.
I wonder if we're alone in the universe.
Tom didn't eat lunch yesterday.
Tom's father died last year.
I thought Tom had enough money to buy everything he needed.
Tom has one brother.
We can't just give up on Tom.
I've been having strange dreams.
Tom got a bottle of water out of the fridge.
I'd hoped to avoid this problem.
Tom thinks I'm in love with him.
This fruit isn't for you.
This fruit isn't for you.
You add examples but you don't translate them.
I wonder what scared her.
I wonder what scared him.
I wonder what scared them.
Tom has a wonderful voice.
Tom is a wonderful dancer.
Don't give Tom your email address.
Don't give Tom your email address.
I wonder: Why is she late?
Eventually you'll have to tell Tom.
What would I do without Tom?
What would I do without Tom?
How well did you really know Tom?
What you said surprised me.
Tom didn't find it funny.
Have I made myself clear?
I know what's wrong with Tom.
I know when Tom was killed.
I know when Tom's birthday is.
Maybe we should've listened to Tom.
He devotes himself to his work.
The more I eat the bigger my appetite gets.
I don't believe in extraterrestrials.
Maybe we should talk to Tom.
Let me at least talk to Tom.
Don't talk to Tom like that.
Can I talk to you about Tom?
Tom caught the ball.
Has the train been delayed?
I hope to visit this airport again.
I hope to visit this airport again.
I'll go shopping.
The lake is surrounded by mountains.
You scared her.
I think something scared them.
I just want you to scare them.
I just want you to scare him.
I just want you to scare her.
I didn't want to scare them.
I didn't want to scare him.
I didn't want to scare her.
We saw you on the beach.
We saw you on the beach.
We saw them on the beach.
We saw him on the beach.
We saw her on the beach.
Management hid the true financial state of the company from the workers.
We have to do this on our own.
The new traffic regulations come into force tomorrow.
Tom was probably drunk when he crashed his car.
Tom was released from prison three months ago.
Tom withdrew an envelope from his jacket pocket.
Tom had tears in his eyes.
It took me several hours to prepare it.
Tom put down his fork and pushed his chair back.
Tom picked up the telephone and started dialing.
I want to take her home.
I want to take him home.
I want to take them home.
Am I talented?
Maybe I missed something.
Maybe I missed something.
I wonder where that ship is headed.
I wonder if Tom has a girlfriend.
We've got to find Tom.
You can talk to Tom.
Just go talk to Tom.
Can you talk to Tom?
Can we have a word outside?
I can understand Tom.
It's an established fact.
The news of his sudden death was like thunder on a sunny day.
I share your grief.
I was wondering if you would talk to Tom.
I married Tom in 2013.
Tell Tom to be careful.
Tom decided to enter the competition.
None of Tom's friends knew where he lived.
None of Tom's friends knew where he lived.
Are you going to be here long?
Are you going to be here long?
Am I in love?
Am I in love?
This coin will bring you good luck.
This coin will bring you good luck.
These shoes are Tom's.
You've already convinced me.
You've already convinced me.
Nobody knows except Tom and me.
They can't fire me.
The cup you just broke was the one Tom gave me.
His appearance deceived me.
I was deceived by her appearance.
I never deceived you.
I never deceived you.
You're deceiving yourself.
You're deceiving yourself.
Let's not deceive ourselves.
I didn't mean to deceive you.
I didn't mean to deceive you.
It is no use trying to deceive me.
I'll have to take Tom with me.
I don't have time to translate this text.
Do you still love Tom?
It seems obvious to me.
Everyone knows you're in love with Tom.
It's boring.
It took the doctor eight hours to do the operation.
Do you have a lover?
Toss her the ball.
Shall we go to Lithuania?
It's not free to get water here.
Tom has a serious health problem.
Tom has another problem as well.
It's dangerous to cross roads without looking both ways.
It's not my problem. It's Tom's.
Tell her to be careful.
Tell her to be careful.
Tell him to be careful.
Tell him to be careful.
We miss you.
We miss you.
We've missed you.
We've missed you.
We must intervene.
I'll tell them to stay outside.
I'll tell him to stay outside.
I'll tell her to stay outside.
I'll tell them that's not true.
I'll tell him that's not true.
I'll tell her that's not true.
You know that's a lie.
Like me, he's also not tall.
Tell me where I can find Tom.
Tell me where I can find Tom.
Did you have dreams?
I'm not the least bit worried about losing my job.
Tom is an excellent lawyer.
The boys built a raft.
Why are you running away?
Why are you running away?
The bird flew away.
I keep it in the attic.
I keep it in the attic.
I keep it in the attic.
Tom brought me something to eat.
Morning found them on deck.
Now you're accusing me of murder.
Are you accusing me of something?
Tell me what happened to Tom.
Tom told me that wasn't true.
What you told me wasn't true.
What you told me wasn't true.
What you told me wasn't true.
What you told me wasn't true.
We'll help you rescue Tom.
We'll deal with Tom later.
We'll never see Tom again.
We can manage without you.
We haven't heard from Tom.
Will you wait a minute?
Tom told me to wait outside.
Tell me a little about Tom.
Tell me a little about Tom.
Tom wants to take you home.
Tom wants to take you home.
Can you tell me about Tom?
Can you tell me about Tom?
They don't pay me enough.
They don't pay you enough.
They don't pay you enough.
Tom gave me some pills.
We're very grateful for your help.
How late was the train?
Did you shoot Tom?
I don't eat green peppers at all.
Tom turned off the light and went to sleep.
Are you good at skiing?
How about getting me another glass of wine?
Do you think that's fair?
I saw Tom today.
How would you describe your relationship with Tom?
Tom isn't very polite.
Tom isn't very polite.
I went to the airport by taxi.
I'll pick Tom up in an hour.
I've just been to the airport to see her off.
I emailed Tom the pictures I took yesterday.
Do you really think Tom is a spy?
Do you really think Tom is a spy?
Do you think that was deliberate?
Taro stayed in Tokyo for three days.
Put on your gloves.
How about February 28th around 3:00 pm?
Tom got out of the pool and then jumped back in.
Tom wrote something on the back of the envelope.
What are you and Tom doing?
Most people live in urban areas.
Are you saying that you don't love Tom?
Good people die every day.
Judging from his accent, he must be from Kyushu.
He visited a friend.
She likes to dress up as a police officer.
Polish girls didn't want Justin Bieber to come to Poland.
His body was shaking in anger.
Tom will give up.
Take it to Tom.
Tom advised us to leave early and avoid the morning traffic.
I wouldn't say it was unimportant.
I wonder where Tom keeps his wine.
I won't take up much of your time.
I won't take up much of your time.
I wish it weren't true, but it is.
Tom knows a good Chinese restaurant not too far from his office.
I want to know why Tom isn't here.
I must convince Tom to come.
In that country I was a foreigner and was treated as such.
I thought you wanted to marry Tom.
Cars took the place of bicycles.
Television is a very important medium through which to provide information.
I took the opportunity to visit the museum.
I'll take you there.
I stayed longer than I thought I would.
Please show me your identity card or passport!
I get angry when my boyfriend talks to other girls.
I get angry when my boyfriend talks to other girls.
He washes his car at least once a week.
I was there with Tom.
I want you to stop looking for Tom.
The ice is too hard to crack.
He peels her apple.
Good luck convincing him.
He begged me to come.
He begged me to come.
He begged me to come.
What kind of dreams do you have?
What kind of dreams do you have?
Excuse me, but could you do me a favor?
Excuse me, but could you do me a favor?
What was your response when he invited you?
What was your response when he invited you?
That's why Tom doesn't have a girlfriend.
Have you seen Tom? "Not in the last few days."
Tom will translate French into English for free. "That's good to know."
Tom got a new job. "What kind of job?"
I looked around, but saw nobody.
I plan to speak with Tom about that.
All art is quite useless.
Brush your teeth after every meal.
Brush your teeth after every meal.
Nancy didn't mind living abroad by herself.
Tom's intentions were unclear.
I'm going to visit a friend.
Classical music soothes me.
My parents don’t like the way I dress.
You ought to listen to your mother.
You ought to listen to your mother.
You're dating Tom, aren't you?
Tom is in a good mood today.
Tom came to my office today.
Tom hid himself behind the tree.
I've got a funeral to go to.
Tom has been warned many times.
Tom has been warned several times.
I don't have enough time.
I want a divorce.
If you have any questions, don't hesitate to ask.
Am I on time?
Tom dropped his glass.
Tom dropped his glass.
Tom gave us something to eat.
Why did Tom kill himself?
Tom put away his toys.
I'm really careful.
I went to the beach with her.
I went to the beach with her.
I went to the beach with him.
I went to the beach with him.
I went to the beach with them.
I went to the beach with them.
Just be careful with her.
Just be careful with him.
Just be careful with him.
Just be careful with them.
Just be careful with them.
You should be careful with her.
You should be careful with her.
You should be careful with her.
You should be careful with him.
You should be careful with him.
You should be careful with him.
You should be careful with them.
You should be careful with them.
You should be careful with them.
You should be careful with them.
Be careful with her.
Be careful with her.
Be careful with her.
Be careful with him.
Be careful with him.
Be careful with him.
Be careful with them.
Be careful with them.
Be careful with them.
If you insist on going alone, please do so.
Nobody else got hurt.
I would never testify against my wife.
The teacher explained to us the meaning of the poem.
I swear it was her.
I swear it was her.
I swear it was him.
I swear it was him.
I swear it was them.
I swear it was them.
I swear it was them.
I swear it was them.
Two of them were drowned.
Just promise me you won't get angry.
I'd like to talk with you about Tom.
Many of us are angry.
Tom did have reasons.
Seventy percent of people in the UK cannot speak a second language.
It's an old custom.
There were no other customers.
There were no other customers.
Am I being accused of some kind of crime?
I consider Tom to be my best friend.
You've got nothing to apologize for.
I'm not as attentive as I should be.
You did that on purpose, didn't you?
He will protect you.
He will protect you.
She will protect you.
I'm sorry, I don't know what to say.
Let's go wake her up.
Let's go wake her up.
Let's go wake him up.
I'd like to wake her up myself.
I didn't mean to wake her up.
I didn't mean to wake him up.
Be careful not to wake her up.
Be careful not to wake him up.
Be careful not to wake them up.
I don't want to wake her up.
I don't want to wake him up.
I don't want to wake them up.
I want her brought to justice.
I want him brought to justice.
I want them brought to justice.
I want you brought to justice.
I want her fired.
I want him fired.
I want them fired.
I want you fired.
I want you fired.
She's in love with her best friend.
You can't defeat Tom without my help.
She was shivering with cold.
The kids are driving me crazy.
I borrowed money from Tom.
I have to visit him.
I have to visit them.
Don't you want to visit her?
Don't you want to visit him?
Don't you want to visit them?
Don't you want to visit us?
I just want to visit her.
I just want to visit him.
I just want to visit them.
She squeezed his hand.
The magic is gone.
I don't want to bother Tom while he's working.
Something's worrying them.
Something's worrying him.
You're hard to please.
You're hard to please.
Tom sat right in front of me.
You're sitting in Tom's chair.
You're sitting in Tom's chair.
What have you been doing for the past hour?
Tom fell asleep on the bus and missed his stop.
I figured I could trust her.
I figured I could trust them.
I figured I could trust him.
Children are expensive.
It's awfully noisy at night around here.
Just listen to Tom.
Just listen to Tom.
I wanted to say hello to Tom.
Do you think she would accept my invitation?
The exact same thing happened to Tom.
Tom clapped.
The largest muscle in the human body is the gluteus maximus.
I had to fire Tom.
I had to fire Tom.
I enjoy being with Tom.
She wants a divorce.
Tom managed to carry both suitcases by himself.
How did you persuade Tom to come back home?
How did you persuade Tom to come back home?
How did you persuade Tom to come back home?
I ran into Tom on my way home.
It took Tom almost three hours to finish his homework.
Does Tom have a summer house?
Does Tom have a sense of humor?
Tom was our interpreter.
Why wasn't Tom invited?
What can we do about it?
Is there anything you can do about it?
Is there anything you can do about it?
If a man had 11 sheep and all but 9 died, how many sheep would he have left?
Tom keeps his room tidy.
Tom keeps his room tidy.
This may come in handy.
These may come in handy.
Tom's French is quite good already.
We have no complaints.
Tom wasn't in when I dropped by.
We must stop Tom.
I didn't run away.
Language has the power to shape the way we think.
I agreed to meet Tom next Monday.
I agreed to meet Tom next Monday.
I think you've had enough candy for one day.
Dry your tears, my child.
I didn't know Tom had a nickname.
She has perfect teeth.
Do you really trust him?
Except for Tom, the whole family went swimming.
Why did you become a lawyer?
Why did you become a lawyer?
How many pills do you have left?
We were bored.
Are you busy tomorrow afternoon?
Are you busy tomorrow afternoon?
Are you busy tomorrow afternoon?
I appeared on television once.
Danger! High voltage.
Were you in love with me?
Were you in love with me?
Were you in love with me?
Were you in love with him?
Were you in love with him?
Were you in love with her?
Were you in love with her?
I'm not in love with him.
I'm not in love with her.
I was never in love with you.
I was never in love with you.
I was never in love with him.
I was never in love with her.
I think I'm in love with him.
I think I'm in love with her.
I think I was in love with you.
I think I was in love with you.
I think I was in love with him.
I think I was in love with her.
Are you still in love with him?
Are you still in love with her?
Why don't you go with us?
Why don't you go with us?
Why don't you go with them?
Why don't you go with them?
Why don't you go with me?
Why don't you go with me?
Why don't you go with him?
Why don't you go with him?
Why don't you go with her?
Why don't you go with her?
Why is Tom following me?
Somebody's following me.
I feel a little woozy.
Tom is terrible at math.
Tom wants to be happy again.
The train began to move.
Tom is a very hardworking student.
Go get some towels.
These shoes belong to them.
Scientists can easily compute the distance between planets.
Mike knows how to defend himself.
Mike knows how to defend himself.
Who survived?
I can hear Tom.
We're in deep shit.
Tom was unable to conceal his sadness.
Tom can operate a crane.
Can I quote you?
You aren't any better than me.
You aren't any better than me.
How is your progress?
Tom looked out the open window.
How is your progress?
Tom never drives over the speed limit.
That's dead easy.
Why are you angry with them?
Why are you angry with them?
Why are you angry with him?
Why are you angry with him?
Why are you angry with her?
Why are you angry with her?
Are you angry with them?
Are you angry with them?
Are you angry with him?
Are you angry with him?
Are you angry with her?
Are you angry with her?
Are you still angry with them?
Are you still mad at them?
Are you still angry with them?
Are you still angry with them?
Are you still angry with him?
Are you still angry with him?
Are you still angry with him?
Are you still angry with him?
Are you still angry with her?
Are you still angry with her?
Are you still angry with her?
Are you still angry with her?
I'm not mad at them.
I'm not mad at him.
I'm not angry with him.
I'm not mad at her.
I'm not angry with her.
Don't get angry with them.
Don't get angry with them.
Don't be angry with him.
Don't be angry with him.
Don't be angry with her.
Don't get angry with her.
Don't get angry, Tom.
Don't get so angry.
Don't get so angry.
Don't get angry with Tom.
Don't get angry with Tom.
Are you still angry with them?
Are you still angry with them?
Are you still angry with him?
Are you still angry with him?
Are you still angry with her?
Are you still angry with her?
Are you angry with them?
Are you angry with them?
Are you angry with him?
Are you angry with her?
Are you angry with her?
I tend to agree with you.
I tend to agree with you.
I tend to agree with them.
I tend to agree with him.
I tend to agree with her.
I have to agree with Tom.
I have to agree with Tom.
That sounded a little desperate.
The woman is a nurse.
It was a false alarm.
Tom's phone is ringing.
Tom's phone is ringing.
I don't want to be stuck in an office all day.
I didn't know Tom very well.
I didn't know Tom very well.
I didn't know Tom at all.
I didn't know Tom at all.
I didn't go to Tom's funeral.
I didn't go to Tom's funeral.
I didn't expect I'd find Tom.
I didn't come here to apologize.
I didn't mean to offend Tom.
I didn't recognize Tom at first.
I want you there with Tom when he wakes up.
I want you there with Tom when he wakes up.
I don't want to be late for my first class.
We don't want to be late for the concert.
Picasso is an eminent painter.
I think I'll go buy something to eat.
I really want to go to Egypt.
Men grovel at her feet.
The guards didn't see him.
I'm fed up with math.
I wanted a horse, but I got a bicycle.
We want to know what happened to Tom.
I want to know what happened to Tom.
We didn't help Tom escape.
Suspicion is the poison of friendship.
Please tell her to hurry up.
Please tell her to hurry up.
Please tell him to hurry up.
Please tell him to hurry up.
I'll tell them to contact you.
I'll tell them to contact you.
I'll tell them to contact you.
I'll tell him to contact you.
I'll tell him to contact you.
I'll tell her to contact you.
I'll tell her to contact you.
Tom filled the bucket with water.
Tom filled the bottle with water.
Tom fell into the pool and drowned.
I only meant to scare you.
I only meant to scare them.
I only meant to scare him.
I only meant to scare her.
Tom got hurt in the game last week.
Tom got a D on his test.
My birthday is October 20th.
My birthday is October 20th.
You may wait outside.
You can wait outside.
What's the craziest thing you've done lately?
We'll get you another balloon.
Tom had long hair when I first met him.
We don't want to keep Tom waiting.
Tom had a mild heart attack.
Tom graduated from college three years ago.
I didn't even get a chance to see Tom.
Don't you want to see Tom again?
Don't you want to see Tom again?
We don't want to be late again.
I want them to lose.
I want him to lose.
I want her to lose.
Let's visit them.
Let's visit him.
Let's visit her.
Why can't we go visit them?
Why can't we go visit him?
Why can't we go visit her?
Do you want to talk to Tom?
Do you want to talk to Tom?
Do you want us to kill Tom?
Do you want us to kill Tom?
Do you want us to kill Tom?
Do you want us to kill Tom?
I thought you wouldn't notice that Tom wasn't here.
Toss him the ball.
Toss him the ball.
Toss her the ball.
I don't want to scare them.
Tom is the only one who survived.
Nothing makes Tom happy.
I want you to take me to Tom.
He buys and sells leather goods.
Tom has three million dollars in the bank.
You assemble cranes.
Tom has everything he wants.
I saw them jump into the pool.
I saw him jump into the pool.
Tom will eventually give up.
I saw her jump into the pool.
English is a hard language to learn.
Tom needs urgent help.
Don't throw out this magazine. I haven't read it yet.
My son likes to play with cars.
Don't play with that gun. It's not a toy.
I don't want Tom to get sick.
Tom became furious.
We can't protect them.
I answered all Tom's questions.
I want you to take me to Tom.
Take Tom to the hospital.
My mailbox has been empty since last month.
To feel envy is a sin.
It's Tom I want to talk to.
I want you to take a break.
I didn't want to lose Tom.
I want to talk about Tom.
The peace talks ended in failure.
Excuse me, please. I didn't understand that. Can you maybe translate it into one of the following languages?
I'd like to thank you.
I'd like to thank you.
My promise to come next Monday still holds.
I didn't know Tom then.
I didn't know Tom then.
I don't even know what Tom's last name is.
I found out who Tom's father is.
I found out who Tom's father is.
I found out why Tom was late.
Tom resigned.
I wasn't talking about Tom.
I was young and naive then.
I was young and naive then.
I didn't recognize Tom the last time I saw him.
I'm not easily offended.
I thought his name was Tom.
Your name is Tom, isn't it?
The fire has gone out.
We can't just leave Tom here by himself.
You have to ask Tom first.
You have to ask Tom first.
Why don't you read a book?
It's one of the greatest books of all time.
War and Peace is one of the greatest books of all time.
He was furious.
I'll see Tom today.
She was furious.
The police have opened an investigation.
My French teacher is the same age as I am.
My French teacher is the same age as I am.
Will you protect me?
Will you protect me?
Why didn't you protect me?
Why didn't you protect me?
I had to cancel the meeting.
Are you trying to get me fired?
What did Tom have in mind?
Tom's parents are older than mine.
Tom finishes his shift at 2:30.
We could've helped you.
We don't care about the money.
Tom must have a lot of money.
Tom earns a lot of money.
Tom is losing his patience.
There's only one bath towel in our bathroom.
Why isn't Tom here today?
I think we'd better ask Tom what he thinks.
Tom told me where he had hidden the old coins.
We must follow their instructions.
We have to follow their instructions.
Please don't ask unnecessary questions.
Please don't ask unnecessary questions.
Do you like Italian music?
Do you like Italian music?
Are you friends with Tom?
Everybody's upstairs.
I feel completely helpless.
I feel completely helpless.
I can't find Tom's address.
I can't find Tom's address.
He likes all vegetables except cabbage.
Tom wasn't with us.
Tom used to hang out with us.
Tom had many friends.
She wouldn't hurt a fly.
Wise people learn from their enemies.
Wish me luck, I will need it.
I am handicapped.
Tom told me to be careful.
Tom was late for work.
Tom couldn't hide his feelings.
Tom had three dogs.
Tom's mother didn't like dogs.
Tom isn't as naive as a lot of people think he is.
I don't know where your bicycle is.
Why is Tom not here?
Tom wasn't at school yesterday, was he?
Without your help, Tom doesn't have a chance.
I can't go to school today. I'm sick.
We have one advantage.
Was Tom wearing a hat?
There was nobody to ask.
Tom lit three candles.
Tom isn't replaceable.
I forgot to ask Tom what you asked me to ask him.
If you see Tom, tell him I'm looking for him.
If you see Tom, tell him I'm looking for him.
If you see Tom, tell him I'm looking for him.
If you see Tom, tell him I'm looking for him.
I don't want to be away from home.
I'd like to talk to Tom for a few minutes.
I'll only talk to Tom.
Tom is a very careful driver.
I'm totally indifferent to it.
They moved here recently.
Tom and I are going swimming.
Do you eat rice every day?
Do you eat rice every day?
Dan accepted Linda's invitation to dinner.
I don't think Tom likes to ski.
I think Tom doesn't like to ski.
I'd like to ask Tom that myself.
Tom often walks to school.
This pond has a lot of carp.
What floor is your office on?
Will this satisfy you?
Will this satisfy you?
He learned Russian when he was young.
When did you buy that from Tom?
When did you buy that from Tom?
What did you buy from Tom?
What did you buy from Tom?
We're saving money to buy a house.
Who did you and Tom work for?
Do you plan to stay long?
Do you plan to stay long?
Tom has a lot of money, but not very many friends.
I don't care about them.
Why should I care about them?
Why should I care about them?
Tom has a brilliant future.
How many kids does Tom have?
Why doesn't Tom have a girlfriend?
Tom was wearing glasses.
I'm glad you talked me into going.
I'm glad you talked me into going.
She blushed deeply.
Tom ironed his white shirt.
You're going to be late for school.
You're going to be late for school.
Tom always walks to school.
Tom has a tight schedule.
Tom wasn't in class yesterday.
I saw Tom last week.
I saw Tom last week.
Tom was also arrested.
Do you recognize that woman?
It happened in the blink of an eye.
Are you sure Tom is the person you saw?
Can you wait a minute?
Can you wait a minute?
I have to recharge the batteries.
Most people brush their teeth at least two times a day.
That's a wise choice.
We ask the teacher questions every day.
I think you'd better talk to Tom.
I think you should talk to Tom.
Tom passed away last year.
Tom wasn't here yesterday.
I didn't see Tom at all yesterday.
I don't think Tom has any brothers or sisters.
I only meant to scare Tom.
I only saw one person on the beach.
I should be with Tom.
I should be with Tom.
A man standing on the cliff was about to commit suicide by jumping into the void.
Tom wakes up at 8 a.m. every morning.
He wanted to please the crowd.
He was the last person I had expected to see during my stay in America.
Tom is eating lunch now.
Tom dresses like a girl.
We will pay our friends a visit.
Atomic bombs are a danger to the human race.
We will pay our friends a visit.
That's his specialty.
You can ask Tom for help.
You can ask Tom for help.
Tom found a Roman coin.
I was happy for Tom.
I was happy for Tom.
I have to impress Tom.
They greeted us with a smile.
Tom and I live together.
Living in Japan is very expensive.
Why don't you take a break?
Why don't you take a break?
He'll make a good lawyer sooner or later.
There was another guy with Tom.
Each man stood up in turn and introduced himself.
In 1957, the Soviet Union sent a female dog named Laika into space.
I'll be meeting Tom's parents tonight.
Everyone is talking about Tom.
The joke fell flat.
We can't find Tom anywhere.
I can't find Tom. I've looked everywhere.
We can't force Tom to do that.
I can't force Tom to go.
I can't get a straight answer from Tom.
We can't kill Tom.
We can't kill Tom.
I knocked over that lamp.
You should have let me warn you when I had the chance.
I appreciate your understanding.
I think we have some mice in the attic.
How can we find Tom?
The police can't find Tom.
When did you fire Tom?
Did you wait for Tom?
Did you wait for Tom?
I'll never forget Tom.
Why did you invite Tom?
Who tried to kill Tom?
Do you know who killed Tom?
Maybe I shouldn't have kissed Tom.
The question is who'll go there instead of Tom.
Did you recognize Tom?
They said they never saw Tom.
You're not going to believe what happened to Tom.
Am I going to have to work with Tom?
Do you work with Tom?
Why do I have to work with Tom?
I spend a lot of my free time with Tom.
How much time do you spend with Tom?
Who's with Tom?
I've never played guitar with Tom.
Why should I want to go with Tom?
Why should you have to go with Tom?
We know you're friends with Tom.
A taxi is expensive.
I met Tom on my way here.
Health is more important than wealth.
Tom seems to be as fit as a fiddle.
Tom has psychological problems.
The post office is not too far from here.
Emily's parents are working in a factory.
You're in love with Tom, aren't you?
It was a tragedy.
Take care of our planet.
Tom had a knife in his hand.
Tom and I work together.
Tom has another plan.
This was Tom's chair.
I find those shoes too expensive.
I wanted to talk to you about Tom.
I wanted to talk to you about Tom.
Whose turn is it to wash the dishes?
I would like to see Tom one more time.
We hid in the cave together.
Tom lit a cigarette.
Tom was a traitor.
This country has few natural resources.
I'm going to give you a bike for your birthday.
You're perfect.
We have to pick a place to set up the tent.
I like the beach.
I would like to eat now.
Tom is the boy who broke the window.
It's a magic number.
A promise is not enough.
Perfect people don't exist.
Italy is having the worst economical crisis in its history.
Tom doesn't like classical music.
Alzheimer's disease affects mainly people older than 60 years.
French bread is very popular in Brazil.
The police found Tom's bicycle.
It's dangerous to jump off a moving train.
Tom has two choices.
Prevention is better than cure.
Tom couldn't control his emotions.
Which kind of player are you?
You can fool some of the people all of the time, and all of the people some of the time, but you can't fool all of the people all of the time.
Tom is a quadriplegic.
Tom has what he wants.
Tom expects the worst.
I'm beginning to lose patience with Tom.
I hid my worries from my wife.
I want to know if you've been talking to Tom.
What an awful tragedy!
Tom has a new girlfriend already.
Tom has a new girlfriend.
We may never know what happened to Tom.
I was so happy that I forgot to thank them.
You have a good lawyer.
Did I wake Tom up?
Tom unbuckled his belt.
Tom is having a crisis.
I'm not angry with you.
Why aren't you in your office?
You said you loved Tom.
You can't be friends with everybody.
Tom woke up around noon.
Who else knew about Tom?
Just let me talk to Tom.
He turned the music off.
If your friends jumped off a bridge, would you?
Let's fire him.
Let's fire her.
Let's fire them.
Tom took off his hat and bowed.
Stop trying to control me!
He came on this bicycle.
I asked Tom where he had been.
I asked Tom where he had gone.
My grandfather likes to walk.
It was obvious that he was trying to get her attention.
Can we wait for Tom here?
You have to take this powder after each meal.
Tom is good at cards.
Tom has heart problems.
I got a C in English.
Help me get dressed.
We've got a mechanical problem.
Tom is just doing his duty.
Tom was just doing his duty.
Tom had a lot of enemies.
Drinking alcohol on the street or in parks is illegal in most of the United States.
I wasn't scared at all.
Have you been talking to Tom?
Tom's room wasn't clean.
We'll wait outside.
She touched my shoulder.
Don't tell me you've forgotten Tom.
Don't tell me you've forgotten Tom.
Don't tell me you've forgotten Tom.
Someone who doesn't drink in company is either a thief or a spy.
Put your masks on.
Put your mask on.
Put your mask on.
Please read the instructions carefully.
Tom has lost the will to live.
I'm worried about Tom's health.
I'm worried about Tom's health.
I'm fed up with Tom's behavior.
I'll ask Tom about it tomorrow.
Tom opened the window a crack.
We'll have to be careful.
You're a terrible dancer.
I can't get this song out of my head.
Tom opened the window a crack.
Tom opened the window a crack.
Tom says he has an announcement to make.
I know that you and Tom are friends.
I know about you and Tom.
What are the differences?
They spent the afternoon around the pool.
Most of the plants died.
I am screaming because I saw a mouse!
Can I count on Tom?
How can we stop Tom?
Tom is the best singer in our class.
Tom had no time to study.
Tom has real talent.
Summer has arrived at last.
You know what they say about Tom.
You know what they say about Tom.
If someone has sharpened blades in their hand, no matter the length, or their training, they always are a threat.
I can't ask Tom to do that.
Takeshi did come, but didn't stay long.
It's important to me what you think of Tom.
It's important to me what you think of Tom.
Tom is awfully skinny.
I think it's a warning.
We have to talk to Tom.
That's a scary thought.
I asked Tom to stay.
We're saving money to buy a house.
I think that an angel watches over me.
Tom filled out the application for me.
The nurses were very nice to me.
Tom and I'll go together.
Tom and I both know that.
I'll take you to the hospital.
The experts were satisfied with the results.
I didn't want to disturb her.
I didn't want to disturb her.
I don't want Tom's death on my conscience.
We'll have to leave without Tom.
Tom is too drunk to drive. Could you take him home?
How did you manage to impress Tom?
How did you manage to impress Tom?
That surprised him.
That surprised her.
That surprised them.
I wanted to surprise them.
I wanted to surprise him.
I won fair and square.
Tom isn't skinny.
Don't get mad at us.
Can I hide in here?
Can we use your ball?
I stayed at the hotel, but the others went shopping.
We have a crisis.
Well, why don't we just ask Tom?
I came here to warn you about Tom.
I came here to warn you about Tom.
We're all worried about Tom.
Maybe you've forgotten why I'm still mad at Tom.
Did you think I didn't notice how you were looking at Tom?
Every woman in the room turned to look at Tom.
What do you want me to ask Tom?
Something's clearly bothering Tom.
Someone threw a rock at Tom.
Perhaps we should contact Tom.
You're the only one who can defeat Tom.
Maintaining a criminal in the jail is very expensive.
My mom bought me this toy when I was eight years old.
It's a lie and a falsehood.
Take care of old people.
Don't count on Tom.
Don't count on Tom.
Tom didn't get caught.
I had a hard time.
Michael had a hard time making ends meet.
Send me a copy.
Send me a copy.
It wasn't as expensive as I expected.
Take us home.
One of them was Tom's friend.
Have you been with Tom all night?
I understand you were Tom's best friend.
Can we talk for a minute?
I could tell you things about Tom that you probably don't know.
I'm sorry I shot you.
Creative people create, the non-creative plagiarize, all the others - translate.
I don't see any way of stopping Tom from doing that.
Tom was trying to protect you.
In our next class, we will study the days of the week, the months, and the seasons.
Tom, be careful!
Do you want to help us catch Tom's killer?
How many goats do they have?
Are you and Tom working together?
Do you work with Tom?
She mentioned my name in her book.
Listen closely and do not interrupt.
Happy Independence Day!
Tom tried to do it by himself.
No further discussion is necessary.
They are impatient.
Tom opened a box of matches and lit one.
I think Tom should be warned.
Give me Tom's address.
Give me that envelope.
Tom was put in a cell.
Tom and I are in love with each other.
Tom has back problems.
Please read the instructions.
Soon the sound died away.
It's a questionable policy.
All of us know Tom.
We all hate Tom.
Someone who looks a lot like Tom is standing near the gate.
Tell Tom I'm looking forward to meeting him.
I only have American coins.
Tom's got the key.
Tom had a knife.
I'll be a little late today.
Tom was the only one who was late.
I can walk to school in ten minutes.
Tom usually goes to bed at ten-forty.
Dan explained in detail how he lost all his money.
She smiled at herself in the mirror.
I don't hate Tom anymore.
You're absolutely perfect, in every way.
Tom's parents have a lot of money.
I met Tom in the library on Monday.
Tom is having trouble with this.
Tom is running out of time.
Tom has a list of people to he wants to talk to.
I've never stopped loving Tom.
They can't see Tom.
Why are you hiding from Tom?
Are you hiding from Tom?
Maybe Tom is in love.
Does Tom earn enough money to live in the city?
Maybe there's something I missed.
The newspaper hasn't published our article yet.
I knew we'd find Tom.
I touched the bottom of the pool.
They paid no attention to his warnings.
No, I'm not angry with you.
No, I'm not angry with you.
You're not an innocent girl, are you?
What's your relationship with Tom?
What's your relationship with Tom?
Do you swear you're telling me the truth?
I will survive.
Tom wants you to take us to school.
Tom is really popular.
Tom is really popular.
Can we postpone the trip?
What's the fastest way to get the airport from here?
He has grown three centimeters this year.
The chicken is raw.
Wait here a minute.
I didn't mean to meddle.
They're all scared of Tom.
She is a most beautiful lady.
Who was it that read my diary while I was out?
Let's try to stay calm.
We're all working hard.
We'll take Tom with us.
We can use Tom's truck.
She got a piece of bread stuck in her throat.
Tom doesn't want to hurt anybody.
She's in desperate need of money.
They won't be here long.
They won't let Tom out.
You're giving me the creeps.
Tom looks like he's sleepy.
What kind of truck was Tom driving?
I've missed you a lot.
I don't even know if Tom has a girlfriend or not.
I don't even know if Tom has a girlfriend.
I have no intention whatever of resigning.
We've all missed you.
I have no idea why Tom isn't here.
When Tom was eighteen, he decided that he wanted to become a soldier.
Stop scaring us.
Why not just kill Tom?
Is this Tom's wife?
Tom has a lot of questions to ask you.
Tom has a lot of questions to ask you.
I've asked Tom to help you.
I've asked Tom to help you.
I don't think you have to worry about Tom anymore.
Tom couldn't find his shoes.
The fountain is over there.
Can you come here for a minute?
Please let me talk to Tom.
Where is the British embassy?
Where is the British embassy?
I need you to talk to Tom.
Did you talk to Tom today?
We're concerned for your safety.
This book is popular amongst students.
When did you talk to Tom?
She refused my friend request.
I didn't think the house would burn down so quickly.
Tom is wearing the tie I gave him.
Tom is waiting to take you home.
Tom is going to take you home.
No matter what you say, I won't give up.
It's a risk we'll have to take.
Why do you treat Tom like this?
Tom called to say he'd be late.
Tom seemed frightened at first.
Tom is a goner.
Don't be so melodramatic.
Tom has trouble hearing.
Tom had a paintbrush in his hand.
Someone attacked her.
Tom worked very hard.
I didn't mean to hit Tom so hard.
We're having the same problems that Tom is having.
What else does Tom have?
Tom is concerned about his health.
Tom is extremely easygoing.
Tom doesn't usually walk to the gym.
He dedicated his life to medicine.
Ruscism is a very popular ideology in Russia.
We'll look into it.
I dreamed about you.
Tom, put the bowl into the microwave.
Would you please turn the TV off?
You should cancel your trip.
You should cancel your trip.
You should cancel your trip.
You should cancel your trip.
I make a lot more money than he does.
Plants grow towards sunlight.
Where did you go with Tom?
Where did you and Tom go?
You scared me to death.
I hate the way the water tastes here.
Tom threatened them.
Tom threatened them.
Didn't I tell you Tom would be late?
Tom hardly ever wears green.
You get the idea, don't you?
Something was bothering Tom.
Turn it off, Tom.
Turn it off, Tom.
Turn it off, Tom.
We were very careful.
No one will be hurt.
Tom became confused.
I'm spending precious years of my life on you, and you don't appreciate it!
Her purse is the same color as her shoes.
What were you and Tom doing in the attic?
What were you and Tom doing in the attic?
We don't want any accidents.
She's young and sexy.
Tom likes kittens.
I don't care what anyone says. I think Tom is a nice guy.
Tom does all of his studying at night.
I feel betrayed.
I feel betrayed.
He's a dancer.
You should enjoy your life without making others' lives unpleasant.
Tom has a nice car.
She didn't want to spend any more time with Tom.
Tom hasn't taken a bath in week.
Are dragons real?
I heard you and Tom fighting.
I heard you and Tom fighting.
And she misses them very much.
We started talking on Facebook.
Tom treats me like a princess.
I spoke to Tom last night and he told me that he likes you.
Did Mary tell you that she thinks Tom and me are dating?
Tom has blonde hair and green eyes.
He seemed bored.
She seemed bored.
She seemed bored.
I thought my head was going to explode.
I thought my head was going to explode.
I'll ask Tom the next time I see him.
She winked at me.
Tom winked at the girls.
Money is a big bother: you can live neither with it nor without it.
Squirrels like to eat nuts.
You better watch your back!
Tom worked very hard, but he didn't make it.
We're a team, not individuals! We need to work as a team.
The school uniform is convenient because it can be worn for both informal and formal occasions.
Give me the backpack.
We'll take that risk.
Let's not invite Tom.
I'm still mad at Tom.
When did you see Tom?
He's a real expert.
She's the real expert.
Tom's a real expert.
I'd heard you'd moved.
Tom is off his rocker.
Tom filed for divorce.
Tom wrecked his truck.
Why were you with Tom?
How's your ulcer, Tom?
Hold your ground, Tom.
Tom ran out into the street.
I'm not to be disturbed.
I know how to handle Tom.
Tom doesn't want to be my friend. He thinks that he's too cool for me.
Nobody wants to play with Tom.
I don't appreciate Tom's humor.
I don't appreciate your humor.
Tom says that he's just eaten.
Many, if not most, professional translators only translate into their native language.
Most of the leaves have fallen.
Did you know that Tom had a son?
Did you know that Tom has a son?
Did you know that Tom had a son?
Tom's dog is brown.
I wear size six gloves.
Tom was tickled pink.
I would like a list of the Italian words that don't appear in the corpus yet.
Tom must be mad at me.
Who asked Tom to come?
He couldn't bring himself to shoot the deer.
He couldn't bring himself to shoot the deer.
He took a beautiful shot at a deer.
I felt betrayed.
Tom removed his tie and unbuttoned his collar.
She went to Mexico by herself.
This is the second time I have arrived in China on my own.
It amazed us that she had been to Brazil alone.
It amazed us that she had been to Brazil alone.
You never told me you knew Tom.
You never told me you knew Tom.
Why is he not letting me through?
You may go where you please.
I'm looking forward to going hunting with my father.
I'm looking forward to going hunting with my father.
Mr. Sato practices archery on weekends.
She used a damp rag to wipe off the dust.
Tom is wiping the table.
Tom fired his secretary.
Tom was almost hit by a truck.
I don't feel like talking about Tom today.
Tom showed me his collection of old coins.
Tom has a baseball card collection.
I found this in Tom's room.
Tom wasn't there when it happened.
I've made some mistakes that I should've been able to avoid.
I still think Tom is guilty.
I've heard it said that it's harder to please a woman than to please a man. I wonder if that's true.
I've heard it said that it's harder to please a woman than to please a man. I wonder if that's true.
She killed an hour looking around the stores.
Tom knows people.
When I was young, we used to swim in the river.
If you don't get a job soon, we're breaking up.
This is the perfect Father's Day gift.
This is the perfect Mother's Day gift.
She stared at her reflection in the mirror.
Were you looking for Tom?
Were you looking for Tom?
They're looking for Tom.
What's going on with you today?
This is a thought provoking book.
Tom's house is full of toys.
Tom's house is full of toys.
Tom always has a smile on his face.
He worked very hard to make his dream come true.
Galileo Galilei was born in Pisa, Italy in 1564.
Don't scare me like that, OK?
Don't scare me like that, OK?
When can we see Tom?
Tom threatened to kill me.
I've just eaten.
I've just eaten.
I've asked Tom to help us.
That's the whole problem.
Tom signed the contract without reading it.
It's a democratic government.
I'm not good enough for you.
I'm not good enough for you.
How are we ever going to find Tom?
We have a new puppy. He is about 12 weeks old.
She adds a lot of examples.
She adds a lot of examples.
I look forward to reading your report.
Elizabeth is independent of her parents.
Today I walked 10 kilometers.
I suddenly lost my appetite.
I'm glad the rumors weren't true.
The Vatican is an independent country.
Some people take a bath every day and others don't.
I'm still mad at her.
Tom looked at his notepad.
Tom knows this area like the back of his hand.
I didn't ask Tom to go there.
I didn't know that Tom wasn't at home.
I didn't know that Tom wasn't at home.
I'm going to take a bath as soon as I get home.
He is quite a character.
I am ironing my dress.
She admired her reflection in the mirror.
She admired her reflection in the mirror.
She caught sight of a rowing boat in the distance.
This is the only pair of shoes I have.
It's not me you have to convince.
Tom yanked off John's fake beard.
Tom was wearing dark brown shoes.
That's probably Tom's girlfriend.
Tom has a British accent.
Judging from his accent, he must be from Osaka.
I'm glad that you want to support this project.
We must work hard to promote world peace.
We must work hard to promote world peace.
They set up a fund to support the victims.
Should I talk to Tom?
It's dangerous.
The countryside is beautiful.
He has begun to enjoy country life.
He has begun to enjoy country life.
He has begun to enjoy country life.
Rural environments are too quiet for me.
We spent our holiday exploring rural France.
We spent our holiday exploring rural France.
Let me have a word with Tom.
Let me talk with Tom.
Let me talk with Tom.
Let me talk with Tom.
Let me go talk to Tom.
Can we talk with Tom?
Could you talk to Tom?
Could you talk to Tom?
Tom pointed to the right.
The patrolman motioned me to pull over.
Tom dashed out into the street.
I don't want to seem insensitive.
Anyways, we have no other choice.
I'll never ask Tom for help again.
I'm surprised that building is still standing.
If you have any interesting books, lend me some.
What advantage do they have?
Our bodies respond to our feelings.
If you pay attention to your foreign friends, you may be surprised that their customs and habits are different from yours.
Can we talk to Tom now?
We'll talk in my office.
Would you carry this upstairs for me?
His speech has a positive influence on all the colleagues.
I love spending time with Tom.
We haven't questioned Tom yet.
Did you read the instructions?
What sort of dreams have you been having?
It took them some time to get used to one another.
My brother uses that bike.
The ball rolled on the ground towards me.
Do you know much about Tom?
It's a complete disaster.
It was a total disaster.
The men have been shorn of their power.
The men have been shorn of their power.
I need to change that bandage.
I asked him to drive me home.
She wiped a tear from her cheek.
Even if you are busy, you should keep your promise.
I didn't have the courage to tell her the truth.
I didn't have the courage to tell her the truth.
If you knew the truth, you'd be surprised.
She failed and felt humiliated.
A bullet pierced the helmet.
I'm sorry if I scared you.
I'm sorry if I frightened you.
I'm sorry if I frightened you.
Some of them have committed suicide.
Some of them have committed suicide.
You said I could talk to Tom.
Why don't I just talk to Tom?
Maybe I should talk with Tom.
Congratulations on your victory.
They gained a victory.
We took part in the discussion.
I met him by chance at the airport yesterday.
Where is the Greek embassy?
Why did the chicken cross the road? is a very well-known English riddle, to which there are a multiplicity of answers.
Hand me my towel.
It's good that the horse didn't suffer.
I'd like to make a suggestion.
Tom wants to get out of town.
I don't see any bullet holes.
I like living with Tom.
Tom lived a hard life.
Tom just moved to town.
How old are you? "Sixteen years old".
I was afraid of Tom.
Tom and I both made mistakes.
I won't mention it again.
I believe you all know Tom.
Tragedies happen every day.
My sister's work is teaching English.
We were worried about Tom.
Don't be too rough on Tom.
I've never been more bored.
Tom ducked into the alley.
Tom and I are always busy.
Give the flashlight to me.
I picked Tom up at the train station.
Tom didn't want to give up.
Tom had big money problems.
Tom has a drinking problem.
Tom is desperate for money.
We're looking for a lawyer.
I don't think it's a trick.
I don't want to make waves.
Do you know Tom's parents?
Do you know Tom's parents?
Do you know Tom's parents?
Do you know Tom's parents?
Do you know Tom's address?
Tom was frank.
Tom was moody.
Tom was given a medal.
Tom was boring.
I squeezed Tom's hand.
I suggest you ask Tom.
I'm off to pick up Tom.
Can we drive you home?
Could you tell me how to get to Park Street from here?
You surprised me.
You surprised me.
You surprised me.
You surprised me.
Tom doesn't have much money in the bank.
Someone attacked me.
Someone attacked them.
No one expected Tom to win.
I'm more experienced than Tom.
We'll protect Tom.
Dan's sentences are easy to translate.
Dan believes that he's the center of the universe.
It is a joy to welcome overseas visitors to our home.
Tom and I are teachers.
Tom and I aren't cowards.
Tom and I aren't friends.
Tom and I aren't strangers.
Tom and I aren't strangers.
You were always a winner.
You were always a winner.
I met Tom on Friday the 13th.
It looks like your hard disk is fragmented.
Maybe Tom was the one who stole your bicycle.
Tom might have cancer.
Will you wait a moment?
Be thankful.
Be thankful.
Be thankful.
Find Tom and kill him.
Find Tom and kill him.
If Tom doesn't surrender, shoot him.
The post office is closed.
He was the only person to survive the fire.
The cost of advertising has gone up.
I want to be your ally, not your enemy.
Tom and Mary shared the cost.
Tom and Mary shared the cost.
What do you have against Tom?
Too expensive!
Tom is easy to live with.
Tom is now older and wiser.
Tom said it wasn't him who broke the window.
Tom made up his mind to be a helicopter pilot.
Tom turned on the car radio.
This is a post office and that is a bank.
You're in terrible danger.
You've got to talk to Tom.
I bet my bottom dollar he is innocent.
I bet my bottom dollar he is innocent.
Tom begged me to help him.
I'm always happy when I get email from you.
The post office is just across from the store.
He sent in his application to the office.
He sent the letter back unopened.
He works as a busboy.
I sometimes meet Tom at the club.
Farragut captured New Orleans without a fight.
He works as a ghost writer.
I work nights as a paramedic.
Maybe he did it on purpose.
Is she still working as a teacher?
Are you still working as a waiter?
She works as a secretary in an office.
I worked three years as Tom's assistant.
I worked three years as Tom's assistant.
He really wants to work as a translator.
Tom was too scared to even yell.
How did you find Tom?
How did you find Tom?
How did you find Tom?
My sister works as a secretary at a bank.
I had no idea you worked as a surgeon.
Tom worked as hard as the rest of us.
He worked as hard as any man in the village.
He doesn't work as hard as he used to.
He went to Portugal to work as a soccer trainer.
Why doesn't Marika work as a Japanese-Finnish translator?
My wife works as a nurse at a local hospital.
I met Tom on the way.
I barely even remember Tom.
What kind of nonsense is that?
Certain poisons, properly used, are useful.
I wonder if Tom would really do something like that.
Tom left an envelope on your desk.
He handed over all his property to his son.
Tom wasn't able to read in the dim light.
Tom wasn't able to read in the dim light.
In situations like these, a gun might come in handy.
Tom threatened Mary with a pistol.
We can still talk to Tom.
My French is limited.
You should stay upstairs.
You were a teenager then.
You're angry, aren't you?
Why do I need a lawyer?
Tom pulled off his shoes.
Tom put on his new shoes.
You can't let Tom drink by himself.
Exactly how many times did you hit Tom?
I found out what Tom does for a living.
What do you think of Tom's new car?
I have just started to study Korean.
I have just started to study Korean.
Tom hurried away.
Tom drove off in a hurry.
Tom got away with the money.
The dog drank water and went away.
The dog drank water and went away.
Tom got on his bicycle and rode away.
I'm here at Tom's request.
Do you think you'll need Tom's help?
Do you think you'll need Tom's help?
Everyone on the ship thought it was going to sink.
I have a brief statement.
This well is very deep.
I came to wish you good luck.
I came to wish you good luck.
I came to wish you good luck.
I came to wish you good luck.
I thought it was lunchtime.
Why don't you give me a break?
Some words have double meanings.
It's hard not to like Tom.
Do you think Tom will accept my invitation?
Do you think Tom will accept my invitation?
Was his name Tom or John?
Did you ask Tom where he'd been?
Did you ask Tom where he'd been?
Did you ask Tom where he'd been?
Did you ask Tom where he'd been?
Why did you marry Tom?
Do you have anything against Tom?
Do you have anything against Tom?
He runs a lot of hotels.
Where do you think I can find Tom?
Where do you think I can find Tom?
If you see Tom, could you give this to him?
If you see Tom, could you give this to him?
Students have to work hard, but they also have to leave time for social activities.
Who makes breakfast for Tom?
I don't want Tom to miss the bus.
The box was so heavy I could not move it.
The box was so heavy I could not move it.
Don't sit on that bench.
Tom's dog follows him everywhere.
Tom is visually impaired.
Why was Tom not at the meeting?
Did you ask Tom why he wasn't at the meeting?
Did you ask Tom why he wasn't at the meeting?
What size shoes does Tom wear?
Would you be willing to send me a sample free of charge?
Could you send me more information by email?
Could you send me more information by email?
Could you send me more information by email?
Could you send me more information by email?
Could you send me more details by email?
Could you send me more details by email?
Tom struggled to make ends meet.
I'm glad you could come. Please make yourself at home.
Ask Tom anything.
I apologize for Tom's behavior.
Tom can't do this alone.
As soon as man is born he begins to die.
Tom owns a car dealership.
Tom suggested we get together for a drink later.
Tom only cares about appearance.
Tom only cares about appearance.
The burglars broke into the bank at night.
It was the perfect moment for a kiss.
I knew Tom was guilty.
I knew Tom was guilty.
I knew Tom would back out.
I knew Tom would back out.
I knew very little about Tom.
The bomb will explode in 10 seconds.
He plays the guitar.
I'll be home by noon.
I enjoy talking with Tom.
I have a mission for you.
I knew I should've married Tom.
Tom and I love each other.
Tom talks with a slight accent.
When the lights went out, Tom lit a candle.
Can you take Tom to the hospital?
Can you take Tom to the hospital?
I met Tom at the airport.
What's the worst thing that could happen?
Tom gave the rope a yank.
Tom has light brown hair.
How long have you and Tom been working together?
I don't see Tom as often as I'd like to.
What else do you like about Tom?
What else do you like about Tom?
What do you really know about Tom?
What do you really know about Tom?
Could you help me find Tom?
Could you help me find Tom?
Do you really think we'll find Tom?
Do you really think we'll find Tom?
Do you know where we can find Tom?
Do you know where we can find Tom?
Why didn't you invite Tom?
Why didn't you invite Tom?
Why didn't you invite Tom?
Tom and I don't know each other.
Someone tried to kill Tom.
A stranger came up to you and asked you the time.
She doesn't like wearing heels.
John, are you and Tom brothers?
Do you recognize my voice?
His loud voice drew my attention.
I've been looking foward to meeting you.
Have you met Tom's new girlfriend?
I'm told that Tom likes to work on his own.
Tom is waiting in the hallway.
You said your name was Tom, didn't you?
You were in love with Tom, weren't you?
I could write Tom a note if you want me to.
She was my colleague before they fired her.
The temperature was above zero last week.
If I had known your email address, I would've written.
You have a lot of nerve.
He kept calm in the face of the danger.
He was mad at me because I broke up with him.
Aren't you taking this a little too seriously?
I think we can catch Tom.
Corporations are not people.
It seems that something is bothering him.
I ran and ran; otherwise I might have been late.
Just buy Tom some candy.
Tom could tell by Mary's accent that she was probably from Ireland.
Tom and I are giving up.
Tom can't back down now.
Tom lit the fuse.
Tom stepped back.
Just get it over with.
I'm stronger than Tom.
If I were you, I'd go talk to Tom.
Should I try to talk to Tom?
Something's not right with Tom.
Which hospital did they take Tom to?
I forgot to write the address on the envelope.
You can't please everybody, because not everyone is human.
We'll send the textbooks in three different lots.
I'll certainly talk to Tom.
I'll fire Tom if I have to.
I'll kill Tom if I have to.
She was perfect.
When was the last time you saw Tom at school?
Tom poured some more wine into his glass.
Tom was late, as always.
Did you ask Tom if he wants to go with us?
Did you ask Tom if he wants to go with us?
Did you ask Tom if he wants to go with us?
Did you ask Tom if he wants to go with us?
You shouldn't listen to Tom.
Tom struggled to free himself.
I recognized Tom at once by his voice.
The nurse attended the patient.
It is your business to take care of them.
She cared for her father until his death.
I'm bored out of my mind.
Tell Tom I'm in the office.
Tom, I'm bored.
You can talk to Tom, right?
The first time is free.
Could you ask Tom to call me?
Could you ask Tom to call me?
His handwriting is unreadable.
Stupidity is also a natural talent.
My car isn't powerful enough.
A calamity was avoided by sheer luck.
The car's almost out of gas.
I don't know Tom, but I know his sister.
I don't know Tom, but I know his sister.
I'll contact you when we're finished.
I'm actually looking for Tom.
I'm forced to agree with Tom.
Tom blames me for everything.
Do you know how to do first aid?
Do you know how to do first aid?
Does Tom have a beard?
Where's the nearest post office?
Was that meant as a joke?
I hope I didn't offend you.
I hope I didn't offend you.
Tom's car was hit by a truck.
Boy, that sentence sure caused a kerfuffle.
They're still available.
Tom had one child.
Tom and I are both busy.
This wasn't Tom's fault.
If we don't finish this job, we'll lose the next contract.
Tom was unable to conceal his anger.
Go grab your backpack.
Now let's get to work.
It's not fair at all.
I don't like this at all.
It wasn't funny at all.
He earns over 500 dollars a month from that job.
Tom was unable to hide his excitement.
We have direct access to the information.
Do you know any restaurants with good Korean food?
Tom was wearing an expensive suit.
Tom was wearing black leather gloves.
Tom was wearing black leather pants and a black leather jacket.
Tom was chosen captain.
Tom's dog was run over by a car.
Tom almost got hit by a car.
Am I the only one who thinks it's a bad idea to buy Tom's old car?
Tom is very careful.
Tom isn't very careful.
Tom was careful.
I'll take Tom there myself.
Tom wants to say hello.
Tom has money problems.
This is Tom's computer.
I'm at Tom's apartment.
I'll talk to Tom later.
I'm still in love with you.
Could you hand me the remote?
We must leave a tip for the waiter.
We all find her behaviour abhorrent.
They can play the guitar.
I haven't spoken with Tom since that happened.
I almost touched your hand this time.
It's incredible, isn't it?
I thought you were in charge.
When are you going to move?
You're smarter than most of Tom's friends.
You're starting to scare me.
You're taller than most of Tom's friends.
Tom has a sister about your age.
Did you answer Tom's question?
Tom is difficult to work with.
I don't want to seem too eager.
Yes, I did this intentionally.
Why didn't you tell me about Tom?
Why did you quit working for Tom?
Tom looked a little frightened.
I'm assuming Tom knows about this.
Tom didn't want to miss his plane.
Maybe this will convince you.
I don't enjoy riddles.
I'm surprised they let Tom in here.
Tom's face was as white as a sheet.
We helped him financially.
I'm going to drive Tom there myself.
I'm not surprised at Tom's behavior.
I don't feel like talking with Tom today.
Tell us what you know about Tom's family.
I found out when Tom graduated from college.
Tom doesn't know how to eat with chopsticks.
Our teacher said to us, "Don't leave the room."
Maybe this will convince you.
We rushed out onto the street.
I've known Tom longer than I've known you.
Don't think I don't appreciate what you've done.
Don't think I don't appreciate what you've done.
I have to say I envy you.
I have to say I envy you.
You and I both know you were the one who broke the window.
I'm going to find out who broke this window.
I want you to call me Tom.
I want you to call me Tom.
I want you to go with Tom.
I want you to go with Tom.
You can win all the battles yet lose the war.
How many guitar lessons have you had so far?
How many guitars do you own?
Don't let Tom leave.
Don't let Tom leave.
Don't look at Tom.
He gave us his impression of the poem.
Tom is almost convinced.
Tom is an environmentalist.
Tom's an expert.
How many museums did you visit?
I don't think Tom's jokes are particularly funny.
Tom will be found.
Tom will be fired.
Tom made a copy.
Do you really want to talk about Tom?
We'll never catch Tom.
I'm sure it was Tom that I saw in the park.
I'm sure it was Tom that I saw in the park.
There were many people at the funeral.
I haven't spoken with Tom since he got out of the hospital.
Tom's room is very small.
Did you think I'd give up so easily?
Do you have a swimming pool?
Do you have a swimming pool?
Sasha the Ukrainian says that Russian vodka has more alcohol content than does Ukrainian vodka.
Do you know who wrote this poem?
I couldn't convince Tom.
Were you attacked?
I received a letter from Tom.
Why didn't you listen to Tom?
Why didn't you listen to Tom?
I don't know anybody here except Tom.
Tom recently got out of prison.
I'm disgusted with Tom.
Most men here wear ties every day.
Tom works in advertising.
He became a shell of his former self.
She became a shell of her former self.
Take it outside.
That looks expensive.
That looks painful.
This seems fair.
It seems impossible.
We thank you very much!
We saw Tom last night.
She ironed a skirt.
You'd better ask Tom first.
Tom's name is first on the list.
You're going to have to work with Tom.
Does Tom have an attorney?
Has Tom had many visitors?
Tom wasn't wearing a hat.
Tom is the most talented artist in our class.
Yes. I was very surprised at the news.
We're going to send Tom home.
We're not going to catch Tom.
Tom called to tell me he'd be late.
Tom attempted suicide.
Tom has three kids now.
Tom's last name is hard to pronounce.
Tom got angry with me.
Tom asked everyone to take off their shoes.
Tom and I are both to blame.
History is written by the winners.
Did I forget to mention that?
Tom sat near the fire, playing his guitar.
Forgive Tom.
Forgive Tom.
Why did you invite Tom to dinner?
Why did you invite Tom to dinner?
Why did you invite Tom to dinner?
Why did you invite Tom to dinner?
Tom explained the rules in detail.
I gave up on Tom.
Do you agree with Tom's decision?
Do you agree with Tom's decision?
I gave up on Tom.
I gave up on Tom.
Tom has a family now.
Tom has a family now.
Tom has a family now.
My wedding has to be perfect.
I'm no longer angry at you.
I'm no longer angry at you.
I'm no longer angry at you.
I'm no longer angry at you.
No one can stop Tom.
I'm not angry at Tom.
My father wants me to marry Tom.
We can't interfere.
Go and look for Tom.
Why are you washing your hands?
Tom's personal assistant has a personal assistant.
Why do you need so many shoes?
Your sudden appearance has surprised me.
Be polite, but firm.
She's always grumbling.
I can't say I'm surprised.
My father died before I got my diploma.
Just tell Tom I'll be a little late.
What are your instincts telling you?
I'll tell you how to deal with Tom.
Tom just told us that he got fired.
He went out to eat.
I went to see a movie with Tom after school.
I went to see a movie with Tom after work.
Tom has been absent from school for three days.
Tom sat on a stool in the corner.
Tom is a very good cook.
Tom didn't even have enough money to buy a cup of coffee.
The garden can't be seen from the outside.
I play guitar almost every day.
We're almost halfway done.
I understand your concern.
Which shoes are you wearing?
Which shoes are you wearing?
Why do stars twinkle?
Please quit finding fault with me!
Quit finding fault with me!
Can't anyone take Tom's place?
Tom's car is stuck in the mud.
Just tell me where I can find Tom.
Just tell me where I can find Tom.
Tell me about your fight with Tom.
Tom always does that by himself.
Tom could hardly make himself understood.
Tom did his homework by himself.
She says she brushes her teeth every morning.
Tom was just trying to protect himself.
I'd like to know more about Tom.
A rat is a small animal with long, pointed teeth and a long tail.
He's a very talented artist.
We're very curious.
Reading a book can be compared to a journey.
Tom makes millions of dollars a year.
There's no reason to panic... yet.
Tom is concerned about your safety.
Tom picked up his toys.
Tom sells fruit.
Tom likes nuts.
Don't tell me you agree with Tom.
Tom was acting on his own.
Tom is hiding from them.
Tom is always polite.
Tom is the one who gave me this bicycle.
We'll take a break soon.
My grandmother knit that by hand.
Your shift ends at 2:30.
Your dress is very nice.
Everyone laughed, including Tom.
Fossil fuels won't be available forever.
We all miss you very much.
Put on your shoes.
Please tell me how to get to the airport.
Can you tell me the way to the bank?
Stop grumbling.
Do you want to meet Tom?
As a last resort, read the instructions.
We're not to be disturbed.
I have the honor of working with Tom.
In case of an emergency, get in touch with my agent.
Was I polite enough?
Alcohol is a drug.
Alcohol is a cure.
Do you think you'll see Tom again?
Mama, Tom won't gimme back my toy!
Please, give me something to eat.
I'm not here to buy shoes.
I went on foot.
I have to fell this tree.
Someone left the water running.
The situation seems hopeless.
The situation appears desperate.
Animals are not toys!
The matter admits of no explanation.
Let me get this straight.
The Anonymous is still able to deliver.
Someone left the water running.
You're cute.
You're cute.
You're cute.
You're cute.
You're cute.
I really see no reason to leave.
Shots were heard.
Say you're sorry.
Say you're sorry.
You're white as a sheet.
He leads a hectic life.
I'm pretty sure that Tom just made up that story.
Tom gave us a present.
Tom is the perfect guy for you.
Tom isn't a religious person.
Tom has been trying to get in touch with you.
Why are you barefoot?
Tom didn't mention where he'd been.
Tom rides a bicycle.
Do you need a break?
Do you need a break?
Tom always eats fruit for breakfast.
Tom always eats fruit for breakfast.
Be brief.
I have to stay calm.
I can't let anything happen to Tom.
Tom and his wife don't have any children.
It was a competition.
It was a competition.
Tom has just signed a new contract.
It takes courage.
It takes courage.
I don't trust this data.
Today wasn't a good day.
Is the well deep?
Tom had an important job to do.
Tom didn't want to be a lawyer or a doctor.
Tom has a white dog.
Why did we fail?
Tom and I are very good friends.
Let's all be friends.
Don't scare the girls.
Don't scare the girls.
Your new guitar sounds good.
It's now time to say goodbye.
Tom still has wet hair.
Tom had a sharp pain in his right hand.
We worked hard.
You're disturbing the whole neighborhood.
Tom's impossible.
Fear is the absence of trust.
I carry a bag of rice.
How long do you think it would take you to read this book?
How long do you think it would take you to read this book?
I'm learning Korean.
I don't need the user manual.
I'm not late, am I?
I can't get you out of my head.
Tom has a lot of money, but he has no friends.
The accident left him permanently paralyzed.
I swear, I wouldn't date you if I was on fire and you were the last bucket of water.
He is the champion.
Tom and I are best friends.
I'm one of Tom's best friends.
Tom told me that I was thirty minutes late.
Am I late?
Shouldn't we wait for Tom?
Tom has a heart of gold.
Tom got what he deserved.
Tom was hit by lightning.
Tom was arrested by the police.
Our train was thirty minutes late.
Tom got bored after three minutes.
Tom said he wanted to kill himself.
Tom killed himself three months ago.
Can you tell me the time?
Tom told a joke, but nobody laughed.
Tom's bicycle is much newer than mine.
Shall I drive you home?
Tom is ironing his shirt.
The USA dropped an atomic bomb on Hiroshima in 1945.
They drink cola.
What time do you usually eat lunch?
What time do you usually eat lunch?
He crossed the river in a small boat.
That must be Tom's girlfriend.
Tom and I introduced ourselves to each other.
These rules are not very clear.
My watch gains one minute a day.
There is a communal kitchen in the dormitory.
You must be Tom's parents.
You must be Tom's brother.
Tom, do you have a moment?
Is there anything to eat?
Tom has lots of free time.
I didn't come here to discuss Tom.
I didn't come here to discuss Tom.
Tom opened his refrigerator and looked inside.
I want you to tell me about Tom.
I'm the only one who can stop Tom.
Who did you have lunch with?
Nobody knows what happened to Tom.
Do you want to know my first impression of Tom?
I was the worst student in the class.
He has the habit of spitting on the ground.
You've got to fight back.
Thank you very much. I appreciate your help.
Tom postponed his departure for three days.
We have to eat.
The beach is an ideal place for children to play.
I think it's a fair decision.
That song was very popular three years ago.
Tom didn't come to school today because he had to go to a funeral.
Tom is taking a tremendous chance.
Tom's favorite Elvis Presley song is "Jailhouse Rock."
She always writes down every word her teacher says.
If you go too close, you run the risk of being electrocuted.
Tom was older and wiser than his friend.
Tom never even left the house.
I don't know the traffic regulations here.
No sooner is one lie out of your mouth than you're telling yet another.
I'm not asking Tom.
You said you'd talk to Tom.
I'm looking forward to good news.
Maybe you gave up too fast.
Tom has oily skin.
I'm the one who stole Tom's money.
Wealth does not always bring us happiness.
I recognized Tom immediately.
Finding it hard to make ends meet on his income, she started to work.
Please don't be angry.
It's important to take care of your skin.
A team of British scientists has discovered what is apparently a “strong correlation” between a person's beliefs and the structure of his or her brain.
You're always playing computer games.
It is true that Rosa had a glass of wine.
I don't want to cause any more trouble.
He was bored the whole day.
Tom is a busboy.
Tom was asked not to speak at the meeting.
Tom is a cook.
Tom can't be so easily fooled.
Tom can't be so easily fooled.
Tom could get killed.
We seem to have lost Tom.
I don't like to be interrupted.
The street is deserted.
What happened was unavoidable.
When did you and Tom buy that?
I'm really going to miss you.
I'm really worried about Tom.
I'm sorry I wasted your time.
I still think about Tom.
I'm sure it'll come in handy.
I'm sure Tom had his reasons.
I politely corrected Tom.
I think Tom will swim.
I think Tom will swim.
Tom seemed surprised when I told him about it.
Tom is dialling a number.
Our plan flopped.
A young girl is chased by an old man.
I have to go to the library with Tom.
We need to take Tom home.
I'm surprised to see you again so soon.
Can we talk about this outside?
He said he had come to Japan the previous week.
I need Tom's help.
I assume you're referring to Tom.
I saw Tom on the stairs.
I like rice.
I don't know who killed Tom.
You're supposed to meet Tom at the club.
That wouldn't surprise me.
Please don't leave me here with Tom.
You can't hide forever.
You can't skateboard here.
You don't look Japanese.
Who turned off the light?
Is Tom available?
I have information for Tom.
You scared the children.
You scared the children.
You won't be fired.
I want to become a good listener.
To study English is important for today's young people.
I'd like to talk to you in my office.
I've spent so many years as chairman that I feel it's time I stepped down.
I tried hard to make them stay home, but they refused to listen to me.
People have the tendency to speak more loudly when they get excited.
Tom is a cripple.
Who is lurking in the shadows?
I take care of people.
Tom ate quickly.
Do you know who broke the window?
I don't recommend eating in that restaurant. The food is awful.
She had to speak before a large audience.
I know a guy who plays the guitar fairly well.
Do you care what other people think about us?
I will consent to the divorce.
The doctors did not believe he was in danger of dying.
I was amazed that she had drunk all of the wine.
Tom kept us entertained.
I hate Tom because reasons.
I hate Tom because reasons.
Have you seen Tom on stage?
What's with Tom?
Save Tom.
Save Tom.
I'm trying to find Tom.
I forgot to ask Tom.
I forgot to ask Tom.
It was a fair price.
We'll get rid of it.
Give me a ride home.
Tell Tom I miss him.
Put on a happy face.
Tom has a blue car.
Tom was in my dream.
Tom's car hit a tree.
I'll try to find Tom.
You gave up too soon.
Does Tom have a plan?
What do you think of Tom's beard?
Someone saw him wash his car.
Hurry up, we are leaving!
I didn't plan on staying here so long.
It's time to wake Tom up.
I'm convinced Tom had nothing to do with that.
Are you sure you don't know Tom?
Are you sure you don't know Tom?
Are you sure you don't know Tom?
Are you sure you don't know Tom?
I thought I saw Tom in the park.
There's absolutely no risk.
Tom described the problem in detail.
Sometimes the nights are cool.
Sometimes the nights are cool.
Tom is always careful.
I was grateful.
If you ask Tom, he'll help.
If you ask Tom, he'll help.
Tom will never give up.
I didn't give up.
The weather forecast was right.
What's the weather forecast for tomorrow?
I've tried to contact him.
I've tried to contact her.
Do you know how to contact us?
Do you know how to contact us?
Do you know how to contact them?
Do you know how to contact them?
Do you know how to contact me?
Do you know how to contact me?
Do you know how to contact him?
Do you know how to contact him?
Do you know how to contact her?
Do you know how to contact her?
I can't contact them.
I can't contact him.
I can't contact her.
Perhaps we should contact them.
Perhaps we should contact him.
Perhaps we should contact her.
I must contact them.
I must contact him.
I must contact her.
We'll contact him.
We'll contact her.
I'm not sure I can contact them.
I'm not sure I can contact him.
I'm not sure I can contact her.
Tom can't be in the car more than ten minutes or he gets sick.
Here we enjoy mountain walks and fresh air.
Tom has been sober three months.
I'm looking forward to meeting your parents.
I need to stop thinking about Tom.
The Confederate army retreated.
General Lee and the Confederate Army lost the great battle.
Please don't be mad at me.
Please don't be mad at me.
I miss talking with Tom.
Keep out of Tom's way.
Why does that bother you?
You shouldn't respect someone just because they're rich.
We saw the island in the distance.
She has a black puppy.
I hate Tom for many reasons.
Did you two break up?
We're going to be late again.
I think I've made myself clear.
Don't touch my guitar.
Don't touch my guitar.
It's important to Tom.
I must weigh at least ninety kg.
My patience is coming to an end.
St Peter's is in Rome and St Paul is in London.
We are looking for a house with a garage.
We are looking for a house with a garage.
Tom is riding his bicycle.
Tom wanted to keep his bicycle in my garage.
My French still isn't very good.
They'll announce the winner tomorrow.
Tom stormed out of the meeting.
I don't want to leave them.
You are a waiter.
That is indeed beautiful.
I'll meet with Tom tonight.
I didn't mean to hit Tom.
I'll get in touch with Tom.
Don't you have any other way of contacting Tom?
When did you start having trouble with Tom?
When did you start having trouble with Tom?
What have you done with Tom?
Why do you continue to argue with Tom?
Why do you continue to argue with Tom?
How did you live with Tom?
Why did you agree to spend the evening with Tom?
Where did you go after your talk with Tom?
Why are you still with Tom?
What exactly was your relationship with Tom?
Was Tom hurt?
Can you wait outside?
Can you wait outside?
He couldn't tell green from blue.
We were proud of Tom.
We were surprised by Tom's decision.
We were surprised by Tom's decision.
Sometimes it's better to remain silent.
Tom's house shouldn't be too hard to find.
I no longer remember the song's melody.
Tom's house shouldn't be too hard to find.
It's too late for us to back out.
We'll start an investigation immediately.
I have to turn off the telephone.
The sun sank below the horizon and it got dark.
I knew she was waiting for Tom.
I grabbed Tom by the elbow.
She was the one who contacted me first.
I've been saying that all along.
When you're young and you're in love, the world seems beautiful.
I had to stop Tom from making the biggest mistake in his life.
How pretty!
We're all very proud of Tom.
I feel like my head is going to explode.
I feel like my head is going to explode.
Tom has short legs.
I apologize for yesterday.
Would you mind waiting a minute?
We're grateful for your help.
We're grateful for your help.
Tom has three cars and a motorcycle.
That was a pretty good movie.
We're not accusing you of anything.
We're not accusing you of anything.
I apologize for yesterday.
John wanted to be completely independent of his family.
I know that Tom likes classical music.
Did you get the information you needed?
I had a date with Tom last night.
There is no shortcut to education.
Dan's new girlfriend is very young.
I was just thinking aloud.
I'm inclined to believe her.
My dream is to become a famous singer.
You can hide in here until the police leave.
You can hide in here until the police leave.
You can count on Tom.
You can count on Tom.
You can count on Tom.
He swallowed his pride.
She swallowed her pride.
If students today had more free time, they might show more interest in politics.
Is it true you love salted coffee?
I knew Tom very well.
Who cares what Tom thinks?
I wanted to talk to Tom about something.
Yesterday I got up early.
I'm trying to make a good first impression.
You didn't have to stoop so low.
Here's a tip for your trouble.
I am pleased to tell you that your work has now been accepted for publication in SM.
If you have any questions, please don't hesitate to contact me.
Whatever happens, don't panic.
There's a bottle of white wine in the refrigerator.
We were listening to classical music.
Don't be so naive.
Don't be so naive.
She spends as much money as she earns.
I used to hate Tom.
That is how he got out of danger.
No one laughed at Tom's jokes.
It's been five years since we moved here.
A stranger came up to them and asked them the time.
How many people survived?
They've fired him.
A stranger came up to them and asked them the time.
A stranger came up to them and asked them the time.
The sooner you clear the matter up with Tom, the better.
I was dumbstruck.
I don't care how much money you have.
It took me two hours to reach Yokohama.
I like my coffee with lots of foam on the top.
This blue backpack is heavy.
He has a robotic voice.
The prince slew the dragon.
I always laugh at funerals.
Who told you that Tom and I are dating?
Everyone was drunk, except me.
What's the point of existence?
What happened to Tom's head?
There are some topics you shouldn't discuss with Tom.
Tom picked up the coins.
I'm afraid we're stuck here.
Someone put an envelope on your desk.
Which best describes his actions?
I'm just a little surprised.
I'm in love with Tom's wife.
We don't have enough room.
Tom got out of the pool.
Tom didn't obey his parents.
The wine is in the glass.
I prefer a hotel by the airport.
It's dangerous to swim at night.
We fast-forwarded the film.
I'd like to invite you to my favourite café. It’s a nice, relaxing place with a good vibe.
The police asked the criminal to give up his gun.
Those are the facts.
The princess lay with her eyes closed.
Tom recognized her handwriting.
I know Tom's sister.
If you want to talk to Tom about this, let me know and I'll give you his number.
The fact that you disappear for weeks with no apparent reason bothers me.
Thanks for helping us out, doctor.
There was an eerie silence.
I saw you and Tom yelling at each other yesterday.
I saw you and Tom yelling at each other yesterday.
Is it too late to say I'm sorry?
Could you be a little more specific?
Could you be a little more specific?
He messed it up.
He made up his mind to be a pilot.
My job is to take care of the baby.
She got a flat tire on her way home.
Haven't I told you not to call me Tom?
The least you could do is to answer me.
He was standing at the side of the road.
I thought we could eat out on the patio.
I thought we could eat out on the patio.
It is dangerous to fly in this heavy fog.
He told me that I should be more careful.
He told me that I should be more careful.
Put it on.
Say your prayers.
Say your prayers.
Give me a moment.
Stop for a moment.
Get up out of bed.
Put the kettle on.
Be careful with that.
Give me a minute, OK?
Put a lid on it, Tom.
Don't settle for less.
Get outside right now.
Don't send that letter.
Let me talk to Tom first.
Be very careful with this.
Be very careful with this.
Don't release that prisoner.
Turn yourself in to the police.
Give me a chance to talk to Tom.
Don't attempt to do this by yourself.
Let me get my lawyer on the phone.
Tom has problems at school.
I never had that problem with Tom.
How do we make this problem go away?
I heard about your problems from Tom.
I heard about your problems from Tom.
Tell us everything you know about Tom.
Tell us everything you know about Tom.
Tom never had any problems at school.
What does Tom have?
Tom was half right.
Tom pulled a lever.
Tom stifled a laugh.
Tom inserted a disk.
Tom has his reasons.
Tom and I were busy.
Does Tom have a key?
I know that you still love Tom.
That would be dangerous.
Just give us a minute.
Don't let Tom give up.
You can't rely on Tom.
They should thank Tom.
We have to follow Tom.
You can talk to Tom.
That's utter nonsense.
There's absolutely no risk.
He is far from perfect.
It was Tom's fault, not yours.
Tom's name isn't on the list.
Tom's name isn't on the list.
What are you and Tom up to?
The next train for the airport will depart from platform two.
The little girl has a doll in her hands.
A squirrel hid in the branches.
After my graduation, I'd like to go to Shanghai, in order to study China's history.
I don't like to be away too long.
We celebrate our Independence Day on the Fourth of July.
Can you tell the twins apart?
Women with mothers or sisters who have endometriosis are at elevated risk of developing the condition themselves.
Be sure to switch off the television before you go to sleep.
Let me know when you get that report back from Tom.
Let me know when you get that report back from Tom.
Don't worry about Tom. He always acts that way.
Don't worry about Tom. He always acts that way.
Give me Tom's phone number and I'll call him.
Give me a minute to catch my breath.
Don't ever try to do this by yourself.
Are you going to give up?
Grab Tom and don't let him get away.
I'm hoping to find Tom.
The problem is we don't have enough money to complete the project.
I was Tom's partner.
Put it on Tom's tab.
Congratulations to you both.
Could you ask Tom to stop by after work?
Do you want me to go talk to Tom myself?
I don't know what more I can do for Tom.
They have no reason to be angry.
I did not want to attract attention.
I am dozing.
I'm the only one who understands Tom.
If you stay at a big hotel, you can use their swimming pool.
This is a very scary place.
Tom is too proud to ask others for help.
I can't find Tom. Has he gone already?
I did surprise him.
I'm not sure what's wrong with Tom.
The pilot increased the speed of the plane.
I thought you were going to talk to Tom about it.
Tom sat at the kitchen table eating dinner.
Why did you break up with her?
We'll have a barbecue at the beach.
It's pretty hot.
We took a mud bath.
He granted me permission to work in his office.
We have no complaints.
Can you watch Tom?
The plane took off at exactly ten o'clock.
Do you mean you're giving up?
Do you mean you're giving up?
Do you mean you're giving up?
Do you mean you're giving up?
There's nobody in the house. Everybody's outside.
Go and talk to Tom.
Go and talk to Tom.
The last time I saw Tom was about a year ago.
Do you have anything to eat?
Do you have anything to eat?
I'm not ready to give up.
Why do you interrupt me all the time?
I've tried to contact you.
I don't want what I'm about to say to be recorded.
I want the whole world to know that we're in love.
I appreciate what you did for me.
There is a lid for every pot.
Excuse me, where's the American Embassy?
Tom seems to have something on his mind.
Tom has been trying to get rid of the mice in his house.
Find out all you can about Tom's business.
Tom unhooked the fish and released it back into the water.
I didn't think Tom would have any problems.
When was the last time you worked with Tom?
I'd like to call Tom and see if he can come visit me tomorrow.
Could you pull over?
I found the book boring.
Did somebody hit Tom?
Tom and I were born on the same day.
Youth has its advantages.
The cat scared me.
Describe your ideal breakfast.
You should learn how to ride a bicycle.
We have to get you to the hospital.
Butterflies live for three days.
Tom could be seriously injured.
Please turn off the light when you leave the room.
Please turn off the light when you leave the room.
May I visit you tomorrow?
Fair enough.
I'll be in the attic.
I've never seen Tom with that woman before.
Rummaging around in boxes, I stumbled upon an old family photo.
One can win several battles but lose the war.
Take me back to the office.
Can't you just talk to Tom?
All of them were handmade things.
All of them were handmade things.
He tried putting on his new shoes.
The meeting has been canceled.
They go to work on foot.
You're scaring him.
You're scaring her.
You're scaring her.
You're scaring him.
Nothing scares us.
Nothing scares them.
Nothing scares him.
May we have a short recess?
May we have a short recess?
I'm not ready to give up yet.
Why didn't he tell me about Tom?
Let's make a pact.
Continue your investigations.
Could I ask you a few questions about Tom?
Doesn't Tom always wear a tie?
He won a free trip to Tunis.
I miss my parents so much.
Tom lives in a very big mansion.
Zero is a special number.
Tom has a weird sense of humor.
All electronic devices must be checked with the guard.
His house was burnt down.
I was just trying to protect you.
Aren't you glad Tom isn't here?
Aren't you glad Tom isn't here?
Please take more care in the future.
You wouldn't have recognized Tom.
Tom had some questions.
Your handwriting is very good.
Why are you late to class?
I miss my mom.
Tom got sick.
I don't know how to persuade Tom to help us.
I don't know how to persuade Tom to help us.
Science is not a religion.
He was kind enough to take me to the hospital.
One of your buttons has come off.
Please just take me home.
Have the children eaten yet?
Who's looking after your dogs?
Dan dragged Linda out of the house and threw her in the street.
Why don't you just fire Tom?
Tom insists I stop calling him by his first name.
I'm not completely naive.
A stranger is a friend you just haven't met yet.
It was definitely a hoax.
She managed to carry all the bags herself.
Why did you fire Tom?
Why did you fire Tom?
Why did you fire Tom?
Why did you give up?
Why did you give up?
Why did you give up?
When did you give up?
When did you give up?
When did you give up?
Did you go shopping?
Did you go shopping?
Did you go shopping?
Why did you shoot me?
Why did you shoot me?
Why did you shoot me?
Did you sue Tom?
Did you sue Tom?
Did you sue Tom?
Did you threaten Tom?
Did you threaten Tom?
Did you threaten Tom?
Tom tried not to overreact.
He dressed like a girl.
It's very cold in this room. The fire went out.
You don't look like Tom.
He took this photo.
Tom has a dark secret.
I was afraid I'd be late.
Could you turn off the TV?
Could you turn off the TV?
That couple spends quite a bit of money eating at nice restaurants.
We have to get rid of Tom.
I've been trying to get Tom to take his medicine.
I'd like to have Tom over for dinner.
I've discovered Tom's secret formula.
Is there any word on Tom's condition?
I have a Russian passport, but I'm French.
I keep a diary.
I don't worry about my spelling - I rather go for speed typing.
Don't deceive yourself.
Do you think it might cause sickness?
The tablets are swallowed with water.
God heard our prayers.
God heard my prayers.
Hey, you! No running by the pool!
Hey, you! No running by the pool!
We didn't notice her sorrow.
We got stuck in traffic.
I could've met you at the airport.
I could've met you at the airport.
I could've met you at the airport.
I could've met you at the airport.
That's not a horse, it's a donkey.
I didn't say hello.
There are people who speak of wisdom with no clue of what respect is.
We're all bored.
Tom wore gloves.
I've always been attracted to older women.
I was furious.
I didn't mean to step on your foot.
Armenia joined the World Trade Organization in 2003.
Armenia joined the World Trade Organization in 2003.
I don't know why Tom is whispering.
I don't like them at all.
I don't like waiting for Tom.
Tom's bored.
Tell her that I am fed up of her lies.
I'm your lawyer.
They need instructions.
How did you know I was with Tom?
She tried to hide her anger.
Excuse me, waiter. There's a hair in my soup.
We need to speak to Tom.
Tom is bored stiff.
Tom has a big nose.
Tom will eventually give in, I think.
Leave the rest to me.
Did you hit Tom?
Did you hit Tom?
Did you hit Tom?
The chairman resigned out of the blue.
Lots of animals, like for example tigers eat meat.
She read the poem out loud.
He can't continue without Tom.
I want to thank you for all you've done.
I want to thank you for all you've done.
We survived!
Stop shooting.
I had a long conversation with Tom.
I had a long conversation with Tom.
The thing about her is... She tended to create sides. And people would then get on those sides.
Put Tom on a bus.
Put Tom on a bus.
Such toys have a bad influence on children.
The Frenchman sings.
I had a long conversation with Tom.
I couldn't get in touch with him.
I couldn't get in touch with him.
This is a doghouse that I made myself.
She glanced shyly at him.
The law does not apply to this case.
It wasn't true.
I need to leave before Tom arrives.
I need to leave before Tom arrives.
I want you in my office in one hour.
We're investigating a series of murders.
They chose Tom as their leader.
You had better call off your plan.
Stop whatever it is you are doing and listen to me for once, dammit!
Having failed twice, William didn't want to try again.
She studies hard.
As far as I can remember, it was three years ago that we last met.
Tom became popular.
Are drinks free?
You promised me that you would make something for us to eat.
When does the post office open?
All is not milk and honey in Canada.
I am woebegone.
Perfectionists find it harder to function than average people.
We ran around the fountain in the park.
Only yokels spit on the ground.
He spat on the ground.
They didn't accept the counterproposal.
You can't be too careful when driving a car.
You know more than I do about German customs and traditions.
What are the advantages of this technology?
What are the advantages of this technology?
A woman without a man is like a fish without a bicycle.
Did you see anyone suspicious?
Did you see anyone suspicious?
I finished translating for today.
Today, I waited for a shorter amount of time than usual before he arrived.
I'll accompany you to the airport.
I'll accompany you to the airport.
We'll pick Tom up on the way.
We'll pick Tom up on the way.
Under present circumstances, I don't intend to return to my country.
This isn't the way to Tom's house.
Finish cleaning the windows.
The sheep is dying of gid.
Tom works for a translation agency.
You must be a good cook.
I'll visit my uncle next week.
Gee, it sure is boring around here. "Link!" "I'm back." "Where did you go?!" "He must've gone to the island of Delphino, Your Majesty." "...My boy, you're in HUGE trouble."
My gas bill for last month was very high.
He did well for a beginner.
Tom wants to see a doctor as soon as possible.
Tom waited outside in the pouring rain for over an hour.
I'm going to miss this place.
Tom is heartbroken.
The clatter of the horse's hooves soothed him.
I hear the hubbub of the children in the background.
It's a boring word.
The meal was disgusting.
They waited outside.
Tom's parents only stayed together for the sake of the children.
Tom's parents only stayed together for the sake of the children.
Everybody was surprised.
Tom's parents only stayed together for the sake of the children.
He put me in a good mood.
I won't tolerate that anymore.
She's unbelievably stupid.
It's unbelievably beautiful!
Tom is unbelievably naive.
Tom made a wise decision.
What Tom did was appreciated.
They found Tom.
He became a handsome young man.
I just miss him.
Tom called to say he would be late.
Tom called and said he would be late.
What scared you?
What scared you?
I'll miss them.
I'm going to miss you.
I'd like to meet Tom's father.
I have eaten enough.
He seemed very surprised when I told him about it.
Rural life appeals to me very much.
My brother is a seasoned sailor.
The water in this fountain is very cold.
It was dangerous.
Summer has come.
It's a trifle incident.
Gold is heavier than silver.
Give Tom something to eat.
Give Tom something to eat.
Give Tom something to eat.
Give Tom something to eat.
Do you know why Tom is absent from school?
We didn't mean to hurt them.
Somebody's got to talk to Tom.
Do you want me to talk to Tom?
Do you want me to talk to Tom?
Did you talk to Tom on Monday?
Did you talk to Tom on Monday?
Did you talk to Tom on Monday?
The fall of the empire was inevitable.
Tom's favorite color is blue.
There is a basket full of bananas on the counter.
Love is not enough.
The train pulled into the station.
Tom has many talents.
Tom threw a stick for his dog.
Tom climbed into bed.
Tom climbed into bed.
I wiped the window sill with a paper towel.
I'm in love with Tom's girlfriend.
You wouldn't have recognized Tom.
They wouldn't have recognized Tom.
You are very talented.
You are very talented.
Finish playing and then we'll study.
I thought I'd dropped something.
I thought I'd dropped something.
He who fights may lose, but he who doesn't has already lost.
She hugs trees.
Moral values are important in society.
I want to move to Antarctica.
I'm taking Tom to the park.
What have they done to Tom?
Mosquitoes enjoy the company of humans.
I can't believe I'm sitting next to Tom.
She wasn't able to contact him by phone.
We don't want to overwhelm them.
Explain to me in detail how it happened.
Tom is studying his notes.
Tom jumped into the water.
My favourite colour is purple.
I always keep promises.
Do I know Tom?
That's where we saw Tom last year.
Do they sell books?
The Loch Ness monster is an urban myth.
What's his teacher's name?
There are internal contradictions within modern society.
I am a teacher.
The information is stored in a file on my computer.
All wise men are good, but not all good men are wise.
Tom can't have been all that surprised.
Tom can't have been all that surprised.
This can't have been an accident.
Please tell me all these horrible accusations are a lie.
'OK' is said to be the most popular word in the world.
Don't worry. I'll protect you.
He likes this guitar.
Oil is more precious than human life for you, right?
We'll obey.
I've dreamt about you nearly every night this week.
Sad to see you go.
Sad to see you go.
Oil is not everything, Charley!
This rule cannot be applied to that case.
Do you recognize me?
Tom graduated from college last spring.
Do you sell fruit?
Does it please you?
Does it please you?
Does she work hard?
Does she work hard?
Does Tom have it?
It's all Toma's doing.
Draw a line here.
Plants do not have a brain.
Do you have lovers?
Do you have lovers?
It's too late for apologies.
Do you know who broke this window?
He can run a hundred meters in twelve seconds.
Don't forget your gloves. It's cold.
A policeman came up to him.
I've asked him three times to take out the trash and he still hasn't done it!
Tom agreed to be here at 2:30, but he's not here yet.
He says that if he were a bird he would fly to me.
Wait one minute.
He kept insisting that he wasn't wrong.
He kept insisting that he wasn't wrong.
My ears hurt.
The stars were twinkling in the sky.
She said that she would visit Jack with her sisters.
We were a perfect couple.
Tom got very drunk.
Tom got very drunk.
Tom is no longer alive.
Tom is no longer alive.
My grandma and my mom used to say this all the time.
You've frightened me.
Can we speak in the hall?
I am praying.
I am wiping my nose with a handkerchief.
Korean food is generally spicy.
I don't know why Tom got sick.
It'll burn.
Tom apologized to her.
Doctors use medical equipment.
Tom loves sports events.
Marriage frightens some people.
Poison can kill you.
I collect rare coins.
Gamblers enjoy taking risks.
Skyscrapers are beautiful structures.
They failed both times.
Austria had allies, too.
The governor was furious.
Make Tom go away.
Tom dropped the cup.
Tom totaled his car.
You're not that hopeless.
Human blood has the same colour everywhere.
Secrets are a sad thing to have.
You dare not look me in the face, or else I will rip you apart.
There is an urgent need for experienced pilots.
Even in the most difficult situations, Tom has never lost heart.
He missed his flight.
He's not good enough for you.
He told me where to shop.
I didn't ever expect to see Tom again.
I thought I was never going to see Tom again.
I forgot to ask Tom for his advice.
That's a very serious accusation.
Each time I see blood, I faint!
Tom's kindness affected her.
Where are your ancestors from?
Did they approve your project?
Trust is earned, not ingratiated.
Go wake Tom up and tell him breakfast is ready.
The company cancelled the meeting.
Maybe Tom doesn't have children.
Thank you for calling Tom.
You're about three weeks late.
You're not going to catch Tom.
The events were closely linked.
The navy defends our seacoast.
Some neighbors are very noisy.
Columns provide a solid foundation.
We walked through thick bushes.
They called him a traitor.
He visited China in 1998.
He, too, would visit China.
He would have to surrender.
Japan wanted control of Manchuria.
Americans were shocked and afraid.
I tied my dog to a tree in the garden.
The Americans surprised the Germans.
I spent the whole day thinking about Tom.
I spent the whole day thinking about Tom.
She's always very polite.
He doesn't want to work in a factory.
He did all he could to protect his son.
Tom's bedroom only has one small window.
Doing homework is extremely boring.
People could have avoided many mistakes by simple experiments.
I went to the airport to meet with my father.
These pills come in a blister pack.
The singer has a beautiful voice.
I recognized Tom right away.
Tom slept with his shoes on.
Tom thanked us for our help.
That guy gave me the creeps.
Tom mistakenly drank poison.
Tom filled a cup with water.
They're now in Tom's office.
I was with Tom when he died.
I went there to talk to Tom.
I won't try to persuade Tom.
She lives in the country.
We just have to find Tom before the police do.
Tom has a fast car.
He's perfect at everything.
Let's postpone until next week.
It's junk. Throw it away.
The enemy has demanded our surrender.
Prices went to amazingly low levels.
Alexander Hamilton was a proud man.
Can you tell me how long Tom has had this?
Thirty-four of them were lawyers.
He is the last person I would want to go skiing with.
An old wooden box served as table.
The neighbours are making too much noise – they're starting to annoy me!
Were it not for water, nothing could live.
His vote would decide the issue.
I begged her not to go there.
We had to walk all the way to the station.
Love is seeing her in your dreams.
The man is chasing the woman.
How did Tom talk you into that?
I went to the airport to meet with my father.
He unbuttoned his shirt.
She unbuttoned her shirt.
Every student trusts Mr Akai because he never breaks his word.
Such a plan is bound to fail.
When I get bored, bad things happen.
When I get bored, bad things happen.
I'm doing my duty.
We have many varieties of coffee.
I have finally received my British passport.
I have finally received my British passport.
The court judged him guilty.
Is that singer popular among your friends?
Technology solved many of the problems.
This ship was ten meters long.
I'm a winner!
Rice is usually eaten with chopsticks in Japan.
Her voluptuous body attracted me.
You are entitled to have a lawyer.
She often sings when she does the washing up in the kitchen.
I can walk there on foot.
He went up the steps slowly.
I'm late for work.
He took a coin out of his pocket.
He took a coin out of his pocket.
It's hard to surprise him.
It's hard to surprise her.
Are you bored?
Do you recognize this handwriting?
The patient fainted at the sight of blood.
I don't remember mailing the letter.
Boredom is itself boring, hence it tends to feed on itself.
You survived.
You survived.
You survived.
You fainted.
You fainted.
You fainted.
You look Japanese.
You look Japanese.
You look Japanese.
Are you popular?
Are you popular?
Are you popular?
She scolds Terry as often as me.
Tom came back into the office.
That sounds like a scam.
I'll talk to Tom when he gets home.
It is easy to add 5 to 10.
I've been trying to wake Tom up.
Tom turned off his phone.
She always gives me the cold shoulder.
I'm not good at telling jokes.
That doesn't mean you shouldn't be careful.
He's in love with his best friend.
He's in love with his best friend.
Where is your new tablecloth?
That's an old German custom.
That's an old American custom.
That's an old Russian custom.
That's an old Japanese custom.
This is an ancient Chinese custom.
I bet I can do better than Tom.
I bet I can do better than Tom.
Tom's doctor advised him to drink more milk.
One must keep one's promises.
I'm not sure I'm going to Tom's wedding.
We know you didn't kill Tom.
We've come for Tom's things.
I prefer to go by bicycle.
Tom was in love.
Are you going to go with Tom?
I'm going to visit him next week.
You broke my heart.
I just wanted to wish you luck.
I just wanted to wish you luck.
Do you know how dangerous that is?
Do you know how dangerous that is?
I had to get everyone's attention.
Aren't you glad Tom isn't here?
Aren't you glad Tom isn't here?
This dog will protect us.
What if we don't find Tom?
What does Tom have in mind?
You'll be safe here with Tom.
You're about three days late.
You're always drinking alone.
Is that the best you can do for Tom?
I'm not proud.
Ask Tom.
Ask Tom.
Ask Tom.
Please be polite.
Tom insisted I come alone.
They broke the glasses.
According to scientists, the atmosphere is getting warmer year after year.
I kept hoping I'd meet Tom.
I kept hoping I'd meet Tom.
I don't understand what the teacher is saying.
I recognized Tom's car.
Did you ever talk to Tom?
Do you still talk to Tom?
Don't sleep in the bathtub.
This drives me nuts.
The library is eighty years old.
We're going to the beach. Wanna come?
We're going to the beach. Wanna come?
Tom said, "You can kiss your girlfriend goodbye if you don't kiss her goodbye," which meant, "If you don't kiss your girlfriend goodbye, then you'll never see her again."
You will miss the train.
She makes a good living.
It is dangerous to run here.
Tom is always sleepy.
Why are all the sentences here about Tom and Mary?
He only eats fruit.
She attracted our attention.
I think she's in love with me.
To love and to be loved is the greatest happiness.
To love and to be loved is the greatest happiness.
Tom moved here three months ago.
The problem is Tom.
The plane took off at exactly nine o'clock.
I buy silver from a man who owns a mine.
Too many people are indifferent to politics.
Tom watched the 6 o'clock news.
I really appreciate you meeting with me.
Tom has never had a good job.
My uncle went to Mexico in 1983 and never came back.
She was the most beautiful girl on the beach.
I want to visit Estonia.
I want to visit Estonia.
The sentence is senseless, but correct.
I'm in love with Tom's girlfriend.
He has never tasted alcohol.
You arrived there before Tom.
You arrived there before Tom.
John said, "That's a beautiful tune."
Tom failed to keep his promise.
Hold your horses, young man. You can't enter here unless you have a pass.
Whose office is this?
She is sitting in the tub.
Tom had other plans.
I'm trying to be fair.
The rope wasn't strong enough to support him.
They were the first to get into the bus.
We have an agreement.
You forgot your backpack!
I saw Tom in the hall.
The French drink wine.
I have an elephant.
Tom never wore that hat again.
Tom became angry again.
I'll have everyone call me Tom from now on.
Tom will need some persuasion.
The investigation is continuing.
I just received some very disturbing information.
Tom gave us some useful information.
I don't see it as a contradiction.
I can see why that caught your attention.
Thank you for giving me the option.
Tom was a little surprised by the question.
It's barely noon.
Tom was friends with my son.
Your safety isn't our concern.
Tom's personal life is his own.
There's a rumor in my mother's village that we have Japanese ancestors. I don't know what to make of it.
Tom removed his helmet.
You're not mad at me anymore, are you?
My grandfather is very hard to please.
We're doing it for free.
I won't bother you again.
I won't bother you again.
The battle goes on!
Tom has a secret weapon.
No matter what you say, I am convinced that I am right.
No matter what you say, I am convinced that I am right.
No matter what you say, I am convinced that I am right.
In all cultures, babies fall to sleep with lullabies.
The film is boring.
Don't wake me up before 10.
I don't think Tom killed himself.
This is expensive.
Watch what you're doing, you almost killed Tom!
I told Tom I got fired.
I won't tamper with it.
I'll get fired if they find out.
The towel wasn't at all useful.
You have only to touch the button.
What's Tom's older sister's name?
The elephants are drinking water.
What'll they do to Tom?
Who are you describing?
Tom shut off the engine.
I'm just glad Tom wasn't hurt.
Tom is a conspiracy nut.
The teacher asked him, "What's the square root of 256?"
I'll deal with Tom later.
I'll take you to school.
I thought you knew Tom.
The IRS is auditing me.
Tom drowned.
Take Tom.
We don't like to get involved.
God, give us patience!
I know Tom's secret.
Tom looks nothing like me.
She is responsible.
Tom needs to lose three or four kilos.
I wonder what kind of thoughts go through her head.
The hen lays an egg almost every day.
You can never be happy if you feel envious of other people.
Tom always works hard.
My father loves doing some tinkering in the garage.
This translation is outright wrong.
Why did the lights go out?
The dog wagged its tail.
Tom floated downstream on a raft.
I'm a friend of the princess.
She hasn't translated the sentences in French.
We received word of her death.
We received word of his death.
I almost died when I heard this.
He had been through a lot of difficulties in his youth.
I have a collection of stoat figurines.
He likes women with violet eyes.
I wasn't able to access all of the information.
Unlike 'weasel', the Proto-Germanic ancestor of the word 'stoat' has not been established.
Tom's English leaves much to be desired.
I started to become impatient.
Having, as you know, sleep problems, I woke up 3 times last night. So, this morning I was very sleepy.
He is not a singer, but an actor.
It is a great joy to see your own sentences translated into a multitude of other languages.
Are you a translator?
It's too noisy to sleep.
After dinner, I plan to take a bath and go to sleep.
Are you breaking up with Tom?
I killed the rat with a stick.
Can you get rid of that?
Are you a freshman, too?
What soap do you wash your hands with?
When you leave, I'll miss you.
My sister is an English teacher.
I don't know how I'd survive on my own.
I don't know how I'd survive on my own.
The circus is in town.
You must give me 500 dollars right now.
We asked Tom to let us stay.
I don't care about the risk.
Do you think that scares me?
Tom took off his muddy shoes.
No one is born wise, but many die stupid.
Don't be afraid to break the rules.
Many begin, but few finish.
It took him three months to learn to ride a bicycle.
They fell into each other's arms.
The plane crashed.
There are fifty stars on the American flag.
There are many kinds of coffee.
The police got to the scene of the accident.
Thanks, Mike. I don't like chicken.
We need to find Tom tonight.
You're running out of time.
Tom has a beer belly.
I beg of you, don't die!
Tom couldn't fit into the pants he wore last summer.
The sleepy town has been transformed into a bustling city.
Do you want to go get something to eat?
Just get dressed.
Tom doesn't understand British humour.
You don't understand British humour.
You don't understand British humour.
He's tickled pink.
Her skin is smooth.
There is no use crying for help. No one will hear you.
Restrain your impulses.
Our refrigerator isn't working.
I think there's no point in trying to convince her.
Why are you so popular?
It is good to be a winner.
He lured her away from her husband.
The puppies nestled against their mother.
Tom only has faint memories of his grandfather.
When did you fire him?
The city annoys me a lot because it's noisy.
Let's be candid.
Stop apologizing.
Stop apologizing.
I've resigned.
Everyone prayed.
I survived.
Tom's cup was empty.
Tom was praying.
Who surrendered?
Tom gave up.
She forbad me from joining the group.
Catch Tom.
Hug Tom.
Wait outside.
Wait outside.
Stop interfering.
It seems obvious.
When is this crisis going to be over?
He is nasty.
You're the expert.
I often ski.
Watch your fingers!
To be bored is a sin.
He was compelled to sign the contract.
Yoko went shopping yesterday.
You're not going to find anybody better than Tom for the job.
I wake up very early.
The plane had five hundred passengers on board.
We have more important matters to discuss.
They jumped into the water.
Tom has never been bored. He spends all of his free time translating sentences.
My son always interrupts me when I'm talking.
He went to the airport to see her off.
I can't stand the thought of losing you forever.
I want to go to the city.
I have to go to the city.
You didn't commit a serious crime.
He breeds cattle and horses.
Tom graduated from Harvard.
Tom prays several times a day.
I stayed in bed all morning.
What's your problem with Tom?
Tom can't stop talking about you.
Subtract two from ten and you have eight.
Very many religions promise life after death.
They moved here two years ago.
We aren't late.
The answer was right in front of me.
Now, I've lost all my patience.
There are a lot of rats.
I just talked with Tom.
Tom sometimes walks to work.
A group started a campaign to preserve rain forests.
Everyone likes Tom.
Everybody loved Tom.
It's bullshit.
He comes to visit us every now and then.
I think it's the same thing that happened to Tom.
Mine is bigger than Tom's.
Does Tom have a younger brother?
Have you seen Tom's new car?
Have you seen Tom's new car?
Have you seen Tom's new car?
Don't interrupt me!
What she said wasn't true.
Forget Tom.
Find Tom.
Find Tom.
Everybody jumped.
Be objective.
No worries! This is good enough!
Animals are not toys!
Our trip to Africa is turning into a catastrophe.
It was hard for me to refuse his request.
It'll take some time to get used to this.
Are you a translator?
These geese lay golden eggs.
It was thought the Earth is a flat disc.
It's better not to take candy from strangers.
It's better not to take candy from strangers.
I think they'll be late.
Can't you take a hint?
Are you with Tom?
The clouds are getting darker.
Is there something bothering you?
Is there something bothering you?
Tom has decided to put off his departure.
This shoe fits me well.
A third is less than a half.
Are you planning to stay here for a long time?
We will eat here.
Do you want to read?
Get in touch with me.
What a tragedy!
Tom lost their trust.
Tom lost their trust.
I drink alcohol.
Who are you to judge me, you piece of shit?
Get them away from here.
I want to be a lawyer.
It's neither here nor there.
She moved to Paris in 1966.
If I'm late, I'll be scolded.
That isn't Tom's only problem.
How many brothers and sisters does Tom have?
You don't scare me.
Today is too hot for sunbathing.
I broke a glass.
Thanks for staying with Tom.
Please take a bath.
Los Angeles is one of the cities that I want to visit.
They'll want to punish him.
He fired his secretary.
He fired his secretary.
He can run a hundred meters in less than ten seconds.
The enemy attacked from behind.
The general gave the order to retreat.
The night was cool.
What size shoe does he wear?
The pond was completely frozen in the morning.
What is his shoe size?
Does a government have to serve ideologies, or rather, the interests of the people?
The professor I was arguing with finally conceded and said I was right.
What else was in the basket?
This is Tom's photo album.
Am I going to need a lawyer?
I've got Tom's address somewhere on my computer.
This reminds me of Tom.
Tom has long blond hair.
I can't lose!
If you have nothing to do, why not read a book?
I know you miss Tom.
I've decided to fire them.
I've decided to fire him.
I've decided to fire her.
I've decided to fire you.
I've decided to fire you.
I had to fire her.
I had to fire him.
I had to fire them.
You must be careful in crossing the road.
The temperature went down three degrees.
Tom just got back from the hospital.
How are your studies going?
Tom tore up the tickets.
The workmen didn't go down into the mine that night.
I'll be punished.
The note was from Tom.
Something was wrong with Tom.
I think you're still in love with Tom.
I don't want to be judged just by my appearance.
She dived naked into the sea.
Be careful when you cross a road.
Be careful when you cross a road.
It was very dark into the mine.
It was very dark inside the mine.
My watch loses ten minutes a day.
Guess what I found on the beach.
I'm still looking for Tom.
Tom had no money left.
Tom's mother was crying.
I don't want to hurt anyone.
Where did you see Tom?
He washes the car every week.
Tom is persuaded he's right.
Tom made it.
Tom survived.
Tom approached.
Have you seen Tom yet?
He will walk.
What he says is nonsense.
The games were all boring.
She is independent of her parents.
Did you ask Tom to leave?
At funerals we don't tell jokes, and we don't laugh!
Are we going to lose?
Tom is emotional.
Go with Tom.
Wit beyond measure is man's greatest treasure.
I didn't understand the humour.
Leave it to the professionals.
The word "the" is optional in this sentence.
Many people gathered under this banner of freedom.
Many people gathered under this banner of freedom.
It was hard at first.
Learn wisdom from the faults of others.
Is it true that this is not true?
He says he avoided the danger by playing dead.
It was early spring, so there weren't many customers.
It doesn't matter how old you are.
It doesn't matter how old you are.
Don't try to hide it.
I think he's angry.
Let's do lunch!
It's very boring.
Tom is tidy.
Give me those gloves.
You must eat.
I made some modifications.
Tom is a surgeon.
Tom is a salesman.
I feel that Tatoeba has become a very warm and cozy place for us language lovers; especially for all those of us who can grasp and learn languages relatively easily and quickly.
Take the pan off the fire.
What really happened to Tom?
Young girls really want to be slender.
It's no use trying to escape.
Tom seemed a little surprised.
Tom's eyes are wide open.
We're going to be late!
Her silence surprised me.
I beg you to give me a little water.
I'm not angry.
Tom is boring.
Someone attacked him.
I don't want to bother her.
Turn the other cheek.
Light the candle.
Light the candle.
He told a very funny joke.
A button's fallen off the jacket.
A button's fallen off the jacket.
You have five minutes to get dressed and come downstairs.
You have five minutes to get dressed and come downstairs.
Tom can't grow a moustache yet.
Tom can't grow a moustache yet.
Would you mind doing me a favour?
Buying a new TV won't make you happy.
Tom has a bad temper.
Mr. Brown is a wool merchant.
We have to turn back.
Thank you for your invitation.
I promise to leave Tom alone.
You'd better leave Tom alone.
I promised to leave Tom alone.
I stand a better chance alone.
I can't fire Tom.
The Republic of China is a democratic state.
Taiwan is the democratic China.
The Island of Taiwan's surface area is thirty-six thousand square kilometers.
It was getting dark.
It was for Tom.
I thought Tom might get angry.
I'd like to be Chinese.
Tom appeared to be bewildered.
Tom didn't get out of bed until after noon.
We're still waiting for Tom.
You've done something wrong.
Protect me!
Protect me!
Tom rarely wears a tie.
Cecilia wasn't a teacher.
Water is liquid.
I don't think people should make a mountain of a mole hill.
Why didn't you phone before coming?
Why didn't you phone before coming?
You have time to think.
Get rid of her.
Get rid of her.
Get rid of Tom.
Get rid of Tom.
Get rid of them.
Get rid of them.
Mary's parents were very impressed with Tom.
Sheep eat grass.
I don't buy it.
You have to get rid of it.
You have to get rid of it.
You have to get rid of it.
You have to get rid of it.
You have to get rid of it.
You have to get rid of it.
Do you believe in any religion?
Do you believe in any religion?
He has a good chance of getting elected.
Tom is drying the dishes.
Our teacher said, "Water boils at 100 degrees."
Japan does a lot of trade with the USA.
Women frighten me.
The tree was clearly defined against the sky.
The fire is spreading.
I was sixteen years younger than him.
I was sixteen years younger than him.
I work at the airport.
Tom is a lawyer and a very good one, too.
Tom would've gone to jail if he hadn't had such a good lawyer.
The seven dwarfs were the new family of the princess.
Pardon me, where is the entrance to the dragon's cave? "You don't want to go there."
Tom is very curious.
Tom is very curious.
She's trying to commit suicide.
You must eat fruits.
She has wide hips.
Tom fell off of the motorcycle.
A stranger spoke to me.
Tom is still not convinced.
The car is turning left.
The car is turning right.
Thanks for sharing this with me.
The baby was in his birthday suit.
We have to get rid of them.
We have to get rid of him.
We have to get rid of her.
We must get rid of her.
We must get rid of him.
We must get rid of them.
We should get rid of her.
We should get rid of him.
We should get rid of them.
Did the police arrest Tom?
This requires patience.
The portions at that restaurant are generous.
Climb onto the roof.
They were swearing at each other at the top of their voices.
I think I can help you find Tom.
I hugged Tom.
You need to protect yourself.
The girl is a nurse.
I need a more detailed map.
He began to eat lunch.
No one translates my phrases.
Will you take me home?
Three patients died last night.
It works for us.
Tom had one wish.
The winner was Tom.
Tom wasn't wearing a helmet.
Tom has been warned.
Tom wants a new bicycle.
Waiting is boring.
We trust Tom's opinion.
Tom works as a translator.
I would like to draw a tree.
She earns half as much money as her husband.
She earns half as much money as her husband.
I'm ordering you to leave immediately.
I'm ordering you to leave immediately.
You can't give up now.
I'm sorry I'm late.
Did you return Tom's book?
Alcohol is harmful to health.
The picture on this TV is no good. It keeps flickering.
I'll bring you something to eat.
He described the accident in detail.
He gave a detailed description of the accident.
Tom is Greek.
I've learnt many things about Greek culture.
Emily is in love with the Greek language.
As my teacher says, you cannot please both Greeks and Trojans.
As my teacher says, you cannot please both Greeks and Trojans.
Twenty-three centuries ago, the Greek philosopher Epicurus wrote about the existence of other worlds in a letter to Herodotus.
Chris swung his sword!
Tom pulled a small flashlight out of his pocket.
Let's just eat.
I think I know what happened to Tom.
He knew he did not have much longer to live.
He will repent bitterly for defying me.
Tom doesn't have tea.
Call me at my office.
Tom insisted he hadn't been drinking, but his slurred speech and unsteady gait gave him away.
Apparently, Tom's death was a suicide.
Tom's death may not have been an accident.
I didn't have anything to do with Tom's death.
I swear, John. As of today, I quit smoking.
She was saving herself for marriage.
Grief drove her mad.
He hit a ball with the bat.
The bat was stolen yesterday, along with the balls.
My grandfather raises ducks.
Tom has a southern accent.
She doesn't want to get involved.
A sudden illness forced her to cancel her appointment.
It's time to separate.
Have you brought your ID card with you?
Have you brought your ID card with you?
Tom broke his promise.
There is power in Tom's eyes.
Living is dangerous.
Tom's palms were sweaty.
I arrived in Tokyo at noon.
I arrived in Tokyo at noon.
I want to be a teacher when I grow up.
Hell is waiting for you.
Don't talk to me about religion.
Don't talk to me about religion.
Don't talk to me about religion.
Don't talk to me about religion.
If we walk, we'll be very late.
After the fire, only ash was left.
My girlfriend said that she'd kill me if I got drunk.
In hopes of attaining superhuman powers, Christopher Columbus once stared at the sun for five minutes straight. It didn't work.
Our team lost the first match.
The puppy looked at her with very sad eyes.
Please take me to the hospital.
They go to school by streetcar.
She never stops complaining.
I was going to visit a friend.
I was going to visit a friend.
I was going to visit a friend.
I was going to visit a friend.
We're one player short.
We're one player short.
The Party said: "It must be done!" — The Komsomol answered: "It will!"
I published my little book in 2001.
So, you giving up?
So you give up, right?
It's a deadly poison!
Are you sure this isn't poison?
The friend who I thought would pass the exam failed it.
Sometimes I have the impression that we'll never come to an agreement.
It took us two hours to get to Athens.
I would like to see Tom one more time.
I walk to work every day.
Can you give me any details?
Can you give me any details?
Tom didn't believe it was a tiger.
I swear by God that I will speak the truth.
We are looking forward to seeing you again.
I can't stand the sight of blood.
Tom came close to being killed by a stray arrow.
Who can help you learn German?
He hasn't the nerve to tell the truth.
The previous owners of our house moved to Liverpool.
Are you learning Irish on your own?
When Tom gets drunk, he'll eat a lot of things that he wouldn't eat when he's sober.
I'm really scared of thunderstorms.
Tom yanked open the drawer and grabbed a pencil.
Many scholars are seen as weirdos.
I met Tom a few weeks before he died.
I live in this hotel.
Have you seen Tom in the last three hours?
We'll talk to Tom.
Focus your attention on the really important things.
Is Haruki Murakami popular in Vietnam as well?
Jim always avoids trouble at all costs.
Nothing would persuade him.
I'll surprise them.
I can't get involved.
It seems obvious that he is unable to swim.
If it rains, the game will be canceled.
They deported him.
I don't want you to kill Tom.
Everyone ignored Tom.
The first thing you should do is call a lawyer.
We'll have to have a talk with Tom.
She wouldn't even say hi to me.
Don't run away.
It's cold outside.
It's already 11 o'clock.
Tom is wise.
It's dark outside.
Why didn't you just tell me that you're dating Tom?
Talented isn't the word for him.
Tom's resigned.
Do you know why he put off his departure?
Tom has been tasered three times.
Tom slept under mosquito netting.
She looks indifferent but deep down she's very pleased.
Many people envy Tom's success.
She graduated magna cum laude.
You can call a cat a small tiger, and a tiger a big cat.
It's the way that she laughs at herself that endears her to me.
There are few bookstores in this area.
I have no more patience.
The funeral was yesterday.
Your cat isn't very affectionate, isn't he?
Tom was arrested yesterday.
Tom was buried yesterday.
She bought him some candy.
Tom's response surprised everybody.
What's the ambassador's name?
I want to talk to Tom first.
Why don't you get into the pool?
He wants to become a singer.
The pipe burst due to great pressure.
Don't be shy.
She had to say goodbye to her hometown.
Progress was slow.
Stop resisting!
Can you stay with Tom?
Can you stay with Tom?
I don't like to wear shoes without socks.
Our allies are weak.
You've been captured. Surrender!
I came at Tom's request.
I hate rats.
I hate rats.
I have a friend whose wife is a pianist.
I have a friend whose wife is a pianist.
It was expensive, too.
You're no singer.
You're no singer.
There's no such thing as black magic.
You did it on purpose!
You did it on purpose!
The knife had a very sharp point.
I want to speak to a lawyer.
Do you mind if I turn off the light?
The noble knight held his breath as he gazed at the beautiful princess.
She suffered from anorexia as a teenager.
Pray without ceasing.
Pray without ceasing.
Tom and Mary have three sons.
He fell ill three years ago.
The negotiations failed.
If I had known that you were sick, I would have visited you at the hospital.
If I had known that you were sick, I would have visited you at the hospital.
He tried to attract her attention.
I saw you talking to Tom.
I saw you talking to Tom.
I'm a zero.
It's no use talking to him.
It's no use talking to her.
He was the son of a wealthy merchant.
Please ask Tom to leave.
Please ask Tom to leave.
I now agree with Tom.
He will have to go there.
She keeps a human skull on her desk.
She keeps a human skull on her desk.
We came by to wish you luck.
We came by to wish you luck.
I can't count on Tom.
This is probably the most boring book in the world.
The cost of petrol keeps on going up.
He didn't even say goodbye.
Is it true what they say about Tom?
I am studying to be a translator or interpreter.
Tom is a magician.
This guy cut Tom off, and Tom gave him the finger.
Depleted uranium bombs are US democracy's most effective weapon.
The United States of America is a democratic country.
Saturn's atmosphere has winds which can blow at over 1800 kilometers per hour.
Tom doesn't have any sisters.
It was this boy that broke the windowpane.
Children should keep away from the river. It's dangerous.
The plane took off and was soon out of sight.
Tom always complains that Mary doesn't drive fast enough.
I've known Tom for almost ten years.
My father doesn't allow me to go to the movies alone.
My father doesn't let me go to the movies alone.
My father doesn't allow me to go to the movies alone.
My father doesn't let me go to the movies alone.
I am in financial difficulties.
I'm not accusing anyone.
They all started laughing at Tom.
How do I know that you're not working for Tom?
This country is really going to the dogs!
Tom poured some beer into a dish and put it on the floor for his dog.
It's a dog and pony show.
Do you know what's happened to Tom?
Tom listens to his favourite music on his MP3 player when he goes for his morning walk.
Dan took five sleeping pills.
We were late for school because it was raining hard.
She put the chicken in the oven.
In Sumerian "LÚ.GAL" means the ruler or king.
The river Ganges is considered sacred to Hindus.
We ate together.
Facebook is boring.
Save water, drink booze.
It's no use talking to her.
What was Tom's crime?
I'm not going to argue with Tom.
I'd better wake Tom up.
I'd better take you home.
I'd better take you home.
I won't keep you too long.
I won't keep you too long.
I won't betray your trust.
I won't be here that long.
I want to become a diplomat.
Your skirt is too short.
She was wearing a short skirt and high heels.
I understand your concerns.
Scary movies will frighten the children.
How many fluids are used in a car?
They lost their property.
They destroyed stores and factories.
British troops held that area.
Plants don't grow in this soil.
Who cares about facts?
Is that dangerous?
I often have the same dream.
I can't go on without Tom.
Where will you have lunch today?
Tom has been transferred to another hospital.
Tom is a veteran now.
They're preparing a meal for us.
We saw a mountain in the distance.
Yesterday he missed the train to Sapporo.
I gave Tom detailed instructions.
I can protect you.
The funeral is tomorrow.
It sounds to me like you've had enough of Tom.
Haven't we had enough of that nonsense already?
Beavers may be considered as the busiest mammals on Earth.
I'm not sure how many beavers live in this area, but there are many.
Unfortunately, our father is not in heaven, but in a jail cell.
It's noisy next door.
One must do one's duty.
He has a Southern accent.
You're not paying attention.
Today, I will dine with you.
Four babies are born every second around the world.
He was thrown from the car.
Call 1-800 TATOEBA now for a free sentence.
This is offensive.
This is hopeless.
We think of Tom as an honest man.
You're from the embassy, aren't you?
None of this is true.
None of this is true.
Rats are small.
It's suspicious.
Where's the beach?
Where's the beach?
Whose handwriting is this?
Where is the Romanian embassy?
Once is not enough.
Here is a new magazine for you to read.
Here is a new magazine for you to read.
We didn't want to hurt you.
We didn't want to hurt you.
She came here all the way from Hokkaido.
I've run out of gas.
Get out of the water.
Get out of the water.
Get out of the truck.
Get out of the truck.
Get out of my car.
Get out of my car.
Tom looks cool no matter what he wears.
Let's light some candles.
Do we have milk in the fridge?
Do you know Tom's girlfriend's name?
Do you know Tom's girlfriend's name?
It's pretty expensive.
Tom was a waiter.
Tom has children.
Tom has a big TV.
What hands can build, they can destroy.
I'm taking notes.
Did you turn off the gas?
City life has advantages and disadvantages.
I'm proud of Tom.
A wall surrounded the old city.
Mary wiped the sweat from her forehead.
The kids catch butterflies.
I think I know Tom's secret.
Are you Tom's friend?
Can you give us a description of the car that hit Tom?
Is she making a doll?
They have plenty of money.
Candles were everywhere.
He ran the fastest of all.
A number of people were drowned.
A number of passengers were injured.
They have plenty of time.
When the Tsar saw the linen he was struck with astonishment at its fineness and beauty.
This cathedral has a large organ.
Tom doesn't know the difference between reality and fantasy.
Eileen always wanted to become a pilot. When she was a child, her parents often took her to the airport to see the planes.
Tom has never been absent from school.
Who told you about Tom?
I think we lost Tom.
I'm sorry to bother you so often.
I am thinking of going abroad.
Did I break it?
Did I break it?
Tom has no hair on his chest.
He sees himself as the center of the universe.
I take a bath every morning in the summer.
Do geese see God?
I told her I got fired.
We must think about peaceful uses of atomic energy.
We can't protect him.
We can't protect her.
She attacked him.
I had to stop Tom.
I had to stop Tom.
Which ocean separates China and America?
The journalist wanted to write an article that would draw public attention to the issue.
Our stuff got stolen, and we missed our train.
As he has done a lot of bad things, we can conclude that he is a bad person.
They huddled together.
Tom raised the flag.
We are the same age. We are both sixteen years old.
John talked his friends into helping the poor family.
Tom was rescued by a passerby.
We sell shoes.
We surrender.
I know all the places to hide.
An investigation is going on.
I was almost run over by a car.
She was found guilty.
My brother is in love with you.
My brother is in love with you.
They spent the entire day on the beach.
The physics teacher was late to class, as usual.
The physics teacher was late to class, as usual.
He's interested in math.
Tom waved at Mary.
Many countries depend on agriculture.
They scared us.
He's a hopeless case.
She's a hopeless case.
Tom never gives up.
Tom hid under a huge rock.
Tom hid under a huge rock.
Can you tell me how to get to the nearest station?
Here's a list of hotels in the capital and province.
I don't make as much money as I'd like to.
You miss him a lot, don't you?
You miss her a lot, don't you?
You miss them a lot, don't you?
You miss him a lot, don't you?
You miss her a lot, don't you?
You miss them a lot, don't you?
You miss him, don't you?
You miss her, don't you?
You miss them, don't you?
You miss him, don't you?
You miss her, don't you?
You miss them, don't you?
We all missed her.
We all missed him.
We all missed them.
I missed her.
I missed him.
I missed her.
I missed him.
Don't you miss them?
Don't you miss them?
Don't you miss him?
Don't you miss him?
Don't you miss her?
Don't you miss her?
I know you miss him.
I know you miss him.
I know you miss her.
I know you miss her.
Do you miss them?
Do you miss them?
Do you miss him?
Do you miss him?
Do you miss her?
Do you miss her?
We miss them.
We miss him.
We miss her.
I'm afraid I'll be stuck in this place forever.
We have failed.
That's Tom's problem.
What is this world coming to?
Why are you telling me that Tom has a girlfriend?
You hid under the table.
You hid under the table.
You hid under the table.
You hid under the table.
You hid under the table.
You hid under the table.
I'll do my best to persuade Tom.
Tom was trying not to panic.
I'd like to thank you for helping me translate the report into French.
From the inside, the Earth is very hot.
When does the rainy season end?
Tom currently doesn't have a girlfriend.
Light travels much faster than sound.
I want to eat something.
Tom hasn't given up yet.
If I were you, I'd follow Tom's advice.
The scandal nearly wrecked her career.
The scandal nearly wrecked her career.
A strange spectacle happened before my eyes.
Milk does not keep long in hot weather.
Tom sells shoes.
There are five of us and eight of them.
They were stuck in the elevator for four hours.
Wisdom gives us power.
What do Chinese people have for breakfast?
Radio's been replaced by the TV.
How many times have I told you not to talk to Tom?
How many times have I told you not to talk to Tom?
How many times have I told you not to talk to Tom?
How many times have I told you not to talk to Tom?
I wanted to spend more time with Tom.
I wanted to spend more time with Tom.
Do you know Tom well enough to ask him to do this?
Tom is available now.
Tom is the champion.
I ate on the bus.
I ate on the bus.
What are you doing with these dolls?
Tom wiped the sweat from his forehead.
The response is affirmative.
If it wasn't a mouse, what was it?
If it wasn't a mouse, what was it?
Suddenly I heard a commotion in the alley and went to see what was going on.
In late November, they attacked Finland.
Thank Tom for the help.
I'm jealous.
Do you want this guitar?
I'll give these kittens to whoever likes cats.
I want you to find Tom.
I want you to find Tom.
I want you to find Tom.
If you don't mind, I'll go with Tom.
I want to learn to play the guitar.
I want to learn to play the guitar.
You are not Japanese.
You are not Japanese.
Angela Merkel grew up in the former German Democratic Republic.
He missed you.
He missed you.
Flying is too expensive.
I saw Tom and Mary.
I saw Tom and Mary.
Tom was stabbed in the chest three times.
Tom's voice is so sexy! It really makes my chest tight!
Tom had a pain in his chest, so he went to the hospital.
This is a free ticket.
All I know is that something happened that scared the kids to death.
How many independent countries are there in the world?
There are no perfect women, nor perfect men.
If you see Tom, say hello to him for me.
If you see Tom, say hello to him for me.
Well, I'm not surprised.
Well, I'm not surprised.
If you are in Paris, you can visit the Louvre.
If you are in Paris, you can visit the Louvre.
Now, Tom has a job.
Get in touch with me as soon as you arrive here.
Get in touch with me as soon as you arrive here.
It's so cold that the river has frozen over.
He likes to smoke tobacco.
I found your gloves in my car.
Cabbage can be eaten raw.
Cabbage can be eaten raw.
Tom studies philosophy at college.
In the distance we saw the island.
Tom was injured in the blast.
He was a poet and a diplomat.
There is not enough bread.
We lit the candles.
The ship was bound for Cairo.
You won't be punished.
You won't be punished.
Are you ready to go?
Are you ready to go?
Are you ready to go?
This guitar belongs to them.
Let's do the math.
You can always contact me.
Will you make me a paper crane?
Tom bent down and touched his toes.
The exact date of Jesus' birth is unknown.
I miss his kisses.
Maybe I gave up too soon.
Tom took off on his bike.
Tom is an expert in this field.
Tom takes a bath once a year.
Tom's hair is on fire.
Tom's field of study is law.
Sometimes I work from dawn to dusk in the fields.
Tom moved.
They bought a home with a pool.
Be patient.
I always keep my promises.
She couldn't convince him to ride a horse.
He's a traitor.
Are you in love with him?
Are you in love with her?
Let's go back to the office.
Grandma forgot to take her pills again.
I filled the pail with water.
Does Tom have any family?
You made Tom very happy.
You made Tom very happy.
You need to confirm your e-mail address.
You must break the vicious circle.
You must break the vicious circle.
You must break the vicious circle.
Tom is upstairs with the children.
Everyone survived.
We pitched the tent next to the river.
He's a lawyer.
If you search well, you will find.
Right now it's peak season in Cancún.
You're deluding yourself.
You're disobeying orders.
Can I talk to you outside?
Take your dog away.
Take your dog away.
We'll meet Tom at the gate.
We're going to do our best.
We're just looking for Tom.
The evidence is clear.
Be more careful in your actions.
Let's invite Tom over for dinner.
I take a bath every other day.
Please tell me this isn't true.
Please tell me this isn't true.
God is everywhere.
I apologize to everyone.
Oh no, I forgot my pills!
The only difference between children and men is the price of their toys.
We're going to protect you.
I don't want to disturb them.
I don't want to bother him.
I didn't want to disturb them.
I didn't want to disturb him.
I didn't want to disturb her.
Do you think we convinced them?
Do you think we convinced them?
Do you think we convinced him?
Do you think we convinced him?
Do you think we convinced her?
Do you think we convinced her?
Tom hid under his bed, but his mother found him.
Contact them.
Contact them.
Contact him.
Contact him.
Contact her.
Contact her.
Can you contact them?
Can you contact them?
Can you contact him?
Can you contact him?
Can you contact her?
Can you contact her?
This is Tom's notebook.
It won't happen again, I swear.
He took an uncertain stance.
We don't have any sheep.
Tom began to pray.
The sheets are dirty.
She misses her father.
I'm half Japanese.
When did you move to Berlin?
I'm impatient for spring to arrive.
In spring, everyone wakes up early.
The pilot is 30 years of age.
We miss our wives.
Tom just got arrested.
These are Tom's friends.
I want to protect him.
I want to protect her.
I want to protect her.
We were trying to protect you.
We were trying to protect you.
We were trying to protect them.
We were trying to protect him.
We were trying to protect her.
We were trying to protect her.
I'm trying to protect them.
I'm trying to protect him.
I'm trying to protect her.
I was trying to protect them.
I was trying to protect them.
I was trying to protect him.
I was trying to protect her.
I was trying to protect her.
We need to protect you.
We need to protect them.
We need to protect him.
I didn't even know Tom had a girlfriend.
I was just trying to protect you.
You didn't protect me.
You didn't protect me.
Why are you defending Tom?
Were you in love with them?
Her father was a talented musician.
He came, he saw, and he lost.
Tom has hundreds of books.
The sheets are clean.
I must convince him.
I must convince him.
I expected worse.
I don't think it's Tom's fault.
Tom couldn't decide who to assign the job to.
Do you really want to break up with your girlfriend?
I must hide.
I have to hide.
Is it just eight-thirty?
Can you persuade him to join our club?
Don't be fooled by appearances.
I heard a strange noise coming from Tom's room last night.
I've learned a lot about Tom.
You're all doomed.
I saw Tom in the park.
Tom has a toothache.
I was stuck in traffic.
I have to eat.
I'm upstairs.
We're going to be late for the concert.
Tom brought some toys for the children.
True beauty comes from within.
Her skin looked pale in the moonlight.
We nearly missed the train.
Is he a magician?
I asked Tom what he was listening to and he surprised me by saying that he was listening to classical music.
Tom tried to convince Mary that she should cheat on her boyfriend.
Tom has a ticket.
Tom is filling a bottle with water.
Does it hurt when you chew?
It's hard to tell who's more desperate.
Is Tom in trouble?
Tom had a blue coat on.
Tom showed me the poems that he'd written when he was a teenager.
Today is a big day, son!
I'm often told I don't look good in a skirt.
How many sisters does Tom have?
He has perfect teeth.
How many pairs of shoes do you own?
I hit Tom.
I hit Tom.
How much money did you lose?
How much money did you lose?
How much money did you lose?
How much money did you lose?
What? Is there something stuck in my teeth or something?
What? Is there something stuck in my teeth or something?
Fernando, we're racing Massa behind until the end. "Ha! I love your sense of humour." "Well, we can have some fun trying, anyway."
How many guitars does Tom have?
Are you a singer?
You're disgusting.
Tom lives in a large house with a pool.
Tom and I both agreed.
Tom has been in the pool almost all morning.
Is that from Tom?
I didn't want to see Tom again.
I didn't want to see Tom again.
She's very emotional.
I don't want to lose Tom.
Even Tom looked surprised.
Women are not sex objects.
I really do want you to talk to Tom.
The problem isn't Tom.
The children want to go to the pool.
Tom heard an explosion and ran outside to see what had happened.
She mounted the horse with ease.
Just take me home.
Are you sure you can handle the responsibility? There's lots of work involved.
Tom nearly got killed.
Who's with Tom now?
Why was Tom killed?
I will work hard.
The pilot landed the plane safely.
Tom's birthday is March 25th.
His car was seriously damaged.
Stop picking on us.
Stop picking on them.
Stop picking on him.
Stop picking on her.
Tom doesn't have any cats.
Nobody recognizes me.
This river is deep enough to swim in.
He miraculously survived.
We remained silent.
My hour has not yet come.
I went on foot.
He broke them.
He threatened to kill me.
They just want to talk to Tom.
Clint Eastwood was elected mayor of Carmel.
Tom was proud.
He was completely cleared of the charge against him.
Tom has a double chin.
Tom isn't afraid to fail.
There was a car accident yesterday.
Kate is very energetic.
Emi gave her seat to a handicapped man.
The long vacation will give him back his health.
We'll make an exception for Tom.
We've kept it a secret from Tom.
You don't have to work with Tom.
People were deprived of their political rights.
I'm going to help you rescue Tom.
I'm just finishing up the report.
She won't agree to a divorce.
You won't have to worry about Tom.
Did you get what you want from Tom?
Do you and Tom want the same thing?
You've got enough to worry about.
Do you really want to wake Tom up?
Tom sat down in the pilot's seat.
Tom has three ex-wives.
That's not why I'm afraid of Tom.
Capital, land and labor are the three key factors of production.
We've run short of oil.
He wants to get rid of his books.
You should listen to his advice.
I'm on the phone with Tom now.
I talk to Tom on the phone every day.
Dan's father attended the wedding.
I outrank you.
Trans fats are bad for your health.
I'm afraid we're going to be late for school.
This country is rich in oil.
If you had studied harder, you would have passed the examination.
She's an outspoken person.
They hid behind the tree.
You must get rid of such a habit.
I have bad news for Tom.
I have trouble with physics.
I think something may have happened to Tom.
Now the ball is in your court!
The water in the lake is cool.
My new job is harder than my old one.
Please, I ask that you stay calm.
Why isn't there any food in my refrigerator?
I hid behind the tree.
I hid behind the tree.
I hid behind the tree.
You hid behind the tree.
You hid behind the tree.
You hid behind the tree.
You hid behind the tree.
She hid behind the tree.
She hid behind the tree.
We hid behind the tree.
You hid behind the tree, didn't you?
You hid behind the tree, didn't you?
They hid behind the tree.
You hid behind the tree.
You hid behind the tree.
Tom feels that his team will win the game.
He's cleaning his rifle.
How many other cars does Tom own?
It is dangerous to ride a motorbike without a helmet.
Paris is one of the biggest cities in the world.
Tom has an older brother.
The doctor examines the patient.
What he says is not true.
Half of what Tom says isn't true.
Tom only had one pair of socks and they had holes in them.
Tom only had one pair of socks and they had holes in them.
You have to eat.
I don't want to keep Tom waiting.
Do you want to read?
Can you wrap it up for me? It's a gift.
They were very popular.
They sell shoes.
You sell shoes.
You sell shoes.
My mom bought me this toy when I was 8.
Tom can't ride a bicycle yet.
Are you planning on taking Tom with you?
Are you planning on taking Tom with you?
You're driving me nuts.
Is something bothering you, Tom?
The old man stroked his beard thoughtfully.
The old man stroked his beard thoughtfully.
No, repeated the Englishman.
We all try hard to make the grade in life, but only a few succeed.
Does this skirt suit me?
Will you come and see me?
I will send you a copy of this picture as soon as I can.
Yokohama is one of the largest cities in Japan.
We should not place too much emphasis on money.
Most Japanese opposed a tax increase.
We do our duty.
Don't be shy.
Life isn't always fair.
You only have to follow the instructions.
You only have to follow the instructions.
Tom climbed up the ladder to the roof of the garage.
Tom climbed up the ladder to the roof of the garage.
Bad people are at the helm of the nation.
I'm afraid I must say goodbye.
Tom decided not to give up.
Much gold is mined here.
The English are a great nation.
Whatever happens, you have to stay calm.
This custom is peculiar to Japan.
Tom began to remove his gloves.
He denied the accusation.
He gave the police a false name and address.
We're efficient.
We tend to use English when we see a foreigner.
He knows how to greet people in all languages.
Most students come to school on foot.
He worked hard in order to succeed.
The refrigerator door was open.
It took a whole day to paint the picture.
It took a whole day to paint the picture.
Tom accidentally knocked over his drink.
Please turn off the television.
What happened was unexpected.
Yesterday, she committed suicide.
I'm slightly worried about Tom.
Tom stayed in the house all day.
I'd like to hear that from Tom.
Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none.
It was noisy.
Music is the greatest of the arts.
Tom is shoveling snow.
Tom has a 13-year-old daughter.
Tom has a 13-year-old daughter.
Tom has been diagnosed with Alzheimer's.
None of you should leave this room.
Tom used to be thin.
Let's pay them a visit.
Let's pay him a visit.
Let's pay her a visit.
Why don't I pay them a visit?
Why don't I pay him a visit?
Why don't I pay her a visit?
We ran past them.
Tom ran past us.
Tom ran past them.
Tom ran past me.
They ran past him.
They ran past her.
I ran past them.
Want to hear a joke?
Do you want to hear a joke?
Tom has a son whose name is John.
Tom has a son whose name is John.
Why didn't somebody stop Tom?
We'll miss him a lot.
We'll miss her a lot.
We'll miss them a lot.
We'll miss you a lot.
We'll miss you a lot.
We'll miss her.
We'll miss him.
We'll miss them.
You'll miss her.
You'll miss her.
You'll miss him.
You'll miss him.
You'll miss them.
You'll miss them.
You'll miss us.
You'll miss us.
I'll miss him.
I'll miss her.
I'll miss them, too.
I'll miss him, too.
I'll miss her, too.
I miss them already.
I miss him already.
I miss her already.
I already miss them.
I already miss him.
I already miss her.
Aren't you going to miss them?
Aren't you going to miss them?
Aren't you going to miss him?
Aren't you going to miss him?
Aren't you going to miss her?
Aren't you going to miss her?
I won't miss you.
I won't miss you.
I won't miss them.
I won't miss him.
I won't miss her.
I still miss you.
I still miss you.
I still miss them.
I still miss him.
I still miss her.
There's no risk.
I know my legal rights.
I couldn't answer any of Tom's questions.
I don't think Tom did that on purpose.
I think Tom should be punished.
Tom should be punished.
I've never been to Tom's house.
What can I say to persuade you?
Look, don't worry about Tom, OK?
I met my teacher on the way to the railway station.
Tom should be punished.
You don't keep your promises.
You don't keep your promises.
You don't keep your promises.
You don't keep your promises.
Keep your promises.
Keep your promises.
Did Tom break his promise?
Did Tom break his promise?
I never made such a promise.
Tom is a true professional.
Tom doesn't have these problems.
I thought you hated Tom.
I thought you hated Tom.
There are no fish in this pond.
Tom is always very polite.
Tom was very polite.
I was very polite.
Try to be polite.
Try to be polite.
Try to be polite.
Try to be polite.
Try to be polite.
I have pneumonia.
You're hard to please.
You're hard to please.
Tom didn't know what to say, so he said nothing.
No one had a flashlight.
No one had a flashlight.
Tom has a twin brother.
Tom had three children.
Tom is in trouble again.
Tom had heart problems.
When did you take this picture?
When did you take this picture?
I don't remember when I took this picture.
Tom has no experience.
Tom's parents are teachers.
Tom has good teachers.
Tom had no complaints.
Tom has many hobbies.
I should've asked Tom for permission.
I should've asked Tom for permission.
It's far from perfect.
Tom has no siblings.
Tom has a daughter.
Tom has a daughter.
Tom has a sister.
Tom is impatient.
You're impatient.
You're impatient.
I dropped my apple.
I drove Tom to school.
Has the cat got your tongue?
Has the cat got your tongue?
In 1986, the Soviet Union launched the Space Station Mir. During its 15 year lifetime, it was the largest space station to orbit the Earth.
I heard voices outside.
You have at least three options.
What do we know about Tom?
What do you know about Tom?
What do you know about Tom?
What else do you know about Tom?
What else do you know about Tom?
What exactly do you know about Tom?
What exactly do you know about Tom?
What do you know about Tom's girlfriend?
What do you know about Tom's girlfriend?
What do you know about Tom's family?
What do you know about Tom's family?
It's not size that matters. It's how you use it.
Tom had difficulty learning French.
I don't like your patronising tone.
Tom is now in trouble.
What didn't you like about Tom?
What didn't you like about Tom?
What didn't you like about Tom?
What didn't you like about Tom?
I'm glad you told me about Tom.
I'm glad you told me about Tom.
Please don't ask me about Tom.
Please don't ask me about Tom.
Well, it turns out you were right about Tom.
Well, it turns out you were right about Tom.
Don't talk to Tom about this.
Don't talk to Tom about this.
Don't talk to me about Tom.
Don't talk to me about Tom.
Don't talk about Tom like that.
I don't want to talk about Tom.
We don't like to talk about Tom.
Why don't you just talk to Tom about it?
Why don't you just talk to Tom about it?
Are they talking about Tom?
Are they talking about Tom?
I'm not talking about Tom.
I'm not talking about Tom.
I'm talking about Tom.
I'm here to talk about Tom.
Right now, I'm talking about Tom.
I'm not going to talk to Tom about this.
I'm just following Tom's orders.
How will you get Tom to help us?
Nowadays it's not possible to protect oneself against weapons of mass destruction.
You worked for Tom, didn't you?
Two years have passed since Jim graduated from high school.
Tom got straight A's in school.
Tom has something in his hands.
That's likely Tom's girlfriend.
Tom has a safe in his office.
The baby is crawling.
Walk two blocks, and turn left.
Tom has a lot of religious books, but he has never read them.
I wanted to be like Tom.
It was preventable.
It was he who broke the window yesterday.
Tom is finishing his work.
They're surrounding us.
This one is free.
This one is free.
We tried to stop Tom.
We tried to stop Tom.
We tried to warn Tom.
We haven't seen Tom.
We have to stop Tom.
We were trying to protect Tom.
We can't leave here without Tom.
We can't leave here without Tom.
We miss you, too.
We both know that's a lie.
Find Tom and bring him home.
I'm going to go talk to Tom.
I've made some progress.
I have attached instructions on how to use FTP to access our files.
We'll catch up with Tom later.
We'll talk with Tom on Monday.
We've got to try and stop Tom.
Who cares what happens to Tom?
Tom spends a lot of time at the office.
I always wanted to see that play.
My father takes a bath before supper.
I really want to impress Tom.
Tom has no close friends he can talk to about that.
I know you still love Tom.
I'm going to throw Tom out.
I don't have time to explain in detail.
We haven't eaten yet.
We've eaten.
Please write your date of birth here.
Please write your date of birth here.
Please write your date of birth here.
Please write your date of birth here.
My dog's name is Belysh. This summer I taught him to put out his paw. Every morning I wake up early and feed him. Then we go for a walk. He defends me from other dogs. When I go bike riding, he runs beside me. He has a friend, her name is Chernyshka. He likes playing with her. Belysh is a very kind and clever dog.
Is it true that elephants have good memory?
Tom has a son who is a dentist.
My brother became a cook.
The actor is nowhere near as popular as he used to be.
Dreams can make me crazy.
I bought a new guitar today.
I don't want to see Tom today.
I started studying French today.
I wonder why Tom isn't here today.
Steel production is estimated to have reached 100 million tons last year.
We have no choice. I guess we'll have to walk.
Your article was published today.
Your article was published today.
Where does this path go to?
Where did you move to?
Who's in charge here?
This is your handwriting, isn't it?
Tom and I became very good friends.
Tom and I both want the same thing.
Tom and I have both been very busy.
Have you received Tom's invitation?
Have you received Tom's invitation?
We should've listened to you, Tom.
You always were a good dancer.
Tom put some coins in the box.
Tom had something in his hand.
Tom has a wife and three kids.
Tom looked a bit startled.
Tom looked around quickly.
Tom looked over the fence.
That's why I need a lawyer.
He pulled the rope.
I must ask your pardon.
He ignored our warnings.
We'll visit you.
The fridge is empty.
The fridge is empty.
Tom doesn't earn enough money to support a family.
Your sense of humor is beginning to exert itself.
It doesn't matter whose fault it is.
It doesn't matter whose fault it is.
Tom failed to impress the young lady.
Damn! I forgot to buy rice.
How old were you when you left Australia?
What do you want for breakfast tomorrow? Bread? Rice? "Either one is fine."
Hey, I just had a good idea.
Who taught you how to skate?
I would like to but I have a required course tonight.
When in Ukraine, I always speak Ukrainian.
Thank you for your cooperation.
She fell asleep in his arms.
Are you asking me to resign?
There's still some beer in the fridge.
I won't tell anyone about Tom.
I've only seen Tom twice.
She was seen at a restaurant with her lover.
I never thought I'd be doing this alone.
She hugged the baby to her breast.
Dorothy isn't in the office.
I can't stand noisy children.
The grenade exploded five metres from the soldiers.
I want to share my thoughts with you.
I'm in love with Tom.
I'm in love with Tom.
Tom has many enemies.
Tom was vague.
Tom explained why he was late.
Tom earns three hundred dollars an hour.
We were unable to rescue Tom.
We were unable to rescue Tom.
Shakespeare, whose plays are world-famous, lived some four hundred years ago.
Tom wakes up at the crack of dawn every day.
Did you get in touch with them?
Did you get in touch with them?
Did you get in touch with him?
Did you get in touch with him?
Did you get in touch with her?
Did you get in touch with her?
I think I'll talk to Tom.
I think I'll walk to school today.
I think I'll go talk to Tom.
I think I'll eat later.
I will go on foot.
I dove into the water.
I think I'd rather walk.
I think I'd rather walk.
She's not the only beautiful girl in the office.
I think I'd better call Tom.
I think I need a lawyer.
I think I know why Tom isn't here.
I think I know where Tom went.
I think I know where to find Tom.
I think I have a picture of Tom somewhere.
I think about Tom every day.
I think about Tom all the time.
I thought he was an American but he turned out to be an Englishman.
Who's going to drive me to the airport?
Do you have any idea who did this?
Do you have any idea who did this?
Do you have a moment, Tom?
I'm not finished with Tom.
Tom is a little emotional.
The movie was so dull that the audience left one by one.
We should not despise a man because he is poor.
Are dragons real?
Tom was sober.
How's Tom's mood today?
A man who breaks his promises cannot be trusted.
Let's ask Tom.
Let's ask Tom.
Let's ask Tom.
Let's ask Tom.
We're very grateful.
We're still friends.
We're behind schedule.
We're running away.
I just wanted to say goodbye.
You killed Tom.
I understand why you're angry.
I'm sure Tom misses you, too.
I'll tell Tom to contact you.
Do you and Tom stay in touch?
You should call your lawyer.
It's more polite to say thin than skinny.
You're losing precious time.
You're losing precious time.
I was surprised to hear her voice in the next room.
They called them traitors.
Tom eats rice almost every day.
This tool is good for nothing.
He gave a series of lectures on Japanese literature at UCLA.
We purchased a new house for eighty thousand dollars.
This will hardly convince anyone.
Enjoy your life, while you can.
Why didn't you stop Tom?
If you're looking for Tom, he's not here.
If you're looking for Tom, he's not here.
She doesn't mince words.
Tom thinks you're doing it on purpose.
Are you really Tom's brother?
Are you really Tom's brother?
This toy is for boys.
There are no ads on Tatoeba.
I think those are Tom's books.
Tom can't stand the sight of blood.
Please throw the ball to me.
They're acting on their own.
You must help set the table.
Bad becomes good when worse happens.
Wash your hands before each meal.
Why did you stay with Tom?
We don't need to talk to Tom.
I want to take Tom with me.
Tom struggled to keep calm.
In front of the university, there are some bookstores.
He waved at her.
The price includes postage charges.
I warned Tom not to eat that.
I worried about Tom's health.
I'd advise you to let Tom go.
Look at the sleeping baby.
We're stuck here.
When I grow up, I want to be a firefighter.
Tom was waving a flag.
Tom isn't as talented as you.
I think this might interest you.
I think this might interest you.
Tom will get killed.
Tom is going to lose.
No one is threatening you.
No one is threatening you.
Everyone is saying goodbye to Tom.
Don't you want to talk to Tom?
Don't you want to talk to Tom?
Do you remember when you last saw Tom?
Do you remember when you last saw Tom?
It's hard to say no to Tom.
I brought Tom here.
I didn't want to throw it out.
Tom hasn't been arrested yet.
We need to get rid of Tom.
My grandmother always said it was a sin to waste food.
What do you think about Tom?
We don't drink enough water.
Most people don't drink enough water.
Tom is eating lunch.
I'm so proud of Tom.
I'm grateful to you.
I am sure I can get in touch with him by telephone.
Learn Italian.
People don't usually swim around here. The water's not too clean.
Could you please tell me again why you are late?
They are separated by a great distance.
The Beatles are popular among young people.
I saw Tom's picture.
I didn't care.
We've made a final decision.
There are no taxis, so I must walk.
There are no taxis, so I must walk.
He's a painter, but he doesn't do traditional Chinese painting.
Tom was arrested on Monday.
Nobody does this kind of thing alone.
This sort of work calls for great patience.
If you are a student, behave as such.
Don't you know it's hopeless?
I could really use your help.
You're way too good for Tom.
Maybe I could talk to Tom.
Please close the curtains.
I'm trying to protect Tom.
I'll talk to Tom about this.
I'm afraid Tom isn't here.
Tom was eaten by a tiger.
Tom has a mustache.
The towel is wet.
Can I call you Tom?
I searched in my pocket for a coin to make a phone call.
I searched in my pocket for a coin to make a phone call.
Tom worked hard all summer.
Almost all of Tom's friends are famous.
Have I offended you?
Have I offended you?
Have I offended you?
Have I offended you?
Having finished my work, I left the office.
I talked to Tom yesterday.
I spoke to Tom yesterday.
His mother is taking care of him.
My secretary is pushing for a promotion.
I'm not making myself clear.
Tom's apartment is way too big for just one man.
He is an expert in economics.
The horseman is headless.
Tom is a man of absolute sincerity.
Your voice reminds me of my late grandmother.
I have just finished eating lunch.
You're a cute girl.
A dire tragedy has befallen me.
I'm not trying to control you.
I checked outside.
I'd rather read.
Tom has been looking for another lawyer.
He proved to be a spy.
He saw a light far away.
Taxis are expensive.
Now you are sixteen, you should know better.
Once you have made a promise, you should keep it.
The professor's speech was full of humor.
How are you going to carry it out?
I cannot stand headaches.
During one session of the Duma, the lower house of the Russian parliament, an average of eight laws are adopted.
Raising a child is a big job.
Without your help, he would fail.
Nobody wanted to visit my country.
There are lots of different types of dogs.
Can you give me a hand with this table?
Do you want to be near Tom?
Mario failed to save the princess.
Babies crawl before they walk.
Three big men attacked him and stole his money.
Can you tell me where to find Tom?
Can you tell me where to find Tom?
Are you trying to fish in troubled waters?
They carried out the plan right away.
Let me have a look at that book of Tom's.
Tom decided to dress as Pikachu for Halloween.
Enjoy yourself!
Have you read Tom's new book?
Have you read Tom's new book?
Have you read Tom's new book?
We found Tom's keys.
Just don't take offense to my question.
Try to control yourself.
You have two balls.
You have two balls.
You're a good dancer.
Tom's favorite movie is "Planet of the Squirrels."
I was hoping to surprise her.
I was hoping to surprise him.
Tom and I get along well.
There are no plants on the Moon.
Tom wasn't the only one who was late.
Tom wasn't the only one who was late.
They appointed Tom chairman.
Are you younger than Tom?
Are you younger than Tom?
Are you younger than Tom?
Are you younger than Tom?
Should I wait for Tom here?
Should I wait for Tom here?
I refuse to let you marry that man!
We had an implicit agreement that we would support each other.
I visited Tony yesterday.
She shared her husband's fate.
I can't stand the cold.
Your father is Japanese.
Are you 18?
Are you 18?
Tom was injured in a car accident.
Elvis Presley is one of the most famous singers.
She lost her balance.
Nobody's seen Tom.
I lost.
Whose idea was it to fire us?
Whose idea was it to fire them?
Whose idea was it to fire me?
Whose idea was it to fire him?
Whose idea was it to fire her?
You didn't tell me Tom had a sense of humor.
You didn't tell me Tom had a sense of humor.
My husband was a lawyer.
Tom doesn't let his children watch TV.
Stop hitting Tom.
Stop hitting Tom.
How tall is Tom?
Tom has problems.
Ask Tom about it.
Ask Tom about it.
Ask Tom about it.
Ask Tom about it.
Tom got cheated.
Don't shoot Tom.
Don't shoot Tom.
Tom had a choice.
Say hello to Tom.
Say hello to Tom.
Tom has a fever.
I have nothing to ask forgiveness for.
This is Tom's pen.
They call him Tom.
They call him Tom.
Don't wake Tom up.
Don't wake Tom up.
Don't wake Tom up.
Don't wake Tom up.
Don't rely on Tom.
Don't rely on Tom.
Did you invite Tom?
Did you invite Tom?
Ask Tom for advice.
Ask Tom for advice.
Tom won't survive.
That cost us a lot.
I saw you with Tom.
Don't listen to Tom.
Don't listen to Tom.
Bring Tom next time.
Bring Tom next time.
I saw Tom yesterday.
I saw Tom yesterday.
I got a C in French.
You said that you hated Tom.
You said that you hated Tom.
You said that you hated Tom.
I want to thank you.
I want to thank you.
Where is Tom's wife?
He came half an hour late.
I'm happy to be with Tom.
Tom didn't commit the crime he's been accused of.
I don't remember Tom's last name.
The further we are from one disaster, the closer we are to the next.
It took Tom fifteen minutes of googling before he found what he was looking for.
It's a big universe.
Tom is bald, isn't he?
Who wants to take me home?
Many rich people have a safe room in their houses.
Many rich people have a safe room in their houses.
She carried that table by herself.
When she comes, we'll eat.
Hold the line please. I'll put you through to his office.
I gained two kilos this summer.
I think I didn't said it clearly enough.
I don't know how Paris is the most visited city in the world.
When will you take a bath?
Tom has company.
Tom has my keys.
Tom has my vote.
Tom has my number.
Is this book Tom's?
My dad was a coach.
That was a bad bet.
Tom is a bad coach.
Tom got shot at.
Do you see Tom often?
Do you see Tom often?
Do you see Tom often?
Do you see Tom often?
Do you see Tom often?
I borrowed money not only from Tom, but from his wife, too.
I'll see Tom tomorrow.
Tom gave up too soon.
Tom could've drowned.
Tom is a little late.
Tom has friends here.
Tom has convinced me.
Tom has a job, right?
All we can do is pray.
We have to catch Tom.
We couldn't find Tom.
I knew Tom would lose.
I hope they catch Tom.
I decided to call Tom.
Can you take us to Tom?
Tom had no desire to learn French.
How many girlfriends does Tom have?
How many girlfriends does Tom have?
The district is abundant in natural resources.
Tom wants to read a book.
Were you scolded by your teacher?
I think you'd better stick with Tom.
I always brush my teeth before I go to bed.
Tom is pleasant to work with.
The police didn't arrest Tom.
He can make himself understood in four languages.
It's not free to get water here.
Do you meet Tom often?
Do you meet Tom often?
Do you meet Tom often?
Do you meet Tom often?
Do you think I'm made of money?
Tom dropped something.
Tom doesn't have time.
Tom has a lot of time.
Tom has a good lawyer.
Tom has a good lawyer.
We tried to catch Tom.
Tom already thanked me.
No one except Tom came.
No one can protect you.
No one can protect you.
No one came except Tom.
Tom didn't have a plan.
Tom has a great memory.
Tom dropped his pencil.
You have to let me talk to Tom.
Tom's French isn't bad.
Don't call Tom an idiot.
Don't call Tom an idiot.
Ask Tom what to do next.
Ask Tom what to do next.
I'll try to contact Tom.
I'm glad Tom got caught.
Tom gives up too easily.
Tom didn't miss the bus.
Tom is breaking the law.
Tom's help isn't needed.
Tom will miss the train.
I knew that we'd be late.
I followed Tom's example.
I don't think I know Tom.
I don't think I know Tom.
That just broke my heart.
Tom didn't break the law.
Tom hasn't had lunch yet.
Tom told me he'd be late.
Tom told me he'd be late.
What's Tom's wife's name?
Could Tom have been saved?
Be careful not to be late.
Be careful not to be late.
I think this isn't enough.
Tom didn't have any proof.
Tom didn't catch the ball.
Tom has a very nice voice.
Tom has a very nice smile.
Tom has a very high fever.
Tom has a car, doesn't he?
Tom has been telling lies.
Tom never broke any rules.
Ask Tom what his plans are.
Ask Tom what his plans are.
Don't pay attention to Tom.
I learned to cook from Tom.
I bought a bicycle instead.
Tom has a good imagination.
Tom forgot to mention that.
Tom hasn't broken any laws.
Tom has a very good memory.
Tom wasn't at school today.
We can always count on Tom.
Did you see Tom in the park?
Did you see Tom in the park?
Are they purple?
Are they purple?
The truck nearly ran me over.
Let me introduce Tom to you.
Is your blood pressure high?
They should've contacted us.
The orchestra began to play.
The noise didn't bother Tom.
Tom does not have access to the database.
Is it safe to skate on this lake?
I don't care about what other people think.
My mind went blank.
Why do you talk about him as if he were an old man?
We wanted to talk about Tom.
Tom has bags under his eyes.
I'm not your plaything.
I don't like the beach.
This bus connects the two large cities.
Let me answer Tom's question.
I ran into Tom on the train.
I definitely agree with Tom.
I totally agreed with Tom.
Are you absolutely sure you want to sell your father's guitar?
Tom will make a good lawyer.
We can't ask Tom to do that.
We can't ask Tom to do that.
Could you send me some money?
Could you send me some money?
Don't speak to Tom like that.
Don't speak to Tom like that.
Don't let Tom use my bicycle.
Take control of your destiny.
Take control of your destiny.
Tom burst into the apartment.
Kosovo was a province of Serbia.
Times have certainly changed.
Tom doesn't think he'll lose.
We can't control the weather.
I agree with Tom. "So do I."
I'll apologize.
I'll shoot.
I feel comfortable.
I'm surprised.
Why are you hiding from us?
Why are you hiding from us?
Her family moved to Brazil.
I cannot bring this wall down by myself.
I was bored and I fell asleep.
That would be a wise decision.
That would be a wise decision.
The wedding's been called off.
We called off the wedding.
Tom called off his trip.
The details are still unclear.
Tom didn't have any more time.
Tom doesn't keep his promises.
Tom's birthday is coming soon.
How can I contact you?
Are you on good terms with Tom?
Tom's polite.
I'm having a heart attack.
I forgot to ask Tom about his kids.
Why don't you ask Tom to help?
Why don't you ask Tom to help?
Why don't you ask Tom to help?
Why don't you ask Tom to help?
Do you know Tom, by any chance?
Do you know Tom, by any chance?
Ask Tom what we should do next.
Ask Tom what we should do next.
How much did this bicycle cost?
The contract expires next year.
The contract expires next year.
The kids suddenly become quiet.
Tom didn't attend that meeting.
Tom didn't attend that meeting.
Tom did it on purpose, I think.
Tom could've ruined everything.
This place is incredible.
I hate to iron.
I detest ironing.
I felt betrayed.
I felt betrayed.
This doghouse was built by Tom.
Tom doesn't have a temperature.
Tom doesn't have a lot of time.
Tom works at our Boston office.
We can always ask Tom for help.
Did you take Tom to the airport?
Did you take Tom to the airport?
Tom has moved to Australia.
I met Tom in Australia.
Tom Jackson is considered to be one of the most dangerous men in Australia.
Next February, I'll be going to Australia for one year to study.
He had suffered a heart attack.
Did you see Tom at school today?
Did you see Tom at school today?
Ask Tom where he parked his car.
Ask Tom where he parked his car.
I asked Tom if dinner was ready.
I don't consider that expensive.
I think Tom did this on purpose.
Meeting Tom has changed my life.
The audience burst out laughing.
Tom committed suicide in prison.
Tom committed suicide in jail.
Tom committed suicide last year.
Tom committed suicide last year.
Tom is going to miss his flight.
Tom has accepted our invitation.
Tom doesn't want to be a lawyer.
I hate Tom's guts.
I don't hate Tom exactly.
I told Tom we'd be late.
I'd hate to be in Tom's shoes.
Tom wasn't even there.
We had lunch together.
I have a full-time job.
Tom's help isn't needed anymore.
Tom's father is older than mine.
Tom's father is older than mine.
Tom said he didn't need a break.
Do you know what's become of Tom?
Do you know what's become of Tom?
Tom was attacked by a rabid squirrel.
The blood of heroes flows in my veins.
My father doesn't drink alcohol. "Mine doesn't either."
Call your mom and tell her you'll be late.
Are there any risks?
Tom has nothing to apologize for.
Tom has friends who can help him.
Tom has a good chance of winning.
Fill up the tank.
Are you sure you've never met Tom?
Are you sure you've never met Tom?
I asked Tom to wake me up at 2:30.
Don't blame Tom for what happened.
Don't blame Tom for what happened.
Tom didn't flush the toilet.
Nobody will convince me otherwise.
She held on to my hand tightly.
I knew you wouldn't forget Tom.
I knew you wouldn't forget Tom.
I went to the hospital to see Tom.
I thought you would find it interesting.
I thought that would interest you.
I don't think Tom has any friends.
Tom and I were on the same flight.
The situation has become hopeless.
I would like to move to Australia.
Tom's troubles are only beginning.
Tom's intentions were quite clear.
I'm not surprised.
I'm not surprised.
Ask Tom when he plans to come back.
Ask Tom when he plans to come back.
Why don't you ever talk about Tom?
I warned Tom, but he didn't listen.
I warned Tom, but he didn't listen.
Tom does that a lot better than me.
Tom may use my bicycle if he wants.
This bicycle used to belong to Tom.
Tom is going to make a good father.
They should've contacted us by now.
Try to put yourself in Tom's shoes.
Tom's friendship means a lot to me.
Tom shot twice.
Read all the instructions carefully.
Read all the instructions carefully.
Tom and I have become close friends.
Isn't that suspicious?
She's kind of pretty.
She's kind of pretty.
No matter how good you are, there will always be people who are better than you.
I just graduated from Harvard.
I'm glad we're in agreement.
I'm looking forward to seeing you and your family.
Give your passport number and your date of birth.
Is it true that you kissed Tom?
Is Tom in trouble?
It took five minutes to get to the station.
I don't have any pictures of Tom.
Take them all to my office.
You should be careful with those.
I'm looking for Tom. Have you seen him?
I'm not afraid of Tom.
Modern computers carry out ten to the ninth power (10^9) operations per second.
I must find out who broke this.
Don't attempt to do this by yourself.
Do you think you're smarter than Tom?
You should spend more time with Tom.
You should spend more time with Tom.
I went to the airport to see Tom off.
I haven't seen Tom for almost a year.
That incident happened right in front of him.
He was seriously injured in the accident.
Should I bring Tom with me?
I just dropped in to say goodbye.
Have you pray’d to-night, Desdemona?
The ice will break under your weight.
Do you like my motorcycle?
Do you like my motorcycle?
Do you think Tom is in trouble?
Do you think Tom is in trouble?
Tom has already thanked me.
That is why I was late for class yesterday.
Tom has more alcohol in his refrigerator than he does food.
I am playing the guitar now.
Do you want us to take you home?
Do you want us to take you home?
We'll have to postpone the meeting.
Do you want us to take you home?
Do you want us to take you home?
How long have you and Tom been living here?
Her reaction didn't surprise me.
This is my coach.
Tom'll survive.
Do you know Tom's phone number?
Tom doesn't like to be disturbed.
We're going to name him Tom.
Tom helped his mother set the table.
Should we wait for Tom here?
It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it as fact.
Are you sure this is Tom's suitcase?
Are you sure this is Tom's suitcase?
Does Tom often eat lunch at your house?
Does Tom often eat lunch at your house?
Did you know that Tom is blind in one eye?
Is it too far to walk?
Is it too far to walk?
Is it too far to walk?
What is Tom's shoe size?
How can I cancel my wedding?
Why are you and Tom fighting?
What did you and Tom eat for lunch?
What did you and Tom eat for lunch?
Who says I'm afraid of Tom?
Have you spent a lot of time with Tom?
Have you spent a lot of time with Tom?
Hasn't anyone seen Tom?
Who's that talking to Tom?
May I speak to Tom?
Did you speak to Tom?
Should we wait here for Tom?
Are you sure you want to wait for Tom?
Are you sure you want to wait for Tom?
Why did you hit Tom?
Why did you hit Tom?
Why did you hit Tom?
Didn't I warn you about Tom?
Didn't I warn you about Tom?
There's no way to do this without Tom.
Did you receive Tom's invitation?
Did you receive Tom's invitation?
Something attracted Tom's attention.
Tom didn't mention that on the phone.
I'd rather walk.
I'd rather walk.
I prefer to walk.
I prefer to walk.
I'll order food.
Tom is quite good at languages.
This book is geared towards beginners.
Tom doesn't have time to do that now.
Tom's the one who broke the window.
It was so noisy that we couldn't talk.
I recognized Tom the moment I saw him.
They gave up.
They don't care about that.
You hate Tom, right?
I'm the only one who knows where Tom hid the gold coins.
Tom whipped out his gun.
I came to tell you that I'm resigning.
Tom's French is very good.
I know where to hide.
He committed suicide by taking poison.
We'll have to wait for Tom's response.
I'm surprised you came at all.
Are you going to sell Tom your bicycle?
Apparently, Tom is very good at skiing.
Don't be so hard on Tom. He meant well.
What's your name, son?
She was late for the bus.
Tom can be contacted by phone.
I've been divorced three months.
One of Tom's friends was killed in a traffic accident.
Tom didn't attend Mary's funeral.
The boy jumped into the water.
That was the advantage.
Don’t apologise, I understand perfectly.
Did you hug anybody?
Tom's covering something with his right hand.
Solve this problem on your own.
She always wears fashionable clothes.
I have no idea what happened to Tom.
Are you a priest?
It took him a week to finish the work.
Which has the biggest brain, an elephant or a person?
Don't let Tom lie on the floor.
Don't let Tom lie on the floor.
He kicked the ball.
Tom caught a mouse.
She caught a mouse.
My mother faints every time she sees a mouse.
Tom visited us yesterday.
He's Chinese.
If I had a son, I wouldn't name him Tom.
We ate pancakes for breakfast.
Can I see a picture of Tom?
Can I see a picture of Tom?
I don't care how long ago it was.
Tom threatened me.
Tom threatened me.
Tom put on his rubber gloves.
I'm still not giving up.
I am against the death penalty.
Were you comfortable?
Everyone is waiting for Tom.
That plan failed.
Who are Tom's friends?
What's in the garage?
I want a list of all Tom's relatives.
I really miss my wife.
Tom is a lawyer.
Tom says he needs a break, too.
Tom says he needs a break, too.
What we're doing is dangerous.
We took part in the contest.
We took part in the contest.
I remember the day I met Tom.
Let's split the bill four ways.
We all have our orders.
Tom is very impatient.
Let's see if Tom has any questions.
Tom has a lot of hard work ahead of him.
Tom's composition had a lot of mistakes.
Tom's composition had a lot of mistakes.
Tom's car cost a lot more than mine did.
Only three people attended Tom's funeral.
The player put an easy smash into the net.
It's colder in Dallas than it is here! What is this world coming to?
She has no sense of humor.
She has no sense of humor.
I've heard that Tom's plans have changed.
Tom has a meeting this afternoon at 2:30.
No country should interfere in another country's internal affairs.
How close are you and Tom?
Tom has been having trouble sleeping recently.
Cats of that breed have no tail.
I have spoken with the Polish ambassador.
All the cars in this garage belong to Tom.
Tom owns his own company.
Waiter, please. I need a spoon for the soup.
It took me an hour and a half to get there by car.
Yesterday I met Tom on the way to school.
Yesterday I met Tom on the way to school.
The financial crisis has left many unemployed.
Tom is going to be late for school today.
The bus fell off the cliff, killing all 10 aboard.
Tom was a coach.
Don't laugh at Tom when he makes mistakes.
Don't laugh at Tom when he makes mistakes.
Police are continuing their investigation.
About thirty people attended Tom's funeral.
Unfortunately, there may be complications.
Unfortunately, there may be complications.
When was the last time you talked with Tom?
When was the last time you talked with Tom?
We can always count on Tom in an emergency.
Tom and I are very different from each other.
I am already late.
I know you were the one who broke the window.
It's harsh, but fair.
She has been to France three times.
Tom has a big house and three cars.
Tom wasn't able to catch the ball with one hand.
The doctors did everything they could to save Tom.
Describe Tom.
Describe Tom.
Tom can't play the guitar.
I recognized Tom as soon as he walked into the room.
Could you please put on the tea kettle?
My future is closely bound up with the finances of my firm.
Young people tend to think so.
I gave up my seat to an old lady.
He was the champion for three years.
She always keeps her promises.
I warned him, but he ignored the warning.
Don't leave the house.
He felt a sudden pain.
I wish you'd stop calling me Tom.
I missed the plane. Could I take the next one?
He is not a politician but a lawyer.
This is Tom's grave.
I could rip you apart with my bare hands.
Could you explain it in more detail?
She carried out the plan.
It's said that some Englishmen like Japanese-style rooms.
You probably wouldn't even recognize Tom if you saw him now.
You probably wouldn't even recognize Tom if you saw him now.
Don't lose your sense of humor.
If Tom knew how to swim, he'd probably want to go to the beach with us.
Someone told me that people with type O blood attract more mosquitoes than people with any other blood type.
Studying is important.
The plane took off on time.
If it sounds too good to be true, it probably isn't.
We won the contest.
We won the contest.
How long does a butterfly live?
How long do butterflies live?
The plane took off.
Tom was given up for dead.
There are some things you can't control.
I agreed with Tom.
Tom wasn't arrested.
Tom and I don't usually agree.
Three people survived.
He blamed it on me.
I agree with Tom, too.
I asked Tom to explain.
I asked Tom about that.
I asked Tom about that.
I didn't argue with Tom.
Do we really want Tom to know how much money you make?
Has Tom broken something again?
Why wasn't Tom arrested?
Why did they arrest Tom?
What was Tom accused of?
Anyway, I agree with Tom.
Why are you mad at me? "I'm not mad at you!"
Tom looks very tense.
I apologize for the mistake.
Tom is red-green colour blind.
The length of the article is not to exceed 1000 words.
You're observant.
Tom is a good singer, isn't he?
Tom rejected all of my ideas.
Tom rejected all of my ideas.
Tom doesn't have any proof.
A guard is outside.
Tom tells everyone that he can't speak French, but that's not true.
The answer will surprise you.
The answer will surprise you.
Ask Tom where he put his keys.
Ask Tom where he put his keys.
I've known Tom for many years.
Tom doesn't want to apologize.
I relied on Tom.
I am a bit crazy.
Tom's parents are out of town.
Tom put on his gloves.
Tom jumped back into the pool.
The bus was late.
There are too many adverts on youtube.
I'll draw a map for you.
Tom has a black dog.
Tom has a black dog, doesn't he?
Unlike her, you are diligent.
Unlike her, you are diligent.
You have to get this work finished by noon.
The mother cat protected her kittens.
The mother cat protected her kittens.
Please pass me the salt and pepper.
Tom isn't here. He's already left.
We definitely need Tom's help.
Translating is a great pleasure for me. I wouldn't do it otherwise.
Tom's the one who broke the window.
I'm afraid Tom will be arrested.
I disagree with Tom's statement.
I miss my old job.
I give you my permission to do whatever you want to do.
He couldn't have put it more plainly.
You shouldn't break your promises.
We welcome you to our club.
I'll cut your head off!
You could be a great lawyer.
We'd better hurry. I don't want to be late for the concert.
We are grateful to you for your kindness.
I ran out and caught a taxi.
I'm glad we reached an agreement.
It's no use arguing with Tom.
There's no point arguing with Tom.
She tried to conceal the fact.
Please lower the flag.
Tom canceled his hotel reservation.
Tom will contact you.
It was useless.
We shouldn't have let you go.
The mayor granted our request.
It's nearly noon and he's still in bed.
I finally contacted him by phone.
He wouldn't let anyone interfere in his personal affairs.
Tom gladly accepted the invitation.
I asked Tom to explain what he meant.
Tom realized it was useless to argue.
Someone must have left the water running.
He turned the table upside down.
The children are going to the beach today.
I've offended you.
Tom paid a lot of money for that guitar.
Only one thing worries me.
I need a five-minute break.
I don't like high-heeled shoes.
The patient is more alive than dead.
What's your favorite breed of dog?
It goes without saying that health is more important than wealth.
She rides a motorcycle well.
Can you please tell me how I can get to the beach?
Promise you won't get mad.
The crowd hailed the winner.
Tom wrote Mary a letter and thanked her for her help.
I can't fire her.
My son is brushing his teeth.
I don't have a guitar.
I'd like to take the pill.
I saw a light far away.
The stranger was too surprised to speak.
I never go to London without visiting the British Museum.
Russia is facing great financial difficulties.
Do you add new sentences to Tatoeba?
Tom wants to be popular.
I went home and Bill stayed at the office.
I have an important announcement to make.
Tom played the guitar and everyone sang.
I'm really looking forward to tonight's concert.
This river is dangerous to swim in.
I think that the Lions will be the champions this year.
The expedition has postponed its departure to the Antarctic.
Lately, we see crows everywhere.
Tom told me that I should be more careful.
Tom is in worse trouble than I thought.
Tom is in worse trouble than I thought.
I'm going to meet a customer in his office today.
It never occurred to me that I might be fired.
I reflected on the problem.
I appreciate everything you've done for us.
I appreciate everything you've done for us.
Tom knows how to fly a helicopter.
I wanted to surprise Tom.
She couldn't convince him to give a speech.
We were late.
Why are you convinced Tom is guilty?
Tom has three sons. All of them are doctors.
I appreciate everything Tom has done for us.
Tom was the one who taught me how to play the guitar.
No one ever escapes from this prison.
Tom didn't have a pencil.
It seems I've offended you.
It seems I've offended you.
Tom is a computer expert.
I wanted to hear Tom confess.
Tom didn't have time for breakfast.
I bought this from Tom.
I bought it from Tom.
I bought it from Tom.
Everyone can't be a winner.
The ball was wet.
Everyone here knows Tom.
Tom wants a bicycle.
Wait one minute.
Tom wants to walk.
We visited Tom.
He saved the princess.
It was Tom's turn.
Where were Tom's parents at that time?
Tom thanked them both.
Tom thanked them both.
We never talked about religion.
We talked about Tom.
Only three people survived.
Fortunately, Tom survived.
We were very surprised.
You'll be surprised.
You'll be surprised.
You'll be surprised.
They were surprised.
Tom had another suggestion.
Are you stuck?
Are you stuck?
Try to stay objective.
Try to stay objective.
Try to stay objective.
Don't be such a crybaby!
Does Tom have a big family?
Tom stayed home all weekend.
Everyone started laughing at Tom.
The situation was very unusual.
The situation was very unusual.
Tom is a singer-songwriter.
Tom was sent home.
This seemed impossible.
Hurry up, or you will be late for school.
I teach Tom's children French three days a week.
Tom has broken something again.
Tom said he was bored.
Say it isn't true.
Customers have to be satisfied.
Tom is a tax inspector.
I'm capable of making my own decisions.
Were you with Tom the whole time?
Were you with Tom the whole time?
Were you with Tom the whole time?
Were you with Tom the whole time?
We want positive results.
The results are negative.
The police officer removed Tom's handcuffs.
Sometimes history repeats itself.
I'm getting a lot of complaints.
Who's going to replace Tom?
Tom is still in love with you, I think.
The atmosphere in Washington became very tense.
Tom folded the piece of paper in half.
Even though we're divorced, we've remained friends.
Strong winds accompanied the rain.
You made that mistake on purpose, didn't you?
You made that mistake on purpose, didn't you?
You made that mistake on purpose, didn't you?
I congratulate you on your success.
I congratulate you on your success.
I knew Tom better than he thought I did.
Their concern is understandable.
It was still raining.
Why was Tom punished?
Tom still has questions.
Tom still has questions.
Tom and I don't always agree.
Tom already has one of these.
Prepare for the worst.
Prepare for the worst.
We pray for peace.
Please have patience.
Please talk to Tom.
Please talk to Tom.
She came running.
Tom also plays guitar.
Tom can play the guitar, but not very well.
First we'll eat, and then we'll go.
First we'll eat, and then we'll go.
Tom opened the envelope.
Tom noticed that the mailbox was open.
She brushed away the dust.
She is a pianist.
Tom tried to hide his feelings.
The building did not pass a fire inspection.
The building did not pass a fire inspection.
Alice rushed into her room.
Your sudden appearance surprised me.
He focused his attention on that problem.
If there's a way to tell whether or not a girl has a boyfriend, please tell me.
You can't negotiate with terrorists.
Forget about this guy. There are a lot of men better than him in this world.
According to this figure, the reflection angle equals the incidence angle.
We cultivate rice.
Tom needed emergency surgery.
It took him two hours to finish his homework.
We have to do without sugar; we're short of it.
She has a remarkable capacity for learning languages.
Tom was moaning.
Will you miss Tom?
Will you miss Tom?
We all miss you.
We all miss you.
Our plan will call for a lot of money.
The meeting has been postponed.
He was grateful for your help.
Six times three equals eighteen.
My shoes are the same size as his.
A number of traffic accidents have happened recently.
He devoted his life to the study of science.
When he feels fine, he goes for a walk.
Tom bought his magic wand at a magic wand shop.
She had a crush on her teacher.
If you would like to have a sample, please let us know.
Tom survived three days in the mountains.
The driver turned the wheel to the right.
Tom asked me who had painted the picture.
He knows how to brush his teeth.
Do you remember the night Tom died?
Three times five is fifteen.
Tom now makes millions.
On weekends, I take my dogs out for a long walk in the park.
They stole my lover and all the colors of happiness.
You are concerned about Tom, aren't you?
There's room for discussion.
You recognize him, don't you?
You recognize him, don't you?
Not until I visited Australia did it become clear to me how small Japan is.
Tom is a very talented singer.
Tom came yesterday to see you.
Tom has a good ear for music.
The wait was too long.
Tom's paternal grandparents live in Australia.
Thank you for the link.
Tom's name was third on the list.
The first name on the list is Tom.
Why isn't Tom on this list?
Nobody liked Tom.
Tom lit the candle.
We left Tom alone.
There's plenty of time left.
That's an original idea.
Everyone knows Tom.
Have you known Tom a long time?
We needed Tom's help.
This is the room where Tom killed himself.
We keep our promises.
Everybody jumped into the pool.
Has Tom been invited?
Our investigation is ongoing.
May I speak to Tom, please?
May I speak to Tom, please?
We keep our promises.
He took me to school by car.
I had two copies of the book.
I have three chickens in my house.
My shift's over in a couple of hours.
If not now, when do you plan to start the project?
He is one of the candidates running for mayor.
He is one of the candidates running for mayor.
This has never bothered me until now.
Tom doesn't only teach the guitar, he often gives concerts.
I add sentences.
I'm sure I lost at least 3 kilos this week.
She knows her husband's psychology.
He is no less wise than his father.
I persuaded my brother to study harder.
Mr Wilder gave me your e-mail address.
The chickens have come home to roost.
Humans are asleep when they live, they wake up when they die.
This is what he painted.
This is what he painted.
I pray for your success.
Tom bought a pair of black leather shoes.
People have been injured.
Many people were injured.
One man was injured.
Only one person was injured.
No passengers were injured.
Three people were injured.
Tom was severely injured.
Tom was impressed with that.
Look up the number in the telephone book.
Tom shot himself.
There are lots of trees in the countryside.
The food is in the refrigerator. The refrigerator is in the kitchen.
She met Tom here.
He met Tom here.
He met Tom here.
She met Tom here.
Tom was available.
Tom suddenly realized he was in danger.
Tom suddenly realized he was in danger.
Perhaps I should talk with Tom.
I keep a daily record of the temperature.
I wasn't able to catch the ball that Tom threw to me.
I saw his mother scold him.
I visited Tom.
If it had not been for your help, I couldn't have completed the work.
Don't cut in while others are talking.
I rely on Tom.
Mr Johnson insists on his theory.
I thought that guy had a gun, so I shot him.
I thanked him for the nice present.
So boring was the lecture that he fell asleep.
This is only half correct.
Well, at least let me set up the table.
I miss my kids.
When Tom was alive, he could protect me.
Will you miss me?
Will you miss me?
She missed the last train.
She was late for the last train.
I interrupted Tom.
I miss those days.
I miss your smile.
Take him outside.
Take her outside.
I want to survive.
I like this custom.
I wasn't surprised.
I had one advantage.
Tom is stuck in the past.
If you're not listening to the radio, turn it off.
If you're not listening to the radio, turn it off.
Can I speak with Tom?
Where are my gloves?
I was extremely proud.
I was incredibly lucky.
Everyone wished me luck.
He believes in God, but he rarely attends Church.
The boy lay on his back, basking in the spring sunshine.
Tom and I are the oldest.
I said that it wasn't true.
I talked to Tom's parents.
I talked to Tom's parents.
Tell me why Tom isn't here.
Tell me why Tom isn't here.
Tom and I have that in common.
I saw Tom leave the auditorium.
He earns a good salary.
Tom was the only one on the ship when it exploded.
Her statement turned out to be false.
Her statement turned out to be false.
For me, skiing is by far more interesting than skating.
Is there anything else I missed?
It's not Tom's decision.
I was surprised by the question.
Your guitar is better than mine.
Your guitar is better than mine.
Tom's new girlfriend is much younger than he is.
You are three centimeters taller than me.
I was told that it's dangerous to swim here.
He smiled and said goodbye.
I can't remember whether I turned off the gas or not.
They've been dance partners for more than 60 years.
Two boys came running out of the room.
I'm too old for Tom.
You may fall ill at any moment.
She can operate a crane.
She checked the mailbox.
I read a lot in my diary yesterday.
Tom has a right to his own opinion.
She shot a gun.
Tom isn't as impatient as Mary.
While in London, he visited the British Museum.
I just stopped by to wish you luck.
I was Tom's secretary.
I was Tom's secretary.
The police persuaded her not to jump off the bridge.
I'll never forget the soft and moist skin of my lover on that summer night.
I'm glad the kids weren't hurt.
I hugged Tom.
What is the most popular play now?
I was surprised by his resignation.
I was surprised because he lifted me up with ease.
Tom usually eats his lunch alone.
What is she trying to hide?
What is he trying to hide?
She arrived unannounced.
I don't care about the money.
She despises him.
She types well.
She punished her children.
She opened her backpack.
She opened her backpack.
I hope Tom survives.
Where was Tom heading?
How can you be so naive?
How can you be so naive?
How can you be so naive?
Tom has a secret.
Tom has a secret.
She almost convinced me.
She has fake eyelashes.
My son doesn't obey me.
I asked Tom what he was reading.
I almost gave up.
I almost gave up.
I bought Tom's new novel.
Tom wrote a tragedy with a happy ending.
Tom was too proud to ask for help.
I need Tom's money.
She usually walks to school.
She spoke through an interpreter.
Does Tom have experience?
When Tom was a teenager, he earned money delivering newspapers.
It's clear that the passport is a forgery.
He knows how to do shopping.
Tom couldn't attend the meeting because he was sick.
In a few minutes we'll be landing at New Tokyo International Airport.
Today I saw a film about the Chernobyl catastrophe.
The plane should have arrived at Kansai Airport by now.
My eyes must be tricking me.
I thought we were talking about Tom.
I thought we were talking about Tom.
Tom and I want to talk to you about something.
Tom's car has been stolen.
People are gathering outside.
John is on duty today.
You must eat fruits.
Please forgive Tom.
I've forgotten Tom's last name.
I've forgotten Tom's last name.
I must go there irrespective of what you think.
Tom isn't wearing a tie.
Do both of you know Tom?
I don't think I can do this alone.
An Englishman would act in a different way.
I see that you have a Greek name.
I see that you have a Greek name.
I see that you have a Greek name.
I see that you have a Greek name.
I know where to look for Tom.
Take Tom with you.
Take Tom with you.
There is some milk left in the fridge.
He quietly said goodbye.
What toy is big?
Patience is the key.
That was a disaster.
The company has purchased a new computer system.
She was wearing a white petticoat.
It is still a mystery who wrote the letter.
The car is in front of the garage.
I found a nice tie for Tom.
You're going to need this.
She cannot control her children.
I don't like the way Tom decorated his room.
We'll never find Tom.
Tom told me that he had lost his textbook.
I tried to follow the instructions.
There were flies everywhere.
No one was fired.
When was Tom fired?
I hope they find Tom.
Tom has been found.
You're so good at singing.
We ran out of gas in the middle of the intersection.
Tom has no desire to study French.
I called off my wedding.
It's a spectacle you won't forget.
How do you bring up your children?
How do you bring up your children?
I'm really glad I ran into you.
I can't find Tom.
Tom considered the situation carefully.
I want to ask her out, but I don't have the courage.
They are bored.
You caught the ball, didn't you?
You caught the ball, didn't you?
You caught the ball, didn't you?
I am thankful for my friends.
Mr Brown is in charge of our class.
The post office is in the town centre.
Hang your coat in the hall please.
Tom has enough problems the way it is.
Last night, there was thunder and lightning.
Tom felt comfortable.
The restaurant was empty.
Tom was elected president.
Tom loves to eat.
I try to only eat healthy foods.
I drove them home.
Do you know who killed Tom?
We don't want people like Tom in our club.
I'm going to see Tom today.
She blamed me for everything.
She patiently waited for him.
I see a pattern.
There must be a pattern.
Do you want to speak to Tom?
Do you want to speak to Tom?
Tom broke his glasses.
I'm the one who convinced Tom to help us.
Tom has a lot to do.
Tom didn't have a job.
Tom doesn't have a dad.
Does Tom have blue eyes?
Tom is incredibly talented.
Japan trades with lots of countries in the world.
Japan trades with lots of countries in the world.
I'm the one who brought Tom here.
My daughter's driving me crazy.
Tom broke the dishes.
Does Tom have a passport?
I don't like Tom's voice.
He owes me a favor.
Could you type this letter for me?
Could you type this letter for me?
Have you discussed this with Tom?
Tom bought three copies of that book.
How often do you see Tom?
How often do you see Tom?
Tom doesn't have a gun.
What do Tom's parents do?
I hope I won't get fired for this.
Did you like Tom's concert?
Did you like Tom's concert?
A wind from the ocean blows at this time of the year.
Do you think Tom will be fired?
Do you think Tom will be fired?
We don't have enough data yet.
Did you put my name on the list?
I'm capable of doing that myself.
Does history really repeat itself?
I was scared of Tom.
People with no sense of humor are like meadows with no flowers.
Hand me the remote.
I prefer coke to coffee.
I spend a lot of time with Tom.
Tom's mother told him not to talk with his mouth full.
I want to change my appearance.
You're the perfect girlfriend.
You're the perfect girlfriend.
He was too old to resist.
I have to study hard to keep up with the other students.
Tom's reply didn't surprise anyone.
Don't forget to talk to Tom tomorrow.
Don't forget to talk to Tom tomorrow.
Do you know what Tom's last name is?
Do you know what Tom's last name is?
Do you know what Tom's last name is?
It's been very cold, so the lake is frozen.
Why haven't you talked to Tom about this yet?
He's very curious.
There is a bookstore in front of my house.
Sometimes you scare me.
My uncle's handwriting is hard to read.
No one except Tom will be able to do that.
We want candy.
Do you recognize the person in this picture?
Do you recognize the person in this picture?
We must carry out that plan.
Tom didn't have a bicycle when he was growing up.
Everyone just stared at Tom and didn't say a thing.
The boy admitted breaking the window.
Tom's mother has died.
There will be difficulties.
She's the perfect girl for him.
I can't lift a suitcase heavier than 30 kilos.
Please turn right at the next intersection.
Another patient has died.
Tom died from electrocution.
Tom was declared guilty.
Tom was defeated.
Tom had a lot of problems at the school.
Tom has a lot of problems.
We've decided to postpone the meeting till next Monday.
I add sentences to Tatoeba almost every day.
The waiters bumped into each other.
Samsung is a Korean company.
That hasn't convinced me.
My mother often suffers from headaches.
Tom went downtown to do shopping.
He implored her to come back.
You don't have enough faith in yourself.
You don't have enough faith in yourself.
We are surprised at the news.
Tom's eyes are open.
You're Tom's boss, aren't you?
I've always wanted to visit Turkey.
There was a crack in the mirror.
How could I refuse?
Could you wait outside?
Could you wait outside?
Tom couldn't be saved.
I thought Tom couldn't ride a bicycle.
Tom only did half his homework.
Did you sign a contract?
Did you sign a contract?
I signed the contract.
Get Tom away from me.
Get Tom away from me.
Tom has apparently committed suicide.
Laurie will walk to Spain.
Do you think Tom is still mad at me?
Do you think Tom is still mad at me?
Tom is one of Boston's best lawyers.
Can you explain why Tom wasn't at the meeting?
Can you explain why Tom wasn't at the meeting?
Tom has a remarkable memory.
How do we get rid of her?
How do we get rid of him?
How do we get rid of them?
I'll get rid of her.
I'll get rid of him.
May I please be excused for a minute?
Did you ask Tom for money?
Did you ask Tom for money?
What impressed Tom the most?
The old man approached.
He refused to give an interview.
He's the perfect man for her.
We helped each other to overcome the difficulties.
Tom's turn came.
I heard that Tom committed suicide.
We'll be waiting for you in the lobby.
We'll be waiting for you in the lobby.
Tom and I are the only ones still here.
Tom and I are the only ones still here.
I like the colour violet.
I like the colour violet.
Was Tom the one who was injured?
Why are you mad at him?
Kimchi is a traditional Korean dish.
The reasons are unclear.
The reason was unclear.
The audience stopped clapping.
The audience stopped clapping.
Why is everyone clapping?
Why was Tom chosen?
Human life is sacred.
I'm one of Tom's assistants.
We admired the beauty of the scenery.
Tom got a grip on his emotions.
Tom says he's going to resign.
His escape attempt was successful.
Congratulations on your diploma.
I am British.
What made you contact her?
What made you contact her?
What made you contact her?
What made you contact her?
Tom tried to persuade me to do that.
Tom tried to persuade me to do that.
Tom lives a few blocks away from Mary.
This monument was erected in February, 1985.
But there was one curious circumstance.
They would make a perfect couple.
I saw her at the funeral today.
I saw her at the funeral today.
You have crossed a line.
I was at the hospital with Tom when he died.
I was at the hospital with Tom when he died.
He is taking care of his old Mom.
He is taking care of his old Mom.
He took a trip to Europe.
Tom and I were on the same train.
Those trees hide the landscape.
Tom knows the names of all his customers.
I'm looking for Tom now.
We're careful.
We enjoyed skating.
Are aliens real?
He laughed nervously.
Coke or Pepsi?
Science is cool.
Looks are important.
I broke her heart.
She wears long skirts.
He has dedicated his life to the preservation of nature.
When was the last time you ate lunch with Tom?
When was the last time you ate lunch with Tom?
When was the last time you ate lunch with Tom?
It was the worst night of my life.
Did she mention the results of the exam?
Every advantage has its disadvantage.
Could you give him a minute?
Melanie is going to the airport.
He turned off all the lights at eleven.
The answer may surprise you.
The answer may surprise you.
I want to spend my life with Tom.
In a hole in the ground there lived a hobbit.
Tom doesn't have a steady girlfriend.
I've worked hard my entire life.
They shot him.
Tom cautiously opened the envelope.
Does this mean that I am still in love with her?
Here's a letter to you from Tom.
I hate strong-minded women.
She thanked him for his helpful advice.
Enjoy!
She was only seventeen when they met.
I am friends with her.
He was playing with a toy.
Maybe I should talk to a lawyer.
He shook hands with the mayor.
I'm not afraid of Tom anymore.
Tom filled his bucket with sand.
She scared us.
Tom lost his balance.
We're sincere.
Should we intervene?
We need experts.
We waited outside.
We'll be careful.
Perhaps we overlooked something.
I don't see any significant difference.
The teacher said he did not know the answer to my question.
Tom graduated from Harvard with honors.
I called to thank her.
I called to thank her.
The undead feed on human flesh.
The chicken has already been eaten.
I'm the one who should apologize.
Tom was never caught.
Who caught Tom?
This beer contains 5% alcohol.
I didn't catch the meaning.
I didn't catch the meaning.
I didn't catch the meaning.
Tom is chewing something.
I just wanted to tell you good night.
I just wanted to tell you good night.
I just wanted to tell you good night.
I just wanted to tell you good night.
It was a good buy.
Our plan has lots of advantages.
Our plan has lots of advantages.
Find an empty bottle and fill it with water.
Find an empty bottle and fill it with water.
They had to take turns pushing the car.
The enemy gave in without further resistance.
Wait, Tom. It's too dangerous!
Why are you trying to hide your feelings?
You need an entry ticket.
Were you aware Tom was having financial problems?
Tom promised he'd help me build a doghouse.
Tom asked me how many guitars I had.
I saw them at the funeral today.
Tom's dog is white.
My father has a personality disorder.
Italian is the language of love.
Take me to the Hilton Hotel.
Put your toys back in the box.
Put your toys back in the box.
He stole the money from my safe.
Tom's children are sick.
Tom's children are sick.
Tom's children are sick.
In London, quite a few musicals and plays are presented at the theaters every night.
I was persuaded to stop smoking.
We call him Tom.
Dan realized that he was in love with Linda.
I asked her not to interfere.
I asked her not to interfere.
Be careful! There's a cow in the road!
Did you hear what happened to Tom?
Did you hear what happened to Tom?
Did you hear what happened to Tom?
Tom isn't very energetic.
I love her, but the feeling is not mutual.
I'm going to surprise them.
Don't you think you're wasting your time with all that?
How many days a week do you go to school?
Her girlfriend is completely flat-chested.
Tom was buried Monday.
I am as surprised as you.
Tom has a mahogany desk.
Tom didn't have any problems.
Our office is located in the center of the town.
Tom broke three dishes.
What else did you find out about Tom?
What else did you find out about Tom?
What else did you find out about Tom?
Tom carried the dirty dishes into the kitchen.
We appreciate your patience.
Wait a minute, honey!
Where did you draw them?
Where did you draw them?
Where did you draw them?
There's blood everywhere.
Tom's shirt had blood stains on it.
Who locked the dog outside?
I believe in Tom.
This is just unbelievable.
Many people believe that, but it's not true.
I don't remember Tom.
The situation was unbearable.
The situation was unbearable.
The silence was unbearable.
The heat was unbearable.
The play is in three acts.
Tom barely escaped.
It's on the tip of my tongue.
Are you sure this is Tom's room?
Are you sure this is Tom's room?
Are you sure this is Tom's room?
She was forced to resign.
Hurray for Italian women!
The house is five hundred years old.
I asked Tom to help me.
That was a tragic plane crash.
Tom doesn't trust strangers.
I'm not the only one who wants to go swimming.
Tom knew of the risks beforehand.
Tom uses honey instead of sugar.
The ball hit her in the eye.
You'd better ask Tom.
You'd better ask Tom.
You'd better ask Tom.
You'd better ask Tom.
Ask Tom to help.
Ask Tom to help.
Don't fool yourself. He doesn't love you.
Why did God create the universe?
I must convince her.
I must convince her.
I must convince her.
I must convince her.
A guard is outside.
You shouldn't have killed Tom.
Draw a picture
Draw a picture
I cannot understand Korean. I have never learnt it.
I find him extremely intelligent.
It's the perfect size.
I asked Tom to stay at home.
Tom asked for forgiveness.
I should've asked Tom to help.
I asked Tom why he was crying.
You'd better ask Tom for permission.
You'd better ask Tom for permission.
I wonder if Tom's parents will allow him to go with us.
I asked Tom where he'd bought his bicycle.
What can I do to convince you?
We've got to get Tom out of here.
What soap do you wash your hands with?
She thinks I'm trying to steal her boyfriend.
Do you think I should ask Tom for help?
Do you think I should ask Tom for help?
Tom wasn't there when I arrived.
Tom always asks for permission before he borrows my bicycle.
When was Tom arrested?
Tom has been arrested again.
Tom was arrested Monday.
Tom was arrested immediately.
Tom won't have to apologize.
Why should Tom apologize?
Why should Tom apologize?
Where is the New Zealand embassy?
Tom is excellent at drawing.
She sends us to the town.
I was working sixteen hours a day at that time.
His death surprised us all.
I am sure that he will become a great singer.
I am sure that he will become a great singer.
It has been three years since I came to live here.
He was surprised by what he found.
Do you believe ghosts exist?
I apologize in advance.
Those are serious accusations.
Tom denied those accusations.
Tom denied those accusations.
Tom denied the accusations.
Tom denied the charges.
I've never seen Tom wear a hat.
Tom accepted the invitation.
The police rarely intervene.
Who's with Tom?
Tom may be late.
Tom is so boring.
For a wise person one word is enough!
For a wise person one word is enough!
That was the worst.
Where's Tom's car?
That wasn't enough.
They were grateful.
Is that Tom's voice?
Tom was a terrorist.
Is that too expensive?
Your mother and I want you to marry Tom.
Are you really sick?
I will visit Kyoto.
We have to get him to a doctor.
Failure is possible.
They were very polite.
Tom was very grateful.
Tom was very decisive.
Tom is fun to be around.
Tom was very talented.
Tom smiled and said goodbye.
You're a naive person.
You're a naive person.
Tom desperately needed that.
It was a fantastic game.
Things did not go as intended.
I don't know when you must turn off the device.
The library is upstairs.
Nobody but Tom was ready.
My music teacher was surprised to find out that I can cook.
If anyone wants to surrender, now's the time.
You nearly poked me in the eye with your pencil.
You nearly poked me in the eye with your pencil.
He doesn't want to play with his toys.
What's the ideal age for a man?
It was a fantastic night.
Spring is the time to plant trees.
We talked without the aid of an interpreter.
We talked without the aid of an interpreter.
He scared us.
Tom is very popular, isn't he?
I was trying to protect you.
I was trying to protect you.
I was trying to protect you.
I was trying to protect you.
Tom was very independent.
Everyone but Tom was busy.
Everything is so expensive.
The children were barefoot.
This is a terrible tragedy.
This dress leaves little to the imagination.
Is that really Tom's sister?
Tom did all he could to protect Mary.
This is the place where he killed himself.
The bank is trying to take Tom's house away.
The English language surrounds us like a sea.
I wrote a poem in memory of my dad.
Where's Tom's suitcase?
I insist that he should go with us.
The teacher told me to stand up.
There were police everywhere.
There were policemen everywhere.
Their intentions are obvious.
His English is perfect.
His English is perfect.
She saw a mouse.
You lit the candles.
Is that too expensive for you?
Is that too expensive for you?
Tom's intentions were obvious.
These people are professionals.
Why was Tom expelled from school?
Tom's room was the largest one in the house.
These kinds of problems are relatively rare.
Tom was extremely popular with all the girls.
Tom has an idea.
Tom has one child.
Tom has a guitar.
Tom has no class.
Tom had one goal.
Tom had three sons.
Tom has one problem.
Tom had three sisters.
Tom had many problems.
But that's no argument!
The short skirt is out of fashion.
I have to go to the airport to meet Tom.
I'll go and look for her.
Don't forget rule number seventy-two.
She took a bubble bath.
Tom picked up his guitar and headed for the stage.
We have to use every means to persuade him.
This place is open to everybody.
I drank a glass of red wine after dinner.
I drank a glass of red wine after dinner.
Tom has three young children.
Tom has a 13-year-old sister.
The foreign minister said that the war had been inevitable.
Tom has a 13-year-old sister.
Tom has three grandchildren.
We have the necessary equipment.
Tom didn't try to hide the truth.
What's Tom's favorite color?
Are you envious?
Are you envious?
I held Tom's hand.
I met Tom today.
I met with Tom today.
Tom has been hired.
I thought my head would explode.
I walk to work.
I walk a lot.
She's the most popular girl in the class.
It was boring.
I'm going crazy! I miss him so much!
The glass is full of wine.
Try not to disturb me.
I'm here to protect him.
He caught the ball.
I used to keep a diary in French.
Let's go and surprise them.
I can take him home.
Tom can't refuse his grandchildren anything.
Is it true that you're Tom's brother?
The record is finished. Turn it over to the other side.
Tom is in a good mood.
I've enjoyed working with Tom.
I'm leaving Tatoeba.
I'm not happy with my looks.
I have your diary.
I have your diary.
What's this purple stain?
Tom's lips are blue.
Tom was wearing a gray suit with a red tie.
Are you off your rocker?
Tom is mad at everyone.
On New Year's Day, many people visit neighborhood shrines.
Do you still talk to him?
Something frightened her.
I did my best to protect her.
I had dinner with them.
I had dinner with them.
I just fired him.
I just fired him.
I highly recommend him.
Did you threaten her?
Did you threaten her?
Did you threaten her?
Your hair is perfect.
I can't convince her.
It's no use talking to them.
I won't try to persuade her.
I'm sure I can persuade her.
I'm sure I can persuade her.
I'll pray for her.
Pray for her.
Just buy her some candy.
Just buy her some candy.
I thought you were mad at her.
I thought you were mad at her.
I didn't mean to offend her.
We're here to protect them.
We'd better go look for them.
I had lunch with him today.
Tom shot us.
I told them to be careful.
I punished her.
I punished her.
We'll get in touch with her.
I didn't want to worry you.
Tom will never survive.
Tom took his glasses off and put them on the bedside table.
Throw Tom the ball.
We can't just fire him.
Let's just get rid of them.
I told him I got fired.
I told him I got fired.
Nobody forced Tom to do that.
Why don't I pay them a visit?
It's been a while. How are you?
This surprised many people.
Which guitar is yours?
How well can you play guitar?
Tom picked up the dice and threw them.
Tom picked up the dice and threw them.
I can teach you how to translate.
I can teach you how to translate.
He's really cool looking.
Wise is the man who speaks little.
Please take your shoes off.
Did you move there with your parents?
Did you move there with your parents?
Did you move there with your parents?
I saw her wash the car.
I saw her wash the car.
Tom always peels apples before he eats them.
You want to be lawyers.
That's not the worst thing that could happen.
I don't want to offend her.
Can we interview him?
Did you threaten him?
Did you threaten him?
Did you threaten him?
Why did you fire me?
Why did you fire me?
Why did you fire me?
We're interviewing them.
I'm here to protect her.
If it snows, airplanes won't be able to take off.
I'm not as creative as I should be.
I can't refuse her anything.
I sent him an email.
I sent him an email.
What happened freaked us out.
What happened freaked us out.
We tortured them.
Let's thank him.
How many men are guarding her?
I didn't want to worry them.
I didn't want to worry them.
I didn't want to worry them.
I'm still mad at them.
Something's bothering him.
Who doesn't like the beach?
I told her not to give up.
He doesn't allow Kate to drink wine.
I care about them.
I'll take her there myself.
I waited outside for you.
We sent him a copy.
How did you convince him?
How did you convince him?
How did you convince him?
This guitar belongs to him.
The lie is revealed.
Faith can move mountains.
I have to fire her.
I have to fire her.
No one threatened me.
Why did you attack her?
Why did you attack her?
Why did you attack her?
Tom had a rough day.
Did you remember to thank him?
I asked him not to interfere.
I asked him not to interfere.
We introduced ourselves to each other.
They took a trip to the capital.
Tom is wise enough not to do such a thing.
Tom jumped into water without taking off his clothes.
We sent them a copy.
When did you fire them?
When did you fire them?
When did you fire them?
Tom works as hard as anybody else does.
Don't interrupt her.
Don't interrupt her.
It is a mystery why he quit his job.
Were you surprised to see us?
Get us something to eat.
I'll get in touch with her.
Stop scaring him.
Stop scaring him.
Stop scaring him.
We can't just fire them.
We can't just fire them.
We can't just fire them.
It's hard to say no to her.
Don't pressure them.
Do we have to protect them?
Who was the woman in the picture you posted on Facebook?
I think I've persuaded them.
I think I've persuaded them.
Can I take her home?
I can't fire him.
You needn't have hurried to the airport.
I needn't have bought that suit for the wedding, because Tom's got a spare one in my size.
My parents never allowed me to swim alone in the sea.
I'm sure I can persuade them.
I'm sure I can persuade them.
I'm sure I can persuade them.
I'm sure I can persuade them.
Throw the ball to them.
We'll pray for them.
Who cares what happens to her?
I'm going to take her home.
I had dinner with him.
I had dinner with him.
Life doesn't always work out the way you want it to.
They're just jealous.
Tom was attacked by a bear.
Why did they fire you?
Why did they fire you?
He squeezed her hand.
We're all doomed!
Tom stroked his beard.
Tom has multiple talents.
His lips touched mine.
I spotted Tom immediately.
I squeezed his hand.
I squeezed his shoulders.
He squeezed my shoulders.
He squeezed her shoulders.
Wake up, sleepy-head!
I wanted to say hello to her.
I wanted to say hello to her.
I tried to convince her.
I tried to convince her.
I tried to convince her.
I tried to convince her.
I tried to convince her.
I tried to convince her.
I tried to convince her.
I tried to convince her.
I don't want to offend him.
I don't want to offend him.
They're here to protect her.
They're here to protect her.
Why did you fire them?
Why did you fire them?
Why did you fire them?
Why did you fire them?
Why did you fire them?
Why did you fire them?
I can protect them.
I can protect them.
Thank him for me.
When is Tom's birthday?
The beach is empty.
My life is boring.
Someone broke into my apartment last night.
That's a supposition, not a fact.
Tom makes more money than his parents.
Tom got drunk with his friends.
Let's thank them.
I want to thank him.
Why am I not surprised?
Tell him you're sick.
Tell him you're sick.
Tell him you're sick.
Why did you attack me?
Why did you attack me?
Why did you attack me?
Why did you attack me?
Why did you attack me?
Why did you attack me?
Do we have to protect him?
Tom's hair is very long.
I don't like repeating myself.
That's just speculation.
I don't want to be friends with you.
Don't pressure me.
Don't pressure me.
We just want to take him home.
You're mad at her, aren't you?
You frightened them.
You frightened them.
You frightened them.
What should we do with Tom?
I will protect you.
Tom only has one arm.
Tom isn't on Facebook.
Everyone, say hello to Tom.
I don't usually dress like this.
This guitar belongs to me.
This guitar belongs to her.
I must obey her.
Can't we fire them?
No one threatened her.
No one threatened her.
We shouldn't have let him go.
I called to thank him.
I called to thank him.
Are you still mad at them?
Why are you mad at them?
I fired her.
I fired her.
I fired her.
I fired her.
Did you hear about Tom?
I'm grateful for what you did.
There's one thing I didn't mention.
My best friend stole my boyfriend.
I'm not having lunch with them.
Give this copy to them.
Give this copy to them.
I can't fire them.
I can't fire them.
I told him not to give up.
I'm hiding from them.
I told you not to give up.
I told you not to give up.
Don't you recognize him?
Don't you recognize him?
Don't you recognize him?
Give her your seat.
Give her your seat.
When did you fire her?
When did you fire her?
When did you fire her?
The guards grabbed them.
I'll pray for him.
I'll pray for him.
Something frightened him.
I told them I got fired.
I told them I got fired.
Tom was murdered last night.
Tom ran out of water.
Mary is Tom's older sister.
Shouldn't this be in the refrigerator?
You can't fire them.
You can't fire them.
You can't fire them.
You can't fire them.
Let's thank her.
Can't we fire him?
Can't we fire him?
I have a low opinion of her.
I have a low opinion of her.
Pray for us.
It's hard to surprise us.
I've never stopped loving her.
I couldn't protect her.
I couldn't protect her.
I couldn't protect her.
I couldn't protect her.
I couldn't protect her.
I couldn't protect her.
Don't you recognize her?
Don't you recognize her?
Don't you recognize her?
Stop scaring them.
Stop scaring them.
You've frightened them.
You've frightened them.
You scared them.
I assure you they're exactly the same.
Tom put the ice cream in the freezer.
Don't be angry with him.
There's a little pond in the garden.
When does your business trip begin?
A friend is always ready to do a favor.
Are you taller than Tom?
This armchair is comfortable to sit in.
I still can't believe Tom and I are getting married.
More than one million tons of coal are mined each day in Australia.
I'm not really an expert.
My mother was furious.
I thought I was going to faint.
I'm surprised you remember them.
I'm surprised you remember them.
I'm surprised you remember them.
I'm surprised you remember them.
I'm surprised you remember them.
I'm surprised you remember them.
Tell them your theory.
Tell them your theory.
I wanted to say hello to them.
I wanted to say hello to them.
I wanted to say hello to them.
I wanted to say hello to them.
I just fired her.
I just fired her.
I just fired her.
I gave him a fake address.
I'll surprise her.
I'll surprise her.
What exactly did you ask Tom?
What exactly did you ask Tom?
What exactly did you ask Tom?
Yuri Gagarin flew only one space mission.
They can communicate using hand signs.
Who can fly better, a fly or a pilot?
Love is hard to define.
There's beer in the fridge.
Are you sure you don't want something to eat?
I sent an email to them.
I sent an email to them.
I thought you were mad at him.
I thought you were mad at him.
Try not to disturb them.
Try not to disturb them.
I'll thank them.
I'll get in touch with him.
I despise them.
I despise them.
I'm going to surprise her.
Why did you attack him?
Why did you attack him?
Why did you attack him?
Why did you attack him?
Why did you attack him?
Why did you attack him?
I swear I didn't see them.
I swear I didn't see them.
I swear I didn't see them.
I swear I didn't see them.
Are you accusing him?
Are you accusing him?
Are you accusing him?
Are you accusing him?
Describe your ideal breakfast.
Try to be as discreet as possible.
I love the French.
I got a hole in my jeans.
I'm sending them home.
I punished him.
I punished him.
I punished him.
I punished him.
Why did they fire her?
Why did they fire her?
Pray for him.
Pray for him.
I'd like to interview her.
About ten million tons of coal are mined every day in China.
I hope he gets punished.
I despise her.
I despise her.
I want to thank them.
I want to thank them.
We can't just fire her.
They despise her.
I can't convince them.
I can't convince them.
I don't want to bother him.
I punished them.
I punished them.
I punished them.
I punished them.
I'm surprised you remember him.
I'm surprised you remember him.
I'm surprised you remember him.
I'm surprised you remember him.
I'm surprised you remember him.
I'm surprised you remember him.
I'm surprised you remember him.
I'm surprised you remember him.
I can't control her.
They despise him.
They despise him.
It's a copybook.
At first, I didn't believe you.
At first, I didn't believe you.
It took 22 years to build the Taj Mahal.
Tom went to the Australian embassy to get a visa.
I'm sure I can persuade him.
I'm sure I can persuade him.
I'm sure I can persuade him.
I'm sure I can persuade him.
I'm sure I can persuade him.
I'm sure I can persuade him.
I wanted to say hello to him.
I wanted to say hello to him.
We visited quite a few places.
When is the intermission?
Give him the disk.
Give him the disk.
I'm sure we can persuade them.
I'm sure we can persuade them.
I'm sure we can persuade them.
Don't pressure him.
If we're not careful, the same thing will happen to us.
I thought I'd surprise him.
I thought I'd surprise him.
This is Tom's school.
I've got some information for Tom.
I've got some information for Tom.
I've contacted him.
I've contacted him.
I got it practically for free.
Try to convince them to help us.
I've tried to contact you.
I've tried to contact you.
I've tried to contact you.
I've tried to contact you.
I've tried to contact you.
I've tried to contact you.
I've tried to contact you.
I sent her an email.
I asked them not to interfere.
I asked them not to interfere.
Why is Tom hiding from them?
He crossed the bridge.
I did my best to protect them.
I look forward to meeting them.
I'll take him there myself.
I apologize for him.
Are you accusing her?
Are you accusing her?
They despise you.
They despise you.
They despise you.
They despise you.
I didn't want to worry him.
Tell him I'm in the office.
Tell him I'm in the office.
No one threatened us.
No one threatened us.
I had to protect her.
These gloves belong to him.
Let me say goodbye to her.
Why are you hiding from me?
I finally got her on the phone.
No one threatened them.
I'm surprised you remember us.
I'm surprised you remember us.
I'm surprised you remember us.
I'm surprised you remember us.
You can't fire him.
You can't fire him.
You can't fire him.
You can't fire him.
I had to protect him.
I had to protect him.
I couldn't protect them.
I couldn't protect them.
I gave him my old bicycle.
You're scaring them.
You're scaring them.
I can protect him.
I can protect him.
I can't convince him.
I can't convince him.
I was taking care of them.
I have to convince her to come.
Are you still mad at him?
Can we interview them?
I'm not angry at them.
If UFOs were to attack the earth, what would become of us?
Tom is the perfect man for the job.
What you said convinced him.
I'm not having lunch with her.
See you in hell!
Can't we fire her?
Can't we fire her?
Why don't you just fire them?
I want to thank her.
You've frightened him.
You've frightened him.
You've frightened him.
You've frightened him.
You've frightened him.
You've frightened him.
Tom isn't going to like this one bit.
I can't protect them.
I can't protect them.
I didn't mean to offend them.
I didn't mean to offend them.
I didn't mean to offend them.
I didn't mean to offend them.
Do you want to walk together?
The building is one hundred meters high.
I can't control them.
I can't control them.
We heard shooting.
I gave Tom my old bicycle.
Can I see Tom today?
I want you to go easy on Tom.
I want you to go easy on Tom.
Promise me you won't be late.
Promise me you won't be late.
Tom and I both agree.
You don't need to apologize, Tom.
You don't have to apologize.
They might not notice that Tom isn't here.
Tom's family has serious money problems.
What's your date of birth?
The European Games 2015 took place in Baku.
I wish my daughter would dress more modestly.
Give them the disk.
Give them the disk.
It's hard to surprise me.
I'm not angry at her.
We slowly approached them.
Try not to disturb us.
What steps should we take?
No one threatened him.
Stop scaring me.
Pray for them.
Pray for them.
I gave her my old bicycle.
How many men are guarding him?
A new difficulty has arisen.
I want to protect them.
I want to protect them.
I just fired them.
I just fired them.
I just fired them.
I just fired them.
I'll protect him.
Someone stole Tom's money.
I'll thank him.
I'm surprised you remember her.
I'm surprised you remember her.
I'm surprised you remember her.
I have to convince them to come.
I don't want to walk home.
Do you have a spoon I can stir the rice with?
How many cranes are there in this port?
Tom frowned slightly.
When ice melts, it becomes liquid.
I had the feeling that Tom was going to be late.
Hey, don't give up! You can do it!
I had lunch with them.
I've contacted them.
I've contacted them.
You frightened her.
You've frightened her.
You've frightened her.
You frightened her.
I look forward to meeting her.
I'll fire them.
I'll fire them.
Learning French takes time.
These gloves belong to me.
Thank her for me.
He mentioned her name for the first time.
What you said convinced me.
I asked my father to buy this toy.
I'm in the post office.
No one knows just how big the Universe is.
She waved her hand to us.
I heard the thunder, but did not see the lightning.
I heard the thunder, but did not see the lightning.
I need a sincere girlfriend.
I need a sincere girlfriend.
He jumped off the roof.
He ran outside naked.
Can you take my dad to the airport?
It's Tom's duty.
He went to the airport to see his friend off.
Tom's doctor told him that he should quit smoking.
May I switch off the light?
Tom has been doing a pretty good job of eluding the police, but eventually he'll get caught.
Tom has been through a lot.
I can't get a hold of Tom.
I guess Tom didn't want to bother you.
I guess Tom didn't want to bother you.
It really is quite late.
She's hard to please.
Drawing the Japanese flag is very easy.
He leaned towards me.
Tell them I'm not in my office today.
How did you manage to get Tom to do that?
They robbed the man of all his belongings.
I really want to go.
Despite the rain we went out.
There's not enough food.
I like hugging Tom.
Michael broke the dishes.
He knows Tom.
Give them a break.
Give them a break.
Tom has very strong arms.
They communicate with each other by mail.
It's time for a change.
Are you going to ask Tom or not?
Are you going to ask Tom or not?
Are you going to ask Tom or not?
Are you going to ask Tom or not?
Tom would care.
Will I see Tom later?
I may not have enough time.
I lost that bet.
I really need the money.
Tom certainly did an excellent job.
The difference was clear.
I couldn't take my eyes off Tom.
I couldn't take my eyes off Tom.
I imagine that Tom will eventually learn to deal with the way people treat him.
Tom could be out of town.
Tom will graduate from high school this spring.
Tom and his friends built a snow fort.
My car's in the garage.
This is Tom's locker.
Don't worry about what Tom thinks.
They took Tom away on a stretcher.
I often dream about you.
I often dream about you.
I don't know about you, but I agree with Tom.
I don't know about you, but I agree with Tom.
I don't know about you, but I agree with Tom.
I don't know about you, but I agree with Tom.
That's fair.
I want to be careful.
I want to be careful.
You'll get fired.
You'll get fired.
She came close to falling off the platform.
We're discussing that.
Tom wrote a very detailed description.
The square root of four is two.
Don't throw these documents in the rubbish!
I can't control him.
We have enough money to buy this CD.
Tom works hard.
Tom works very hard.
I envy her.
I envy her.
Promise you won't be mad at me.
Tom threw me an apple.
Everybody laughed except Tom.
How about a walk?
Tom began to sing.
Tom had no family.
We didn't break in.
We didn't break in.
I'm just being careful.
I'm just being careful.
Tom sold the guitar that his father gave him.
Tom sold the guitar that his father gave him.
Tom is waiting in your office.
Tom is waiting in your office.
Tom had business in the city.
Tom had business in the city.
Everyone but Tom looked happy.
A fuse has blown.
It's not too far to walk.
I know you're a friend of Tom's.
I know you're a friend of Tom's.
I just stayed quiet.
I just stayed quiet.
Tom has a beard just like his father, grandfathers and brothers do.
Tom doesn't have any freckles.
There was nothing really wrong with Tom.
Do you see patients on Saturdays?
Tom had the same problems.
I'm not leaving Tom here alone.
Can you pick up Tom?
There was a lot I didn't know about Tom.
There are many shades of gray.
She gives him the creeps.
Isn't it great?
I don't know a lot of jokes.
It was a nice break.
We really appreciate it.
I asked Tom what he'd do.
I asked Tom what he'd do.
You're supposed to meet Tom in front of his hotel in about an hour.
You're supposed to meet Tom in front of his hotel in about an hour.
Why were you talking to Tom?
Why were you talking to Tom?
Why were you talking to Tom?
Who won the contest?
You can't control me.
I insist on that.
Take off your mask.
Take off your mask.
Tom took off his shoes.
I simply don't love Tom.
We started singing.
I'm going to need a copy.
Skip the boring chapters.
I can barely control myself.
Just follow Tom.
Just follow Tom.
Two people were killed in a traffic accident.
Remember that you are mortal.
She was already in love with him.
We'll just be in Tom's way.
We sent Tom a copy.
I called my attorney.
I'm staying with Tom.
I called my attorney.
He's responsible for that.
I picked Tom up after work.
I picked Tom up after work.
You aren't really going to buy Tom's old tractor, are you?
You aren't really going to buy Tom's old tractor, are you?
Tom is a talented singer.
I'm sorry to bother you again.
We're aware of the challenges.
We're aware of the challenges.
It took a long time to take in what she was saying.
I just took a bath.
I'll make this brief.
We've got to escape.
We've got to escape.
It wasn't Tom who left the water running.
I'm surprised you weren't invited.
I'm surprised you weren't invited.
I'm surprised you weren't invited.
I'm surprised you weren't invited.
I really appreciate that.
Did you talk to Tom yesterday?
Did you talk to Tom yesterday?
Did you talk to Tom yesterday?
Tom had the same problem.
I didn't click the link.
When do you shop?
When do you shop?
I'm studying with Tom.
I didn't even finish high school.
I didn't even finish high school.
Tom said that he liked skiing.
I know the procedure.
Let's find out who killed Tom.
Tom says that he has the perfect marriage.
I brought a picture of Tom.
I brought a picture of Tom.
Tom has a pretty wife.
I can't stand the pain anymore.
Tom can take a break.
It wouldn't matter.
Do you know what the trouble is?
Do you know what the trouble is?
Please take this back to the office.
Please take this back to the office.
Tom and I have our differences.
Let's take a break for a second.
I wonder if Tom has another one.
I wonder if Tom has another one.
I wonder if Tom has another one.
Have we made any progress?
She helped her daughter get dressed.
I didn't even see Tom.
Would you recognize Tom?
Tom tried to get me to wear a kilt.
The worst is already over.
No one is listening to Tom.
Do we have anything else to eat?
I'm not at all surprised.
I'm not at all surprised.
The boy didn't have an appetite.
Cover up, we're going to leave.
It's snowing outside, cover up.
I miss him a lot.
I find Tom very easy to talk to.
I find Tom very easy to talk to.
Things have really changed.
I didn't really do it alone.
I didn't really do it alone.
I have other plans for Tom.
I have other plans for Tom.
Let's just go to my office.
Tom felt betrayed.
Don't thank me, thank Tom!
Lincoln was a good politician and a smart lawyer.
She felt an aversion to him.
You're smarter than Tom.
Tom lives in the country.
The thieves divided their booty.
Where is the Finnish embassy?
Eventually, Tom will realize that he needs help.
Tom has been executed.
It's really Tom.
Tom had a splendid idea.
Tom had a splendid idea.
Tom is proud of his achievement.
I've never been to a professional baseball game.
I've never been to a professional baseball game.
The room is in immaculate order.
You didn't come into the office yesterday and I want to know why.
It could be dangerous to do what Tom is asking us to do.
Tom tried to remember the last time he had visited an art museum.
I don't have enough money to pay for the operation that I need.
Tom is having trouble coping with the fact that his son committed suicide.
The most important thing to do now is for us to remain calm.
I guess I was too busy to notice that Tom was having problems.
We heard that Tom had committed suicide, but we didn't really believe it.
Remember to turn off the lights.
We've seen aliens.
Tom's last name is hard to pronounce.
I gave Tom explicit instructions.
I didn't mean Tom.
Tom's office is on Park Street.
My palms were sweaty.
I'm surprised you're still here.
I'm surprised you're still here.
I'm surprised you're still here.
I'm surprised you're still here.
Did somebody mention my name?
John hopes to be independent of his parents.
Bring Tom over.
Bring Tom over.
Give Tom any help you can.
Give Tom any help you can.
When I was a child, my mother made me eat green vegetables every day.
When I was a child, my mother made me eat green vegetables every day.
We were up front.
He took a hot bath and turned on the TV.
Tom mentioned your name, too.
What a headache!
What a headache!
She left home with everything she owned.
What's wrong? "My computer just crashed."
I'm the last one who talked to Tom.
I'm the last one who talked to Tom.
I'm the last one who talked to Tom.
Who's your favorite philosopher?
Everybody loves Tom, right?
Materials will be provided.
That's what worries me.
He is often absent from school.
What's the prognosis?
We're half right.
Tom had to work late.
It would be pointless.
I didn't know Tom had a dog.
I didn't know Tom had a dog.
It's very uncomfortable.
Tom didn't have any other questions.
I swear I just saw Sasquatch!
Tom left out no details.
Tom wrote a very detailed report.
Tom provided no further details.
Tom didn't have further details.
The details really don't matter.
The details really don't matter.
Tom didn't have further details.
Tom was the only one who knew how to start a fire without matches.
Now's the time to decide if you want to go with us or not.
They put a price on his head.
I'm not too surprised.
I don't have time for this nonsense.
Tom doesn't like girls who wear high heels.
Tom didn't want any of his friends to know that he was a drug dealer.
Tom doesn't have many clothes. That's why you always see him wearing the same thing.
I know you didn't want Tom to wear your clothes, but his were all wet.
I'm beginning to believe that we'll never be able to convince Tom that he's wrong.
The house looked good; moreover, the price was right.
Tom earns $300,000 a year.
This is the best guitar in the store.
You had your chance and you blew it.
Air is a mixture of various gases.
Which skirt would you choose?
I'd like to wake Tom up myself.
If I were to study French, I'd prefer to study with a native French speaker.
What do you think is the best way to get to Tom's house from here?
My mother asked me not to feed the dog until after we had all eaten.
Would you mind putting a link on your web page to our company's web site?
In 1955, the cancer returned and she died in 1956 at the age of 42.
Think of how much worse it could have been if Tom had not been there.
Everyone rushed over to the other side of the ship to see what was happening.
Do you have a moment to talk about Jesus?
The chance of rain is low.
Classical music is not my cup of tea.
Tom's father was Jewish.
I usually dream in French unless I'm dreaming about talking to one of my English-speaking friends.
There was no doubt in my mind that Tom was the one who stole my motorcycle.
I used to hang out with Tom a lot, but these days he's not around much.
Tom wants to know what to do with all the stuff you left in his garage.
No matter how many people tell him he made a mistake, Tom still insists he's right.
Did you iron all the shirts?
Did you iron all the shirts?
He speaks without an accent.
She may have missed the train.
Tom got bored after fifteen minutes.
Tom began working.
Tom bought a bag of apples and he ate a third of them in one day.
I imagine that Tom will eventually run out of money and have to go back home.
I'd like to buy the car you're selling, but I don't have enough money right now.
Is this new model available on the market?
Tom speaks several languages fluently, but for his job, he only translates into his native language.
I had to wait for Tom's reply for a long time, but it was worth it.
I see you have your guitar with you. Are you planning on playing something for us?
From the direction that he was going in, I would say he was headed to town.
I taught Tom how to swim.
I taught Tom how to swim.
I taught Tom how to swim.
I taught Tom how to swim.
Tom was expelled from school.
Tom has no prison record.
The coaches shook hands after the game.
We're not leaving without Tom.
Tom tried to hide his fear.
The police consider Tom a suspect.
I want to lose ten pounds.
Most wool comes from sheep.
There's one thing I forgot to mention.
I wouldn't want to keep Tom waiting.
I wouldn't want to keep Tom waiting.
Did you know Tom very well?
Did you know Tom very well?
Stay out of Tom's way.
Let's have a bake sale.
Did you know Tom very well?
I wouldn't want to keep Tom waiting.
They have lost 10 games in a row since their winning streak ended.
Tom is OK, isn't he?
Tom carefully took off his mask.
Tom carefully took off his mask.
It doesn't matter why.
Tom has been thinking.
I'm going to kill myself.
I'm going to kill myself.
How can I make Tom stop?
How can I make Tom stop?
Tom was later freed.
You're a weird kid.
She loves Tom, not me.
There was no doubt in my mind that Tom knew the answer.
There was no doubt in my mind that Tom would make the right decision.
I talk to Tom all the time.
Dan has a copy of the police report.
Do you plan to spend your summer vacation with Tom?
The fortress was in the enemy's hands.
I thought we'd surprise you.
I thought we'd surprise you.
I thought we'd surprise you.
I thought we'd surprise you.
Tom has a tiny dick.
Wine made here is very famous.
You should do that by yourself.
You should do that by yourself.
Well, let's have lunch.
I dated Tom for three years.
I dated Tom for three years.
I'd go visit Tom in the hospital if I were you.
I've always hated Tom.
He told me that he liked my accent.
The prince bowed down to Snow White.
That didn't surprise me, either.
Money soon goes.
I see him often.
She is very popular among the students.
You must make an effort.
Perhaps I am the worst singer in the universe!
Is Tom mad at us?
Tom will eventually find out the truth.
I can't come with Tom.
Maybe Tom has other plans.
Tom took off his pants and carefully hung them over the back of a chair.
It all depends on Tom.
I didn't even recognize Tom.
I didn't even recognize Tom.
I just don't understand Tom.
Tom didn't even mention it.
Why didn't Tom tell us that he was going to be late?
We really do need Tom's help.
Do you know why Tom isn't here?
Do you know why Tom isn't here?
Do you still miss Tom?
Do you miss your kids?
Do you miss your kids?
Do you miss your kids?
Do you miss your kids?
We didn't give up.
Tom and I didn't discuss that.
Tom passed away on October 20th.
Tom died of liver cancer.
Tom's wife died in childbirth.
Let's delay this decision until tomorrow.
I realize the effort you have put into this project and I really appreciate it.
I've been told that sitting for hours working on my computer is bad for my back.
Mozart wrote brilliant, complex musical compositions as easily as you or I would write a letter.
I'd think that the last thing you'd want to do right now is talk to Tom.
I want to find out if Tom is going to go out and eat with us.
Tom insists I come alone.
I have kidney trouble.
It just doesn't work.
Someone dropped this.
Why is that your nickname?
Why don't you tell me what's really bothering you?
Why don't you tell me what's really bothering you?
Why don't you tell me what's really bothering you?
Tom is naive.
Why don't you tell me what's really bothering you?
I was being polite.
I don't feel like dealing with Tom right now.
We spent our holiday on a beach in Hawaii.
Tom is a salesman, not a doctor.
I still haven't found Tom.
I haven't found Tom yet.
Tom loves skiing.
Is this your notebook?
I'll find Tom myself.
I'll find Tom myself.
It is interesting for me to read my old diary.
You're energetic.
Tom switched on the microphone.
That would be suicidal.
You're so diligent.
Tom was naive.
I asked Tom not to interfere.
I asked Tom not to interfere.
It rained nonstop.
I have just had one of the worst days of my life.
The animal in the top left-hand corner is meant to be a dragon.
It's better to stay silent than make a mistake.
He broke my nose!
You dropped something.
Tom divided the pie into three equal parts.
Tom suppressed a smile.
Tom and I often swim together.
Tom and I often swim together.
We can't lie to Tom.
We don't know what happened to Tom.
Tom was sent to prison.
I really hate Tom.
You can't stop Tom.
Tom is skating.
We'll convince them.
We'll convince them.
Tom lives in a mansion.
I'm diligent.
Tom can't handle this job on his own.
I'm still angry.
Tom knows a boy who can ride a unicycle.
Tom knows a boy who can ride a unicycle.
I haven't seen Tom in weeks.
I haven't seen Tom in weeks.
I don't have time for a walk.
I finally gave up.
Where was Tom hiding?
I made up my mind to do the work no matter how hard it might be.
I had to cancel that order because we didn't have enough money to pay for it.
Tom gave a famous singer ten thousand dollars to come to the restaurant to sing "Happy Birthday."
I know you well enough to know that you didn't really want to go out with Tom.
Tom was unaware of some errors he had made when translating an important document for his boss.
Tom tasted the popcorn and decided it wasn't salty enough, so he sprinkled on some more salt.
Tom doesn't have a girlfriend.
I'm not used to this heat.
I seldom walk to work.
Do you know who broke this window?
I change my underwear every day.
I insist that we do this now.
Tom doesn't have enough money to buy a car.
They're my allies.
You're so perfect.
I followed Tom into the living room.
Did you have a lawyer?
Did you have a lawyer?
Why are you defending Tom?
Is the pain unbearable?
They released Tom.
Skip it.
They don't control me.
Go back to the office.
Go back to the office.
Could you take me home?
The garage was empty.
I see Tom pretty often.
I don't think Tom has a girlfriend.
I'm running a little behind schedule.
Look at how white Tom's teeth are.
Tom looks suspicious.
I think that's what happened to Tom.
We have a doghouse in our backyard.
I've been looking all over for Tom.
Tom didn't seem inclined to elaborate and I didn't really want to know all the details anyway.
You say you want to visit Tom? Why in the world would you want to do that?
I can't tell you how to do that. You have to figure it out on your own.
Tom doesn't think there is any advantage of doing it the way you suggest we do it.
Did you break any laws?
Don't get killed.
I knew I'd find you with Tom.
I knew I'd find you with Tom.
I knew I'd find you with Tom.
I knew I'd find you with Tom.
I'm convinced Tom killed himself.
I'm convinced Tom killed himself.
I should start dinner.
I should start dinner.
Tom says he wants to walk home.
I'll talk with Tom tonight.
Do you think Tom should be fired?
I'll come again. "Yeah, I look forward to it."
Tom reached for the notepaper.
She frowned.
I can't find Tom. "Try ringing him."
Our kid can't even crawl yet.
Tom rides a motorcycle to work.
Don't listen to her! I promise you; she's just full of hot air.
Is this animal holy?
I didn't make those answers up.
A spectre is haunting Europe—the spectre of communism.
You were Tom's only friend.
You were Tom's only friend.
Tom and I rarely agree on anything.
There is a hole in Jon's sock.
There is a hole in Jon's sock.
Hugs!
My birthday is on the twentieth of July.
I think Tom should be fired.
I'm old enough to be her father.
Our president is not as popular now, as he was before.
The dancer dances a dance.
There's not enough on-campus housing for students.
This carbon fiber bicycle is incredibly lightweight.
Tom waved.
Tom lost the shopping list his mother had given him and just bought things he wanted to eat.
I don't have a lot of work, but it's enough to keep me in the office this week.
I haven't seen anyone that enjoyed a better life than his, even though his living conditions were terrible.
I think we should all be worried a little bit about the way Tom has been acting lately.
The more time I spend doing this, the less time I have to do things I enjoy doing.
I feel the desire to renew my ties with my native country.
I think I like eating white rice better than brown rice.
He always wears his school tie.
You’ve had eleven bottles of beer!
Teeth whitening is expensive.
Tom has a couple of interesting suggestions.
What are you doing in my office?
I can see which way the wind's blowing.
I can see which way the wind's blowing.
Do you think he is leading a double life?
The waiter spit in the soup.
Do you want to drive the tractor?
This sounds like the plot of a Hollywood movie.
Tom says he was fired.
I've just finished watching episode three.
Tom is afraid he'll get fired.
I was bad at English.
Twitter is one of the most popular social media platforms in America.
The train was late, but I still arrived to work on time.
Tom's house is at least three times larger than mine.
I can't do this work alone.
Hunger urged him to steal.
It's just a headache.
Do you want to work with Tom?
Does Tom have big feet?
Can you fill out this form?
You were dropped on head as a child.
Tom isn't talented.
Tom has three cars.
There have been a lot of complaints from students about the amount of homework that Mr. Jackson gives.
I've figured out that the only way I can do this is to get Tom to help me.
If we don't receive Tom's reply within the next three days, I think we should write him again.
I had to attend a meeting so I couldn't make it in time to pick Tom up after school.
Tom walked over to the woman with a drink in her hand and asked her what her name was.
That's not a bad question.
Tom didn't have time to read the report.
He was a professor at Cambridge University.
The hotel I stayed in was not too far from Tom's house.
This is the most beautiful beach in the whole world.
Where's Tom's family now?
He has a walk every morning.
My name is Tom, too.
You can't yell at Tom.
Why didn't you say goodbye?
I know you're worried about Tom.
The reason soon became obvious.
I'm happy for Tom.
I'm happy for Tom.
I'd like to avoid this problem in the future.
Tom had a week to finish this, but he didn't finish it.
Our bad luck was temporary.
We didn't start the fire.
You're unbelievably stupid.
I spent the day with Tom.
We can't let them kill Tom.
Go to the garage.
He founded the company.
Tom is wearing a black hat.
Resources are limited.
We have to surrender.
Nobody talks about Tom.
Everyone left except Tom.
Maybe I need a lawyer.
I have an urgent message for Tom.
Tom tried to resist.
I should've read the instructions.
Look, I'm not an expert.
I can't remember the last time I saw Tom so happy.
I can't remember the last time I saw Tom so happy.
Tom brushes his teeth at least three times a day.
Tom brushes his teeth at least three times a day.
Tom says that he wasn't the one who broke the window.
Tom didn't break his promise.
Tom didn't break his promise.
She thanked him for his kindness.
Tom isn't much of a dancer.
I'm afraid it's not true.
The stars twinkled.
Tom's eyes twinkled.
Tom's eyes twinkle with amusement.
Planets are easy to identify because they don't twinkle like stars do.
My university has a dorm.
Tom is used to talking to foreigners.
The water from this fountain is clear.
Tom forgot to bring his textbook to class.
The earth orbits the sun once a year.
If my brother hadn't saved me, I would've drowned.
If my brother hadn't helped me, I would've drowned.
Who killed the spy?
You'll probably be swamped with responses.
If my brother hadn't helped me, I would've drowned.
This is the bicycle I want.
God, give us patience!
Where's your magic wand?
Tom graduated.
Tom is old enough to be my grandfather.
Tom jumped into water without taking off his clothes.
Tom poured milk into a bowl for his cat.
You should've listened to Tom.
You should've listened to Tom.
Tom comes to visit us every now and then.
I wasn't the only one who was late.
I wasn't the only one who was late.
I wasn't the only one who was late.
I wasn't the only one who was late.
Tom is never here in the morning.
His wife teaches me Italian.
I want Tom's money.
Tom has decided to keep a diary this year.
These shoes are mine.
You should just talk to Tom.
My shirt is orange.
These toys are very popular.
Tom became a dancer even though his parents didn't want him to.
I'm sure that Tom didn't mean to hurt you.
It may seem like just a little thing to you, but Tom is really worried about the whole thing.
People say that I dream every night, but if I do, I can't ever remember any of my dreams.
After Tom had eaten all the popcorn in the bowl, he went back into the kitchen to pop some more.
I don't know Tom very well.
Tom never uses paper towels.
I appreciate your offer.
Tom is extremely naive.
The fight lasted three seconds.
I'm that kind of girls who get on with boys better.
I like to cook traditional dishes.
Tomorrow night, I am going to Narita airport.
He has guts.
I'm just glad she wasn't hurt.
I'm just glad he wasn't hurt.
The court's decision is final.
Animals can sense fear.
I won't be able to attend the conference.
Do you want a puppy?
Do you want a puppy?
Hot outside?
I think we'll get there before noon.
Valentine's Day is celebrated in February.
Tom has a daughter about your age.
Hot outside?
It may seem like Tom has forgotten all about the matter, but deep down inside, he's still torn up about it.
When you speak of a pay-raise before recognition, I am inclined to think you are putting the cart before the horse.
In no country other than England, it has been said, can one experience four seasons in the course of a single day.
The crowd may be on the side of Luciano, but the champ has got the skill to win and that's what matters.
For what you have written, your reaction is not justified in any manner, and I imagine it can make your life impossible.
Tom carried the chairs to the next room.
A whole car fits into the blind spot.
Honor your ancestors.
There's a book lying open on the desk.
I use a big pot to cook soup.
The young girl hugged Tom.
Tom is a singer.
Tom showed me his collection of stamps.
The whole place got quiet.
Tom and I went to the same school.
Use the front door.
Tom didn't even say good-bye.
This book could be useful to you.
This book could be useful to you.
Tom fell into the water and drowned.
Tom is proud of his stamp collection.
I've got a daughter Tom's age.
Tom is very good at sports, but not very good at school.
The Chinese New Year is also known as the Spring festival or Lunar New Year.
Tom earns three times as much as me.
Tom doesn't have any pets.
What time do you wake up?
Tom and I became good friends.
They're surprised.
I'm calling from Tom's house.
You're the expert, Tom.
I spent a lot of time with Tom.
Tom thought he had a chance to survive.
Tom has no perspective.
I suppose we could ask Tom.
Where's my bike?
I saw the fear in Tom's eyes.
You don't have to eat with Tom, but I wish you would.
I just happened to be there at the same time as Tom.
Tom went to a nearby convenience store to buy something to eat.
The doctor told Tom not to take a bath for a week.
My French hasn't gotten any better since the last time we met.
I know you're not planning on staying here for a long time.
I had to stay behind so I could talk to Tom privately.
Tom got a decent grade on the test he took last week.
Yesterday was the first time I had spoken to Tom in French.
You don't have to speak to Tom if you don't want to.
We're not going to give up.
Tom failed.
Tom filled both glasses with wine.
Tom filled both glasses with wine.
Tom dozed.
Tom is going to drive you to the airport.
They cheat.
Tom is going to drive you to the airport.
They canceled.
Take over.
Take over.
Stay still.
Stay still.
Would you like a glass of red wine?
I had my watch stolen yesterday.
He disguised his feelings.
Tom was the last one to cross the finish line.
Tom gave his seat to the old man.
I'm glad Tom isn't here.
I wonder what Tom is going to do with his old motorcycle.
Tom wouldn't hurt anybody.
It is worthwhile visiting the museum.
Students here get their textbooks for free.
Please turn off the television.
Tom is afraid to go outside.
Tom will never be forgiven.
They never give up.
I'm going to meet Tom.
I'm going to meet Tom.
My uncle works in this office.
Here's a picture of Tom.
I don't think my life is boring.
Tom doesn't like being pushed.
We're all having lunch.
Tom almost always walks to work.
My sister is a nurse.
That guy drives me crazy.
Tom has powerful arms.
This car is easy to drive.
The temperature is below zero today.
I'm looking forward to my birthday.
Tom couldn't hide his pain.
You can visit me tomorrow.
I'm Tom's oldest son.
I saw Tom at the restaurant.
I saw Tom at the restaurant.
I understand the risks.
I spoke with Tom's assistant.
I spoke with Tom's assistant.
Who cares about that?
I added your name to the list.
I added your name to the list.
I added your name to the list.
I added your name to the list.
I added his name to the list.
I added his name to the list.
Was Tom angry?
Was Tom angry?
Tom opened the fridge and took out the milk.
I'm sure I can find Tom.
I'm sure I can find Tom.
How many pills did you take?
How many pills did you take?
How many pills did you take?
I'm just thinking.
I take a bath every morning.
Thank God I survived.
You have perfect eyesight.
We've got to rescue Tom.
I often go out for a short walk just after lunch.
They burned.
It's going to take me a while to get this done.
We'll be ready by the time you get here.
Tom has three adult children.
Plants need sunlight to grow.
2015 was the International Year of Soil and also the International Year of Light.
You've never talked much about Tom.
You've never talked much about Tom.
Tom left without warning.
I keep my diary on the table by my bed.
Get rid of such stupid ideas!
I got off the bus at the end of the line.
Recently, I don't have much appetite.
My mother is a high school teacher.
Were you born in the 20th century or in the 21st?
I've got to agree with Tom here.
Tom had a crisis of faith.
Our teacher gives out a lot of homework.
As soon as I can get the chance, I'll send you some money.
I guess I was too busy to notice that Tom was having problems.
It could be dangerous to do what Tom is asking us to do.
Tom's schedule is insane.
What he told us the other day simply doesn't make sense, does it?
She went to the airport to see him off.
I missed you.
This is the very place I have long wanted to visit.
You have to stop Tom.
You have to stop Tom.
You have to stop Tom.
I've been taking lessons from Tom.
I've been taking lessons from Tom.
I've been taking lessons from Tom.
Are you telling me to kill Tom?
It's cold outside, so he came inside the room.
Tom has already achieved many of his goals.
Tom has the information we need.
Are you writing this down?
Tom turned the tap on.
I want everyone in my office in 20 minutes.
It's much too dangerous here.
I can't simply give up.
You'll have to talk to Tom.
Tom has black hair.
Tom had a tough week.
How about a kiss?
We spent the day at the beach.
I have a red bicycle.
I have clearly demonstrated that you've lost the argument.
Tom is out of the office.
Tom works at a nearby restaurant.
Tell her I miss her.
Tell her I miss her.
It's still too cold to go to the beach.
I can't hug Tom if he doesn't want to be hugged.
Tom sat at his desk doing paperwork.
Tom has been kicked off the team.
May I take a bath?
I found this in our mailbox.
I found this in our mailbox.
Did you talk to Tom about it?
The next question is for Tom.
How did you convince them?
Will you have a talk with Tom?
Tom and I have nothing to hide.
Leave Tom.
Leave Tom.
I can't remember the last time I saw Tom.
I can't remember the last time I saw Tom.
Tom managed to sell his car for a lot of money.
You're a very good dancer.
Ask Tom why he needs the rope.
This place is boring.
That doesn't worry me at all.
That doesn't worry me at all.
Tom is too noisy.
The feeling was mutual.
I was bored to death.
I know it means a lot to Tom.
Where can I buy envelopes?
Dress warmly.
Tom doesn't have as much free time as I do.
Are you older than Tom?
Did you plan to eat all of that yourself?
It's hard for me to understand Italian when it is spoken quickly.
Tom is in love.
It's Tom's.
I wanted to surprise you.
I wanted to surprise you.
I'm kind of uncomfortable.
I'm kind of uncomfortable.
We'd like to talk to Tom.
Tom has plans.
Tom is a terrible dancer.
Tom and I are here ot help.
If there's some way to enjoy studying, could you teach me how?
They aim to stir unease in societies.
Tom lost most of his belongings in the fire.
Tom is on the ship's deck.
Tom and I are nonsmokers.
He recounted the accident to me as if he had seen it with his own eyes.
Tom won't be fired.
As I recall, Tom's house is a little farther in from the main road.
I will drink for you in spirit.
Linux is a type of computer operating system.
Linux is a type of computer operating system.
Tom doesn't look too convinced.
My teacher told me to read as much as I could.
I was trying to be supportive.
I was trying to be supportive.
Could you hold on a minute?
Could you hold on a minute?
Tom fired first.
She likes to smoke tobacco.
It's my birthday today. I'm already eighteen.
I've had no problems with Tom.
They eat healthy foods.
There were armed guards everywhere.
Can you send that by email?
Tom has three adult sons.
The list keeps growing.
The world sometimes seems meaningless.
The most important thing is not to give up.
Negotiations are still going on.
What are you trying to hide from me?
What are you trying to hide from me?
You shouldn't have talked to Tom.
You shouldn't have talked to Tom.
You shouldn't have talked to Tom.
You shouldn't have talked to Tom.
You shouldn't have talked to Tom.
You shouldn't have talked to Tom.
I saw Tom's pictures.
I saw Tom's pictures.
Tom has red hair.
Did you understand Tom?
Did you understand Tom?
Did you understand Tom?
Tom and I were both wrong.
I'd better go with Tom.
Congratulations to all!
Tom has a good voice.
It's dangerous to play around the fire.
Tom mentioned that several times.
Tom unzipped his coat.
Nobody contacted me.
They all knew Tom.
Tom is easy to please.
What does Tom's new car look like?
Who's the new head coach?
There's plenty of time.
Tom and I'll do our best.
Tom always prays before eating.
Tom punished his son for lying.
What're you doing with Tom's stuff?
Tom has no real friends.
You shot me.
Tom cared for his sick father.
Tom is still mad.
Is there a hotel around here?
I'm on Tom's list.
I'm on Tom's list.
I'm heading downtown.
Tom got drunk and drowned while taking a bath.
May I turn off the light?
Speak into the microphone.
Speak into the microphone.
We'll contact you.
Tom misses his parents.
Tom misses his family.
I got the tickets for free.
Did you warn Tom?
Did you warn Tom?
Did you warn Tom?
What are you accusing me of?
What are you accusing me of?
Tom has decided not to resign.
Is Tom doing OK?
I'm sorry if I frightened you.
I'm sorry if I frightened you.
I've sent Tom home.
I sent Tom home.
Tom has a very nice car.
Tom remained outside.
Tom missed the train.
Tom has nice skin.
Go back to your office.
We've got one hour to find Tom.
I convinced Tom to go with us.
I convinced Tom to go with us.
Who attacked you?
I won't forget Tom.
The bus was hot and crowded.
We can't wait for Tom.
Can you replace Tom?
I'm not much of an athlete.
I'm not much of an athlete.
Tom's father is a police officer.
The princess lives in a large castle.
Tom was too proud to accept any help.
No matter what you say, I won't give up.
Tom likes talking about politics and philosophy.
Tom scares everybody.
Why are men never happy? Because they always want the impossible.
The British Library is one of the world's largest libraries.
And Jesus said: "Father, forgive them, for they know not what they do."
Home prices have skyrocketed in the last ten years.
What's the moral of the story?
Get to work. These sandbags won't fill themselves.
The soldiers filled the sandbags with sand.
What led to the fall of the Roman Empire?
How can we get past this crisis?
I can't distinguish between them.
Put on your hiking shoes and don't waste time.
I prefer to walk rather than stay here waiting for the bus.
It was eight meters long.
It was eight meters long.
Unfortunately, it's a hoax.
This annoys me very much.
Tom was diagnosed with ADHD.
These trousers need pressing.
It was hot and dry.
What became of Tom?
How do we find Tom?
If you keep on drinking like that, you'll be drunk very soon.
Where is the entrance to the dragon's cave?
The plan has failed.
Tom put the diary in the drawer.
A car went by.
I've come to say goodbye.
She buried a dog.
Experts have offered three possible explanations.
I saw Tom yesterday in a restaurant. He was talking to a girl.
Tom said that he didn't want to be disturbed.
She lounged by the pool.
The bomb didn't detonate.
I'm finishing my homework.
Tom isn't mad at you.
We knew Tom wouldn't be late.
Tom is very unlikely to be late.
They were late for dinner.
Tom has high moral standards.
If the universe is a cosmic egg, who laid it?
Were you in love with Tom?
Please don't leave me with Tom.
Let me have a word with Tom.
Tom was diagnosed with tuberculosis in 2013.
He's leaning on a cane.
Cleopatra was very smart. She spoke at least nine languages.
I'd like you to postpone your trip.
I'd like you to postpone your trip.
He pushed his nose against the window.
She pressed her nose against the glass.
Tom visited the National Museum when he was in Amsterdam.
Tom hates his tiny bedroom.
Well, let's get to work.
I'm sorry for breaking my promise.
I'm sorry for breaking my promise.
Don't be condescending.
Twice I have tried to kill myself.
The cat caught me by surprise!
Do as I say, and no one will get hurt.
She missed her flight.
He's love struck.
She's eating fruit.
Tom and I are very close friends.
We went to the beach and swam all day.
Tom had a couple of suggestions.
I'm not convinced yet.
I don't know much about Tom's personal life.
The nurse hit a blood vessel.
I hope no one was injured.
I hope Tom loses.
My cat got stuck up a tree.
The girls were left behind.
They were a bit embarrassed.
She was a bit embarrassed.
I was a bit embarrassed.
I'm as surprised as you are.
Enjoy your stay.
Tom doesn't want to be disturbed.
I'm retired.
Okay, now I've been completely honest with you. "Honest, my ass! I don't believe a single word you say."
I'm sure Tom's name is on the list.
Tom has no will power.
I suspect Tom is a spy.
Don't be a brute.
I worked with Tom.
I wanted to spend more time with Tom.
The fish fought hard.
Mom, I dropped my toy. Can you get it for me?
When you cause problems with the wrong people, those problems will come pay you back, or come back to haunt you.
Tom doesn't need to be told more than once to do something.
We're hoping that's not true.
Tom and I aren't friends. We're just coworkers.
Is it true that Tom committed suicide?
I can't share that information with you.
I can't share that information with you.
Is it true that Tom committed suicide?
Is it true that Tom committed suicide?
Isn't that dangerous?
Where did you have lunch? "At a restaurant."
Where did you have lunch? "At a restaurant."
Tom's in love with John's ex-wife.
Tom doesn't want to miss his flight.
Tom switched the lamp off.
He is of royal blood.
Tom is sure to be fired.
We know Tom.
Some people started throwing rocks.
I don't want to see Tom now.
I know Tom misses you.
I'm still a little mad at you.
Tom sent me here to protect you.
Tom was only trying to protect you.
Tom was only trying to protect you.
Tom was only trying to protect you.
I'll do everything I can to protect you.
You recognize her, don't you?
You recognize him, don't you?
You recognize him, don't you?
How was your trip?
Tom stopped taking his pills.
They eat a lot of rice in Japan.
Tom and I seldom eat together.
Tom and I are just getting ready to eat. Would you like to join us?
Tom eats lunch at this restaurant quite often.
Are you older than Tom?
How long is the Nile River?
You should eat.
You should eat.
Tom is playing with his wooden toys.
It was Tom that broke the window yesterday.
Tom isn't a teenager anymore.
I don't have the ball.
Tom and his grandmother went to the bookstore.
Many people are older, but not wiser.
I miss the army.
Tom isn't breaking the law.
We need Tom's money.
Even a black hen lays white eggs.
He gripped my hand.
Tom's hands were shaking and his face was red.
What do the prisoners eat?
We're not friends, we're partners.
The majority of the peasants living in this godforsaken village cannot read nor write.
Tom can type very fast.
Please be very careful.
Tom had two choices.
I taught Tom everything he knows.
How many daughters does Tom have?
Pilots communicate with airport services by radio.
We're wasting valuable time here.
I want to know about Tom's new job.
What kind of plant is it?
Tom tried to hide his anxiety.
Tom was a little surprised.
I didn't give you permission to leave.
This is a tragedy.
I didn't make those answers up.
The waiter brought me my drink.
I like to make bread from scratch.
I've got to make funeral arrangements.
Tom's not home.
Give me back the TV remote.
Give me back the TV remote.
Give me back the TV remote.
Give me back the TV remote.
Give me back the TV remote.
Give me back the TV remote.
Give me back the TV remote.
How are you? Did you have a good trip?
How are you? Did you have a good trip?
I paid for Tom.
I paid for Tom.
At this very moment, you're reading and translating this.
How can you justify your behavior?
In my country the customs are different.
I'm not so sure about Tom.
I was as surprised as Tom was.
Tom is very proud of himself.
Tom owns a restaurant on Park Street.
I should've introduced myself.
I should've introduced myself.
I should have introduced myself.
Did you ask the waiter for the bill?
Do you want me to stay with Tom?
Do you want me to stay with Tom?
Do you want me to stay with Tom?
Do you want me to stay with Tom?
That's relatively easy to do.
Tom fell through the ice.
Hunting season is over.
Tom said nobody was hurt.
No one else was hurt.
Tom is probably still hiding.
There was a financial crisis in 2009.
You can't threaten me.
Tom's name is on the list.
Throw me the ball.
Throw the ball to me.
Throw the ball to me.
Maybe I'm going through a midlife crisis.
Why don't you leave Tom?
Why don't you leave Tom?
I appreciate your feelings.
Would I kid you?
Would I kid you?
Tom's wife died three years ago.
I'm not rich enough.
I'm not speaking to Tom.
Did you invite Tom to dinner without telling me?
Did you invite Tom to dinner without telling me?
She devoted her entire life to the study of physics.
It might surprise you.
Tom is always grumbling.
He painted a dog.
Put some ice on your leg.
Tom has three dogs.
Even Tom wasn't convinced.
I'm not at all worried.
I'm not mad at anybody.
Science has many branches.
Put some ice on your left leg.
Hello, ladies.
It rang loudly.
It rang loudly.
It rang loudly.
Spitting is prohibited.
Spitting is prohibited.
Tom is a very sincere person.
The nurse is dressed in white.
Switch it off.
Turn this off.
Switch it off.
Switch it off.
Switch it off.
He squeezed her leg.
They could barely make ends meet.
I think it's time to take a break.
Lee Sedol was defeated by Google DeepMind's computer program, Alpha Go.
I want to hear Tom's voice.
Tom can't stand being interrupted.
He threw the ball.
Tom's new secretary can type very fast.
Becky is by far the best nurse in the whole hospital.
Do you think I've put on weight?
I know Tom quite well.
I know Tom quite well.
Who broke the bottle?
The population of the world increases at a rate of two percent a year.
It's too noisy here for me.
It scared me to death.
It scared me to death.
It scared me to death.
It scared me to death.
He never translates my sentences.
It was my fault that they came late.
It was my fault that they came late.
Which fruit is red?
I'm in love with you.
I want to buy her flowers or candy.
I want to buy her flowers or candy.
Sheep give us wool.
Sheep provide us with wool.
If it weren't for the sun, life would be impossible.
If it weren't for the sun, life would be impossible.
If it weren't for the sun, life would be impossible.
If it weren't for the sun, life would be impossible.
I missed you guys so much!
I missed you guys so much!
Ana will not come to our party.
My mother is a teacher, too.
People don't usually tell jokes at funerals.
I'm trying to find the person who owns this guitar.
Where does this trail lead?
I didn't send an email to anyone today.
I'd like to go back to the office.
They are having lunch in the garden.
The scientist insisted on proceeding with the research.
Tom and I will wait for you.
Tom and I will wait for you.
Don't read what's in the envelope. Just give it to Tom.
He bit off more than he could chew.
She has long braids.
He joined the infantry.
If there's anything urgent, you can get in touch with me.
They stayed at a small, but luxurious boutique hotel in the heart of Berlin.
She lowered her gaze.
She prefers baths rather than showers.
These monks live inside the monastery.
You're powerless.
The tsar was the ruler of Russia.
He's a good-looking guy.
How do you turn off this light?
She's a good-looking girl.
She stole my candy.
I'll take a glass of champagne.
I thanked her for her help.
I thanked him for his help.
I got a weird email.
She tried to hide her tears.
She's young and talented.
She's young and talented.
He's young and talented.
He's young and talented.
He's a skater.
She's a skater.
I got a weird email.
You have to eat.
I want to make Tom happy.
My girlfriend lied to me.
Will you excuse us for a moment?
Will you excuse me for a moment?
I would like 500 grams of meat please.
That's completely ridiculous.
I hope you enjoyed the long weekend.
Tom doesn't have a webpage.
That's just a guess.
Where is the Italian embassy?
For how long has your head been hurting?
Do you live in this dorm?
Tom wasn't angry.
Tom put the kettle on the stove.
Their daughter is a nurse.
Her daughter is a nurse.
Her daughter is a nurse.
His daughter is a nurse.
His daughter is a nurse.
She participates in many school activities.
St. Benedict established his first monastery on top of Monte Cassino.
What do you find attractive about her?
What do you find attractive about him?
I think she's too shy to talk to you.
I think he's too shy to talk to you.
She's planting flowers in the garden.
This plant doesn't need a lot of light.
February is the only month in the year where there are less than thirty days.
This plant is native to Canada.
The plants need to be watered.
Plants require CO2 to grow.
He shares a room with his brother.
It was a mistake to break up with you.
No one likes you. "It's not true!"
I don't care. I hate her.
He was eager to tie the knot.
It sounds impossible, but it's true.
He held her in his arms all night long.
Give me a couple minutes to get dressed.
Who's the person with Tom?
They broke up on Valentine's Day.
We broke up on Valentine's Day.
She didn't even say thanks.
The mere sight of blood makes him faint.
He said his name was Tom.
My mom says I'm pretty.
I bought this for my girlfriend.
I bought this for my girlfriend.
I bought this for my girlfriend.
Have you talked to Tom recently?
Have you talked to Tom recently?
Have you talked to Tom recently?
Who was that girl you were with at the beach today?
The charges were false.
Tom will make it.
The box has holes in it.
The box has holes in it.
The box has holes in it.
I've got to get Tom to the hospital.
I like to think of Tom as the brother I never had.
A standard 355 ml can of cola contains 39 grams of sugar.
The smell is atrocious.
She always leaves her dirty dishes in the sink.
She told him that she had been in love with him.
Plants grow towards sunlight.
Plants grow towards the sun.
She's kind of shy.
He's kind of shy.
That goes against my beliefs.
I'm friends with her brother.
Can you ski well?
Can you ski well?
Who surprised you?
Some people think Tom's native language is French.
A woman wrote 30 books about how to become happy, and then committed suicide.
I don't care how long it takes.
Tom and I are like brothers.
Tom won't back off.
Don't worry. We'll find Tom.
She's too loud.
I prefer working alone.
Don't put the cart before the horse.
Tom's apartment is cluttered.
She fixed him something to eat.
Where did the tragedy occur?
Tom can't breathe on his own.
Tom can't wait to get started.
Don't call me when I'm at the office.
Why do you want Tom to have it?
Why do you want Tom to have it?
Why do you want Tom to have it?
Why do you want Tom to have it?
We tried to be careful.
These shoes are too large for me.
The whole room became silent.
That game is boring.
Health is wealth.
Don't you think it's cool?
Tom has a big nose.
She tried to steal my boyfriend.
We had a fun day at the beach.
My dog likes chasing squirrels.
She wants to be popular.
I don't want you to wake him up.
I respect Tom a lot.
I spoke to Tom myself.
I like Tom's idea.
I knew that it wasn't true.
I had plenty of time.
He got kicked off the team.
What should I do with Tom?
It's really bad for your eyes.
It's really bad for your eyes.
She loves to go shopping.
All eyes turned towards her.
She's a songwriter.
He could no longer contain his impatience.
She's out for a walk.
We came to see you.
I came to see you.
We came to see you.
Are we in danger?
What is the square root of 67?
Stop complaining about the weather.
I didn't know how to react.
He's a science teacher.
I want to get up and dance.
What are some good Israeli movies?
She's the perfect girl.
He's the perfect guy.
I've thought about it recently.
We moved in together.
The Inca were a religious people.
I am studying French by myself.
I got a good look.
Is he still mad?
She's still mad.
He's still mad.
She may be in danger.
Is she still mad?
They may be in danger.
We may be in danger.
He may be in danger.
It's not a competition.
It's not a competition.
We've got to find her before she does something stupid.
Why wasn't the woman who attacked Tom arrested?
Tom has many cats.
Mental strength is crucial for success in any sports.
It wasn't important to me.
I'm a responsible person.
I'll pray for your family.
Tom is named after his father.
They wanted to punish me.
We're responsible.
Nobody wants to be the first one to jump into the pool.
I know Tom from work.
I know Tom from work.
I never said you were boring.
I wasn't too surprised.
Tom should resign.
I don't want to interrupt them.
I don't want to interrupt him.
I don't want to interrupt her.
Don't interrupt us.
Don't interrupt us.
Don't interrupt them.
Don't interrupt them.
Don't interrupt him.
Don't interrupt him.
What size helmet do you need?
What size helmet do you need?
I think about Tom sometimes.
You don't look very well. Are you sick?
You don't look very well. Are you sick?
I think Tom is pretty angry.
Tom stopped using Facebook.
He ruined his clothes.
Take a bath.
Can you explain to me how I can get to the airport?
Every time I see Tom, he's wearing sunglasses.
We all denounce cheating on tests.
You don't look very well, are you sick?
Call Tom and tell him that you will be late.
Never let your sense of morals prevent you from doing what is right.
Tom has been stabbed several times.
Some religious people can be very judgy.
I don't have enough time to explain that to you in detail.
Without a goodnight kiss I won't have sweet dreams.
Can you all tell me how to get to the airport?
Can you tell me how to get to the airport?
Don't faint!
What's the difference between a winner and a loser?
What's the difference between a winner and a loser?
I think what Tom did was intentional.
For a long time I didn't wear a tie.
But there are other advantages.
I'm only a newbie.
Tom frequently appears on television.
This is Tom's chair.
We'll continue to support Tom.
Don't be afraid to talk to Tom.
Don't be afraid to talk to Tom.
That's another concern of mine.
I don't care how much it costs.
I don't care how much it costs.
This is insulting.
The party was fun.
Tom had a heart attack and died in his sleep.
Yes, I'm Tom's sister, but I'm not like him!
Is it true that you're Tom's sister?
They snuggled tightly beneath the blankets.
I knew you'd be mad at me.
I knew you'd be mad at me.
Stop spinning in that chair!
Tom got very angry at his sister and tore up her favorite doll.
I swear, Tom. You have to believe me.
Mom will buy us a puppy.
Why do you like short skirts?
Something's got to give.
I don't want to eat lunch now.
The square root of one is one.
The lovers exchanged numerous letters.
Tom has a steam shower.
I thought the death penalty should be abolished.
Tom, you're scaring the customers!
This is one of the greatest mysteries in astrophysics.
I will be very happy to accept your invitation.
You must be at least 17 years old to donate blood.
I will be very happy to accept your invitation.
This is what Tom does for a living.
This is what I do for a living.
Tom's fingers are really long.
Why are you interested in me?
I need to go shopping.
We need to go shopping.
He leaned over her and kissed her.
Tom looks like he doesn't want to be here.
Remember to turn off the lights.
This match is NID, not even gonna watch it.
I'm sorry I jumped to conclusions.
He jumped to get a ball.
Tom jumped to his feet and ran out of the room.
Share your secret with me.
Share your secret with me.
He was charged to continue this job.
I say I'm not guilty.
Humans can't perform miracles.
Tom has braces on his teeth.
Eleven is a prime number.
Tom is past his prime.
That bicycle is mine.
The dress has a full skirt.
I can barely read his writing.
I can barely read his writing.
She prayed.
He has been to France three times.
Those who have no children educate them well.
To learn a foreign language requires a lot of time.
Tom is the best player on the team.
I made a rookie mistake.
I don't believe he's a lawyer.
I have no patience for children.
Tom has lost his interest in studying French.
I think Tom is progressing.
I know Tom's sister.
I turned it off.
I turned it off.
We only see each other on weekends.
My experience of the world would be much shallower without the ability to communicate in lots of languages.
One school in the U.K. has abandoned textbooks in favour of iPads in the classroom.
I turned off my phone.
I turned off my phone.
He called off the trip.
Do you have Saturday off?
Do you have Saturday off?
Tom's eyes were wet with tears.
Long skirts were in fashion in those days.
I'm friends with her sister.
I'm friends with her sister.
Solitude is the school of wisdom.
The strangest part is that no one recognizes me.
OK, let's begin!
A hot wind is blowing in from the south.
It won't be long before a warm spring comes.
One of the players took off his shirt.
Recently there have been a lot of protests in the city.
Sorry for bothering you at this busy time.
And then I turned the TV off and went to sleep.
And then I turned the TV off and went to sleep.
You should introduce yourself.
Did Thomas get sick?
Write your name and address on this envelope.
Don't sit there. That's Tom's chair.
You will survive.
You will survive.
The hole is big enough.
The hole is big enough.
I was born in a small town called Nara.
The police have ruled out suicide.
The passport is clearly fake.
I've already invested a lot of money into my home.
You should eat more fruit.
You should eat more fruit.
You should eat more fruit.
The French Revolution began during Louis XVI's reign.
Buy two kilos of meat.
Tom is a wise man.
We really miss Tom.
We really miss Tom.
My mom was a schoolteacher.
You remember Tom, don't you?
Counting money in other people's pockets isn't good, but it's interesting.
Russian speech without swearing turns into a report.
I'll try to persuade Tom to help.
I'll try to persuade Tom to help us.
I'll try to persuade Tom to do that.
Everyone knows I'm Tom's girlfriend.
Don't lean on my desk.
Don't lean on my desk.
Tom leaned back on the couch.
I've missed so many opportunities.
How can we stop Tom?
It wasn't a bad day.
Life without humor would be unbearable. This applies to love as well.
We miss you so much.
We miss you so much.
You know that's a lie.
This is all for Tom.
Tom has a great idea.
Where are my hat and my gloves?
We saw Tom last night.
I have no one to say goodbye to.
Who created the universe?
Mary is a music teacher.
I just want to say good luck.
I think there's no point in trying to convince him.
I think there's no point in trying to convince him.
He begged her to forgive him.
Tom was given a warm reception.
Tom is the one who drew this picture.
Tom is the one who drew this picture.
Tom is probably just making a mountain out of a molehill again.
Help me take this down.
Help me take this down.
Please help me take this down.
Please help me take this down.
This is a bit unfair.
He wants to read this book.
I don't translate for free.
Patience begins where it ends.
Patience begins where it ends.
Can you see Tom's boat?
Have you met Tom yet?
Language is the painting of our ideas.
Many Chinese live in Africa.
Let! First serve.
I can't get that song out of my head.
I am thankful.
Of course I'm ready to die for my ideals, said the president.
Contact me if you have any questions.
You can buy it at any bookstore.
You can buy it at any bookstore.
You can buy it at any bookstore.
She winked at Tom.
He takes honey instead of sugar.
Tom has a little boy.
Tom has no free time.
Tom is a good player.
Tom is ready to lead.
Tom isn't a good guy.
Get off my car.
One is not a prime number.
Prime numbers are divisible only by one and themselves.
How long does it take from here to your house on foot?
I saw an opportunity and I took it.
Let's not be naive.
Let's not be naive.
We respect Tom a lot.
I want you to be my coach.
Does that suit you?
Does that suit you?
Would you come here a moment?
Would you come here a moment?
Would you come here a moment?
Would you come here a moment?
Would you come here a moment?
Have you eaten? "Yes, I have."
The disabled considered her their best advocate.
The Grand Bazaar in Istanbul is an explosion of colors.
Tom manages a hotel.
Tom knows the area.
Are you afraid of rats?
Are you afraid of rats?
How can Tom be stopped?
We missed Tom so much.
Will we see Tom again?
Who said life is fair?
Small pots have long handles.
Thank you for your detailed explanation.
Tom pushed the food around his plate.
He tried to talk her into doing it.
Go get Tom a blanket.
He put his hand on his heart.
Software is getting slower more rapidly than hardware becomes faster.
They think it's a toy.
Tom is strict but fair.
Tom is strict but fair.
Tom may have no choice.
The car is in the garage.
I'm looking forward to his present.
Tokyo is one of the biggest cities.
Tom never stopped loving you.
Tom has a facility for acquiring foreign languages.
Tom's making his bed.
Swimming is prohibited here.
Tom was grateful to us.
Tom's wife is a lawyer.
Is he a doctor or a patient?
Have you seen Tom without glasses before?
Have you seen Tom without glasses before?
Have you seen Tom without glasses before?
To the mouse a cat is a lion.
It was entirely his fault.
Bring Tom with you.
Bring Tom with you.
I am fed up with his vulgar jokes.
You're so tiny.
My name happens to be Tom, too.
Of course, it's not true.
We live near the beach.
The army had to retreat.
The baby's name was Tom.
The baby's name was Tom.
The fortress fell into the hands of the enemy.
Tom has been shot twice.
Tom has been shot twice.
Tom and his wife live separately.
She was surprised that it was that late.
Wipe your nose.
Tom's family isn't very large.
Tom's family isn't very large.
The player was broken at love in the opening game of the set.
The future scares me a lot.
The shop was quite empty.
We know that's not true.
Please take me to the airport.
Please take me to the airport.
The baby is fast asleep.
I like that skirt.
There is a bookstore just 'round the corner.
I am weak in math.
I'm not going if you don't invite Tom, too.
Tom's hands were dirty.
Tom's hands were dirty.
Tom's a hopeless romantic.
Tom has a pain in his big toe on his right foot.
We're going to have failures.
That's not a reason to panic.
That's not a reason to panic.
It's a risk we have to take.
It used to be peaceful here.
She is completely naïve and believes everything people tell her.
She is completely naïve and believes everything people tell her.
Tom's the real expert.
Marta dresses badly.
I knew you'd be late.
I knew you'd be late.
My father practices medicine.
The moon is low in the sky.
We only see the Moon because sunlight reflects back to us from its surface.
There was a moon that night.
Words are cheap. The biggest thing you can say is 'elephant'.
Tom has been shot three times.
Tom found a very old coin in the garden.
Tom found a very old coin in the garden.
She unzipped her pants.
That planet imploded.
We must stop Tom before he kills himself.
Tom ironed his shirt.
Let's finish this.
I bought Tom's old car for $3,000.
I bought Tom's old car for $3,000.
He is having lunch.
There's still plenty of time.
Next time don't give up so easily.
These shoes are old, but I still like them.
I want to go to New York.
Tom is a waiter.
Tom is in a bad mood.
I'd like to talk to Tom.
With your help, we'll catch Tom.
With your help, we'll catch Tom.
He waited for her at the airport.
Have you kissed Tom yet?
Tom could have survived if the ambulance had arrived a little sooner.
Tom could have survived if the ambulance had arrived a little sooner.
She's Tom's younger sister.
Tom pressed his ear against the wall.
Kazakhstan is the largest country in Central Asia.
Kazakhstan is the largest country in Central Asia.
I want to learn to play the guitar like you.
I want to learn to play the guitar like you.
That's a risk we have to take.
That's a risk we have to take.
I don't feel like walking.
Have you seen Tom's room?
Learning a language takes time.
You're very wise, Tom.
It's beyond my comprehension.
I began to get angry.
I began to get angry.
It never occurred to me that someone would make up such a thing.
Who broke the mug?
How did you and Tom first meet?
I'm not sure I can contact Tom.
Who was the winner?
Tom was stabbed and died before they could get him to a hospital.
You two look like you're in love.
He convinced his daughter to not marry Tom.
I just want to say hello.
I'm tired of being your slave.
Tom's father walked out on his family.
It doesn't matter what Tom does.
The hotel is run by his uncle.
Tom didn't participate in the discussion.
It's noisy in here.
I have to eat.
Tom's dog wanted to go outside.
Tom almost got caught.
I tried to talk to Tom about my feelings.
I talked to Tom about my feelings.
I talked to Tom about my feelings.
I don't see Tom's car.
No one can blame you for being a little scared.
Have you told Tom's mother?
Have you told Tom's mother?
How can I lose?
Money is tight right now.
Tom never had children.
I've gained three kilograms.
I've come to see Tom.
Where's Tom's father?
We're really proud of Tom.
The teacher kicked Tom out of class.
The teacher kicked her out of class.
Everyone came except for Tom.
I'm hiding from Tom.
I'm hiding from Tom.
Did you mention my book?
I consider Tom one of my closest friends.
We've got plenty of water.
Tom doesn't have to apologize to me.
Are you annoyed by this?
Tom smells awful.
You've surprised a lot of people.
Tom won't like it if you're late.
I saw the cook.
I saw the cook.
I'm looking forward to meeting you.
You don't want to be late.
You can protect me.
This is a picture of Tom's wife.
Tom dislikes noisy cities.
This bicycle is mine.
My friend is seventeen.
Tom wasn't in his room.
He speaks incredibly fast.
Try putting yourself in my shoes.
Try putting yourself in my shoes.
I swallowed my pride.
I had to swallow my pride.
Tom wiped his nose on his sleeve.
Tom swallowed his pride.
Why were you looking for Tom?
Why were you looking for Tom?
Why were you looking for Tom?
His mother made him clean the bathroom.
They should all be fired.
There are mosquitoes even in Greece.
Be objective.
You may as well give up.
You may as well call a cat a small tiger as call a tiger a big cat.
The refrigerator is closed.
Tom is getting what he deserves.
She despises him.
She has a small advantage.
When he was young, he liked to go by bike.
Relations between Greece and Germany are tense.
I didn't want Tom to die.
I don't think I want to see Tom again.
Tom has a white cat.
Tom has a white cat.
She observed how butterflies fly.
Life is more hellish than hell itself.
God is perfect.
Tom says that's not true.
Tom said that isn't true.
I think the crest on the top of the head of roosters is attractive.
My job is boring.
Tom rejected the idea.
Where did you see Tom?
Where did you see Tom?
What's in the fridge?
I asked Tom not to drive so fast.
I asked Tom not to drive so fast.
I asked Tom not to drive too fast.
I asked Tom not to drive too fast.
The path was narrow.
Tom suppressed his anger.
You scared Tom.
You intimidate Tom.
Have I convinced you?
Have I convinced you?
Have I convinced you?
Have I convinced you?
Have I convinced you?
Have I convinced you?
Have I convinced you?
Have I convinced you?
I've been friends with Tom for many years.
He earns twenty dollars a day.
You've always loved Tom, haven't you?
You can't defeat Tom alone.
Does that seem fair to you?
I just want to make sure this isn't poison.
I asked him to make four copies of the letter.
I asked him to make four copies of the letter.
Tom amazes me at times.
I can't hear Tom.
I told Tom not to give up.
I didn't try to kill Tom.
No one noticed Tom.
Tom had some great ideas.
Tom is from here.
Kiss Tom.
Empty your pockets.
Empty your pockets.
No, thank you. I already ate.
Rome is an Italian city.
Please tell me how to get to the post office from here.
I want my lawyer.
Tom didn't drown.
I'm going to read.
I was dizzy.
Tom has a slight fever.
He didn't succeed in carrying out his plan.
Eat something.
Eat something.
Be lenient!
Be lenient!
Be lenient!
Give Tom the disk.
Give Tom the disk.
Tom will make an announcement at 2:30.
I can't believe no one was injured.
Don't you remember Tom?
Don't you remember Tom?
Don't you remember Tom?
What time do you eat lunch?
The infamous female burglar was never caught.
I almost agree with Tom.
Are you still angry with Tom?
Tom is obviously angry.
Can you take Tom to the airport?
Can you take Tom to the airport?
Tom is prudent.
I keep in touch with Tom.
Tom's real name isn't Tom.
There's nowhere you can hide.
There's nowhere you can hide.
In a manner of speaking, yes.
Tom did a handstand on the beach.
Tom did a handstand on the beach.
I told a joke.
I should be the one taking care of Tom.
Maybe someone made Tom do it.
Maybe someone made Tom do it.
My sister does not think for herself.
I know the name of this animal.
We went for a walk.
Do we have to protect Tom?
I warned him, but he ignored the warning.
The plane took off from Narita at 10 a.m.
Nobody can replace Tom.
Nobody can replace Tom.
Tom knows a few magic tricks.
Tom was too polite to say no.
Tom ignored the warning.
I broke it.
I broke it.
I broke it.
I broke it.
The child drew a picture.
It's Tom's problem now.
Am I clear?
He just needs a helmet.
Make sure you save everything before you turn it off.
Am I late?
Nobody can disturb a true friendship.
Tom has a cow.
Where was Tom being held?
Tom tried to conceal the truth.
Tom was sent away to an insane asylum.
Don't be so suspicious.
Wipe your eyes.
Tom almost passed out from the heat.
We've got to warn Tom about that.
Tom opened his backpack.
Tom has never been skiing.
Tom and I know each other.
There's no way off the island.
Don't you miss your father?
Don't you miss your father?
Can you talk to Tom?
Can you talk to Tom?
Could you talk to Tom?
What I think isn't important.
Is there a book store in the hotel?
Is there a book store in the hotel?
Is there a book store in the hotel?
Are you really that naive?
Are you really that naive?
Are you really that naive?
There is a lack of social housing in Paris.
How serious is the crisis?
Admission is by invitation only.
I've got to get back to the office by 2:30.
I've got to get back to the office by 2:30.
You could have drowned.
You could have drowned.
You could have drowned.
Tom has a radio.
Tom wants his father buried next to his mother.
I'm worried about Tom's behavior.
Mice are the dream of all cats.
Tom has only one leg.
Tom has only one leg.
Did you know that Tom only had one leg?
Did you know that Tom only had one leg?
Did you know that Tom only had one leg?
Don't wake me.
Don't wake me.
They were everywhere.
Tom had a lot of time to think about the problem.
Tom has a nice apartment.
All students are admitted free.
Tom had a lot of time to think about the problem.
Tom has changed his email address recently.
Tom isn't very responsible.
It was deliberate.
Tom has shoulder-length hair.
These gloves are Tom's.
My ideal woman is shapely, intelligent and a polyglot.
It's not a failure.
I asked Tom for his phone number.
Is there a mall near here?
I get more than two hundred emails a day.
I bought a pair of leather gloves.
I bought a pair of leather gloves.
Let's go and ask Tom.
You can't fire Tom.
You can't fire Tom.
Turn off the engine.
Tom did it all alone.
I feel sometimes amazed how much crap some people are able to produce in just one week.
I just loathe people who tell lies.
I want you to meet Tom.
The milk froze and became solid.
Compulsory military service exists in Turkey.
Why didn't you take Tom?
Why didn't you take Tom?
Why didn't you take Tom?
I've known Tom since we were children.
This ship is bound for Vancouver.
We will need this to survive.
Tom looks sober.
Don't give candy to my children.
Don't give candy to my children.
I've never kissed Tom.
What's unusual about that?
The meeting lasted about three hours.
We've talked to Tom.
Tom's father is a musician.
Tom's father is called John.
Try not to repeat yourself.
We're running out of food.
Tom couldn't play the guitar.
They're trying to scare us.
Miracle of miracles, none of the passengers were hurt.
Can I open the curtain?
The previous sentence is true.
Tom only had three dollars with him.
Go fuck a refrigerator, peckerneck.
He was not feeling well.
Your cat will survive.
Your cat will survive.
She will survive.
You're much cuter than your sister.
I miss her.
It's stupid and dangerous.
You got what you deserved.
She got what she deserved.
The war ended in victory for the Allied Powers.
Did Tom make it?
Tom is a very talented man.
Are you blaming me?
They gave a series of concerts.
I don't know Tom's phone number.
Tom can't find his shoes.
He just carried out the sentence.
Tom has a younger brother.
You're beginning to worry me.
You will find your toys and books.
You will find your toys and books.
Tom has a hole in his sock.
Tom's dreams came true.
Tom barely passed the exam.
I did everything for Tom.
I did everything for Tom.
Tom didn't even say hi to me.
I'm going to bring Tom back here.
Is she your teacher?
Is she your teacher?
I'm not supposed to talk to Tom.
Are you a religious person?
I don't like your sense of humor.
Tom realized it was hopeless.
Some words are hard to define.
I did that for Tom.
I did it for Tom.
Tom and I'll be neighbors soon.
Graduating from university without studying is a victory, isn't it.
She came out of the shower with only a towel on.
I'm old enough to be your father.
He's old enough to be your father.
She wanted to please the crowd.
Keep your eyes on the road.
She ran her fingers through his hair.
Don't push it.
Don't push it.
He dressed as a fireman for Halloween.
He's a great coach and is loved by all his players.
He's a great coach.
Something fishy is going on.
Teenagers do a lot of stupid things.
Tom wears an eyepatch.
Tell me Tom's email address.
I expect a detailed report.
Tom was surprised by what he learned in sex education class.
Tom fell asleep during sex ed class.
I have patients waiting.
I gave them a fake address.
You're not strong enough.
There are plenty of nice girls out there.
I think Tom wants to kill himself.
Tom broke up with his girlfriend.
He's old enough to be her father.
Tom's phone can take pictures.
I went to a nude beach in France.
Tom is surrounded by beautiful women.
Tom thinks that schools should teach children to obey authority.
Tom has a small dick.
Tom has an evil twin brother.
Tom is being chased by paparazzi.
What's your favorite computer game?
Tom's native language is English.
It's one of the basic human instincts.
He could not take his eyes off of her.
He's just trying to make you jealous.
Tom has big ears.
Tom is a Vietnam veteran.
It's hard to stay objective.
It was inevitable, wasn't it?
It was a decent performance.
Everyone loves winners.
Tom is a great attorney.
It's a little bit dangerous.
I wonder why Tom wasn't there.
The accident happened right before our eyes.
He took notes at every opportunity.
The man matches the description.
Tom is having lunch with the police chief.
They arrived in New Delhi on July 9th.
Tom has a trash compactor.
Tom won the competition.
Tom won the competition.
Tom has an automatic card shuffler.
Tom has an automatic card shuffler.
Sticks and stones may break my bones, but words will never hurt me.
Tom's car is blue.
Tom's car is blue.
Tell me this isn't true.
How do you know about Tom?
Tom has a question.
Tom had a lot of secrets.
Tom chickened out.
Who's your favorite singer?
The taxi is waiting outside.
We decided to stay with Tom.
Tom ate some ice cream.
Tom looks sleepy.
Tom committed suicide in 2013.
I would be happy to be of any service to you.
Try as you may, you can't master English in a few months.
Tom is more wise than clever.
That dark coat does not match her dark skin.
The traffic accident took place on the highway.
Slow speech is characteristic of that man.
If you know who killed Tom, you should tell the police.
Do you want to go with Tom?
Do you know what Tom's favorite color is?
They both are teachers.
Tom's father's name is John.
Then he stretched his legs and settled back in his seat.
Our department doesn't have that information.
Leave it to me to prepare lunch.
That's nonsense. Nobody but a fool would believe it.
It's a matter of cost.
I will leave tomorrow, in any event.
It's by no means easy to master a foreign language.
What school a person graduated from counts for nothing.
The glove has a hole in the thumb.
That's powdered medicine.
I prefer the former plan to the latter.
He took a taxi so as not to be late for the party.
The gate is too narrow for a car.
The champagne bubbled in the glass.
The best way to make your dreams come true is to wake up.
Tom is too proud to ask for help.
Tom has other plans.
How often do you check your email?
Tom isn't progressing.
Tom lives near the beach.
The weather was fantastic.
I differ from you on that point.
The party opened with his speech.
The picture was taken from the air.
I cannot tell whether this bus goes to the airport.
His wet coat was evidence that he had been outside.
I would rather go on foot than stay here waiting for the bus.
When taking antibiotics, one should not consume alcohol.
Press the small button to eject the CD from the computer.
If I killed myself, everyone would be happy, wouldn't they?
That seems fair to me.
Tom has no secrets from me.
Do you miss her?
Do you miss him?
Where did you find that doll?
Where did you find that doll?
It was inconvenient.
You've got to warn Tom.
I saw Tom get hit by a car.
I'm a monster.
Tom was expelled from private school.
Tom is better at French than English.
Summer is almost here!
It pains me to have to say this, but it's the truth.
I'm a loner.
I really like snow.
What you've heard about me isn't true.
Tom's glass was empty.
I don't think Tom has any ulterior motives.
Tom was suspected of being a spy.
Tom graduated from college in 2003.
You'd be surprised if you knew how many times Tom has been here.
Isn't that against the rules?
Tom and I are pretty good friends.
Tom has been blacklisted.
Tom's curiosity got the better of him.
It makes me shiver just to think of it.
Does Tom really have a girlfriend?
They hate our guts.
Would a postponement help?
School lunches are disgusting!
School lunches are disgusting!
I know why Tom got sick.
Tom seldom wears his black shirt.
I can't skate.
Tom's family needed money.
Tom's family needed money.
Tom married John's widow.
I'm being charged with murder.
Jenny thanked me for the gift.
You're the perfect boyfriend.
Tom's passport has been stolen.
Tom's passport has been stolen.
The situation is still tense.
The situation there is tense.
The reason is pretty obvious.
Tom's family is in Australia.
I can't go with Tom.
I can't go with Tom.
Does Tom have a job?
Tom has a small car.
Tom heard a whistle.
Let's not panic.
Why is everyone so surprised?
Tom has been there three times.
I can't give up now.
What's so special about Tom?
Read the newspaper every day, or you will fall behind the times.
The Democratic Party needs major reform.
Tom thinks that wasting food is a sin.
Tom's truck was stolen.
Tom's father was a diplomat.
Tom's parents are both dead.
Tom's father's name was John.
Tom's father is a policeman.
Tom said that wasn't enough.
Tom wants to study medicine.
This is entirely your fault.
This is entirely your fault.
The weather is just perfect.
Tom's plan is simple.
Tom's father told me he was a doctor.
The police think it's a suicide.
The police think it's a suicide.
That doesn't matter anymore.
You look like Tom.
We're not the champions.
No one was really surprised.
He winced as the nurse pushed the needle into his arm.
Tom has already signed the contract.
Tom has a similar problem.
Tom has a meeting tomorrow.
Tom's parents are both still living.
They arrived here safely yesterday.
They arrived here safely yesterday.
There is only one tiny difference.
What was she really worried about?
Tom has never had a job.
I don't want to bother you.
It's all in your imagination.
Tom learned to drive when he was eighteen.
Tom pitched his tent next to mine.
Tom has good taste.
Tom became a surgeon.
Tom hid in the attic.
Tom has a high fever.
Nobody talks about Tom anymore.
Nobody talks to Tom anymore.
They're cleaning the beach.
Tom has his own apartment.
Tom has his own apartment.
My brother is very good at playing the guitar.
This is Tom's diary.
This is Tom's diary.
I want to go talk to Tom.
Tom started singing a song.
Tom says that's not enough.
I don't need an office.
Tom usually walks home from school.
Why do you think Tom was absent today?
Nobody talks about Tom anymore.
The worst is probably over.
This isn't a private beach.
Everything else is boring.
Of course, Tom was invited.
What a bummer.
You want to buy this skirt.
You want to buy this skirt.
I am going to be much more careful.
You can't ask for the impossible.
They've located Tom.
Both Tom's parents are deaf.
Both Tom's parents are deaf.
I thought over my future.
I thought over my future.
The older Mary gets, the more unbearable she becomes.
Your shoes want mending.
Seen from space, the earth is very beautiful.
It was fortunate that he was taken to a nearby hospital right away after the accident.
He has been in deep water since he got fired from his job.
Collect your thoughts before you begin your work.
Why do you hate Tom?
Why do you hate Tom?
Tom phoned his lawyer.
Why don't you like Tom?
Why don't you like Tom?
Tom was asked to leave.
Tom and I know the truth.
Why do you think Tom is stupid?
Tom never had doubts.
When I was eighteen, I could speak eight languages.
She stole my boyfriend!
Tom has serious problems.
Tom is no longer with us.
You will not persuade him with these words.
You will not persuade me with these words.
You will not persuade me with these words.
This car used to be Tom's.
Tom often has headaches.
No animals were harmed during the making of this sentence.
Tom's feelings were hurt.
Tom didn't try to resist.
Tom is waiting upstairs.
Tom isn't naive anymore.
Tom didn't make a sound.
Tom crossed the line.
Tom never had that opportunity.
Can you hurry up?
Tom killed himself in October.
The dogs scared us.
Tom was also killed.
You're a lawyer, right?
I don't trust local TV.
Dan stormed inside a nightclub and started shooting.
I liked Tom's first book more than the second.
Tom is not easily satisfied.
Tom was out of town last weekend.
Tom got pulled over by the police.
Everyone but Tom listened carefully.
Tom needs a lawyer.
I just finished lunch.
I'll be careful next time.
I've been touched by death.
Tom has visited Australia three times.
Tom's parents were also singers.
Tom and I bought that house on Park Street.
I know a great Italian restaurant on Park Street.
Could you tell me how to get to Park Street?
We're ready to put the boat in the water.
Will you visit me?
God, give me patience!
God, give me patience!
Tom's dog can swim well.
Tom was impressed by Mary.
I love free stuff.
Are you shy or are you scared?
Don't be insulted.
Tom isn't wearing any shoes.
We're not far from Tom's.
Tom's wife testified against him.
Tom's wife testified against him.
You can't force me to testify against Tom.
You can't force me to testify against Tom.
Tom left the water running.
Tom left the water running.
Tom is a retired policeman.
You will persuade no one with these words.
I was sober.
Mary left no wealth to her sons.
They insist that he should go.
At last, I completed my work.
Both of them are kind and honest.
This is Tom's favorite book.
This is one of Tom's favorite books.
The meeting is held twice a month.
I feel useless.
Tom rode the horse bareback.
How do you know Tom? "It's a long story."
How do you know Tom? "It's a long story."
Would you like another glass of wine?
Please be careful when crossing the street.
The departure is tomorrow.
They say housework won't kill you, but why take the risk?
I'm completely on your side.
I'm completely on your side.
Is this real silver?
I will sell it as soon as I find a buyer.
I only have butter in the refrigerator.
I only have butter in the refrigerator.
The temperature outside is four degrees below zero.
The book is about a woman who enters a convent.
What are the advantages and drawbacks of this method?
What are the advantages and drawbacks of this method?
Do you usually wear a bike helmet?
Don't spit into the wind.
Don't spit into the wind.
Why are you angry at me?
Why are you angry at me?
I have a big problem with that.
Tom and Mary are doing well.
Tom didn't seem surprised at all.
I suggest that the meeting be postponed.
Many people work in industrial towns.
Tom had plenty of questions.
Tom was worried about that.
It looks hopeless.
The mayor won the election.
Are you the mayor?
Are you the mayor?
Who taught you this prayer?
It is important to brush ones teeth every day.
The kids nodded obediently.
I do appreciate that.
She tried to persuade him to go with her.
She tried to persuade him to go with her.
Are you eating lunch?
We couldn't have done that without Tom's help.
Some men treat women like property.
That sounded like an explosion.
I like English, but I can't speak it well.
Tom asked me how many guitars I own.
That hotel will cost you much more during peak season than off-season.
Tom has enough time.
All our effort ended in failure.
He pushed the emergency button.
I ate quickly.
We'll be back after this short break.
He used the book as a shield.
I don't want to hear about all your old girlfriends.
Tom tried to make both ends meet.
I met him by pure chance.
I want him to play the guitar.
Tom is upstairs in his room.
The taxi has arrived.
Children love chips with everything.
We have plenty of time to do that.
Even Tom has his doubts.
This mysterious catastrophe dismayed the whole village.
They have been transported to various hospitals.
Philosophy is the love of wisdom.
Tom missed his chance.
Be prepared for the worst.
Tom looked around nervously.
I think we need a whole new approach.
The nurse has given Tom a sedative.
Tom put his thoughts on paper.
I saw Tom try to kill himself.
I've got longer legs than Tom.
Why did you interfere in an affair that did not concern you at all?
The false alarm caused panic.
May I see your invitation please?
Tom and Mary had two sons: Paul and John.
I'll ask Tom what he thinks.
I'd like to ask Tom what he means.
I'd like to ask Tom what he means.
When we are no longer children we are already dead.
Are you sure you want to go with Tom?
Are you sure you want to go with Tom?
Are you sure you want to go with Tom?
I'm a very careful person.
Tom has an interesting background.
I would be glad to read the novel, but I don't have the time.
I was stuck in traffic.
Why can't you ask her for forgiveness?
Why can't you ask her for forgiveness?
I want a clear answer.
You stole my bike, and now I'm going to break your face.
Tom has co-authored three textbooks.
I want to get in touch with him.
The police have no grounds to hold Tom.
The police were able to link Tom's DNA to the crime scene.
The police have called off the search.
The police never caught the guy who attacked Tom.
The police officer put handcuffs on Tom.
The police gave Tom the chance to surrender.
The police told me not to leave town.
There were blood stains on the shirt that the police found under Tom's bed.
The police officer placed Tom under arrest.
The police are looking into the incident.
The police could not control the mob.
We have to convince Tom to stay here.
I have to convince Tom to go with us.
The police can't arrest Tom.
I think it's unlikely that the police will find Tom.
Police immediately began investigating.
In the absence of sufficient proof, the police could not indict him.
The police pursued the murderer.
Plants can't grow without water.
I eat three times a day.
I saw Tom in church today.
Plants can't grow without air.
Hannibal crossed the Alps with an army.
They tortured you.
Tom tried to sit up.
Losing a battle doesn't mean losing the war!
I had to hide from the police.
I'm going to turn Tom in to the police.
Tom came to his senses and decided to turn himself in to the police.
Let's hope we find Tom before the police do.
The police have Tom under surveillance.
Tom wanted to turn himself in to the police.
I couldn't understand Tom's explanation.
Do you have any idea who might have killed Tom?
I'll miss you when you're gone.
Tom's family lives in Australia.
How could that happen to Tom?
Doesn't Tom have any friends?
Tom's car is in the garage.
I met your son yesterday and he greeted me politely.
I met your son yesterday and he greeted me politely.
He asked me if I could do him a favor.
She is shameless.
How lucky!
You're gonna get what you deserve.
He is out of his mind.
The bell rang, and the train began to move.
Polish specialists work in Africa.
He talked for three hours non-stop. He's unbearable.
The bald guy is my husband.
I must buy shoes.
I don't want you to get hurt.
I don't want you to get hurt.
That's a really dangerous intersection.
We've missed a great opportunity.
Everybody knows where Australia is.
This place is sacred.
Tom has only a week to decide.
Tom has nothing better to do right now.
Tom has no sense of style.
Tom has no sense of shame.
A cute person will look cute no matter what they wear.
Was that Tom's computer?
Tom had no time to finish the story.
Someone has warned Tom.
Tom is old enough to decide for himself.
Tom spent three times as much as I did.
The description isn't very clear.
I met Tom the year that Mary died.
I don't see Tom every day.
What did you do to make Tom cry?
It's starting to get dark.
Tom flosses his teeth at least once a day.
I'm surprised that Tom didn't enjoy the concert.
I'm surprised that Tom didn't enjoy the concert.
Did Tom show you his stamp collection?
Is that Tom's coat?
What really happened between you and Tom?
What really happened between you and Tom?
Where should we hide?
Tom and I plan to have three children.
The neighbors are noisy.
We saw a white ship far away.
Why was everyone so surprised?
They had to cancel the trip.
How dangerous is the situation?
We're running out of patience.
We're looking forward to that.
It's not a permanent solution.
Many people have been injured.
One man was seriously injured.
It's hard to ignore Tom.
Everybody here knows Tom.
Squirrels drive me nuts.
No one heard Tom's screams for help.
It's time for you to get to work.
I don't miss Tom.
It's extremely dangerous.
Is Tom going to go skating tomorrow?
Is there a swimming pool near your house?
If Tom had a lot of money, he'd buy that for you.
If Tom had a lot of money, he'd buy that for you.
If Tom breaks his promise, he'll regret it.
We hope Tom is OK.
I've always considered Tom a close friend.
These animals feed on grass.
I'm the one who painted this picture.
Something's really weird here.
I don't add sentences in Japanese.
I want to kill Tom before he kills me.
The embassy building is surrounded by high fences.
I'm pretty sure that Tom is going to be late.
It's hard to take you seriously.
It's hard to take you seriously.
I'm not going to give up.
I'm not allowed to go to Tom's house.
I'm convinced Tom had nothing to do with what happened.
I'm convinced Tom had nothing to do with what happened.
I'm convinced Tom had nothing to do with what happened.
I'm beginning to regret hiring Tom.
Sweet dreams, my princess.
They were at the airport to say goodbye to him.
I wonder why Tom isn't here.
I was hoping you would know Tom's address.
I was hoping you would know Tom's address.
I was employee of the year for three years.
I want you to listen to Tom's advice.
I want you to listen to Tom's advice.
The enterprise was doomed to failure.
Sorry if I didn't understand something.
If you're hungry, eat.
If you're hungry, eat.
You've missed the point entirely.
What is it that bothers you?
He's really an oddball.
I wonder what that green spot in the distance is.
I am an Earthling.
This soup is too salty to eat.
These kinds of mistakes are inevitable.
I haven't spoken to you before, have I?
The fridge is not empty, unless the repairman took the last beer.
Double or nothing?
He defends and protects his family.
Were both of them wearing helmets?
Tom hasn't been found.
Tom's body was never found.
This is my sentence.
I think Tom will drive me to the airport.
I think Tom will be late.
I think there is a more obvious explanation.
I think it's dangerous to swim here.
I study French with Tom three times a week.
I spent all day with Tom.
The squirrel closed its eyes and began to count hazelnuts.
I spend a lot of time practicing the guitar.
I have always been interested in working in agriculture.
I pass by Tom's house on my way to and from school.
I heard you broke up with your girlfriend.
I heard that Tom attempted suicide.
I have backstage passes to Tom's concert.
Those who show a friendly face to everyone, won't have true friends.
Don't hesitate to ask me for help.
Don't hesitate to ask me questions.
Don't hesitate to ask me questions.
About thirty villagers were injured.
Both of Tom's parents were teachers.
Maybe we're overlooking the obvious.
That's an absolutely ridiculous idea.
There's definitely someone out there.
Something's definitely wrong with Tom.
Jamala's victory at the "Eurovision 2016" convinces us that the world is not so hopeless as it sometimes seems.
Offending you wasn't my intention.
You're scary!
I haven't seen Tom this happy in a long time.
I think you know that's not true.
Tom told the judge he wanted a different lawyer.
Tom has the gift of gab.
All countries have their embassies in the capital.
It was a perfect morning.
As many as 90% of the world's languages are likely to disappear by the end of this century.
Were you amazed?
Were you amazed?
My parents don't like my girlfriend. They say that she's a gold digger.
My parents don't like my girlfriend.
Thinking of it made a chill run up my spine.
I should've listened to Tom.
The little kids were very curious.
Please don't make me ask Tom.
Please don't make me ask Tom.
The drinks were free.
I have to go to a funeral today.
I have to go to a funeral today.
I have a message for you from Tom.
I have a friend who knows Tom.
The mountains were all around the city.
I received an invitation to the birthday party.
I didn't know you and Tom were related.
I came here today to talk to Tom.
I came here today to talk to Tom.
Tom was bald.
How do we get Tom out of jail?
Could you use some help?
Next week I want to visit my friend.
It was a perfect morning.
The glass was broken by someone.
You have to put up with all these noises.
From what I can tell, Tom isn't a bad person.
Tom was out of town last week.
Everyone but Tom has already gone home.
Does Tom have a choice?
Do you think we can do this without Tom's help?
Do you think we can do this without Tom's help?
Do you know of any good restaurants around here?
Do you know of any good restaurants around here?
I don't pay them any mind.
Do you have any idea who that might be?
Do you have any idea who might have stolen my bicycle?
Do you have any idea how dangerous that is?
Do you have any idea how dangerous that is?
If it happened to Tom, it could happen to me.
If it happened to Tom, it could happen to you.
Do you consider Tom a friend?
Do you consider Tom a friend?
I like red fruits a lot.
As usual, Tom was late.
I'm not afraid at all.
Almost everyone I know has a bicycle.
Do you want to see a picture of Tom?
The plane takes off in ten minutes.
I'd like to buy this doll.
Bill was late for school as usual.
Bill was late for school as usual.
I am sending a copy of my letter to you.
Tell her that I am taking a bath.
The children caught butterflies.
The children caught butterflies.
Tom climbed the fence.
I envy you so much.
What will we do if he's late?
The house was empty, if you don't count the cat.
It was consensual.
You look suspicious.
Are you bored here?
You broke her heart.
Do you like thunderstorms?
He squeezed my shoulder.
Tom says he'll only talk to you.
Please punish him.
Ronald Reagan asked Gorbachev to "tear down this wall".
The people want to translate things that are more interesting.
The people want to translate things that are more interesting.
Mary was buried in this city.
Tom was buried in this city.
Call me if you have difficulties.
If Mary's mother's son is my brother, then Mary is my sister.
However that's also the greatest feeling.
If the fruit is fermented, you shouldn't eat it.
My life is a disaster.
Tom's parents don't like me.
Are you English?
Tom shops online.
Tom should be OK.
Are you English?
Turn right at the next crossing.
Who was punished?
Why do you need a comb if you're bald?
My sister is in love with you. "What?"
My sister is in love with you. "What?"
Seawater is salty.
It rained for several days on end.
Tom has no neighbors.
I'll ask Tom to give me some money.
I'll ask Tom for some money.
Construction materials are expensive at the moment.
Tom is a good coach.
I had no trouble finding Tom's office.
Tom's plan failed.
My shoes squeak.
Why don't you just go talk to Tom?
Why don't you just go talk to Tom?
Thank you very much for your detailed explanation.
Thank you very much for your detailed explanation.
Tom hasn't yet been found.
Tom hasn't been fired.
They sell candy.
Why was everyone surprised?
Tom is doing well now.
Tom was fired on Monday.
He found the office without any difficulty.
Tom and the other farmers prayed for rain.
Tom has my car.
Tom ignored our warnings.
There was no warning.
Tom filled both buckets with water.
Tom filled the pool with water.
Tom filled the bathtub with water.
This wasn't Tom's idea.
Why are you always so rude to Tom?
Why are you always so rude to Tom?
Pour me a glass of wine.
Pour me a glass of wine.
We only have three bicycles.
Tom often skips school.
Tom never cared about money.
Tom is our best player.
We plan to name our son Tom.
Tom has some very good news.
Tom has some good news.
You don't want me to miss my bus, do you?
You don't want me to miss my bus, do you?
Tom has some serious doubts.
Tom took a can of beer from the fridge.
Do you know Tom's email address?
I don't have enough RAM.
I don't have enough RAM.
It'll soon be sunset.
Tom took off his helmet and wiped off his forehead.
My mother is a nurse.
Tom took off his socks and threw them on the floor.
Tom had a good teacher.
I don't have Tom's money.
Tom tried to regain his balance.
Tom tugged on the rope.
Pinocchio, you wicked boy!
Tom usually keeps his promises.
Tom and I are in the same class.
The King did not know that the woman he held in his arms was not his own dear wife, but a wicked witch.
Tom and I are neighbors.
Tom and I are students.
Tom and I aren't fools.
Tom and I barely know each other.
I've become friends with Tom.
Tom and I go to the same school.
Tom and I happened to be on the same train.
Tom and I happened to be on the same train.
Tom and I have no secrets from each other.
Tom and I have started to get on each other's nerves.
Tom and I help each other.
Tom and I know each other quite well.
Tom and I live near each other.
Tom and I looked at each other and smiled.
Tom and I recognized each other even though we hadn't seen each other for years.
Tom and I see each other every day at school.
Tom and I see each other every day.
Tom and I started at the same time.
Tom and I still love each other.
Tom and I still love each other.
Tom and I understand each other.
Tom and I want the same thing.
Tom and I were neighbors.
Tom and I'll always be friends.
May I call you Tom?
May I call you Tom?
Apparently, you're very good at it.
Tom's eyes are closed.
How did you like the play?
How did you like the play?
How was the play?
I will definitely attend your funeral.
Tom's blood type is O positive.
Tom's blood type is O+.
Tom's parents aren't living anymore.
Tom's parents are dead.
Tom's funeral is today.
Tom didn't convince me.
I've heard no complaints from Tom.
I told Tom that I'd be late.
Don't forget about Tom.
Don't forget about Tom.
Tom is a very wise man.
Tom has young children.
Tom had to choose between his family and the bottle.
I need you in the garage.
Tom sat in front of me.
Tom's got heaps of friends.
Take Tom's weapon.
Are you sure nobody's hurt?
That's my job, not Tom's.
Tom lives three blocks from the beach.
We're going to want to talk to Tom.
Did you hire Tom?
Hurry, or you'll miss the train.
Hurry up, or you'll miss the bus.
Hurry up, or we'll be late.
Hurry up, otherwise you'll be late for lunch.
Thank God that nobody was hurt.
How can I get rid of Tom?
Are you going to the shop? Will you buy me a toy?
Tom is a very talented musician.
I asked Tom for his keys.
Where do you have lunch?
Yesterday's maximum temperature was 37ºC.
Tom wants to work in a factory.
When did you notice Tom wasn't here?
When did you notice Tom wasn't here?
When do you think I can talk to Tom?
When do you think I can talk to Tom?
Tom is old enough to be your father.
Are we mortal or immortal?
You'd better ask Tom if he minds.
What's the worst-case scenario?
What's the worst-case scenario?
I couldn't talk Tom into coming with us.
I couldn't talk Tom into coming with us.
That's not a bad decision.
I never wrote that down.
This place is creepy.
Tom handed me the binoculars.
Don't bite off more than you can chew.
I didn't know Tom.
I didn't know Tom.
Whose gloves are these? "They are Lisa's."
You had better call off your plan.
We're better off without Tom.
It's going to break her heart.
How long have you been in love with her?
Did you break it?
There were no computers in the office.
A button came off my coat.
A button came off my coat.
You've frightened me.
Who listens to Tom?
When was the last time you spoke with Tom?
When was the last time you spoke with Tom?
I've looked for Tom everywhere, but I haven't found him.
There are huge snakes on this island.
Why are you always talking about Tom?
Why are you always talking about Tom?
Tom isn't very religious.
What can Tom do about it?
Tom has a good job now.
Tom has a good job now.
What'll we do if Tom is late?
Tom's plan isn't working.
I'm sorry if I'm bothering you.
I'm sorry if I'm bothering you.
I have to survive.
Can I ask Tom about that?
Tom used to be a waiter.
Everyone knows Tom was the one who broke the window.
Tom has three suggestions.
I thought I saw Tom in the park, but it was someone else.
We were incredibly bored.
Tom has a grandson.
Let's go ask Tom.
It was pretty dangerous.
I saw you in the park with Tom.
I saw you in the park with Tom.
I saw you in the park with Tom.
I saw you in the park with Tom.
I know how to survive.
Are you sure it was a ghost?
Are you sure it was a ghost?
Are you sure it was a ghost?
Eventually, Tom just gave up.
Tom had a smile on his face.
Tom's French has improved.
Which textbook are you using?
Tom has more money than I'll ever earn in my entire life.
Mother chose this curtain.
Tom had a son named John.
I share your opinion.
I share your opinion.
I asked Tom.
Tom is claustrophobic.
Some people don't like chicken.
Tom owns a shell company in the British Virgin Islands.
I didn't shoot Tom.
Drive to the next intersection and make a left turn.
I followed Tom's advice.
I wasn't well.
Do they have a bicycle?
It's very dangerous to swim in this river.
It's dangerous to swim in this river.
Who else, other than you, knows about Tom's past?
Who else, other than you, knows about Tom's past?
I want to visit the Philippines.
I share your feelings.
I'll miss everybody.
I'm not religious.
I've only lost twice.
How did Tom get in here? "He came in through the window that you left unlocked."
Does Tom have a bicycle?
Does Tom have a bicycle?
I'm very surprised.
I've eaten.
Does she have a bicycle?
Does he have a bicycle?
They were sunbathing on the beach.
I'm incredibly busy.
Did you ski yesterday?
Did you ski yesterday?
He went there by bike.
He went there by bike.
Do you know his email address?
Do you know his email address?
The dog is chewing on something.
She seemed very surprised when I told her about it.
We see each other every day.
I'm going to miss you a lot.
I can't refuse him anything.
I can't refuse her anything.
I can't refuse him anything.
I can't protect you.
I can't protect you.
Do you care about the environment?
I like watching disaster movies.
Tom's birthday is in three days.
I'm not in the office today.
Do you want to give me a heart attack or what?
Do you want to give me a heart attack or what?
She despised her husband.
I'm much younger than Tom.
I want to talk to Tom's French teacher.
You are as white as a sheet.
You are as white as a sheet.
You are as white as a sheet.
Tom is due to come at noon.
The bus will take you to the center of the city.
You agree with Tom, don't you?
You agree with Tom, don't you?
Tom was in a bad mood.
He walked all the way home.
Mathematics is the language of the universe.
I don't really care anymore.
Tom gave a detailed answer.
I recommend it.
Don't let it go.
This movie is so boring.
I stayed home all day.
I stayed home all day.
I miss all this.
Tom still hasn't taken down his Christmas tree.
Tom turned off the lamp on the nightstand.
Tom is a friend of mine from high school.
My manner had convinced them.
I went to an Italian pizzeria.
I went to an Italian pizzeria.
Tom felt a little nauseated.
The clock is ten minutes behind.
I know what killed Tom.
Let's talk to Tom about that.
There's not enough time.
We can't give up.
There's a good chance that what Tom told you isn't true.
I'm not afraid of cold, but I can't stand heat.
Tom misses you.
Tom misses you.
Tom misses you.
Chew with your mouth closed.
Chew with your mouth closed.
I'd like to speak to Tom about his brother John.
Tom has been kicked out of school.
I've never taken drugs.
How about a glass of wine?
Sugar is bad for your teeth.
We can't publish this story.
Tell them to be careful.
How much money does Tom make a month?
How much money does Tom make a month?
Tom promised he wouldn't be late.
His pencil has a sharp point.
I know Tom and his wife.
I know Tom and his wife.
I don't hate Tom at all.
I was going to ask Tom to do that.
I was going to ask Tom to do that.
I wanted to ask Tom why.
We'll always remember Tom.
I know both Tom and his wife.
I know both Tom and his wife.
I wasn't strong enough.
I'm not convinced.
I'm not convinced.
I'm not convinced.
Are you and Tom friends?
What's there to eat?
I don't care how I look.
I'm not even surprised.
She tends to forget her promises.
Do you know Tom?
Do you know Tom?
Do you know Tom?
Tom eats lunch at the school cafeteria two or three times a week.
What should we do about Tom?
Do you know where to find Tom?
Do you know where to find Tom?
Tom isn't perfect.
Tom isn't perfect.
I saw Tom's picture in the newspaper.
My grandmother is still very active at eighty-five.
Tom speaks with a southern accent.
I don't know what Tom's house looks like.
There are one billion nanometers in a meter.
She speaks frankly.
No animals were harmed during the making of this sentence.
I folded all the towels.
I folded all the towels.
Tom has a pacemaker.
It was my fault, not Tom's.
We can't lose.
MasterCard and Visa are accepted.
I'm surprised you don't agree.
I came to talk with Tom.
How much candy have you had?
I used to respect Tom.
Tom used to have a dog.
Tom had a dog.
I used to live near Tom.
Tom used to play the guitar.
Tom used to have a black car.
Tom used to have a black car.
We used to be friends with Tom.
Tom and I used to fight a lot.
Tom and I used to work together.
I used to walk home from school.
Tom used to earn $30,000 a month.
I used to think it didn't matter.
I'm not as skinny as I used to be.
I'm still not used to the food here.
I used to ride a motorcycle to work.
I don't see Tom as much as I used to.
You've put on weight.
You've put on weight.
I don't miss home at all.
I can hide anywhere.
This will take some time to get used to.
I used to have a girlfriend, but we broke up.
Tom doesn't have as much free time as he used to.
My brother will take you home.
My brother will take you home.
You won't find Tom there.
You won't find Tom there.
We could walk.
We could walk.
We'll stand.
Tom has a house.
Tom has a cat.
Tom drew a tree.
When can I see Tom again?
German cars are very popular.
We are doomed!
Tom is in poor health.
What's Tom's last name?
She pressed her lips firmly together.
I'm going to miss it a lot.
I ordered a glass of wine.
I have to go to the office.
Tom is on TV.
Tom was on TV.
Tom was on TV.
She won't give up easily.
She shot him.
She shot her.
He shot at me.
She insisted on my going there.
She missed him a lot.
I want Tom to be punished.
I can't buy the bicycle for you.
Why are you afraid of Tom?
Why are you afraid of Tom?
I want to be there with Tom.
I want to go to Australia.
I want to thank everyone.
I want to make sure Tom is OK.
I want to sit between you and Tom.
I want to thank you for what you've done.
I want to thank you for what you've done.
I want to thank everyone who helped me.
I want to thank everyone who helped me.
I want to thank everyone for their support.
I wanted to go, but I got sick.
I wanted to go, but I got sick.
I wanted to avoid this problem.
I take care of him.
I haven't spoken to Tom about that yet.
I haven't talked to Tom about this yet.
I want to eat.
I want to thank everybody here.
She was steaming with anger.
Everybody got sick.
I'd like to go to Hawaii.
Can you tell me what's bothering you?
Can you tell me what's bothering you?
Can you show me where Tom's office is?
Where are they sending us?
I warned Tom about Mary.
I warned Tom about Mary.
Tom wants to be a lawyer.
Please light a candle.
Please light a candle.
She always dresses very simply.
They're boring.
They're cute.
They ruined it.
They ruined it.
I haven't spoken to Tom in three weeks.
They lost.
How often do you like to go to the beach?
New Zealand is a country of sheep and cows.
I'm already bored.
Tom didn't attend today's meeting.
Tom bought some vegetables and fruit.
Tom mentioned your name.
Tom mentioned your name.
Tom is absent because he's sick.
Tom takes care of his sick father.
Tom took care of his sick mother.
Tom took care of them.
Are you attracted to Tom?
Conchita Wurst won the Eurovision Song Contest 2014 with the song "Rise Like a Phoenix."
Tom has a lot of books in his room.
Tom's house is on the other side of the river.
Tom's house is on the other side of the river.
Tom's house is on the other side of the river.
My sister has the habit of underlining words she doesn't know while reading.
The coach asked the players to give their 110 percent.
Tom insisted that he was right.
Could you turn off the radio?
I think Tom broke the dish on purpose.
So what's the prognosis?
We know about Tom.
We know about Tom.
There's no water in the pool.
Where's the swimming pool?
Do you recognize that person?
Did you really see Tom in the park?
Did you really see Tom in the park?
There's no reason for panic.
Do you think that plants feel pain?
Do you think that plants feel pain?
Do you always obey orders?
Tom tried to control his fear.
Tom didn't have shoes on.
You can't teach old dogs new tricks.
What floor is your office on?
What floor is your office on?
What floor is your office on?
If you're not watching the TV, turn it off.
If you're not watching the TV, turn it off.
Tom and I are getting married in October.
We need instructions.
I want you to stay with Tom.
I want you to stay with Tom.
I want you to stay with Tom.
There was no investigation.
These are my terms.
They tied me up.
Tom is going to be late again.
Have you completely lost your mind?
Have you completely lost your mind?
I have Tom's key.
Are you trying to get rid of me?
Are you trying to get rid of me?
Do you recognize any of those men?
Please don't run away from me.
Please don't run away from me.
Do you know how much Tom makes?
Do you know how much Tom makes?
They basked in the sun.
How do you know I'm not from here? "It's obvious." "Really?"
I ran into Tom at the library.
Did you ask Tom why he was leaving?
Did you ask Tom why he was leaving?
Did you ask Tom why he was leaving?
Did you ask Tom why he was leaving?
Tom has so much money that he doesn't know what to do with it.
Are you still at the office?
Are you still at the office?
Why didn't you ask Tom to leave?
Why didn't you ask Tom to leave?
Why did you ask Tom to leave?
Why did you ask Tom to leave?
Tom's cows were stolen during the night.
That's not true! You're lying!
That's not true! You're lying!
This hotel has free Wi-Fi.
This hotel has free Wi-Fi.
Is sugar a poison?
Tom's father was a very wise person.
You're Tom's daughter, aren't you?
He whispered something to her.
I've known Tom for a long time.
He bowed to the Queen.
He dreamed about his home.
He often walks to school.
I put Tom on the list.
I didn't really miss Tom.
We asked Tom about that.
Tom's parents were teachers.
I was three hours too late.
I love Tom and I always will.
I hope you brought your guitar.
I don't want to wait for Tom.
I didn't know that about Tom.
He almost convinced me.
Is he still angry?
He is still angry.
He betrayed my confidence.
That's not cool!
They won the kissing contest.
He suffered multiple injuries after falling from the fourth floor.
He flew to Paris.
It's not a beauty contest.
Are they real or fake?
Tom found Mary's secret diary.
Please get in touch with me when you are here.
I can do that for Tom.
I'm going to be a lawyer.
Please put the potato chips in the bowl. Don't eat them directly from the bag.
I can survive.
How old are you? "I'm 16 years old."
Tom should've been punished.
Tom knew that he'd be punished.
Tom should be warned.
Silver doesn't cost as much as gold.
Silver doesn't cost as much as gold.
Silver costs less than gold.
What are you doing? "I'm watching my plants grow."
I sell shoes.
You can never count on Tom.
Tom knows how to make money.
Have I convinced you?
Have I convinced you?
The button came off.
Thank you for coming to see me.
Thank you for coming to see me.
Thank you for coming to see me.
My father went to Hong Kong on business.
You always want to control everything.
Ask Tom to be quiet.
You're naive.
You're naive.
You're naive.
The clicking of high heels kind of hurts my ears. Do the people wearing them not notice?
He told me to be here at noon.
He drowned in the ocean.
Tom was killed by a drunk driver.
I took the wheels off my bicycle.
I'm leaving you.
I'm leaving you.
I'm leaving town.
Tom's house is on fire.
You're careful.
You're careful.
Did you hear? She's going out with Tom!
Did you hear? She's going out with Tom!
You're scaring me.
Are you happy with your appearance?
Are you happy with your appearance?
Tom refilled his coffee cup.
Friendship requires mutual trust.
When women succeed, America succeeds.
When I was small I kept a diary.
When I was small I kept a diary.
When I was small I kept a diary.
When I was small I kept a diary.
I remember it vividly.
The thought makes me shudder.
I shudder at the thought.
He kissed me softly on the lips.
Tom's car is on fire.
Tom's car is on fire.
At this very moment, you're reading and translating this.
I was hoping to see Tom.
I made Tom buy it for me.
I heard a noise up there.
I take care of my family.
I'm not always available.
Tom's resources are limited.
I met with Tom earlier today.
In the center of the village there is a flag.
In the center of the village there is a flag.
Tom had three assistants.
I was forced to resign.
You were guilty.
None of Tom's relatives came to his funeral.
None of Tom's relatives came to his funeral.
I was really happy for Tom.
I swam toward the shore.
I misunderstood Tom.
I just miss Tom so much.
I miss Tom a lot.
I miss Tom so much.
I miss Tom so much.
I speak to Tom every day.
I talked to Tom about it.
I miss my mom and dad.
We tried to convince Tom not to do it.
I thought that you were Tom's uncle.
Your friends will miss you.
Your friends will miss you.
Your friends will miss you.
Your friends will miss you.
You will be missed by your friends when you're gone.
You will be missed by your friends when you're gone.
Tom's boots sank into the deep snow.
Will you take the red pill or the blue pill?
Will you take the red pill or the blue pill?
We had a few glasses of sangria.
She was angry at herself.
I see Tom almost every day after school.
I see Tom almost every day after school.
I wasn't able to answer Tom's question.
I don't wear shoes in my house.
I don't wear shoes in my house.
I've got lots of friends here.
They went out to eat.
Tom has wide shoulders and narrow hips.
I'm talking to Tom right now.
I majored in philosophy at my university.
Nobody can do this better than Tom.
I don't care how old you are.
His behavior truly surprised me.
I took the wheels off of my bicycle.
I was very proud of my son.
You won't get rid of me that easily.
I want to hear you play guitar.
You're three years younger than Tom.
You're three years younger than Tom.
I knew we were going to lose.
I never dance sober.
Don't be a slave to money.
Don't be a slave to money.
I didn't expect Tom to be here.
I didn't expect Tom to do that.
I feel sorry for Tom's parents.
I now know this isn't true.
He's not allowed to go there.
Tom's parents have separated.
I don't doubt that one bit.
I saw Tom's name on that list.
I still don't feel very well.
Your wife is mad at you.
Maybe Tom didn't have time.
I don't buy a lot of candy.
The knife punctured his lung.
The knife punctured his lung.
You are jealous.
I asked Tom to let the dog out.
You are jealous.
I think that would be cool.
I'm sure we can depend on Tom.
Why do people call him Tom?
Why do people call him Tom?
I thanked Tom for his advice.
You don't give up, do you?
Tom is looking down the well.
Tom fired the pistol three times.
We're having lunch here.
Tom puts milk in his coffee.
This factory is almost fully automated.
The universe has no center.
He broke up with his girlfriend.
Please turn off your cellphone.
Please turn off your cellphone.
I think we can avoid that.
Tom has hardly any close friends.
I told Tom that wasn't true.
I don't know why Tom is late.
Tom doesn't have an office.
I'm surrounded by enemies.
Don't be impatient!
Don't be impatient!
Don't be impatient!
Don't be impatient!
Don't be impatient!
He is basically a nice man.
Are you a singer?
Why are we voting for Tom?
You are a singer.
Tom's father died in 2013.
I didn't see Tom on Monday.
For once, I agree with Tom.
I'm looking for Tom. Do you know where he is?
I'm looking for Tom. Do you know where he is?
I'm looking for Tom. You don't know where he is, do you?
I'm looking for Tom. You don't know where he is, do you?
I have no problem with Tom.
I see Tom almost every day.
I see Tom almost every day.
I don't like Tom very much.
The goat ate the food from my hand.
The goat ate from her hand.
I'd like to go, too.
I saw Tom in the library yesterday.
Tom has a sense of humor.
Tom is extremely popular.
I'm not being paid enough.
Maybe Tom has problems.
Tom is perfectly satisfied with his current salary.
The bathroom is empty.
Tom's car's outside.
I have no respect for Tom.
I really enjoy what I do.
I was just doing my duty.
I'm not a rookie anymore.
Are you telling me you've seen Tom today?
Are you telling me you've seen Tom today?
Are you telling me you've seen Tom today?
Are you telling me you've seen Tom today?
I believe it's all a hoax.
I couldn't control myself.
I'm not going to miss Tom.
I don't think it was fair.
I talked to Tom on Monday.
There's something strange going on.
Tom hasn't been forgotten.
Tom and I get along great.
Tom is still angry with you.
Tom has a nice-looking beard.
Tom accidentally knocked over the bottle of water.
How did Tom convince you to come?
Where's your backpack?
I talked to Tom again.
I talked to Tom again.
Are you sure his name was Tom?
Are you sure his name was Tom?
Are you sure his name was Tom?
Are you sure his name was Tom?
You're angry now.
I don't know why Tom was fired.
I have an important message for Tom.
I can depend on Tom.
I know a lot about Tom.
I was very proud.
I was very proud.
We can depend on Tom.
I hope they let Tom go.
Times may change, but human nature stay the same.
We could ask Tom.
Everybody came to an agreement.
I have to ask Tom first.
I have to ask Tom first.
I didn't recognize Tom.
I didn't recognize Tom.
I didn't recognize Tom.
I didn't recognize Tom.
Tom would never break a promise.
You did that on purpose.
You did that on purpose.
They work hard.
Do you want to marry Tom or not?
That was a personal victory for Tom.
That was a personal victory for Tom.
That was a personal victory for Tom.
Why is Tom's car still here?
She persuaded him to do it.
I used to live close to Tom.
I love dealing with professionals.
Tom thinks that I did that on purpose.
Tom thinks that I did that on purpose.
Tom got a bottle of beer out of the fridge.
We can talk outside.
You can talk to Tom.
Please stop stealing things from me.
Please stop stealing things from me.
They decided to travel back in time to save Tom.
Tom tried to protect me.
Tom tried to protect me.
Get Tom away from here.
I don't need a partner.
We can talk to Tom.
Tom has been mistreated.
Tom has been mistreated.
Stand up and introduce yourself, please.
You could talk to Tom.
You could talk to Tom.
I care about you.
I don't like to be hugged.
The princess is waiting.
This patient is refusing treatment.
She looked surprised.
I've missed you so much, Tom.
How well did you know Tom?
How well did you know Tom?
How well do you know Tom?
Will I go to hell if I don't go to church?
Sometimes, it's easier to ask for forgiveness, than to ask for permission.
Do you know how to use chopsticks?
He drank a glass of red wine.
I talked to Tom again.
Tom put down the book he was reading.
I'm in desperate need of help.
I'll wait patiently.
Don't give up. You still have a chance.
I make a lot of money.
Thank her for the help.
Thank him for the help.
I'm going to be late for the bus.
Tom often swears when he's angry.
Tom said it cost too much.
Tom said it cost too much.
Tom said it cost too much.
Tom said it cost too much.
Tom's knife is on the table.
I told them we'd be late.
I told you we'd be late.
I told you we'd be late.
I told him we'd be late.
I told her we'd be late.
I don't have enough money to buy what I want.
Tom will never make it.
How did Tom survive?
This one is free.
This one is free.
The plane is at the airport.
Tom's girlfriend saw him with another girl.
Why are there so many motorcycles in this city? Well, it's because they're cheaper than cars and there are more poor people than rich ones.
Tom doesn't have a basement.
I was swimming in the pool at that time.
I'm sure I turned off the stove.
I'm sure I turned off the stove.
Tom and I are Facebook friends.
Tom climbed down the fire escape.
Tom had a bad headache.
All around is silence.
Tom wasn't the one who broke the window.
Excuse us for just a minute.
I've never spoken to Tom.
He died and his soul went to hell.
I took part in the discussion.
His father is Japanese.
Her father is Japanese.
There's a fire upstairs.
Tom has the day off.
We can't postpone the meeting.
We can't postpone the meeting.
We'll have to postpone the game.
I'm impatient.
Tom's daughter is three years old.
I thought the police were looking for Tom.
I thought the police were looking for Tom.
Tom and his wife have separated.
Tom tried to start the engine.
Tom tried to start the engine.
I didn't like Tom's idea at first.
I have little time left to live.
I have little time left to live.
Do you know what color Tom's car is?
Do you know what color Tom's car is?
Tom is very interested in painting.
Do you know what color Tom's car is?
Tom tried to be polite.
The police arrested a man who looks like Tom.
Can you drive a manual transmission?
I wonder how much money Tom makes.
What's the moral of this story?
Tom couldn't suppress his anger.
Do you remember what I told you the last time we met?
Do you remember what I told you the last time we met?
How to thank him in Turkish?
Tom stood in front of the microphone.
Does Tom have the same opinion?
I've been saving it for a special occasion.
I've been saving it for a special occasion.
I've been saving it for a special occasion.
I've been saving it for a special occasion.
I almost kissed Tom.
Do you have your guitar with you?
Do you have your guitar with you?
Do you have your guitar with you?
Tom is fun to work with.
The children were asleep upstairs.
I'm working with Tom now.
We've already done a lot for Tom.
Does Tom want something to eat?
Do you recognize that girl?
Do you recognize that girl?
Do you recognize that girl?
Do you recognize that girl?
I don't like to wash dishes.
I know I can't take Tom's place.
Somebody's taken Tom's place.
Tom's glass is empty.
Tom tried to hide his pain.
Your writing is horrible.
Terrorists were everywhere.
I'm sure you're not surprised.
I'm sure you're not surprised.
I'm sure you're not surprised.
I'm sure you're not surprised.
I'm sure you're not surprised.
I'm sure you're not surprised.
I'm sure you're not surprised.
Tom doesn't have a visa.
Tom was very frank.
Tom and I used to be roommates.
I love your sense of humor.
I don't want you to be late.
I don't want you to be late.
I don't want you to be late.
Is that Tom's girlfriend?
We're not convinced yet.
I study psychology.
Tom's goal is to become famous.
Tom has a twin brother named John.
I let Tom down.
I let Tom down.
Don't take it quite so literally.
Do you have a more detailed map?
Do you have a more detailed map?
Not everyone hates Tom.
We missed the plane.
Tom doesn't own a car.
Would that be fair?
Tom's speech was quite interesting.
Did Tom faint?
We found the perfect place.
I'm sure I turned off the gas.
Tom's attitude has changed.
Are you Tom's mother?
Are you Tom's mother?
Maybe there's something we missed.
Tom is obsessed with learning French.
Tom filled the bucket with cold water.
Tom thanked everyone for waiting.
I'm bored and I have nothing to do.
We sang in the choir when we were children.
He's been blacklisted.
You must be Tom's sister.
You must be Tom's sister.
Tom is a very talented writer.
The audience is young.
What stopped Tom?
Tom is very responsible.
Tom wants to end this.
Tom's family is poor.
I couldn't protect Tom.
I couldn't protect Tom.
I'm waiting to see what Tom will do.
Give me back my gloves.
Convincing Tom was difficult.
Convincing Tom was difficult.
All my friends call me Tom.
I'm just trying to find Tom.
Tom's birthday is October 20th.
The patient got worse.
Tom wasn't even here yesterday.
I saw Tom the other day.
She nearly fainted when she saw the blood.
They're French.
I wouldn't care if Tom did that.
The young man helped the old lady load the groceries into her car.
Tom visited Australia.
Tom is a little surprised.
I'm a childhood friend of Tom's.
I pray for Tom almost every day.
Which is cheaper, the bus or the street car?
Eat more fruit.
Eat more fruit.
Tom had a sore throat.
Meg is the double of her mother.
I didn't know why Tom wasn't invited.
How did you draw this picture?
If by any chance I'm late, please don't wait for me.
If by any chance I'm late, please don't wait for me.
Shhh, you'll wake up Tom!
Shhh, you'll wake up Tom!
Shhh, you'll wake up Tom!
Shhh, you'll wake up Tom!
Tom isn't allowed to go there.
I really appreciate your help.
I wonder what Tom's salary is.
Tom wasn't there at the time.
Mary put her doll in the microwave.
Can you give us a description of the car that hit Tom?
Tom wasn't even on the plane.
I've ruined everything.
Tom has published three books.
Tom has my book.
Vienna is in Austria.
Vienna is in Austria.
Leave Tom to me.
Leave Tom to me.
We had to walk.
Violet light has a shorter wavelength than red light.
Do you recognize these men?
Do you recognize these men?
I didn't follow instructions.
I don't want to blame anyone.
I had no lawyer at that time.
Tom was killed in the battle.
She didn't know she had married a monster.
The nurse was a witch, though the king did not know it.
Tom hopes to become a lawyer.
Tom put our names on the list.
I had no right to interfere.
I had no right to interfere.
Tom has a brother named John.
I've heard that joke before.
Tom has never had a mustache.
Tom has had such a hard life.
What color is Tom's car?
Tom was invited by us.
Tom is always in a good mood.
I'll always take care of you.
Tom wiped the blood off his sword.
He bought a shield and a sword.
Tom was killed in a dark alley.
She wants to read a book.
None of the windows were open.
Tom didn't convince everyone.
Muriel just turned twenty.
I'm thankful for everything.
Are you accusing me of something?
Are you accusing me of something?
Don't lose your sense of humor.
Tom was caught in a lie.
It's a vague story.
This is the picture Tom painted.
I hope Tom never gets caught.
I'm not going to let you go.
I'm not going to let you go.
Please contact us now.
Please come to our offices any time.
I think that they were all fired.
I think they were all fired.
I thought you'd be angry.
I thank you for the warning.
We’re not late, are we?
Tom is just trying to scare you.
The cat is eating the mouse.
Tom is a talented young man.
There's no reason to panic.
Tom is stalking me! Help!
I should have stayed out of it.
Tom's car is stuck in the snow.
How dare you say such things about Tom?
How dare you say such things about Tom?
How long have you worked for Tom?
How long have you worked for Tom?
How long have you worked for Tom?
She washes an apple.
This is his formula.
The train pulled out exactly on time.
Tom's parents died in 2013.
Tom's parents believed him.
Tom has had a very good year.
I asked Tom what he thought.
You can ask Tom about that.
You can ask Tom about that.
I spent half a day with Tom.
I'm going to miss Tom a lot.
I won't let Tom go.
I won't let Tom go.
I won't defend Tom.
It's probably a false alarm.
George W. Bush was the worst president in American history.
The event attracted more than 300 people.
Pay attention to your surroundings.
Most Japanese eat rice every day.
Tom doesn't intend to give up.
I'm not going to defend Tom.
She was the youngest descendant of the king.
If I got a boyfriend, I'd want one who's at least 180 centimeters tall.
He committed suicide by jumping off a bridge.
70% of English people don't speak a second language.
You're a better skier than me.
We may have a problem.
I've lost my strength.
What are you washing?
What are you washing?
Why do you even care about this?
Why do you even care about this?
I've already started to do that.
Tom knows that he'll be punished.
Neither side will concede.
Doctors recommend three meals a day.
The whole family went to the beach.
Give him your seat.
Give him your seat.
Give her your seat.
Give her your seat.
Tom has some advice for us.
I'm convinced we can do it.
Tom is an excellent singer.
I'm friends with everybody.
I met him at the airport.
I met him at the airport.
I met her at the airport.
I met her at the airport.
I met them at the airport.
I met them at the airport.
He won a silver medal.
They're escaping.
He dove.
He's disgusting.
He's disgusting.
Get out of there.
Get out of there.
Tom and I had a great time.
Why are you accusing me?
Why are you accusing me?
When I hear that song, I remember my younger days.
How long were you and Tom together?
This toy is almost indestructible.
Home prices are surging.
He often swears when he is angry.
Tom is getting bored.
Thanks Tom, I appreciate it.
I want to be Tom's friend.
Where are Tom's gloves?
I'm not mad at Tom anymore.
I'm not mad at Tom anymore.
The reasons for our failure are as follows.
Tom finally got caught.
Why did you attack Tom?
Why did you attack Tom?
Why did you attack Tom?
Tom has a black bicycle.
I'm not the coach.
The boy likes to walk to town.
Tom is a normal teenager.
Tom is a normal teenager.
Tom and I are very close.
They ate at a restaurant.
Tom has a very long beard.
Cain attacked Abel.
He scares easily.
Tom didn't have a brother.
I know what really happened to Tom.
I know what really happened to Tom.
I'm going to the beach with Tom.
Tom is far from perfect.
Tom has an older sister.
Tom has a way with kids.
Tom has a very good job.
I didn't want to give up.
I didn't want to give up.
Let's ask Tom about that.
I'm glad no one was hurt.
The book is now available.
Ukrainian girls are the prettiest in the world.
Do you mind if I call you Tom?
Do you mind if I call you Tom?
If you give me Tom's phone number, I'll call him.
If you give me Tom's phone number, I'll call him.
If you give me Tom's phone number, I'll call him.
If you give me Tom's phone number, I'll call him.
I can call Tom if you want.
I can call Tom if you want.
Tom has questions, too.
I hope no one gets hurt.
Where is the Estonian embassy?
I'm really looking forward to summer vacation.
I have a date with Tom tonight.
There were rumors about us, but they weren't true.
Do Germans and French hate each other?
Tom's apartment has three bedrooms.
Tom and I have been through a lot together.
What can you tell me about Tom?
What can you tell me about Tom?
Was this man threatening you?
Santa didn't reply to Tom's letter.
Tom had a lot to do.
I asked Tom why.
I had a busy day today.
I can carry you in my arms.
Tom is my dance partner.
Is Tom in any trouble?
Turn off the water!
Turn off the water!
He failed miserably.
You can't replace Tom.
You can't replace Tom.
You can't replace Tom.
Tom got on his bicycle.
We were planting trees.
Apple sold 75 million iPhones this quarter.
And what will the teacher say? "Let him talk. He is paid to grumble all day long."
Everyone thought we were going to lose.
Why are you siding with Tom?
I don't even have a bicycle.
She takes care of her brothers and sisters.
Around half of the audience were female.
Whatever happens, keep calm.
Sound travels very quickly.
Are you blaming me?
I have a lot of patients who are older than me.
Why do you care about this?
Tom has dark circles under his eyes.
How are you going to convince Tom?
I'm the expert.
Tom has a Japanese friend.
Tom accidentally shot himself.
Tom is learning how to play the guitar.
Do you think I'll survive?
I'm not working with Tom anymore.
I haven't worn this tie in almost three years.
I'd better turn the engine off.
Do you think we convinced Tom?
Her diploma.
I'm short.
He peels his apple.
Tom had to cancel his trip.
Tom had to cancel his trip.
I'm very worried about Tom.
I don't expect Tom to help.
I heard a noise upstairs.
I heard a noise upstairs.
I speak to Tom quite often.
Let me eat in peace.
Let me eat in peace.
Do you feel sorry for Tom?
I asked Tom what he meant.
He kicked me in the side.
Tom is a former champion.
Why do you care about this?
The seeds of these trees are yellow.
Tom followed the instructions.
Tom wants to become a priest.
He eyed her suspiciously.
What do you think he's dreaming about?
Tom could barely contain his excitement.
Tom is a martial arts expert.
I hate not winning.
Are you polite?
Tom's eyes opened.
Tom has hidden superpowers.
Please cancel our order.
The old oak was almost higher than the house.
What is her shoe size?
I think it's about time I had a serious talk with Tom.
Tom has a girlfriend.
Does the price include breakfast?
Does the price include breakfast?
I'm very surprised.
We got a flat tire.
I'm tired of listening to Tom.
Good luck on your date with Tom.
Good luck on your date.
Tom's wife filed for divorce.
Tom's wife filed for divorce after the incident.
Are you telling me to kill Tom?
Why don't you go to Malta?
Why don't you go to Malta?
Tom doesn't have a bank account.
Subrahmanyan Chandrasekhar was one of the foremost astrophysicists of the twentieth century.
Calm down, son.
Tom will have a busy weekend.
Tom has a very important job.
The furigana is automatically generated.
Tom was attacked by a rabid squirrel on Halloween day.
This was pretty expensive.
Tom has a son also named Tom.
Tom has a son and a daughter.
Tom has a son and a daughter.
I've had a very busy day.
Where were you on the night of October 20th?
Tom's children are wonderful.
Tom's children are wonderful.
I don't understand Tom at all.
I followed Tom into the house.
I had to force Tom to take it.
I had to force Tom to take it.
I asked Tom what had happened.
I asked Tom what he was doing.
I asked Tom where he got that.
I asked Tom where he got that.
I think I have the advantage.
Are we asking too much of Tom?
I still consider Tom a friend.
Tom turned on the gas.
That's why Tom and I are here.
I'm the coach.
I want a book to read on the train.
Just ask Tom.
Be careful. There's a hole in the floor.
My suitcase isn't as heavy as Tom's.
I'll have to warn Tom.
Tom has a birthday in October.
Tom has been shot in the head.
Tom had three people with him.
Tom usually eats lunch in the school cafeteria.
Tom suffers from chronic pain.
I did everything I could to stop Tom.
The woman has five children.
We didn't manage to convince him.
Tom said he didn't want to work late.
We have a good chance of winning.
Don't shake the table.
Don't shake the table.
The clock struck ten.
I hardly ever throw food away.
I want this guitar.
Do you want something to eat? "Sorry, I just ate."
Tom has a dancer's body.
I'm a hopeless romantic.
Tom is a hopeless romantic.
Something has happened to Tom.
I've never heard of Tom Jackson.
I want something else to read.
I think the worst is over now.
Thanks for sharing this.
I didn't do it deliberately.
Tom takes offence at the slightest thing.
Tom plays computer games for hours on end.
I want a pool.
I remember the way you used to look at Tom.
I almost caught the ball.
Who doesn't want love and affection?
Do you want me to help you find Tom?
Do you want me to help you find Tom?
Do you want me to help you find Tom?
Tom put on his helmet.
Can you save Tom?
Can you save Tom?
My house burned down.
May I quote you?
May I quote you?
Which bus goes to the airport?
Which bus goes to the airport?
Tom said he'd almost given up.
Mosquitoes are perhaps one of the most dangerous animals in the world.
I'm not perfect.
Everyone knows these days that tobacco causes lung cancer.
Tom has at least 300 books.
At 90, Tom's grandmother still leads a very active life.
People often enter into a relationship thinking that they can change the other person.
They caught five butterflies.
Don't go over the speed limit.
Where did you put my notebook?
Where did you put my notebook?
We moved to New York last fall.
He understands the risks.
Tom's knee hurts when he walks up or down stairs.
I have more skirts than my big sister.
Tom was just trying to survive.
Who will play the role of the princess?
Tom wants to become a surgeon.
I don't think it's dangerous.
Tom has trouble remembering names.
The former kings are not forgotten.
Tom made Jill his secretary.
I did it because I'm Tom's friend.
When I was in school, I dreamed of becoming a pilot.
When I was in school, I dreamed of becoming a pilot.
Tom has a lot of responsibilities.
Did you break up with Tom or did he break up with you?
Everyone wanted to talk to Tom.
Does Tom still play the guitar?
Why did the police arrest Tom?
The baby was fast asleep.
The baby was fast asleep in her mother's arms.
You almost convinced me.
Tom's situation was different.
Tom's first wife died in 2013.
I thought Tom would find it interesting.
I think you'll find it interesting.
I think you'll find it interesting.
I thought you would find it interesting.
I thought he would find it interesting.
I don't agree with Tom on much.
You're Tom's wife, aren't you?
Tom got a job in a circus.
Tom got a job in a circus.
Jim got a job as a waiter.
Tom is a security guard at the airport.
Divide this in half.
Divide this in half.
On the whole, the event was successful.
He remained silent.
Her daughter has what it takes to be a good teacher.
What would you do if you had a billion dollars?
What would you do if you had a billion dollars?
What would you do if you had a billion dollars?
What would you do if you had a billion dollars?
Do you know Tom's father's name?
Do you know Tom's father's name?
We're going to the beach. Would you like to go with us?
We're going to the beach. Would you like to go with us?
Tom got fired on his first day.
Tom died before the ambulance arrived.
The Zulu tribe in South Africa has its own language.
I've known Tom for three years.
I've known Tom for three years.
It's been almost three months since I've moved here.
He put the entire blame on his brother.
I was disgusted.
I was disgusted.
I was disgusted.
I was disgusted.
I programed my first computer game when I was twelve years old.
Don't forget to invite Tom.
Don't forget to invite Tom.
Is Tom retired?
You're going to be late for school again.
You're going to be late for school again.
Could I speak to Tom?
I can't believe you married Tom.
I want to thank him.
I want to thank her.
Did you remember to thank them?
Did you remember to thank them?
Did you remember to thank him?
Did you remember to thank him?
Did you remember to thank her?
Did you remember to thank her?
You're careful.
Tom passed away three days ago.
What would you do if you had a billion dollars?
What would you do if you had a billion dollars?
Tom doesn't have time to help you.
Tom doesn't have time to help you.
Tom doesn't have time to help you.
Tom doesn't have time to help you.
This situation seemed hopeless.
This situation seemed hopeless.
Advertising is everywhere.
Even Tom is a little surprised.
Beaches in Hawaii are famous for their large waves.
She's as sweet as honey.
He ate some sand.
That's not Tom's fault.
Tom has thin lips.
Let Tom go home.
Let Tom go home.
She has him wrapped around her finger.
I'll ask Tom to do that for you.
I'll ask Tom to do that for you.
I don't know why Tom isn't here.
I really need to see Tom today.
Can I speak to Tom, please?
I have my doubts about Tom.
He set out to make a movie as gruesome as humanly possible.
Harald? That is indeed an unusual name.
I almost fell into the pool.
I almost fell off the cliff.
I nearly fell into the pool.
I almost fell off the cliff.
Three workers were injured.
Try to convince Tom to help us.
Try to convince Tom to help us.
Try to convince Tom to help us.
Try to convince Tom to help us.
Try to convince Tom to help us.
I'm not Tom's mother.
I'd like to see that contract.
We took the quickest route.
Harald? What an unusual name!
I can't find Tom anywhere.
I talked him into selling his house.
I talked him into selling his house.
Tom didn't notice the bullet holes in the wall.
This is a rather unusual request.
I had a good coach.
Here's the letter from Tom.
The secretary proved to be a spy.
My advice would be to ignore Tom's advice.
Tom had a meteoric rise to fame.
Do not talk nonsense!
Yesterday, my aunt regained her sight.
I demand an investigation!
He's an hopeless idiot.
Tom was in a good mood.
It seems that Tom isn't here today.
Tom asked the stranger who he was.
There is no antidote for the venom of this snake.
Some animals, such as tigers, eat meat.
What kind of music did you listen to when you were a teenager?
What kind of music did you listen to when you were a teenager?
We're going to the beach. Are you coming?
Tom might be a traitor.
Run away!
Run away!
The patient showed the doctor his tongue.
What are you expecting Tom to do?
Have you tried turning it off and on again?
Have you tried turning it off and on again?
I'm behind schedule.
They're behind schedule.
Their lips interlocked in a long kiss.
Have you tried turning it off and on again?
Have you tried turning it off and on again?
I always brush my teeth before I go to bed.
Health is more valuable than wealth.
We're friends since Monday.
She stayed at home all day long yesterday.
Do you remember when you last saw Tom?
Do you remember when you last saw Tom?
Nobody is paying attention to Tom.
It was really incredible.
I'll ask Tom to buy tickets for us.
I'd rather not ask Tom to do that.
My conscience bothers me.
A stranger approached him.
What's the fastest way to get to the airport?
I had a talk with Tom.
Tom was shot in the leg.
Someone stole Tom's money.
Never talk to strangers.
I hardly ever talk to Tom anymore.
I knew it was Tom's handwriting.
I spoke to Tom just the other day.
I believe he said his name was Tom.
She is a teacher.
He is a singer.
She walks to work.
Are you angry at Tom?
He whispered sweet nothings into her ear.
Tom was arrested Monday evening.
I've never asked Tom to do anything.
I hope you and Tom have a good time.
I'm not going to ask Tom to do that.
All we know is that Tom is guilty.
We all know that Tom is guilty.
Tom was late for the meeting.
Tom was late for the meeting.
We want to meet Tom.
Sooner or later he will drive me mad.
The teacher explained the difference between the sentences "We all know Tom is guilty" and "All that we know is that Tom is guilty."
The ice is not thick enough to hold our weight.
Are we going for a walk?
There's no need of making such fine distinctions.
They are out of touch with reality. They only care about their power, and the money they earn.
Do you want something to read?
Do you want something to read?
Don't lose your patience!
When it's cold outside, I put my gloves on.
Tom, do you want to go to the pool with me?
Okay. Let's go to the pool.
The children want to go to the pool.
You have a sense of humor. I like that.
Tom, put these gloves on.
I'm not going to marry Tom.
He's a carbon copy of his father.
I'm a dead duck!
I don't want to be a fifth wheel.
It was just a happy accident.
You are really a lost cause.
Ask her if she'll sew up the hole in your jeans.
If I had time, I'd visit more exhibitions.
Is this your first foreign trip?
Is this your first foreign trip?
The worst comes afterwards.
Who installed the new hard drive?
How did you manage to talk Tom into working for you?
How did you manage to talk Tom into working for you?
That's my teacher.
Didn't you know that Tom could play the guitar?
Didn't you know that Tom could play the guitar?
Do you recognize him?
Do you recognize him?
If you go to pick up Tom, at what time will you be here, approximately ?
We both know what happened to Tom.
They're going to kill Tom.
There's a possibility that Tom will be late.
There are many talented people in our city, but Tom isn't one of them.
Tom has an older brother named John.
Tom has three sons and one daughter.
You were thirty minutes late.
You were thirty minutes late.
Happiness is more important than wealth.
I agree with Tom 100% on this.
The teacher is Chinese.
I like the teacher.
Tom fell from his bike.
That scenario is unlikely.
They're outside.
Tom got the ticket for free.
Tom's son was very rude to me.
She gave us a vague answer.
I need a partner.
Mary disagrees with Tom.
Tom's car is expensive.
Do you know the area well?
Do you know the area well?
Stop making a fuss over nothing.
If we continue like this, we won't get anywhere.
It is easy for a monkey to climb a tree.
Jesus turned water into wine.
I make a living playing music.
Didn't you and Tom ever do that?
The Hungarian flag is red, white and green.
He filled the cup to the brim.
So you ate at your house?
It will change your life for the worst.
Tom decided to postpone the meeting.
Please turn out the lights.
Who cares what Tom says?
What's the panic?
Tom has a little money.
Did you find a partner?
Aristotle believed that the Earth was the center of the universe.
I can't control myself.
We're going to visit Tom.
I like to listen to Tom's stories.
Are those people terrorists?
They have to be very careful.
I can't believe you're giving up.
Give me a towel.
According to the Chinese, the five elements are metal, earth, fire, water and wood.
Tom was skinny.
We'll take you home.
You're the only one who's seen Tom.
It's empty.
Tom's cheeks turned red.
Tom saw his reflection in the mirror.
Tom saw his reflection in the mirror.
A stranger spoke to me.
A stranger spoke to me.
Has Tom got a cat?
She's now older and wiser.
I always have rice for lunch.
I always have rice for lunch.
This isn't a ram, it's a goat!
This is the worst place in the world.
With whom are you eating lunch?
This road will lead you to the airport.
Did I mention that?
I'm all alone. "But that's not true. You have friends!"
I'm all alone. "But that's not true. You have friends!"
The ocean contains about 97% of all the water on Earth.
Walk or ride your bike instead of taking a car everywhere.
You have to put off your departure for England till next week.
You have to put off your departure for England till next week.
I had to put the trip on hold for the moment.
This isn't dangerous.
Tom wants you to do him a favor.
Tom wants you to do him a favor.
You were half right.
You were half right.
You were half right.
I've always loved plants.
I've always loved plants.
There was an uncomfortable silence.
Tom won the contest last year.
Tom won the contest last year.
Tom won the contest last year.
Please write down everything I say.
George Washington was born on 22nd February 1732.
Is that a public domain book?
Turn the sound off.
I think they did that on purpose.
I think they do that on purpose.
It had never occurred to her that he would be punished.
I knew that I'd break her heart, but I had no choice.
Visiting hours are almost over.
I made her a doll.
To her, lying is a second nature.
A student spends a lot of time studying.
He doesn't have enough money to buy a car.
You drive me crazy.
I wake up at six, but I don't get out of bed until seven.
I wake up at six, but I don't get out of bed until seven.
Tom was stabbed in the chest.
A son must obey his father.
Tom raised his glass.
What else did you find in Tom's apartment?
What else did you find in Tom's apartment?
What else did you find in Tom's apartment?
That's an unusual request.
Is Tom dreaming?
I'm sorry to bother you, but we've got a small problem.
I'm sorry to bother you, but we've got a small problem.
Don't they take care of the dog?
Tom begged for Maria's forgiveness.
This movie is very popular among young people.
I'm so grateful for you.
I'm so grateful for you.
I'm so grateful for you.
I'm so grateful for you.
Stay with Tom.
Stay with Tom.
I could've married Tom.
I could've married Tom.
I haven't talked to Tom.
She unbuckled her belt.
No one's blaming you.
No one's blaming you.
He told the truth, otherwise he would have been punished.
Tom is the perfect father.
I hate black humor.
I don't want to add trouble to Tom.
Want to hear a joke?
I was told you were an expert.
A look of surprise crossed Maria's face.
Tom looked through the binoculars.
You're Tom's parents, aren't you?
I'm sure I turned off the lights.
This matter is very urgent.
This matter is very urgent.
His behavior bothered me.
Tom washes his hair almost every day.
Tom washes his hair almost every day.
Please visit me tomorrow.
I want Tom left alone.
I'm surprised you remember Tom.
I'm surprised you remember Tom.
I'm surprised you remember Tom.
I'm surprised you remember Tom.
These pills will ease the pain.
Tom is convinced that he's a relative if mine.
What do I have to say to convince you?
The last time I saw Tom he was eating an apple.
I'll be right outside if you need me.
I think I should've asked Tom to help.
You recognized Tom, didn't you?
You recognized Tom, didn't you?
They held him for a few hours and then let him go free.
The bomb destroyed three houses.
He does everything carelessly.
Tom's younger brother is dumb as a brick.
We were running a little late.
It's the rainy season in Japan right now.
Stop sniveling, Tom.
Tom isn't the squeamish type.
Tom posted a picture of his puppy on Instagram.
Tom posted a picture of his puppy on Instagram.
I had strange dreams last night.
Last night, I had strange dreams.
Tom is donating blood.
Her house is surrounded by a white fence.
If you hurt her, I'll kill you.
Mary has long eyelashes.
Tom has marital problems.
I just want you to scare Tom.
Usually I wake up early.
No one can be everywhere.
I'll go shopping tomorrow.
Please give me salt and pepper.
I want to find out who broke the window.
Don't play in the street—it's dangerous.
Don't play in the street—it's dangerous.
We wanted to talk to Tom.
He spent three years in jail.
Tom's girlfriend is three years younger than he is.
You need to take these pills.
They spent the night on the beach.
What accent have I got?
I hope that my accent's good.
She didn't accept the invitation.
What does this mean for Tom?
I'm sure I can persuade Tom.
I'm trying to protect you.
I'm trying to protect you.
I'm trying to protect you.
I'm trying to protect you.
I have a friend who can fly a helicopter.
They all killed themselves.
Tom persuaded me to stay.
Tom almost got fired.
I left the car in the garage.
I left the car in the garage.
I don't know why he's so mad.
That lift makes a lot of noise.
Hurry!
Tom put his finger on his lips.
The new building has many empty apartments and few residents.
Even the bad weather failed to ruin my mood.
A bright idea occurred to me.
I don't care what Tom does with his own money.
I gave him a warning, to which he paid no attention.
Tom was electrocuted.
I didn't invite Tom.
I didn't invite Tom.
Tom wanted me to do him a favor.
I dropped my keys.
How many provinces does Canada have?
Stop calling me Tom.
Stop calling me Tom.
Stop calling me Tom.
The men are eating lunch.
He will certainly be late.
I want to save Tom.
I can't read your handwriting.
I can't read your handwriting.
Tom looks like he hasn't slept in days.
Get rid of things you don't use.
Get rid of things you don't use.
Tom tried to cover up his mistake.
It's hard to throw things out.
Tom tried to cover up his mistake.
Tom's garage is filled with things that he never uses.
Do you like silent movies?
Do you like silent movies?
I'm going to go back to the office.
Tom's apartment is spacious.
Tom's father is a Korean War veteran.
Tom is a World War II veteran.
Tom's father was a World War II veteran.
The monk is praying.
Risotto is made with arborio rice.
What a pleasant surprise!
What don't you like about your handwriting?
She thinks her job is pointless.
A cool wind is blowing from the sea.
How much do you love Tom?
How much do you love Tom?
Unfortunately, that's the reality.
Tom lives far from the airport.
She'll drop you off at the airport.
He'll drop you off at the airport.
The Pope visited Brazil.
My father takes a walk every morning.
The helicopter took off.
I can't hide my feelings.
I can't hide my feelings.
I haven't talked to Tom since.
Tom had to cancel his trip to Australia.
I'll answer questions from the audience.
It's Tom's turn to help wash the dishes.
I don't know why Tom wasn't here today.
I'm very surprised that Tom isn't here.
Form the dough into a ball.
I asked Tom to give me a second chance.
What time are you planning to meet Tom?
What time are you planning to meet Tom?
I'm not bothering you?
I am going to fly my kite this afternoon.
Where can I leave my bicycle?
Form the dough into a ball.
Tom, wake up. It's me.
It is extremely important to exercise daily.
Tom and I ate together.
I want to avoid unnecessary risks.
He was deathly afraid of Barbies.
Do you eat rice every day?
Do you eat rice every day?
Tom wants to go to Australia.
We'll eat on the way.
I wanna be cuter.
We decorated the room ourselves.
We decorated the room ourselves.
They failed the exam.
It was the window that Jack broke yesterday.
Tom has a big apartment.
Without telephones, it would be inconvenient.
Tom hid in the closet.
Tom left without warning.
Do you have friends in your class?
Please take the dishes away.
He kissed the tip of her nose.
Wool is warm.
Tom, help me. The zipper's stuck.
Don't bring food inside the tent. It will attract animals.
Men sometimes perceive expressing emotions as a sign of weakness.
It's okay to feel emotions.
The conference ends tomorrow.
You are two years younger than Tom.
You are two years younger than Tom.
The refrigerator door is open.
The refrigerator door is open.
Stop speaking in riddles.
Today I'll go to the cinema with Tom's brother.
Where do you usually eat lunch?
What do you think about Catalunya's independence?
I don't like the taste of alcohol.
Milk is a food for babies.
She pleaded with him to not leave.
She didn't mean to offend anyone with her remark.
The pool is empty.
I'm going to stop Tom.
You're perfect.
I didn't mean to scare you.
I didn't mean to scare you.
I didn't mean to scare you.
I didn't mean to scare you.
I didn't mean to scare you.
I didn't mean to scare you.
I didn't mean to scare you.
I didn't mean to scare you.
Tom has already published three books.
I'm pleasantly surprised by that.
Where do you usually eat lunch?
Tom is impossible to beat.
Tom jumped into the freezing water.
Don't listen to Tom. He's lying to you.
Don't listen to Tom. He's lying to you.
Don't listen to her. She's lying to you.
Don't listen to her. She's lying to you.
Don't listen to him. Tom is lying to you.
Don't listen to him. Tom is lying to you.
Don't listen to him. He's lying to you.
Don't listen to him. He's lying to you.
The older, the wiser.
I hate riddles.
My heart aches from love.
My teeth ache from the operation.
Give her a doll.
I've got a busy schedule.
I wanted to sink through the floor.
Tom wanted to sink through the floor.
How much is this ball?
Her dress leaves nothing to the imagination.
The sight of blood made her excited.
Tom is both her friend and lover.
Tom shot her.
Pine trees can grow up to thirty meters tall.
There were no other survivors.
I shouldn't have gotten involved.
I said good night to my parents and went to bed.
The wind is blowing into my face.
What bus do I need to take to get to the airport?
Tom looked for his glasses.
I'm sure I turned off the gas.
Find Tom before he tells someone.
Find Tom before he tells someone.
Find Tom before he tells someone.
Find Tom before he tells someone.
Tom was given a medal.
My mother is always poking her nose into my private life.
I think that you and Tom could make a cute couple.
Don't take it seriously. It's a joke.
Don't take it seriously. It's a joke.
Sorry I couldn't refuse her.
Sorry I couldn't refuse her.
I heard a noise outside.
I heard a noise outside.
She caught his eye immediately.
He caught her eye immediately.
Tom was attacked by a grizzly bear.
Tom carefully removed the bandage.
What's the first thing you do when you wake up?
Dry your face with a towel.
He is not an American but a Frenchman.
She thought he might be feeling lonely and forgotten.
It's not free.
I think about Tom often.
Can you tell me the time, please?
Do you know Tom Jackson?
Do you know Tom Jackson?
Do you know Tom Jackson?
I listened to the boring lecture for what seemed an interminable fifty minutes.
I think we should have turned left at that last intersection instead of right.
My name is Thomas, but you can call me Tom.
My mother calls me Thomas, but everyone else calls me Tom.
Street racing is dangerous and stupid.
Tom's life was changed forever.
You have a strange sense of humor.
You have a strange sense of humor.
I'm not perfect.
Isn't life just great?
Tom's room was very clean.
Does Tom have an older brother?
I talked to Tom a couple times.
I talked to Tom a couple times.
She wasn't wealthy enough to feed her dog meat every day.
My mom still calls me Tom.
Tom was killed in a car crash.
Our patient is regaining consciousness.
That would be sad.
I said I didn't know Tom.
I said I didn't know Tom.
Tom always had a lot of money.
Prices will increase after October 20th.
There was a girl in Tom's car.
There was blood on Tom's face.
You can't change Tom.
You can't change Tom.
Leave it to the professionals.
Leave it to the professionals.
I make a good living.
The basket was empty.
The basket was empty.
It's only a guess.
We all agreed with Tom.
She asked me to read 5 poems.
He asked me to read 5 poems.
The doctor examines the patient.
You're so impatient.
The seeds of that tree are yellow.
You're so impatient.
The seeds of that tree are yellow.
You're so impatient.
You're so impatient.
You're so impatient.
You're so impatient.
You're so impatient.
You're so impatient.
Tom is boring, isn't he?
Tom is boring, isn't he?
I'm utterly speechless. Need I say more?
I loved going to the beach.
Tom's death wasn't a suicide.
He died when he was seventy years old.
Tom's blood type is O negative.
Gas prices are up.
Come to my office.
Come to my office.
I'll always love Tom.
Tom has an Android phone.
No complaints have been reported.
The customer isn't always right.
Tom pleaded guilty.
Are you a real nurse?
Tom's helpless.
One suspect has been identified.
It's wrong to trick people like that.
This is the perfect location.
How long will you remain in Tokyo? "Until Friday."
Tom can't come to the office today.
Monsanto controls 27% of the world seed market.
Does Tom want me to drive him to the airport?
They didn't give me a choice.
He knew he did not have much longer to live.
I don't see Tom as often as I'd like.
Tom is always in a bad mood.
We planted rice.
I was with Tom the night he died.
Mine is 20 centimeters long.
Perhaps I expected too much from Tom.
By signing a contract, you agree to certain terms and conditions.
We have complete confidence in Tom.
Tom is skinny.
My father fell ill because he worked too hard.
We can't just leave Tom here alone.
We can't just leave Tom here alone.
Tom has been behaving suspiciously.
You and I both know that's not true.
You and I both know that's not true.
No one has seen Tom for three days.
I don't think you should marry Tom.
I don't think you should marry Tom.
I know Tom did it on purpose.
I know you did it on purpose.
I know you did it on purpose.
I know she did it on purpose.
How dare you talk about Tom like that!
How dare you talk about Tom like that!
Tom fell asleep the moment his head hit the pillow.
Boxes were everywhere.
We'll set up camp here.
Tom had one brother and three sisters.
I'm a ghost.
Tung oil is made from the seeds of the Tung tree.
They don't want to get out of bed.
Garbage was everywhere.
Tom is a player.
Why don't you call Tom?
Why don't you call Tom?
The castle is in need of urgent repairs.
We set up our tent and built a campfire.
Tom began to brush his teeth.
I know where they're taking Tom.
I know where they're taking Tom.
Tom and his friends went to the circus.
Tom's friends were all laughing at me.
Are you sure you don't know Tom?
Are you sure you don't know Tom?
Tell me the name of the ninth month.
Tell me the name of the ninth month.
Tell me the name of the ninth month.
Tell me the name of the ninth month.
The procedure is the same.
The baby fell into the well.
Tom clearly has a problem.
Why are you asking Tom?
Why are you asking Tom?
Tom and I are both a little busy.
I asked Tom why he wasn't here yesterday.
Tom can play the guitar, I think.
Tom is small for his age.
Tom has a difficult job.
I caught Tom.
I checked the date.
Tom has a wife and two children.
Tom didn't have time to do his homework.
Tom is going to be late.
I can't ask Tom to do that.
I don't need an interpreter.
The park was almost empty.
How many men named Tom do you know?
How many men named Tom do you know?
I wanted Tom to drive me to school.
I wanted Tom to drive me to school.
These are decisions I want to make alone.
Do you want me to bring my guitar?
Tom was completely helpless.
She came running to him.
They just want an excuse to fire you.
They just want an excuse to fire you.
Don't tilt your chair.
Tom has a nose ring.
I'm taking away your phone.
Tell me this isn't true.
We swam in the moonlight.
What do you find so interesting about Tom?
What do you find so interesting about Tom?
I look after my grandfather.
This is unequivocally the worst meal I have ever had.
I found a pair of gloves under the chair.
Tomorrow there's a high probability it will rain.
Has Tom been arrested?
They rented the upstairs room to a student.
Ladies also play with the ball.
You were handsome.
Tom picked up a rock and threw it.
It's time to wind up.
That worries me.
Who took these pictures?
It'll come in handy.
I assure you this isn't just about money.
I assure you this isn't just about money.
Not everything is about money.
Tom's name was on the box.
This shop has more candy than that shop.
Tom ran out of the room.
Would you like to see Tom?
Would you like to see Tom?
Who broke the plate?
I really want to see Tom today.
It's easy for Tom.
I couldn't have done that without Tom's help.
I spoke to Tom about that just the other day.
Somebody attacked Tom.
Why did you kiss Tom?
Why did you kiss Tom?
All of Tom's friends laughed at me.
You shouldn't have talked to Tom like that.
What's wrong with Tom today?
I'll ask Tom to make you something to eat.
I'll ask Tom to make you something to eat.
The investigation is still ongoing.
The helicopter gently touched down.
The envelope's already been opened.
Tom's room was pretty clean.
Tom's room was pretty clean.
It's very low.
Tom was treated like a king.
I'm stuck in the mud.
Do you know how to drive this thing?
Tom washes his car at least once a week.
The police found drugs in Tom's house.
It was Tom who drove us home last night.
Tom's injuries aren't life-threatening.
It was a perfect day for a wedding.
I'm glad I'm not late.
I don't know Tom well enough to ask him to do that.
Tom won't be arrested.
I asked Tom to stop following us.
I didn't go to the funeral.
I didn't go to the funeral.
I didn't go to the funeral.
I didn't go to the funeral.
I appreciate it very much.
No one is immortal.
Tom sends more than a hundred text messages a day.
Only one man survived.
Tom died in a train accident.
What makes you so sure Tom was the one who stole your bicycle?
What makes you so sure Tom was the one who stole your bicycle?
It took us a long time to find Tom.
Tom had no problem with that.
Tom had a knife in his hands.
Somebody has broken into my house.
We won't be able to survive without your help.
We won't be able to survive without your help.
We're not officially dating.
This company is building a factory in China.
Do you want me to ask Tom?
Do you want me to ask Tom?
I saw Tom on Monday.
Tom has very broad shoulders.
We'll probably never know what happened to Tom.
It doesn't matter to me, but it matters to Tom.
Tom doesn't have enough money to buy a new car.
Tom lives about thirty minutes from the airport.
His dog follows him everywhere.
Tom pressed an ice pack to his head.
I don't want this day to end.
It's in my backpack.
It's in my backpack.
It's in my backpack.
How did you survive?
My parents have kicked me out of the house.
I'm not strong enough.
Tom has tiny hands.
I'm not in love with him. We're just good friends.
Tom has a nice voice.
Tom has a rich uncle.
They call me Tom.
We shouldn't expect too much help from Tom.
Everybody was clapping.
He's a salesman too.
My car isn't powerful enough.
Change the flag.
Tom's dog stood up.
Tom's dog lay down.
Tom felt someone touch his arm.
Tom was popular.
Tom put the coins into the box.
Tell us what happened to Tom.
Tell us what happened to Tom.
Tell us what happened to Tom.
Tell us what happened to Tom.
She moved to England.
Tom has enough money.
Tom said that he was going to be late.
Nobody's going to blame you.
Nobody's going to blame you.
Tom is a ghostwriter.
You're worse than Tom.
You're worse than Tom.
We went skiing in Canada.
Are you saying I have no sense of humor?
Are you saying I have no sense of humor?
We're proud of Tom.
Let me take you to the hospital.
Let me take you to the hospital.
I spent Monday with Tom.
That's all nonsense.
We're all retired.
You should brush your teeth after every meal.
Tom has enough money to buy everything he wants.
My coach helped me.
Tom likes fruit.
Please go with Tom.
Please go with Tom.
Please go with Tom.
Please go with Tom.
Is Tom your name?
Tom has a Ford.
Tom has a soft voice.
Stop pulling your sister's hair.
Stop pulling your sister's hair.
This is Tom's bag.
Tom has a warm heart.
Excuse me, have you seen Tom?
Is that a bullet hole?
Tom and I will help you.
This scares the shit out of me.
You're not tall enough.
People don't believe your silly propaganda!
You're not very polite.
You're not very polite.
Tom picked up a coin.
Food is running low.
Take your shoes off.
Dress warmly!
Dress warmly!
Do you find me repulsive? "No, not all."
Do you find me repulsive? "No, of course not."
I get the impression that Tom is in love with you.
Tom is having financial problems.
Tom sells vegetables on the side of the road.
Tom wanted a bicycle.
I love Tom so much.
We want to find Tom.
Tom was teleported to another planet.
We think it's fair.
We'll all miss you.
We'll all miss you.
I didn't understand the joke.
You said we'd never catch Tom.
You said we'd never catch Tom.
I spoke with Tom today.
I spoke with Tom today.
We're grateful to you for all your help.
Don't you miss your father?
Don't you miss your father?
Tom won a gold medal.
Tom finished the bottle of wine by himself.
I despise this music.
Tom flosses his teeth several times a week.
Tom has three cows.
He walked home.
Tom had no money with him at that time.
We can't satisfy everyone.
Tom misses his wife.
Put the car into the garage.
Did you recognize Tom?
It's useless to try.
We don't want to lose.
I've hired Tom.
They hired Tom.
He hired Tom.
She hired Tom.
Tom was hired.
When was Tom hired?
When was Tom hired?
Did you hire Tom?
I want to hire Tom.
I didn't hire Tom.
I know you hired Tom.
I know you hired Tom.
We'd never hire Tom.
She hired him as an interpreter.
I think we should hire Tom.
You won't regret hiring Tom.
You won't regret hiring Tom.
I never should've hired Tom.
You hired Tom, didn't you?
You hired Tom, didn't you?
We've decided to hire Tom.
Why didn't you hire Tom?
Why didn't you hire Tom?
Why didn't you hire Tom?
Why didn't you hire Tom?
Tom drowned in the river.
Tom is our teacher.
Tom has a weight problem.
Tom has a younger sister.
What happened to Tom's car?
What happened to Tom's car?
Tom had a son named John.
The fight didn't last long.
How many cars does Tom have?
If I were a rich man, I wouldn't have to work hard.
All the men in Tom's family are bald.
The situation was very tense.
The situation was very tense.
Why don't you just talk to Tom?
Why don't you just talk to Tom?
I saw you talking to Tom earlier.
I saw you talking to Tom earlier.
I went to the airport to see him off.
I had no friends except for Tom.
Tom suffers from chronic back pain.
I almost feel bad for Tom.
The temperature is currently ten degrees below zero.
It's not what you say that counts, but how you say it.
The road is under construction.
I'm sure we'll see Tom again.
Tom and I go out together.
Tom needs a helmet.
How was your trip to Australia?
How was your trip to Australia?
Tom and I didn't like each other.
Tom and I didn't like each other.
Tom was killed on Monday.
Tom gives me the creeps.
Tom talked me into going.
Tom talked me into going.
The wind is blowing at an incredible speed.
Tom told me a joke.
Tom has three girlfriends.
Tom stole my candy.
We haven't talked to Tom yet.
We haven't talked to Tom yet.
We haven't talked to Tom yet.
Thanks for sharing your thoughts.
Thanks for sharing your thoughts.
The money we offered them was obviously not enough.
Ask Tom where he is.
Ask Tom where he is.
We haven't seen Tom in weeks.
This restaurant is always crowded.
It's useless to even try.
You really do hate me, don't you?
We'll visit you tomorrow.
You will miss the train.
You will miss the train.
Tom has lung cancer.
Who knows when Tom's birthday is?
Tom has his own car.
Tom has his own car.
We got what we deserved.
Tom has a long neck.
I don't remember the exact date.
I don't remember the exact date.
Tom has a big truck.
Tom had a black cat.
Tom had a black cat.
Tom is a used car salesman.
How many times do you wash your hands every day?
How many times do you wash your hands every day?
What happened to Tom's passport?
What happened to Tom's passport?
Tom hasn't been seen since.
Tom's parents live in South America.
We shouldn't stand in Tom's way.
It was very dark in Tom's room.
It was very dark in Tom's room.
Where are the games being held?
I dreamed about Tom last night.
Tom became a singer.
Tom became a dancer.
We're going to miss Tom a lot.
Tom isn't fit for the job.
Any further discussion is pointless.
The badly decomposed body of a young girl was found on the side of a highway.
We haven't seen Tom in a long time.
I agree with Tom a hundred percent.
Tom's problems aren't over.
We're not going to force Tom to do that.
We haven't talked to Tom about that yet.
Tom walked home from school.
Tom married a nurse.
Tom obviously has a problem.
If Tom messes up again, he's going to get fired.
I want to get in touch with her.
Tom has sore toes.
Did I wake Tom up?
Tom always peels apples before he eats them.
Tom looked for the rope.
Who are you angry at?
Who are you angry at?
Tom is nowhere in sight.
Please take us there.
Please take us there.
You dropped your key.
You dropped your key.
Tom has excellent taste.
You may wait outside.
Tom tried to hide his excitement.
This is your final warning.
Sorry, I'm late.
I'm bored right now.
I want to give up.
I persuaded my brother to participate.
I persuaded my brother to participate.
Just get rid of it.
What are you and Tom doing tomorrow?
No one knows how many people died in that battle.
Tom wants to be a diplomat.
Apparently, Tom doesn't like me.
This is how to cook rice.
Tom left the office early.
Take a short walk every day.
You need new shoes.
That doesn't scare me one bit.
Please come to my office.
I don't care, and neither should you.
What does your father do for a living?
Why are you making faces?
I'm going to visit Tom today.
Eleven students received the award.
He will break up with her.
Watch your head.
You left your headlights on.
You left your headlights on.
Tom's appetite was good.
Can you take me home?
Could you please tell me how to get to the airport?
I hope Tom doesn't lose.
Tom's wife left him.
We have plenty money.
I wonder who killed Tom.
Call me if you find Tom.
Call me if you find Tom.
She never stays long.
He never stays long.
He misses his father.
She misses her father.
Tom is very warmhearted.
Tom isn't even here yet.
Every dog has a name.
You know how Tom is.
I just thought you were bored.
She moved in to the new house.
Tom is respected by everyone.
Tom found my bike.
Tom can't tell jokes.
Tom bought some rice.
Tom would defend me.
Tom has a lot of friends now.
Tom had good reason to worry.
Tom didn't join us for lunch.
Tom didn't join us for lunch.
Can I eat in my room?
Tom is going to make it.
Tom is washing your car.
I have pictures of Tom.
Everybody calls him Tom.
Tom has charisma.
Sorry for being so late.
Sorry for being so late.
It has a hole in it.
It has a hole in it.
It has a hole in it.
It doesn't worry me.
Tom has a good salary.
Tom dropped the glass.
Is Tom running away?
Tom doesn't tell lies.
Where did you drive them?
Where did you drive them?
Tom looks very afraid.
You shouldn't have run away.
You shouldn't have run away.
I was talking with Tom.
Tom married a teacher.
Did you get in touch with Tom?
Tom is not a bad person.
You will eat.
You will eat.
Tom did that on purpose.
I have to be careful.
I have to be careful.
Are you good at math?
Tom isn't very talented.
They both looked at Tom.
They both looked at Tom.
We went to the beach.
You should thank him.
You should thank him.
You should thank him.
You should thank him.
Our team has good players.
At least, no one was hurt.
They won't fire me.
I'd like to forget Tom.
We work in a factory.
I don't like to walk.
I've missed Tom so much.
I've missed Tom so much.
Do you have a garage?
We can't leave Tom here.
Why is my life so boring?
We'll all miss you, Tom.
We need to wait for Tom.
We'd better wake Tom up.
It wasn't on purpose.
Tom wants a motorcycle.
Thanks for the fruit.
Tell Tom I said goodbye.
Tell Tom I said goodbye.
Tell me how to find Tom.
Tell me how to find Tom.
Tom can't stay long.
Where are we headed?
You're a good singer.
You're a good singer.
I think about Tom a lot.
We could talk about Tom.
Do you have a theory?
Do you have a lawyer?
Do you have a lawyer?
Can I drive you home?
Can I drive you home?
You have to talk to Tom.
I never had a chance.
Give Tom another chance.
Give Tom another chance.
I gave Tom another chance.
I can't wait to see Tom.
I was tired and cold.
I'd not recommend it.
Tom has dark brown hair.
I'd be very grateful.
I wouldn't blame you.
I wouldn't blame you.
Tom is white as a sheet.
Tom went home on foot.
I know you're talented.
I know you're talented.
I'll eat standing up.
I'll drive you there.
I'll drive you there.
That boy's name is Tom.
Let's go say hi to Tom.
Let's go say hi to Tom.
Tom smells like a dog.
I begged Tom to help me.
Tom has gone out to eat.
Tom also has a brother.
Tom isn't giving up yet.
Tom almost convinced me.
Ask Tom how he got here.
Ask Tom how he got here.
Ask Tom how he got here.
Ask Tom how he got here.
Irritating, isn't it?
Incredible, isn't it?
Does Tom have gray hair?
The room was crowded.
Tom sticks out like a sore thumb.
They're in my office.
They're all barefoot.
Have you seen Tom today?
This is a message for Tom.
You have to eat before you go.
You have to eat before you go.
Please wait a minute!
Did you get a sunburn? The tip of your nose is completely red.
We're talking about Tom.
Are you looking for Tom?
Are you looking for Tom?
Are you looking for Tom?
I know you're guilty.
I know you're guilty.
I know you miss them.
I knew you'd miss me.
I knew you'd miss me.
I have an invitation.
Tom and I are newcomers.
I got sick last week.
I was losing balance.
Get Tom out of my sight.
You know Tom, don't you?
You know Tom, don't you?
You know Tom, don't you?
You know Tom, don't you?
I never listened to Tom.
Didn't you eat lunch?
Tom is in a lot of pain.
I didn't see a ghost.
Don't try to hide it.
Tom has a Japanese car.
He got up at once, struck a match, and looked at the time. It was exactly one o'clock.
Are you giving up so soon?
Are you giving up so soon?
Take it to the repair shop.
Take it to the repair shop.
Take it to the repair shop.
Take it to the repair shop.
Tom drives an old Ford.
Tom has tried to kill himself again.
Tom has long hair and wears glasses.
Tom deserved the prize.
I've never heard of Tom.
Tom and I share a room.
I share a room with Tom.
Tom hid behind the sofa.
Tom hid behind the sofa.
I met Tom on the street.
That's so incredible.
You wouldn't survive.
You wouldn't survive.
Tom and I will help you.
Tom and I have to leave.
Tom and I are very busy.
Let's go back to the garage.
Tom has a lot of debts.
We know how to find Tom.
We usually call him Tom.
Only three people were hurt.
We haven't lost yet.
Give me those gloves.
Tom had no other choice.
They're awfully nosy.
They won't intervene.
They won't intervene.
They're all upstairs.
Why aren't you at Tom's?
Why aren't you at Tom's?
Where is Tom being held?
He laughed nervously.
I'm here to pick up Tom.
Baby teeth are sharp.
We can't protect you.
We can't protect you.
I worked in this factory.
Tom gave a bitter laugh.
I'm going to be sick.
I'll be in my office.
I still can't reach Tom.
I should go talk to Tom.
I said I'd wait for Tom.
We're not blaming you.
We're not blaming you.
I was dreaming about you.
It's hard to surprise you.
It's hard to surprise you.
I only meant to scare you.
I made Tom a promise.
I won't try to persuade you.
I won't try to persuade you.
I won't try to persuade you.
I won't try to persuade you.
I'm sure I can persuade you.
I'm sure I can persuade you.
You missed them, didn't you?
You missed them, didn't you?
I was hoping to surprise you.
I was hoping to surprise you.
I have to ask Tom first.
I have to meet with Tom.
I've told you about Tom.
I've told you about Tom.
I heard they caught Tom.
I dreamed about Tom.
I need to speak with Tom.
I go to school with Tom.
You miss Tom, don't you?
You miss Tom, don't you?
You saw Tom, didn't you?
You saw Tom, didn't you?
I asked Tom to call you.
I asked Tom to call you.
You don't even know Tom.
You don't even know Tom.
You don't even know Tom.
Why didn't you stop Tom?
You must not give up.
I didn't know about Tom.
Tom is very independent.
I like to read jokes.
I was always a loner.
Tom is completely sober.
We can't give up now.
He wears an eyepatch.
She wears an eyepatch.
Tom was carrying a heavy backpack.
Don't interrupt me, Tom.
Write down each word.
Write down each word.
I'm Tom's new assistant.
I'm Tom's new secretary.
Tom's hands are shaking.
Leave Tom alone, please.
Leave Tom alone, please.
Do you want to meet Tom?
Do you want to meet Tom?
Tom sold three refrigerators today.
Tom cares a lot about the way he looks.
You disgust me.
This is Tom's bicycle.
Tom wants to protect me.
I want to take Tom home.
It was too expensive.
He and I are friends.
Is Tom in trouble again?
Tom can't survive alone.
I can't find Tom either.
I'd like to go with Tom.
I'd like to go with Tom.
Tom can't be left alone.
He broke his promise.
Would you recognize Tom?
Tom didn't kill himself.
I don't mind walking.
Tom misses his daughter.
Ask Tom not to go there.
Ask Tom not to go there.
I ran into my friend.
I ran into my friend.
Tom is a sincere person.
Tom is a talented actor.
I didn't read it all.
I didn't read it all.
Tom suffers from chronic pain.
Tom suffers from chronic back pain.
Are you taking notes?
Are you taking notes?
I am sure of his accepting our invitation.
This novel is boring.
Tom's not in the office.
Please eat something.
Please eat something.
They named their son Tom.
Tom broke the cup.
It was me who killed Tom.
I'll always remember Tom.
I really want to see Tom.
I taught him to ride a bicycle.
I like shopping with Tom.
I've been in constant contact with Tom.
We'll never give up.
Tom never makes his bed.
I'm meeting Tom in an hour.
Tom seems sincere.
Tom and I were both drunk.
I've finally gotten used to living here.
I don't even know what Tom's real name is.
Don't forget your promise.
Don't forget your promise.
Tom is disgusting.
I thought you were retired.
I tried to convince Tom to help us.
I tried to convince Tom to help us.
I just got a message from Tom.
I just got a message from Tom.
I'm offering you the chance to be happy.
I'm offering you the chance to be happy.
I use flashcards to study French vocabulary.
What kind of shoes are you looking for?
What kind of shoes are you looking for?
Tom wants to be a pilot.
I like the way Tom plays the guitar.
You'd better stop Tom.
You'd better stop Tom.
Can I go with Tom?
Let's keep in touch by e-mail.
I've got to be careful.
Can you send me a screenshot?
We'll share our food with them.
I hope to live in a mansion someday.
Don't hesitate to ask.
Don't hesitate to ask.
The implication was clear.
The implication was clear.
My motorcycle is new.
Tom was invited.
She's unfit for the job.
We'll have to find Tom ourselves.
Tom drowned in his bathtub.
Tom has more experience than I do.
How many times a year do you go to the beach?
How many times a year do you go to the beach?
Tom didn't want to get out of bed.
Tom isn't naive.
My head is killing me.
He breathed his last.
He is wearing gloves.
He mocked my efforts.
I never liked Tom much.
I hope to see Tom soon.
Let's not wait for Tom.
I never saw Tom before today.
Are you and Tom enemies?
Tom will walk to school tomorrow.
Tom also has a daughter.
Can I have some more candy?
Tom was surprised, too.
My old job was extremely boring.
You can just call me Tom.
You can just call me Tom.
Tom has even more books than I do.
He watched her making a doll.
She's slim, but short.
I don't want to be the one who breaks the news to her.
Tom isn't the champion.
Tom hasn't done enough.
He told a good joke.
When did he fall ill?
Tom got drunk last night.
You don't value me.
Will anyone be fired?
I didn't tell you to fire Tom.
I agree with Tom's opinion.
I agree with Tom's opinion.
I'm not always so lenient.
Is it open on Sunday?
Tom's apartment is small, but it's very cozy.
I would like to speak with Tom.
They rolled around in the grass.
Tom and I were alone.
This music is popular with young people.
This music is popular with young people.
The eagle soared majestically above the snow-covered peaks.
We chose Tom to be captain.
Tom dressed like a girl.
You forgot to mention Tom.
You forgot to mention Tom.
History is repeating itself again.
It's nice to be appreciated.
Tom didn't stop talking.
It's impossible to describe.
We're here to support Tom.
We're here to support Tom.
Tom hasn't signed the contract yet.
We're not surprised.
I visited Tom yesterday.
I visited Tom yesterday.
They named their baby Tom.
They named their baby Tom.
Tom's flight has just taken off.
Tom eats a lot of fruit.
A north wind is blowing.
Let's take a picture.
You don't value me.
We knew Tom had talent.
Why do you always take Tom's side?
Let's continue this discussion tomorrow.
I looked for the key.
There's no use arguing with Tom.
There's around 6 billion people in the world.
That disc cost ten dollars.
Jack's problem is that his wife spends more than he earns.
Replay the last 10 seconds.
Tom is my ideal man.
Today I'm having lunch with my brother.
It's hard to persuade Jonathan.
Can you show me the definition?
It took some time before he realized his mistake.
Do you have any idea who's behind this?
I want to talk to you outside.
We clapped our hands.
How much does Tom make?
Has Tom been convicted?
Why should I thank Tom?
Why do you take everything so seriously?
Why do you take everything so seriously?
I saw him run away.
There may be a problem with Tom.
When can I visit you?
When can I visit you?
Tom has a great memory.
Tom's answer was wrong.
Tom's answer was right.
Don't leave things half finished.
Don't leave things half finished.
Such is the cold in the Alps that the snow there never melts.
Tom has to be punished.
It's my turn to wash the dishes.
Tom has no friends here.
Does Tom have green eyes?
We'll certainly invite Tom.
Does Tom have a computer?
Tom has long brown hair.
You need to help me find Tom.
We're not angry.
I wanted to go there.
I looked at Tom's face.
Bring me a dry towel.
I miss you very much.
I asked for Tom's help.
Luckily, Tom was there.
This isn't gasoline.
I dream every night.
Tom was very energetic.
Tom was very emotional.
Will I have to move?
No one dances sober.
I bet Tom will be late.
Tom is in love with me.
In Japan people take off their shoes when they enter a house.
I was at Tom's concert.
The street is empty.
Tom says he's homesick.
You're just envious.
I was with Tom from 8:30 to 2:30.
I was with Tom from 8:30 to 2:30.
I'll help you find Tom.
I'll help you find Tom.
I can't understand Tom.
Stop talking about Tom.
Stop talking about Tom.
Stop talking about Tom.
Everybody's at risk.
Are you doing that on purpose?
Are you doing that on purpose?
Are you doing that on purpose?
Are you doing that on purpose?
Are they going to arrest Tom?
Thank you for your detailed explanation.
We're all going to miss Tom.
I saw Tom at the library.
My parents made me sell my motorcycle.
I haven't seen Tom yet.
Tom took one of his gloves off.
They didn't give up.
Why do you care what other people think?
Why do you care what other people think?
I thought it was Tom's.
Have you been fired?
Have you been fired?
Tom wasn't a bit tired.
We don't know much about Tom.
Do you like the people leading the country?
Tom often skipped class.
The second woman to fly in space was Svetlana Savytskaya in 1982 onboard Soyuz T-7.
Tom is not a drug dealer, he's a rug dealer.
If you had one word to describe Tom, how would you describe him?
Tom had no such problem.
Tom's clothes are disheveled.
I don't think Tom is crazy.
I lie to Tom all time.
Whose idea was it to fire Tom?
Tom is very hard to please.
I couldn't get rid of it.
I couldn't get rid of it.
I expect Tom back soon.
I can't call Tom.
She ripped his shirt open.
You should visit Tom.
Tom had a terrible childhood.
Tom has an aunt who is in prison.
Tom is completely bald.
Tom's mood has changed.
Why did Tom attack you?
Why did Tom attack you?
It's useless to beg.
Tom opened his backpack.
We've learned a lot from Tom.
We shouldn't give up.
Just ask Tom to help you.
Just ask Tom to help you.
We weren't talking about Tom.
We weren't talking about Tom.
I'll visit Tom next week.
Tom often appears on TV.
They all looked at Tom.
I'm not jealous of Tom.
You were very clear.
You were very clear.
Tom wasn't there today.
Tom unzipped his pants.
Tom unzipped his pants.
Tom unzipped his pants.
Tom was very surprised.
I'm cold and hungry.
I'll miss you a lot.
I'll miss you a lot.
We know very little about Tom.
Should I ask Tom to help?
Britain is leaving the European Union.
Did you see Tom's face?
Did you see Tom's face?
What a tragic story!
Tom works in a factory.
I don't want to fight with Tom.
We were all helpless.
Tom scared the children.
I try to keep my promises.
Tom is a talented artist.
Tom interpreted for me.
I feel like a slave.
Tom wasn't very polite.
Tom was hard to please.
Why did you invite Tom?
I think Tom misses you.
I think Tom misses you.
I miss my parents so much.
We'll never let Tom go.
Let's take Tom with us.
Let's take Tom with us.
Why did you let Tom go?
Why did you let Tom go?
Why did you attack Tom?
Why did you attack Tom?
Does Tom have any pets?
His name escapes me.
She lives a few blocks away from here.
It's still dark out.
Can I see Tom a moment?
It's not a bad plan.
We know what this means to Tom.
I think you'll lose.
I think you'll lose.
Some people walk to work.
Tom already has our permission.
Tom broke his new toy.
Close the refrigerator.
Come at eleven without fail.
The cabinet resigned.
Thunderstorms are scary.
Tom is teaching me to paint.
We can hide in here.
Put aside those fears.
Is this man threatening you?
Tom took out a notepad.
I am giving you an order.
Reality is scary.
We don't have enough beer.
Love is immortal.
That's why I'm late.
I told Tom a few jokes.
Who told you about Tom?
I think Tom is sincere.
Did you speak with Tom?
Could you speak to Tom?
Could you speak to Tom?
The office is empty.
You'll have to ask Tom.
You'll have to ask Tom.
Tom has a blue bicycle.
Thank Tom for the help.
Do you recognize me?
The window was open.
Give Tom a kiss for me.
Tom is on duty tonight.
How did I miss this?
When I was three years old, my name was changed from Tom to John.
Would you excuse us?
I forgot to send you an e-mail.
Get your hands off Tom.
Get your hands off Tom.
Get your hands off Tom.
Many children are playing on the beach.
Tom was wearing a mask.
Besides him, I'm simply a beginner.
Two to the fourth is sixteen.
I won a medal in 2003.
I won a medal in 2003.
I won a medal in 2003.
He climbed to the summit of the mountain.
His intentions were unclear.
Have you found Tom yet?
You'd better watch Tom.
You'd better watch Tom.
We'll take you home.
We're going to lose.
Tom screamed in terror.
We still haven't heard from Tom.
Did you hear Tom's speech?
Did you hear Tom's speech?
Tom still has a chance to win.
It won't be long before that happens.
We're not going to talk to Tom.
Tom went to school by bicycle.
Tom went to school by bicycle.
I've had a very busy week.
They're pretty loud.
Tom built a doghouse yesterday.
We were way too lenient on Tom.
He got sick during the trip.
I've always respected Tom.
I've always respected Tom.
Tom had an upset stomach.
Tom has swallowed it.
This question is closely related to that one.
Tom has enough money to buy anything he wants.
There are no towels.
I can't believe that you kissed Tom.
I can't believe that you kissed Tom.
We'll miss you, too.
We'll miss you, too.
May I speak frankly?
Tom made a mountain out of a molehill.
Are you independent?
Are you independent?
This was in Tom's safe.
Did Tom break your heart?
You should ask Tom for advice.
You should ask Tom for advice.
I begged Tom not to go.
I begged Tom not to go.
It's cooler tonight.
Tom wiped his forehead.
Do you really love Tom?
What's Tom's wife like?
Tom is just learning to crawl.
Kissing Tom was a mistake.
I dreamed about you the other day.
I dreamed about you the other day.
I didn't know Tom had a horse.
The bullet penetrated the wall.
Are these Tom's gloves?
I'm in the pool every day in the summer.
What is the likelihood of survival?
She told me that she has something more urgent to do.
I thought you knew Tom.
I thought you knew Tom.
I thought you knew Tom.
It's Tom's only chance.
It's Tom's only chance.
How serious is Tom's sickness? - "We should fear the worst."
Turn it upside down.
Turn it upside down.
Turn it upside down.
Turn it upside down.
Tom and I are partners.
Look out the window.
He lost his balance.
Have you decided where we are having lunch?
Have you decided where we are having lunch?
We're so grateful.
Tom took a book out of his knapsack and started reading.
Tom took a book out of his knapsack and started reading.
We're all winners.
Were you hurt?
Were you hurt?
Tom's father died before he was born and his mother died shortly after he was born.
I'll ask Tom to go to the supermarket and buy some eggs.
Should I ask Tom for help?
Should I ask Tom for help?
Should I ask Tom for help?
Tom carried out his plan.
Tom had a headache.
Tom barely escaped death.
I ran into Tom on the bus.
I ran into Tom on the bus.
The water was turned on.
Tom's clothes are dirty.
Tom can't be fired.
I'm late for dinner.
I'm late for dinner.
Why did you interfere?
Why did you interfere?
We're always very careful.
The man Tom is talking to is a lawyer.
Why are you following us?
Why are you following us?
I never want to see Tom again.
I asked Tom why he thought that was important.
Tom punished his children for what they did.
We haven't given up yet.
Tom never said goodbye.
I asked Tom what movie he wanted to watch.
We haven't heard from Tom in a long time.
Turn it off, please.
Turn it off, please.
Turn it off, please.
Turn it off, please.
Turn it off, please.
Turn it off, please.
Tom refilled his glass.
The house was empty.
Tom's room is still empty.
What are Tom's options?
I'm calling from Tom's.
My mother asked me to set the table.
Antigua and Barbuda is an independent country.
We have to find out what happened to Tom.
We have to find out what happened to Tom.
I'll ask Tom to go to the supermarket and buy some eggs.
I'm taking Tom with me.
It happens automatically.
They sold a refrigerator.
She didn't resist for long.
He lost hope and killed himself with poison.
This shoe fits me well.
Old friends contacted me.
I'm glad Tom isn't here anymore.
I don't have a lover.
I asked Tom where he had bought his car.
I asked Tom where he had bought his car.
We haven't heard anything from Tom yet.
What happened changed Tom's entire life.
Where did Tom live before he moved here?
We have lots of work to do.
Tom stole my girlfriend.
My head is still spinning.
She bought a toy for her child.
Tom bought a bicycle for three hundred dollars.
How's your patient?
When I was eight, my mom bought toys for me.
I don't want to give up.
I'm trying to save Tom.
The baby was crying.
You're an hour late.
You're an hour late.
Tom is with a customer.
The bus went over the cliff.
Tom looked for his pen.
It may be expensive.
It may be expensive.
You're just envious.
There are dragons here.
Tom was late for class.
You're wrong about Tom.
You're wrong about Tom.
I should've warned Tom.
You've got to warn Tom.
You've got to warn Tom.
I came to thank you.
I invited Tom to lunch.
I heard Tom was killed.
Do you like walking?
I had to send Tom home.
I asked Tom to do that.
I asked Tom to do that.
It didn't bother me.
We don't even know Tom.
We won't see Tom again.
Don't throw it out.
Don't throw it out.
Don't throw it out.
Don't use that word.
Don't use that word.
Don't use that word.
Oh, don't apologize.
Oh, don't apologize.
Didn't you talk to Tom?
Didn't you talk to Tom?
She tied him up.
He winked at her.
She allowed her child to be drowned.
I didn't even hear Tom.
He has a square jaw.
Don't even talk to Tom.
Don't even talk to Tom.
Tom is waiting outside.
Don't talk nonsense.
You'd never survive.
You'd never survive.
There's plenty left.
Tom won't be forgotten.
I'll hire Tom tomorrow.
Nothing makes sense.
Everyone called me Tom.
Tom watched admiringly.
Tom watched admiringly.
It wasn't important.
Please leave Tom alone.
Please leave Tom alone.
Tom has big, blue eyes.
Everybody looked at Tom.
They waited outside.
Tom wasn't too careful.
Tom, please be careful.
We'll talk upstairs.
That's just useless.
Tom still doesn't have a girlfriend.
We've never broken the law.
Your children will be safe with Tom.
We haven't seen Tom since yesterday.
We haven't seen Tom since yesterday.
Tom was shot three times in the back.
Tom usually goes to school by bicycle.
We now know that was a lie.
I asked Tom where he had gone for lunch.
She is buying a toy for her child.
I can't just leave Tom.
Tom's daughter is sick.
I can't do that to Tom.
I want you to meet Tom.
You're undependable.
You're undependable.
You've got to stop Tom.
You've got to stop Tom.
Where did you find Tom?
They need new shoes.
You are a teacher.
Should we wait for Tom?
Should we wait for Tom?
Everyone wants to be Tom's friend.
Everyone wants to be Tom's friend.
Tom washes his hands all the time.
This game is boring.
We try to keep our promises.
Tom wanted to make a lot of money.
We now know that's not true.
There are billions of stars in the sky.
Tom showed us his stamp collection.
Tom says he isn't ready to give up.
Tom wants to become a famous singer.
Do you want to read?
Let's look upstairs.
We were all a little sleepy.
Sorry, I only meant it as a joke.
To tell the truth, I don't really care.
You were born to be real, not to be perfect.
She made her appearance around noon.
She begged him not to go there.
Tom got in the bathtub.
I will put off my departure if it rains.
You should talk to Tom.
How big is Tom's house?
Don't read my diary!
I asked Tom where he wanted to go.
I asked Tom where he wanted to go.
We're surprised and shocked.
Tom went upstairs to take a bath.
We've had lot of complaints.
I often eat chicken.
Tom isn't feeling well.
Tom is the perfect son.
You should thank me.
I like to chop wood.
I hope he isn't ill.
Don't let him go.
I have to thank him.
Tom was in a good mood yesterday.
Tom was dumped by his girlfriend.
Tom wanted to protect his family.
My father is frank.
Climb onto the roof.
Climb onto the roof.
I am reading a play.
I broke up with her.
I broke up with him.
I have to go with Tom.
I have to go with Tom.
Tom's mother has died.
Tom's mother has died.
Tom has no complaints.
Tom left the water on.
But the universe is infinite.
Tom left the radio on.
Get dressed quickly.
Tom collected old coins.
Tom is interested in math.
Tom isn't boring.
Does Tatoeba really help translators?
I can barely hear Tom.
Will we see Tom again?
Her bike is blue.
I like that description.
We missed Tom so much.
I'm fed up with him.
I woke up at eleven o'clock.
I woke up at eleven.
The event starts at 11pm.
The event starts at 10pm.
The event starts at 9pm.
The event starts at 8pm.
The event starts at 7pm.
The event starts at 6pm.
The event starts at 5pm.
The event starts at 4pm.
The event starts at 3pm.
The event starts at 2pm.
The event starts at 1pm.
The event starts at noon.
The event starts at noon.
The event starts at 11am.
The event starts at 10am.
The event starts at 9am.
The event starts at 8am.
The event starts at 7am.
The event starts at 6am.
The event starts at 5am.
The event starts at 4am.
The event starts at 3am.
The event starts at 2am.
The event starts at 1am.
The event is on Sunday.
The event is on Saturday.
The event is on Friday.
The event is on Thursday.
The event is on Wednesday.
The event is on Tuesday.
The event is on Monday.
The country is in crisis.
My name is Tom. What's yours?
Tom has a dark sense of humor.
Tom has very high expectations.
It's very important that I talk to Tom.
Tom's old car has finally given up the ghost.
Tom almost cracked my ribs when he hugged me.
May I drink alcohol?
I think it scared Tom.
I think it scared Tom.
I think it scared Tom.
I think it scared Tom.
It took me a long time to get over it.
I can tell you where to find Tom.
I can tell you where to find Tom.
I called Tom for help.
I called Tom for help.
We've got to take Tom to the doctor.
We've got to take Tom to the doctor.
I asked Tom what he was drinking.
Milk and alcohol don't solve problems.
Tom brushes his teeth every day.
Tom wants to eat some ice cream.
Tom was in a bad mood yesterday.
Tom doesn't even care.
Tom has been selected.
Tom is a good partner.
Don't touch my bike.
Why was Tom sent home?
They add pictures to their album.
Playing in the street is dangerous.
Thank you for mentioning this.
Thank you for mentioning this.
All three of them were in love with the same girl.
Let's not make a mountain out of a molehill.
I met Tom in the park.
I met Tom in the park.
The list included Tom.
Everyone but Tom came.
Tom called the office.
The boy wants a toy.
I like Tom's approach.
Tom has no weaknesses.
Tom and I fight a lot.
He doesn't obey his parents.
That surprised Tom.
Her life is in grave danger.
Tom threatened to kill himself.
What happened to your guitar?
What happened to your guitar?
Tom wanted to talk to a lawyer.
Tom made a dog house for Cookie.
Darkness is falling.
Tom begged us to stay.
Should I wait for Tom?
Should I wait for Tom?
She won the contest.
Where's Tom's bicycle?
Tom already has a job.
I loved Tom very much.
Tom said I was pretty.
Take me to the hospital.
Is there a hospital nearby?
Where is her royal highness?
He grows a mustache.
Why did you marry Tom?
I didn't wait for Tom.
Tom pocketed the coin.
Many cars passed by.
Tom waited obediently.
Please remind me to post the letters.
Tom clenched his fist.
Tom looks Chinese.
Tom and I made a pact.
Tom could've survived.
I know Tom misses you.
Why did they fire Tom?
They never caught Tom.
I saw nobody around.
Tom isn't here, is he?
Please wish me luck.
Tom is very emotional.
I asked Tom what he was eating.
Why wasn't Tom here yesterday?
Where exactly did you see Tom?
Where exactly did you see Tom?
Why is Tom trying to scare me?
We haven't had any complaints.
Tom filled his glass with water.
I was eighteen then.
Tom's children are downstairs.
Tom's house is near the beach.
Tom has a boat.
Stop watching TV. It will destroy your brain.
Tom said I was boring.
Tom comes home every day for lunch.
I'll go see if Tom is OK.
Lions, wolves, elephants, and horses are all animals.
Tom will come on October 20th.
Tom will come on October 20th.
Tom's answer stunned everyone.
The elephant is grey.
Tom went to the swimming pool.
He looked for the keys in the drawer.
Where did he get that crazy idea from?
I have a new e-mail address.
He was supposed to speak with Tom.
He should have arrived before noon.
You're with Tom, aren't you?
You're with Tom, aren't you?
Tom is very attentive.
Tom is bleeding again.
Tom is bleeding again.
He is seeing one of his secretaries behind his wife's back.
Tom doesn't have many photos of himself as a baby.
Tom wanted to make more money.
I have billions of dollars.
My brother bought me a small toy.
Tom turned off his headlights.
Tom tore the letter to pieces.
Tom tried to protect his kids.
Tom wanted to protect himself.
She tried to hide her mistake from us.
She may have missed her train.
She bent down.
The dog came running to me.
New York is worth visiting.
I'm going to Berlin to visit my friend.
I'm going to Berlin to visit my friend.
My cat is going to have kittens next month.
Tom never signed the contract.
Tom owns about thirty guitars.
Tom might make a good stepdad.
We're facing serious problems.
Tom had a stomachache.
How I've missed you!
How I've missed you!
The decision is Tom's.
Where can we find Tom?
What took Tom so long?
What took Tom so long?
You're a lot like Tom.
You're a lot like Tom.
Tom's hands were cold.
Tom had a bad day.
Something happened to Tom.
I'm Tom's ex.
The peasants are planting rice.
I gave Tom a huge hug.
Do you live nearby?
Do you live nearby?
We'll never catch Tom.
We've got to call Tom.
Can I sit next to Tom?
Tom ordered some food.
Just get rid of it.
We just don't have enough time.
Tom showed me his new guitar.
The bottle of water is in the fridge.
Tom won't escape punishment.
We need you back in the office.
We need you back in the office.
You love Tom more than I do.
You love Tom more than I do.
Tell Tom I said hello.
Tell Tom I said hello.
Will you see Tom next month?
Will you see Tom next month?
How long can Tom stay?
How long did Tom stay?
Could we speak to Tom?
We have to follow Tom.
We have to follow Tom.
We have to follow Tom.
There are many different types of kisses.
I'm certain I saw Tom.
When did you meet Tom?
Tom is the guilty one.
Give me Tom's address.
She committed suicide yesterday.
Put the kettle on.
We followed orders.
Why is Tom so popular?
Tom made a suggestion.
Tom is hard to handle.
The tank was empty.
Please take me to Tom.
Please take me to Tom.
Who did you offend?
Who did you offend?
Tom has got a problem.
Tom is still not here.
Tom often tells jokes.
They were barefoot.
Tom begged me to stay.
Tom and I are lawyers.
Tom and I think alike.
Did I frigthen you?
Did I frigthen you?
Put on your gloves.
Throw the ball to Tom.
Tom got bored quickly.
Wasn't that enough?
Tom missed his flight.
Tom doesn't have any plans for tomorrow.
Do you allow your children play in the street?
I used to love Tom.
We'll eat at six o'clock.
Did you take notes?
Did you take notes?
Tom has some problems.
Are you Tom's brother?
Are you and Tom close?
Has Tom been released?
Has Tom been released?
Do you agree with Tom?
It bothers me, too.
Let's eat together.
I'll be late today.
I gave Tom some candy.
We missed you, too.
We missed you, too.
I would read this book, but I don't have the time.
We wished each other good luck.
Tom was accepted to Harvard.
Tom will be late for dinner.
Tom will be late for dinner.
Tom will arrive around noon.
Tom and I are both OK.
Tom and I are both OK.
It made me furious.
Tom could have cancer.
Tom started washing his car.
Tom should've been a lawyer.
Tom should be there by noon.
Tom has been expelled.
Tom has been expelled.
Tom has lots of shoes.
Tom has lots of money.
Come in, it's open.
Come in, it's open.
I suggest you hide.
I suggest you hide.
I can't tell a lie.
I can't tell a lie.
Tom isn't here either.
Tom isn't here either.
Nobody walks in LA.
Keep your shoes on.
Keep your shoes on.
Tom prepared to leave.
Does it bother you?
We had a short holiday in February.
I can protect you.
I put on my helmet.
I put my helmet on.
She betrayed his trust.
Tom shut his notebook.
The beach is empty.
Tom may have missed the bus.
We have to be extremely careful.
Tom never stops complaining.
We have a lot of work to do yet.
Where should we pitch our tent?
We have to get something to eat.
The office is dark.
You can protect me.
Were you attentive?
Were you attentive?
We'll need Tom's help.
Why isn't Tom at home?
The park was empty.
I was right about Tom.
I went to talk to Tom.
I was wrong about Tom.
I was wrong about Tom.
Just fill this out.
Just fill this out.
I'm dying to meet Tom.
I'm dying to meet Tom.
I'm Tom's new partner.
It's in the fridge.
It's in the fridge.
Tom is with a patient.
Tom is with a patient.
We just don't have enough money.
Tom's room is full of toys.
Tom's room is full of toys.
Do you know what Tom's plans are?
Don't follow Tom's example.
Don't follow Tom's example.
Don't follow Tom's example.
I just wanted to thank you.
Tom is a terrible salesman.
Tom and his friends were asked to leave.
The movie wasn't half bad.
Tom's not in his room.
Nothing is useful to anything.
I had to grab her to keep her from falling.
We get it for free.
We get it for free.
This room is empty.
Is it already open?
I knew you'd find Tom.
I just talked to Tom.
When I woke up, it was still dark outside.
I don't even know Tom.
I have news about Tom.
We'll pray for you.
We'll pray for you.
I have to go find Tom.
We can protect you.
We can protect you.
Can you protect me?
Can you protect me?
I can take you to Tom.
I can take you to Tom.
I couldn't let Tom go.
I couldn't let Tom go.
Tom didn't have a gun.
Tom didn't have a weapon.
Tom didn't have a gun.
That would be rude.
Tom is in big trouble.
I didn't even see Tom.
Tom is wearing gloves.
What Tom did was incredible.
Tom is still upstairs.
Tom is still upstairs.
The boys are noisy.
Is she still angry?
Are you still mad?
Are you still mad?
Tom read the poem out loud.
Oil is expensive.
Tom is a professional.
Tom has been released.
Tom has been released.
Tom has been released.
Tom doesn't look well.
We want to thank you for coming.
We want to thank you for coming.
You may eat anything in the refrigerator.
Tom named his puppy Cookie.
We're all looking forward to it.
We're all looking forward to it.
Tom often plays the guitar.
Tom told a very funny joke.
They lost the bet.
She lost the bet.
We shook hands and said goodbye.
Tom wasn't there last week.
It's in the garage.
It's in the garage.
It's in the garage.
It's in the garage.
Turn on the lights.
I broke my phone.
I was slightly surprised.
Do you have a pass?
I try to eat right.
You're forgetting Tom.
You're forgetting Tom.
I weigh 130 pounds.
We've lost three games in a row.
Tom went there by bicycle.
Tom will probably be late.
We didn't need Tom's help.
We didn't need Tom's help.
You should go talk to Tom.
You should go talk to Tom.
We should go talk to Tom.
You shouldn't talk to Tom.
You shouldn't talk to Tom.
I hope Tom is careful.
We're not blaming Tom.
I'll walk with you.
I'll walk with you.
I'm late for lunch.
I'm late for class.
I'm in the bathtub.
Where should we go next weekend?
I'm sorry you lost.
I'm sorry you lost.
Are you sure you know where Tom's house is?
Are you sure you know where Tom's house is?
I called to thank Tom.
Did you know Tom well?
Did you know Tom well?
Are you waiting for Tom?
We don't want to miss our flight.
We have nothing to apologize for.
You must not talk to Tom.
You must not talk to Tom.
Did you break it?
Did you break it?
Did you break it?
Did you break them?
Did you break them?
You broke it.
You broke it.
You broke it.
You broke it.
The room was empty.
I have to wake Tom up.
I feel so helpless.
I feel so helpless.
I never blamed you.
I never blamed you.
I obeyed the rules.
Tom is cold and tired.
I can't speak for Tom.
Tom is wearing a mask.
Tom is putting on weight.
I have to go there.
Tom tipped the waiter.
Tom talked me into it.
Tom went to the beach.
Where did you hide?
Where did you hide?
Where did you hide?
Where did you hide?
Tom has had a busy week.
I don't take drugs.
Didn't you miss me?
Didn't you miss me?
Tom decided to go.
Tom had no money left.
Who's upstairs now?
What convinced you?
What convinced you?
Who's accusing you?
Who's accusing you?
You must pay attention when swimming in the sea.
You must pay attention when swimming in the sea.
You are in love with him.
Stop pressuring me.
Tom never tells lies.
Tom was treated terribly.
We knew we just couldn't give up.
We've got to contact Tom.
We expect a lot from Tom.
Tom's music is beautiful.
Tom wrote a lot of poems.
Tom had a nice smile.
Tom asked me why I was late.
I'll wait upstairs.
I'll wait upstairs.
I'm glad you met Tom.
I'm glad you met Tom.
I had to drag him out of bed.
Just buy him some candy.
Just buy him some candy.
Just buy them some candy.
Just buy them some candy.
We should stop seeing each other.
I happened upon her.
They're leaving us.
We were as surprised as you were.
We were as surprised as you were.
We were just trying to scare you.
We were just trying to scare you.
Tom started vomiting.
Tom married a rich widow.
Who stole Tom's bicycle?
You'll be safe with Tom.
You'll be safe with Tom.
We weren't friends.
Tom's face got red.
Have you already signed the contract?
Have you already signed the contract?
Have you already signed the contract?
I paid 300 dollars for this guitar.
Have you met Tom yet?
Have you met Tom yet?
Have you met Tom yet?
You're the experts.
I've worked extremely hard.
I've worked extremely hard.
Shouldn't we ask Tom?
Shouldn't we ask Tom?
Tom has things to do.
I'm bored to death.
You're fashionable.
You're fashionable.
You're fashionable.
You're fashionable.
You're fashionable.
I couldn't leave Tom.
I couldn't leave Tom.
I couldn't leave Tom.
I couldn't leave Tom.
I couldn't leave Tom.
I couldn't leave Tom.
Someone stole my bicycle.
We have already reached an agreement.
I don't have a headache.
I brush my teeth every day.
I kissed Tom.
Does Tom already have a job?
Tom earns thirty dollars an hour.
I recognized Tom's voice.
I recognized Tom's voice.
We're going to need a lawyer.
We're going to need a lawyer.
All men are mortal. Socrates was mortal. Therefore, all men are Socrates.
I am eating lunch with my sister.
Tom is wearing an orange shirt.
I think Tom is courteous.
You're in love with someone else, aren't you?
Tom doesn't scare me.
Tom has a nice laugh.
Tom has developed a new system for learning English.
Tom is a great coach.
Never give up.
Tom takes care of me.
They're everywhere.
Tom was a good coach.
Tom wanted a divorce.
Are you bored here?
Are you bored here?
Are you bored here?
Cancel all my appointments.
Cancel all my appointments.
Are you and Tom friends?
Did you get stuck in traffic?
Did you get stuck in traffic?
Which ones are Tom's?
Which ones are Tom's?
You should visit Tom.
Be at the station at eleven on the dot.
Be at the station at eleven on the dot.
Tom skated very well.
Tom skated very well.
You ruined my life.
I want to go there.
We both know that's a lie.
I'm friends with Tom.
Tom is as tall as me.
Tom heard the scream.
Don't pull it. Push it open.
Don't pull it. Push it open.
You'll get over it.
You'll get over it.
The sky started to darken.
The sky started to darken.
You are kidding me.
You are kidding me.
You can't blame me.
You can't blame me.
If he asked you to jump off a bridge, would you do it?
If he asked you to jump off a bridge, would you do it?
If she asked you to jump off a bridge, would you do it?
If she asked you to jump off a bridge, would you do it?
If Tom asked you to jump off a bridge, would you do it?
If Tom asked you to jump off a bridge, would you do it?
I swear I won't tell anyone.
Put the disk in the computer.
That's an old joke.
You broke my heart.
We're not partners.
There's a traitor among us.
I've been to see Tom.
I've been to see Tom.
I've been to see Tom.
I'm letting you go.
I'll never marry Tom.
Tom's father is rich.
She needed money desperately.
It reminds me of Tom.
It reminds me of Tom.
It reminds me of Tom.
Where's Tom's ticket?
What did you ask Tom?
What did you ask Tom?
I still remember Tom.
What were you fired for?
What were you fired for?
Don't blame them.
Don't blame them.
Don't blame him.
Don't blame him.
Don't blame her.
Don't blame her.
I don't blame him.
I don't blame her.
I don't blame Tom.
Tom never hurt a fly.
He had to withdraw.
Tom doesn't blame us.
All of us stared at Tom.
She broke my heart.
Tom opened the diary.
Don't stop playing.
Don't stop playing.
Is this bike yours?
Tom slept peacefully.
We've been friends.
Remove the bandage.
Tom didn't make it clear.
I hated Tom for that.
The choice was Tom's.
The association has thirty members.
Please turn off the television.
Please turn off the television.
The old lady thanked me for helping her across the road.
My little sister asked me to teach her how to ski.
Don't let Tom go.
Don't let Tom go.
It is a mystery how they escaped from prison.
I will give you a bicycle for your birthday.
Snow reflects ultraviolet light.
I visited Paris in Europe.
The soldiers had artillery.
I will have finished the work by noon.
Read this.
Stop Tom.
I lost.
Tom isn't a bad guy.
You're disobeying orders.
I live pretty close to Tom.
I went to Tom's apartment.
Tom didn't want to be late.
Luckily nobody drowned.
Luckily nobody drowned.
Hand me the remote.
Did Tom say why he was fired?
Did Tom say why he was fired?
It wasn't any bigger than a soccer ball.
It wasn't any bigger than a soccer ball.
It wasn't any bigger than a soccer ball.
We're prepared to take that risk.
Tom wasn't hurt at all.
She drives everybody up the wall.
My sister dropped her plate on the floor.
Something is obviously not right with Tom.
Tom passed away in 2013.
We're going to rebuild this city.
Tom feigned surprise.
Tom was barefoot.
Tom's feet were bare.
Tom's hands are full.
Tom isn't here today.
Tom's wife just died.
Tom is angry with me.
Tom has a second job.
Tom must be homesick.
How bad was Tom hurt?
Who brought Tom here?
It's crowded today.
It's crowded today.
Tom's office is dark.
You must be polite.
He is at the office.
The flame went out.
Stay here with Tom.
We'll stay with Tom.
I was just kidding.
She was just kidding.
Why are they angry?
Close your eyes for a moment and look for the answer.
What did you and Tom do after dinner?
What did you and Tom do after dinner?
Tom feared the worst.
When did you see Tom?
Tom will contact you.
Why is Tom mad at me?
Will I see Tom later?
You have to find Tom.
You have to find Tom.
Can we interview Tom?
I'd love to meet Tom.
We'll go talk to Tom.
What is the probability that at least two students have the same birthday?
Don't try any tricks.
Get me another lawyer.
I was the last one to see Tom.
Tom asked me if I knew anybody who could translate from French into English.
I won't bother you.
I won't bother you.
We'll bring Tom home.
We'll bring Tom home.
We'll take Tom home.
We'll let Tom decide.
We weren't cautious enough.
Tom told me to wait outside.
Tom's cat is missing.
Tom slept until noon.
Tom had no sons.
The hole in his sock is so big that you can see his ankle.
She keeps a lover in another town.
She gets lots of attention from men.
Tom told me he was going to kill himself.
Tom told me he was going to commit suicide.
You told me not to talk to Tom, remember?
You told me not to talk to Tom, remember?
You told me not to talk to Tom, remember?
You told me not to talk to Tom, remember?
Haven't I told you not to call me Tom?
Haven't I told you not to call me Tom?
Tom was wounded by a bullet.
I won't forgive Tom.
Tom is a polite boy.
We're all professionals.
Have you fired Tom?
Have you fired Tom?
Have you fired Tom?
I knew Tom.
I knew Tom.
I've given Tom permission to use my bicycle.
How did you dress for Halloween?
Canada has signed a trade agreement with the European Union.
I told you not to call me Tom, didn't I?
I told you not to call me Tom, didn't I?
Haven't I told you not to call me Tom?
Haven't I told you not to call me Tom?
Tom never stays long.
Tom told me that I wasn't going to be fired.
Tom told me not to open the envelope until my birthday.
Tom told me not to open the envelope until my birthday.
Tom told me he had to go back to the office.
The nurse told me that it wasn't supposed to hurt.
The nurse told me that it wasn't supposed to hurt.
Tom told me that he would like to buy a new bicycle.
I told Tom to never see my sister again.
I told him to be careful.
I told her to be careful.
Tom's doctor told him to quit smoking.
Tom's doctor told him to quit smoking.
I told them to contact us if they needed help.
I told you to be careful.
I told you to be careful.
I told you to be careful.
I told you to be careful.
I told you to be careful.
Tell Tom you're sick.
Tell Tom you're sick.
As soon as I woke up, the headache returned.
A storm is brewing.
Will you talk to Tom?
You must talk to Tom.
Tom broke up with me.
Tom had one daughter.
She gave me a doll.
Put a lid on it, Tom.
Put a lid on it, Tom.
I miss her so much.
He crushed the box.
He got angry with us.
She got angry with us.
I don't love Tom anymore.
I miss you a lot.
She moved here from Mexico five years ago.
He and I went through hell together.
Where can I buy a live tiger?
All the children laughed at Tom.
All the children laughed at Tom.
Tom was the one who took this picture.
Tom was the one who took this picture.
I'll take good care of Tom.
First, let's talk about Tom.
Tom can't be that naive.
Stop micromanaging everything!
I'll leave Tom alone.
I'll leave Tom alone.
I didn't kiss Tom.
I didn't kiss Tom.
No one got sick.
I didn't look at Tom.
Is Tom in the office?
Turn your head to the left.
Turn your head to the right.
It's not very expensive.
I'll do that for Tom.
Tom had things to do.
I was looking at Tom.
We used to swim in this lake.
We hardly ever see Tom anymore.
I don't love Tom anymore.
I don't love Tom anymore.
Tom isn't there yet.
I feel safe with Tom.
They laughed at Tom.
Tom needs help badly.
This is Tom's sister.
Let's wait for Tom.
I'm angry with Tom.
Tom ate some cheese.
Tom has sharp eyes.
Just look at Tom.
Just look at Tom.
I do forgive Tom.
I knew Tom.
Tom was taken prisoner by the Germans.
Can't we go with Tom?
I knew Tom very well.
Are you Tom's friend?
Does Tom have a boat?
Tom has Alzheimer's.
Tom is haunted by his past.
I didn't shout at Tom.
I didn't shout at Tom.
We ate some apples.
Tom is wiser than I am.
We're grateful for your support.
We're grateful for your support.
This is too spicy for me.
Tom is on duty today.
I envy you so much.
Tom had no food left.
Tom had no food left.
Take away this box.
Take away this box.
Take away this box.
Take away this box.
Tom isn't my patient.
Tom jumped overboard.
I seldom speak to Tom.
I think I'll call Tom.
I haven't seen Tom very much recently.
I hardly ever see Tom anymore.
I won't work with Tom.
Tom bought new gloves.
I hardly ever see Tom anymore.
Don't miss the bus.
Please get dressed.
Tom skimmed the list.
Let's not talk to Tom.
Tom is a great player.
We're going to be late for school.
We're going to be late for school.
I won't be late again.
Tom has been laid off.
Ask Tom what he's done.
I often go to the beach.
I'm in touch with Tom.
Canada is a model for democracy.
The situation worries me very much.
That's fantastic, isn't it?
Tom usually walks to school.
How many lawyers does Tom have?
Tom has a son about your age.
Tom was impatient.
Tom was very popular.
Ask Tom what he's done.
I'm going to talk to Tom when he arrives at home.
I'm going to talk to Tom when he comes home.
Tom will protect you.
I'm earning money.
That was our goal.
Why wasn't Tom there?
Tom smiled guiltily.
I'll see Tom tonight.
I'll go look for Tom.
Mom set the table.
I'll try to find Tom.
I'm younger than Tom.
I have no details.
Tom plays the guitar.
Tom swam in the pool.
I'm not a veteran.
Tom has no chance of winning.
They came to an agreement.
Put these letters in the mail box.
Donald Trump is elected president of the United States.
Tom wasn't surprised.
Tom wasn't here then.
Tom will be arrested.
Tom will be punished.
Tom's feet were cold.
I'm a French teacher.
I'm a French teacher.
I learned that from Tom.
I felt sympathy for Tom.
I expect a lot from Tom.
I like listening to Tom.
Are you having any difficulty breathing?
Are you having any difficulty sleeping?
Tom has a son your age.
Tom has a big appetite.
I asked Tom to make tea.
I asked Tom for a favor.
We have a lot of regular customers.
Tom fell into the well.
I couldn't speak to Tom.
Tom is no ordinary man.
I want to work with Tom.
I'd like to work with Tom.
Did you remember to turn off the lights?
Did you remember to turn off the lights?
I share a room with Tom.
The boy's name was Tom.
Tom collects old coins.
Tom can ride a bicycle.
Do you think Tom has any chance of winning?
Do you think Tom has any chance of winning?
Do you think Tom has any chance of winning?
Do you think Tom has any chance of winning?
Let's eat first.
Let's eat here.
Let's eat together tonight.
Let's eat before we go.
Let's eat before we go.
Let's eat sushi.
Let's eat lunch.
Let's go to lunch.
Let's eat in this evening.
No one agreed with Tom.
Maybe I should ask Tom.
Maybe I should ask Tom.
Tom is the expert on this.
I asked Tom to wait here.
There's no one with Tom.
A lot of people swim here in the summer.
A lot of people swim here in the summer.
Where did you work before you came here?
Where did you work before you came here?
Is Tom a French teacher?
I'm acquainted with Tom.
Are you having any difficulty breathing?
I should go warn Tom.
I should go warn Tom.
I should talk to Tom.
How can they lose?
I said we'd find Tom.
I saw Tom last night.
I never even met Tom.
I was so homesick.
It just scares me.
I felt sorry for Tom.
I felt sorry for Tom.
I had to protect Tom.
I had to protect Tom.
How do we survive?
I can't wait for Tom.
I didn't go with Tom.
I didn't go with Tom.
I didn't go with Tom.
I didn't go with Tom.
I'm eighty-three years old.
I admired Tom's work.
I enjoyed talking to Tom.
I enjoyed talking with Tom.
I got this book from Tom.
I got this book from Tom.
I got this book from Tom.
I handed the mike to Tom.
I handed the mike to Tom.
We haven't raised enough money yet.
I asked Tom to leave.
Who was the coach?
I think you know Tom.
I think you know Tom.
I won't give up, Tom.
How often do you go to the beach?
I'll surprise you.
I'll surprise you.
Tom is being watched.
Do you like candy?
Do you like candy?
Buy me some candy.
Buy me some candy.
That man was fired last week.
There are still a lot of things I don't know about Tom.
Did Tom kill himself?
Did Tom really kill himself?
Yesterday, I got a telegram from Tom.
Please don't ask Tom.
Please don't ask Tom.
Please don't ask Tom.
Please don't ask Tom.
Tom, don't interrupt.
It's bigger than Tom.
It's bigger than Tom.
It's bigger than Tom.
Maybe I'll bring Tom.
Should I include Tom?
Should I include Tom?
I usually agree with Tom.
I'm nothing like Tom.
I'm still seeing Tom.
What did you miss?
What did you miss?
Tom stopped clapping.
I've offended you.
I turned the page.
Do you sell fruit?
Tom is investigating.
The lights are on.
This was a gift from Tom.
Did they fire you?
Did they fire you?
Tom finally realized there was something wrong.
Tom is misunderstood.
Who can blame you?
Who can blame you?
Have you googled Tom?
Have you googled Tom?
I bought this TV from Tom.
Did they hurt you?
Did they hurt you?
I can't disagree with Tom.
I stayed inside all day today.
Tom always brushes his teeth after meals.
I wouldn't swim in this lake.
Ask Tom when he'll come back.
Ask Tom when he'll come back.
I am not rich, nor do I wish to be.
When he came to, he needed a little bit of time to figure out where he was.
I feel very sorry for Tom.
We're trying to find Tom.
This is too easy for Tom.
Tom isn't angry with me.
Nobody can say no to Tom.
I'm getting ready to leave.
I saw you looking at Tom.
It wasn't as expensive as I thought it would be.
This is one of the best beaches in Australia.
Just take me home.
Your liver is doing fine.
This can cause liver damage.
It can cause liver damage.
It can cause liver damage.
It can cause liver damage.
She is suffering from kidney disease.
He is suffering from kidney disease.
Our neighbor's ground yields better corn than our own.
I wanted to warn Tom.
Did you draw that?
Did you draw that?
Let's go wake Tom up.
Let's talk about Tom.
I'll take you to Tom.
We tried to save Tom.
We tried to save Tom.
You should marry Tom.
You have to call Tom.
You have to call Tom.
Tom is hated by everyone.
We're really looking forward to it.
When did you ask Tom?
When did you ask Tom?
He decided to be a lawyer.
I didn't keep Tom waiting.
Are you still looking for Tom?
Are you still looking for Tom?
I saw a snake eating a mouse.
Tom has Monday off.
Tell me what you think about Tom.
When do you want to eat?
You can't fire us.
You can't fire us.
Did you find Tom?
Did you find Tom?
Just leave Tom alone.
Just leave Tom alone.
Just be careful, Tom.
She isn't perfect.
We've got to hide.
The girls fainted.
The girls fainted.
I want this puppy.
Why did you kill Tom?
Why did you kill Tom?
Why did you kill Tom?
I'd like to meet Tom.
OK, I'm convinced.
Would you give up?
Would you give up?
You never gave up.
You never gave up.
It's already open.
What a collection!
You're a wise man.
You're a wise man.
I persuaded him to give himself up to the police.
I wasn't dreaming.
I don't see Tom much.
Do you know Tom well?
Do you know Tom well?
Do you know Tom well?
Get up out of bed.
Get up out of bed.
Tom checked the date.
I like curry rice.
Her skirt is long.
My life is boring.
Are you bored yet?
Are you bored yet?
Tom placed fourth and did not win a medal.
I like elephants.
Maybe you should turn off the TV.
He's so perfect.
He's very peculiar.
Tom's face turned red with anger.
This is the only thing I care about.
Is that the only thing you care about?
Is that the only thing you care about?
Prisons aren't enough.
It's the least I could do.
Will you go with Tom?
Talk to my lawyer.
Stop for a moment.
Tom crushed the box.
Tom crushed the can.
I lost a glove. Now what should I do with the second one?
It became clear that the stolen bicycle belonged to him.
I asked Tom if he wanted to drive.
I asked Tom if he wanted to drive.
He's not breaking the law.
She's not breaking the law.
Tom didn't blame me.
I've known Tom since 2013.
Tom has other ideas.
The bus was empty.
Tom may not make it.
Tom has a tough job.
Tom has a tough job.
Luckily, Tom wasn't there.
We have to take care of our parents.
It seems that Tom is sick.
Is Tom's name on the list?
Do you know how to convert from Celsius to Fahrenheit?
I'd like to look like Tom.
I went to church with Tom.
I promise I won't be late again.
I was sitting next to Tom.
I want to go out with Tom.
Tom is washing his hands.
I want to do this for Tom.
I have to get back to my office.
Are you sure you don't want to go swimming with us?
Are you sure you don't want to go swimming with us?
I tried to call Tom again.
Tom is no longer at home.
I appreciate what you do for me.
I appreciate what you do for me.
I wasn't mad at Tom.
What's got into Tom?
I want to visit Tom.
You're late again.
You're late again.
How did Tom move it?
Tom isn't a bad boy.
I should go there.
It would be a mistake to ignore Tom's advice.
It would be a mistake to ignore Tom's advice.
My glass is empty.
I just moved here.
Just go and ask Tom.
Just go and ask Tom.
We haven't lived up to expectations.
That is no fault of Tom's.
I'd like to buy something to eat.
This must be hard for Tom.
I'll take the children to school.
Ask Tom to stop doing that.
Ask Tom to stop doing that.
Can you replace Tom?
I can't move this.
Tom got sick last weekend.
I'm going to fail.
I'm going to lose.
Tom has terrible eyesight.
Tom has quite a few books.
Tom has lots of new ideas.
We've got a lot of stuff left to do.
Tom has a beautiful smile.
Tom had trouble breathing.
I generally agree with Tom.
I generally agree with Tom.
I forgot to speak with Tom.
We're not perfect, but we try to be.
Tom got a job as a waiter.
I don't get along with Tom.
I'll take you to the train station.
I'll take you to the train station.
Tom forgot to wear gloves.
I bet you Tom will be late.
I still have a lot of things to do.
I asked Tom why he was sad.
I asked Tom where he lived.
I asked Tom where he lived.
We still have a lot of things to do.
Tom said I was rude.
Tom should be fired.
Tom should be fired.
Tom sounded irritated.
He sounded irritated.
She sounded irritated.
Tom sounded irritated.
Don't you miss me?
Don't you miss me?
Don't be too long.
I broke his heart.
I broke her heart.
Tom was always fair.
Tom got sick last weekend.
Tom doesn't mind walking.
Who's that with Tom?
Were you attacked?
That's our policy.
Stop bothering me.
Sign the contract.
Just look outside.
Just look outside.
Why was Tom invited?
Aren't you going to ask Tom?
Aren't you going to ask Tom?
This is a message from Tom.
We haven't had any complaints so far.
Tom is certain to succeed.
We have to take care of our children.
We have to be prepared for the worst.
Stay here and wait for Tom.
Stay here and wait for Tom.
Stay here and wait for Tom.
Stay here and wait for Tom.
My car's bigger than Tom's.
Tom is absent from school.
It was nice to speak with Tom.
I'm on good terms with Tom.
I'm on good terms with Tom.
Let's get drunk.
Tom has gone skiing.
He went skiing.
Tom wasn't punished.
We kept fighting back.
I think you've been set up.
I am envious of his success.
He frequents the company of wicked women.
Everyone was hurt.
Tom is preparing to leave.
I asked Tom for his address.
I almost felt sorry for Tom.
I almost felt sorry for Tom.
Tom is now short of money.
Tom is my favorite singer.
Everyone is looking for Tom.
Tom stole your bike.
Tom stole your bike.
They were perfect.
They hurried away.
They're undamaged.
Tom is no expert.
These shoes cost too much.
These shoes cost too much.
Did you have a good trip?
Did you have a good trip?
The boy fell in the fountain.
I turned on the radio and turned off the television.
Obviously, he can do what he wants with his money.
You're tough but fair.
We haven't seen each other since then.
Tom and I'll come together.
I'm not acquainted with Tom.
I'm grateful for Tom's help.
I think Tom stole my bicycle.
Tom gave me a vague answer.
We sat in the very back of the auditorium.
I want to go skiing with Tom.
That place is a shithole.
I saw Tom off at the airport.
Tom elbowed me in the ribs.
I know what Tom likes to eat.
I know some of Tom's friends.
I know some of Tom's friends.
We have a new coach and some new players.
Are you falling for Tom?
I asked Tom to wait a moment.
We haven't heard anything from them yet.
I assume that was Tom's idea.
The truth began to dawn on Tom.
I asked Tom to drive me home.
I asked Tom not to bother us.
I asked Tom to wait a minute.
We don't yet know what we're up against.
My pen must be looked for.
We have to make do with what we've got.
It's useless to talk to Tom.
It's hard to argue with Tom.
Tom came half an hour late.
I'm wondering if I love Tom.
I've lost patience with Tom.
I'm well acquainted with Tom.
We'd all be very grateful if that happened.
Tom had blood on his shoes.
Tom had blood on his shoes.
I'm already in love with Tom.
I'll try and reason with Tom.
Tom gave us a vague answer.
Tom has a lot of gray hair.
Luxurious place!
Stay in Hell.
Are you uncomfortable?
Wealth is relative.
She was cornered.
Tom despises lies.
Tom failed twice.
He is Chinese?
Math scares me.
Thomas hugs Maria.
Tom is Japanese.
Did you lose?
Did you lose?
Did you lose?
Evil is everywhere.
Wolves scare me.
I love butterflies!
Stop talking to me about Tom.
Stop talking to me about Tom.
Stop talking to me about Tom.
She already ate.
It's a pity that you're leaving Japan.
It's a pity that you're leaving Japan.
Tom has arachnophobia.
Waiter, three coffees, please.
My mum values this writer.
Horror movies frighten me.
I want you to teach Tom how to do that.
I want you to teach Tom how to do that.
I came here hoping to see Tom.
I came here hoping to see Tom.
I asked Tom to do that for us.
I'm eating everything.
He's my partner.
I asked Tom to do that for me.
I don't consider Tom a friend.
The hat on the desk is Tom's.
It seems like Tom is in love.
I mistook Tom for his brother.
Tom is good at mathematics.
I had intended to go with Tom.
I had intended to go with Tom.
I had intended to go with Tom.
I had intended to go with Tom.
How can we find Tom?
What's going on with Tom?
You're half right.
You're half right.
The plot develops rapidly.
Tom isn't mad at us.
I have a tomcat called Cookie.
Did you ask Tom why?
Did you ask Tom why?
Did you ask Tom why?
Did you ask Tom why?
You can trust her, she always keeps her promises.
Does Tom have a pet?
Ask whether the Russians have already flown in.
You may call me Tom.
You may call me Tom.
I wanted to hug Tom.
Can I come with Tom?
We'll take Tom home.
The cup was empty.
The garage was empty.
The restaurant was almost empty.
The classroom was almost empty.
The bus was almost empty.
The train was almost empty.
Tom thought the room was empty.
Tom was alone on an empty beach.
I opened the box, but it was empty.
Your account is empty.
The theater is empty.
My house is empty.
The room is empty.
The bottle is empty.
The glass is empty.
The bag is empty.
This one is empty.
This one is empty.
The house is empty.
The drawer is empty.
The lab is empty.
The restaurant is empty.
The classroom is empty.
The bathroom is empty.
Why is my bag empty?
Tom's room is empty.
The store is almost empty.
The waiting room is empty.
The glass is empty.
The glass is empty.
I think that my head is not empty.
Your account is empty.
Your account is empty.
Everything's free.
We'll miss you, Tom.
I'll never speak to Tom again.
I'll be having lunch with Tom.
Tom is unbelievably stupid.
Tom is tidying up his room.
Here's a basket full of fruit.
Tell Tom I miss him.
I've asked Tom not to do that.
I've asked Tom not to do that.
I've asked Tom not to do that.
I've asked Tom not to do that.
I'm going to miss Tom so much.
Did you tell on Tom?
Did you tell on Tom?
Did you tell on Tom?
Did you tell on Tom?
Is it a good play?
I couldn't refuse.
I want to thank those who helped me.
You forgot to mention that.
You forgot to mention that.
I want to thank everyone who helped me do this.
I want to thank everyone who helped me do this.
Let's get to work.
You're the one who wanted to talk to Tom, not me.
You're the one who wanted to talk to Tom, not me.
Tom has a white cat.
Tom has a white cat.
Tom has a black dog.
Tom looked over the documents carefully.
I'm not too worried about Tom.
Tom doesn't want you to share this information with anyone.
Tom doesn't want you to share this information with anyone.
Give me a minute, would you?
Give me a minute, would you?
Let's get to work!
The wheel doesn't turn.
The elephant is an enormous creature.
I think Tom wants something to eat.
He heard Tom.
He heard Tom.
She heard Tom.
We can't let Tom go.
The nest fell from the tree.
I'm the surgeon.
Tom's suffocating.
Listen to your heart, because it never lies.
How could it have exploded?
You're Tom's students, right?
I had a tough week.
I still love Tom.
You were just doing your duty.
You were just doing your duty.
Tom goes swimming almost every day.
Did you see Tom that night?
Did you see Tom that night?
Did you see Tom that night?
Did you see Tom that night?
Are there any Chinese restaurants near here?
Talking to Tom isn't going to help.
Tom says he has an announcement to make.
I had a long conversation with Tom.
I had a long conversation with Tom.
Do you recognize that woman?
Please pass me the salt and pepper.
Please pass me the salt and pepper.
Are you saying that Tom is a traitor?
Are you saying that Tom is a traitor?
We're expecting Tom any minute now.
This isn't silver.
A storm is coming.
I must convince Tom.
I must convince Tom.
A river separates the city into east and west.
Tie him to a tree.
Tom ran a red light.
Tom ran a red light.
You know how Tom is.
You're the expert.
I didn't break it.
I didn't break it.
I didn't break it.
I didn't break it.
Can I make copies?
I'm here to see Tom.
I don't have time for nonsense.
My time is very expensive.
She buys us shoes.
Stop following me.
Stop following me.
I remember this poem.
After finishing the juice, he moved the glass out of the way.
This is Tom's knife.
Tom blamed it on me.
He's taking a nap.
Tom has his reasons.
We told the waiter that everything was delicious.
Tom isn't even here.
I am going to wash the dishes.
I dropped my keys.
It costs too much.
It costs too much.
It costs too much.
Tom missed his stop.
Tom stifled a groan.
Tom was never found.
What did you hide?
What did you hide?
My bedroom is smaller than Tom's.
I miss you.
I miss you.
Have you pray’d to-night, Desdemona?
I was looking forward to this.
Copy this, please.
Copy this, please.
I'll get rid of Tom.
Don't wake him up.
I'll go and get Tom.
Tom doesn't have many books.
I'll do anything I can for Tom.
I don't consider Tom a friend.
I assume you're talking about Tom.
Now is the time to act. It is never too late to turn things around.
Tom is out of sugar.
Do not threaten me.
Tom is organizing a fundraising event.
We've lost 3 to 0.
When was Tom killed?
I think Tom is hurt.
I remember Tom well.
The sun was setting a fiery red.
I met Tom yesterday.
I know you miss Tom.
I know you miss Tom.
I lost sight of Tom.
I know that you love Tom.
I've got to see Tom.
I got that from Tom.
Tom wanted to ask her to dance but was afraid that she would say no.
I'm going to be late for the meeting.
I'm going to be late for the meeting.
There was blood on Tom's shirt.
I'm not worried about the price.
I can see why you suspected Tom.
I can't ask Tom now.
I could go with Tom.
I could go with Tom.
I could go with Tom.
I could talk to Tom.
Tom waved as the car pulled away.
We'll do our best to make it an uneventful trip.
I asked Tom to stop.
Controlled Access Zone: No entry without permission.
Tom went for a walk.
Tom is taking notes.
I've heard no complaints.
I'm so grateful for that.
I'm not really religious.
I try to please everyone.
I hope we can avoid that.
I asked Tom if he was OK.
French is Tom's native language.
Tom ignored all my warnings.
Everybody was worried about Tom.
Tom hung his coat on a hook.
Did you ask Tom why he did this?
Did you ask Tom why he did this?
Did you ask Tom why he did this?
Did you ask Tom why he did this?
You shouldn't have invited Tom.
You shouldn't have invited Tom.
Tom has beautiful blue eyes.
When does Tom's bus arrive?
There was blood on Tom's shirt.
Tom had long hair last year.
Tom gave me these old coins.
Tom gave me these old coins.
My hair isn't as long as Tom's.
Tom dusted off the old lamp.
We're waiting to hear from Tom.
I'm angry at everybody.
It's been a tough year for Tom.
It's amazing that Tom survived.
Tom didn't intend to hurt you.
Tom didn't intend to hurt you.
Tom decided to keep a diary.
I'll find Tom and let him know.
I would have to agree with Tom.
I want to go swimming with Tom.
I suggest that you talk to Tom.
I suggest that you talk to Tom.
I couldn't wait to talk to Tom.
I asked Tom to help us do that.
I asked Tom to help us do that.
I asked Tom to be here by 2:30.
I asked Tom if he needed money.
Everybody likes me, except Tom.
I've learned so much from Tom.
I had to hide.
We all like to ride bikes.
Tom didn't sign the contract.
I'll talk to Tom later about this.
I'm the world champion now.
Ask Tom what his sister's name is.
Ask Tom what his sister's name is.
I know exactly where to find Tom.
Tom has as many cats as I do.
Tom has a dog and three cats.
She's indifferent to me.
Tom has three boys and a girl.
I always wanted to go there.
Tom doesn't have a ticket yet.
Tom isn't very good at French.
Tom is waiting at the airport.
Let's hear Tom's explanation first.
It looks like you know Tom already.
I'll try asking Tom for some money.
I love Tom, but he doesn't love me.
I was looking forward to it.
Tom is heading west.
No one noticed that Tom wasn't there.
I'm looking for Tom Jackson's office.
Tom didn't leave his apartment.
I hear Tom has dropped out of school.
Do you want me to try talking to Tom?
Do you want me to try talking to Tom?
I'm fed up with the food here.
I'm fed up with the food here.
I'm a very independent person.
I won't interrupt you anymore.
This is Tom's third trip to Australia.
Tom doesn't drink enough water.
I didn't answer any of Tom's questions.
I never claimed I was perfect.
I never claimed I was perfect.
I never claimed I was perfect.
I never claimed I was perfect.
I knew Tom would accept my invitation.
I'll do whatever it takes to save Tom.
I'll do whatever it takes to save Tom.
He must work hard.
Tom doesn't have hair.
I don't know how Tom got my phone number.
I don't try to please everyone.
I don't try to please everyone.
Tom has too many strange ideas.
Tom has three younger brothers.
Tom has several thousand books.
I'm planning to buy a painting from Tom.
I like listening to Tom play the guitar.
I feel like I missed something.
Let's go eat. I'm starving.
I know how much you love Tom.
I know how much you love Tom.
Did you have fun? "Not really, it was boring."
Why are you so angry with me?
Why are you so angry with me?
I can see right through you.
You don't have to be so shy about it.
I didn't mean to offend anyone.
I don't apologize for anything.
If we'd followed Tom's advice, we wouldn't be having this problem now.
I think I'm going to get fired.
One acquires bad habits very easily.
Did you know Tom had gotten fired?
We hate Tom as much as you do.
Can you make a copy for me?
Can you make a copy for me?
Swimming in this lake is not permitted.
I really respect Tom.
The rules are very clear.
I don't keep secrets from Tom.
Everybody was listening intently to Tom's speech.
I knew I was safe there.
Tom was afraid he'd be late.
How many glasses of wine did you drink before I got here?
Let's sit down for a minute.
That's a fair question.
She keeps her diary in English.
Tom is being guarded by three men.
Why did you cancel your trip?
Why did you cancel your trip?
Why did you cancel your trip?
How many games do you have in your collection?
February is the coldest month of the year.
Tom defragmented his hard disk.
Tom didn't even get a chance to say goodbye.
Certainly.
Shit.
Why do people hate Tom so much?
The Astronomical Unit (AU) is defined as the average distance between the Earth and the Sun. It is approximately 150 million km (93 million miles).
Tom has three sons. One's almost your age.
Tom has three sons. One's almost your age.
I asked Tom why he wanted to study French.
I hope you find it interesting.
It may have been Tom who broke this window.
I swear I didn't see her.
I swear I didn't see him.
Tom got on his motorcycle and started it up.
If the world were perfect, it wouldn't be.
I wake up with difficulty.
I haven't gotten any letters from Tom yet.
Oh, a butterfly!
What can we do to increase our profits?
What can we do to increase our profits?
I hope you find it interesting.
We'll give an interview in the afternoon.
Tom is upstairs in his bedroom.
I had no idea that you were having trouble with Tom.
I live in this area.
Tom usually only wears his glasses when he's reading.
I asked Tom why he never studied French.
I prefer doing my own research.
Tom bought three pairs of shoes.
I share a room with my brother.
Tom didn't help wash the dishes.
Are you really going to let Tom go there by himself?
Are you really going to let Tom go there by himself?
Tom doesn't have any bad habits.
I asked Tom to go to the supermarket and buy some bread.
I asked Tom to go to the supermarket and buy some bread.
I would like to visit South Korea.
I would like to visit South Korea.
I would like to eat ice cream.
I would like to have some pancakes now.
I would like my name to be Tom.
Tom has a lot of valuable books.
Can you tell me how you found out that Tom wasn't at school today?
Can you tell me how you found out that Tom wasn't at school today?
Tom helped the teacher decorate the classroom for Valentine's Day.
Do you like Korean food?
Do you like Italian food?
I don't like socializing.
I feel like eating popcorn.
I don't like feeling helpless.
May I take a bath?
My time is very expensive.
I wish I were a good singer.
I wish I could use magic.
We are to take an exam tomorrow.
Tom arrived on foot.
My mother is very hard to please.
This is just propaganda.
I'm a careful man.
I wanted to show Tom how good I was at skating.
I sometimes skate.
They recognized Tom.
You haven't convinced me yet.
You haven't convinced me yet.
You haven't convinced me yet.
Tom threw the book into the fire.
Tom has a Canadian girlfriend.
When did you buy this bicycle?
When did you buy this bicycle?
When did you buy this bicycle?
Tom was worried sick.
I asked Tom if we could meet.
I want to visit South Korea.
It's a plant.
I've never kept a diary.
You shouldn't have brought Tom with you.
You shouldn't have brought Tom with you.
Let's talk to Tom and find out what he thinks.
I didn't talk to Tom about this.
I'd like to visit Australia.
I'd like to visit Australia.
Tom was interrupted.
Tom was interrupted.
She's our teacher.
She's our teacher.
He is a famous composer.
He is a famous composer.
Tom rushed upstairs.
Don't be so angry.
Don't be so angry.
Tom isn't surprised.
Tom's mother forced him to eat his vegetables.
The same thing must've happened to Tom.
Are you going to open the envelope?
Your battery is running low.
Tom is the only one here who can play the guitar.
Tom's advice didn't help at all.
I assume you're angry.
Don't listen to Tom. He doesn't know what he's talking about.
Don't listen to Tom. He doesn't know what he's talking about.
I wish I had Tom's strength.
How did Tom ever talk you into doing this?
I asked Tom why he did it.
I asked Tom why he did it.
I don't have a lot of patients.
How can we contact you?
Did you hear about what happened to Tom?
You've got to move.
You've got to move.
Tom approached them.
Loud music bothers me.
The music you listen to reflects your inner world.
Tom has unique musical abilities.
Tom has three sons, I believe.
Tom is a monster.
Tom has an older brother named John.
You're starting to scare me.
I'm putting this sentence on Tatoeba and nobody can stop me!
I am checking my mailbox.
Finish your work.
Finish your work.
I'm dying of thirst. Give me water!
You've been convicted.
You aren't late.
You aren't late.
I'm friends with a lot of them.
When can we move?
Where do I turn?
Tom doesn't have a ticket.
Tom has never had much money.
Tom has never had much money.
There isn't enough time to do that.
You're Tom's friend.
She works hard and never complains.
She works hard and never complains.
He works hard and never complains.
You can't handle this alone.
You can't handle this alone.
Tom watches on TV all informative programms
I saw five planes taking off, as if they were birds.
Tom spent days in the archives and wrote articles at night.
We're all unique.
Be careful with Tom.
I felt powerless.
I felt powerless.
I felt powerless.
I felt powerless.
I get scared when it thunders.
What places would you like to visit?
What places would you like to visit?
Let's do it for Tom.
I thought about Tom.
Even expert drivers can make mistakes.
Put your helmet on.
This is the pool where Tom learned to swim.
I'll do whatever I can to help you and Tom.
Tom has sheep.
You can't marry Tom.
You can't marry Tom.
You can't marry Tom.
You can't marry Tom.
By the way, I saw Tom last night.
By the way, you can all call me Tom.
By the way, you can all call me Tom.
By the way, he's already at the office.
Tom pressed his cheek against my cheek.
Put your helmet on.
I swear it's true.
Put your helmet on.
Those who don't learn from their mistakes are doomed to repeat them.
I want to dive into the river.
She despises him only because he is poor.
You despise me, don't you?
You despise me, don't you?
You despise Tom, don't you?
You despise Tom, don't you?
They don't despise you.
Why do you despise people?
Why do you despise people?
Tom despises people who smoke.
His very servants despised him.
I despise him.
No one dared to approach Tom, as he had a knife in his hand.
She despises Tom.
Ken despises Tom.
It makes no difference whether you go or not.
It makes no difference whether you go or not.
It makes no difference whether you go or not.
He despises Tom.
I despise Tom.
This dress is a good buy.
Did you ask Tom who helped him with his homework?
Did you ask Tom who helped him with his homework?
Did you ask Tom who helped him with his homework?
Did you ask Tom who helped him with his homework?
I will never be late again.
I'm pretty sure that Tom doesn't have a brother.
I'm pretty sure that Tom doesn't have a brother.
I can't control Tom.
You can call me Tom.
You can call me Tom.
I see Tom every day.
I see him every day.
I see her every day.
I see them every day.
We see each other every day.
I stole it from Tom.
What was Tom's plan?
How do you guys know Tom?
How can we save Tom?
Why did you decide to name your son Tom?
Why did you decide to name your son Tom?
Tom has never had the chance to do that.
Tom committed suicide when he was thirty.
Tom committed suicide when he was thirty.
I don't know if Tom has a brother or not.
I don't think Tom has a brother.
I didn't want to get out of bed.
I wonder how long Tom will be here.
Tom asked me to call him John from now on.
I've never made a lot of money.
Tom lost the key to his dorm room.
Tom is from the same village that I'm from.
I'm sorry if I offended anyone.
I'm sorry if I offended anyone.
Tom described what happened in great detail.
Tom drank the whole bottle of wine by himself.
We'll see what Tom has to say about that.
Tom didn't commit the crimes he's been accused of.
Tom doesn't brush his teeth as often as he should.
Tom doesn't really believe that nonsense, does he?
I told everyone to be careful.
I told everyone to be careful.
I miss my family and my friends.
I just wanted to thank everyone.
Tom is sleeping like a baby.
Don't yell at Tom.
You don't look anything like Tom.
You don't look anything like Tom.
I suggest you let Tom go.
I was surprised to find out that Tom had children.
Did you eat well?
Did you eat well?
Enjoy the moment.
Ask Tom to help you.
Ask Tom to help you.
Don't interrupt Tom.
Gas is cheap now.
I have to visit Tom.
Tom did it for free.
She may have been surprised when she received my letter.
Tom had a rough day.
I blame Tom.
Tom won't interfere.
Tom won't interfere.
Tom has a black cat.
Tom has a black cat.
Tom has two choices.
We were grateful.
Wasn't it enough?
It cost too much.
It cost too much.
It cost too much.
It cost too much.
Who attacked you?
They cried in each other's arms.
We cried in each other's arms.
This is Tom's favorite expression.
Tom ran out of time.
Tom ran out of food.
I climbed the tree.
I climbed the tree.
I climbed the tree.
I'm about to eat.
Time is precious.
Tom can eat anything he wants.
Your handwriting is very bad, I can't read it.
Tom set the table.
I talked to Tom.
You may go there.
You may go there.
I saw you outside.
I saw you outside.
Tom and his wife have just had a baby.
Why don't you apply for the job of interpreter?
Why don't you apply for the job of interpreter?
Can you explain why Tom isn't here?
Can you explain why Tom isn't here?
Can you explain why Tom isn't here?
Can you explain why Tom isn't here?
I'll help you look for Tom.
I'll help you look for Tom.
Tom fainted at the sight of blood.
I think Tom has a girlfriend already.
Can I eat?
I asked for Tom.
I asked Tom.
I spend at least three hours a week studying French.
Tom and I are well.
Tom and I are well.
Tom and I are well.
Let me drive you.
Don't let Tom down.
Don't let Tom down.
Did you invite Tom?
You may quote me.
You may quote me.
You may quote me.
You may quote me.
They wash lettuce.
Tom didn't have it.
Tom didn't have it.
We got snowed in.
We both miss you.
We both miss you.
We both miss you.
I understood Tom's point of view.
I understood Tom's point of view.
Tom is convinced that's a good idea.
Tom was the winner.
Give me a moment.
We love Tom dearly.
Sorry, I'm late.
Sorry, I'm late.
Everyone knows Tom.
Obey your father.
Obey your father.
Obey your father.
Obey your father.
She likes tigers.
You like tigers.
You like tigers.
Who else hates Tom?
Tom's dog hated me.
Please forgive Tom.
The sunset is beautiful.
Be there at noon.
Be there at noon.
How can you lose?
How can you lose?
Stop bothering Tom.
I miss you a lot.
Stop interfering.
Take it away, please.
Take it away, please.
Take it away, please.
Take it away, please.
Give us a moment.
Give us a moment.
The one with the guitar is Tom.
I can't ignore Tom.
Where is it kept?
Where is it kept?
Where is it kept?
Tom's parents were shocked.
I wanted to be Tom.
The balloon popped unexpectedly.
Tom shoved his hands in his pockets.
I'll get fired if I don't do it.
I'll be waiting for you outside.
I'll be waiting for you outside.
Tom asked me to read him some poems.
Tom was very tense.
I'm an hour late.
I'm in my office.
Look at Tom's face.
Look at Tom's face.
Does Tom scare you?
Does Tom scare you?
The country isn't rich in natural resources.
There are seven billion people in the world, and yet I am nonetheless alone.
I nearly fainted when I heard the story.
I ate an apple before I went for a walk.
You left the car headlights on.
You're a monster.
You're a monster.
Ask Tom to call me.
Ask Tom to call me.
Please call me Tom.
Please call me Tom.
I need that tape.
I've drawn a map.
I just can't stand Tom.
Did that surprise you?
Did that surprise you?
I came to say hi.
I came to say hi.
She is an expert.
I don't care why.
Be frank with me!
Be frank with me!
Be frank with me!
Draw a line here.
Tom missed his son.
I recently met Tom.
You surprised me.
When can I see Tom?
I'm friends with all those guys.
You can let Tom go.
Can't you stop Tom?
Can't you stop Tom?
Tom took a picture.
Can I sit with Tom?
Tom turned scarlet.
That's very rare.
I will die without you. "I'll go to your funeral."
That's the worst.
Take it upstairs.
Take it upstairs.
Take it upstairs.
Tom has green eyes.
Do I look like Tom?
Can we see Tom now?
Can I call you Tom?
Can I call you Tom?
It's cooler here.
You should ask Tom.
You should ask Tom.
You should ask Tom.
You should ask Tom.
He began with a joke.
Did Tom have a gun?
Did Tom have a gun?
We were working hard on the project.
Give Tom your seat.
Give Tom your seat.
Be brief, please.
Be brief, please.
She got back in her car.
They all loved Tom.
He is morose today.
I'm not worried about it at all.
Take us there, Tom.
Take us there, Tom.
Their job is to wash the cars.
Tom has a really good voice.
They were waiting for Tom.
We were attacked.
We bike together.
Why are you always so suspicious?
Why are you always so suspicious?
Why are you always so suspicious?
Why are you always so suspicious?
Why are you always so suspicious?
Everything I do turns into a disaster.
Tom glided across the ice effortlessly.
Tom's feet sank in the snow.
You'll get pneumonia.
You'll get pneumonia.
Tom strung the tree with lights.
The roof collapsed under the weight of the snow.
Your house looks so cosy.
A genius is a person with extraordinary creative abilities.
All the girls love Tom.
What will we do if he's late?
I'm not Chinese.
The dog follows me everywhere.
My studies are financed by my mother.
Poetry is my passion.
What's your email address?
Tom is shoveling snow outside.
Tom is a typical teenager.
Tom is a typical teenager.
Salt makes ice melt faster.
Salt makes ice melt faster.
Tom isn't good at hiding his emotions.
Tom isn't good at hiding his emotions.
There's snow outside.
You're too tense.
You're very wise.
You're very wise.
You're very wise.
You're very wise.
I'm surprised Tom was even here.
Tom has three beautiful daughters.
Tom was my partner.
I ran out of gas.
Tom wiped his face.
What does Tom have?
We need Tom's help.
You're objective.
You're objective.
You're objective.
We're frightened.
Tom is ashamed of his body.
His lips brushed against mine.
Tom's arm brushed against mine.
Tom's arm brushed against mine.
Tom had a good job.
I had to carry Tom upstairs.
They're upstairs.
Tom looked outside.
Don't laugh at Tom.
Don't laugh at Tom.
Who do you blame?
Who do you blame?
I finished the wine and set down the glass.
Tom's car is dirty.
We're all like Tom.
Wait a minute, Tom.
The towel is dry.
The problem is you're not patient enough.
The problem is you're not patient enough.
The problem is you're not patient enough.
Your problem is you're not patient enough.
Your problem is you're not patient enough.
Your problem is you're not patient enough.
Tom doesn't like being told he's not old enough yet.
I think this is very dangerous, and in general, a bad idea.
I don't claim that we're perfect.
Tom didn't take a bath for a week.
Why don't you take Tom?
Why don't you take Tom?
I hope we beat Tom.
The child hid behind a big tree.
The girl is a nurse.
If we stick together, we'll be able to survive.
Are you dating Tom?
I'm your partner.
I can speak to Tom.
Japanese manga and anime are popular around the world.
American movies are popular around the world.
That's pretty incredible.
Tom is never sober.
Tom is never sober.
Tom is never there.
I saw Tom today. "Who?!"
You're a traitor.
I know where you hide your diary.
Go and don't be afraid. We'll protect you.
Tom's house has three bedrooms.
Tom's house has three bedrooms.
Give me the ball.
Give me the ball.
I didn't want to throw it out.
I feel like I'm a teenager again.
I feel like I'm a teenager again.
You don't love Tom, do you?
You don't love Tom, do you?
Your French accent is terrible.
I must thank him.
I read Tom's diary.
I know this joke.
I brought Tom home.
Give Tom my thanks.
Give Tom my thanks.
He's a bit naive.
You'd remember Tom.
You'd remember Tom.
They abandoned Tom.
That sounds fair.
Tom wasn't perfect.
We'll convince Tom.
Tom started typing.
Tom started typing.
Are you a lawyer?
Let's be friends.
Tom is not happy you're late again.
Tom is not happy you're late again.
In some countries capital punishment is illegal.
Tom is independent.
What kind of fruit is green?
The bin is empty.
Lunch is at noon.
Someone called Tom.
May I see your collection of old books?
He threw his toy.
Tom was left alone.
Tom is fashionable.
No one noticed Tom.
Tom was so careful.
We want to see Tom.
I'll eat it here.
I'll eat it here.
Tom was in trouble.
I don't remember him saying that.
It took me several hours to write it.
Tom learned to ride a bike when he was ten years old.
I've always been proud of Tom.
Tom always walks to school when it isn't raining.
No one wanted to listen to me.
Bad people aren't born bad.
We can still break even.
Who told you such nonsense?
He told us a lie.
We can't leave Tom.
I'll take Tom home.
I'm going with Tom.
Tom waved the flag.
I didn't touch Tom.
Could you call Tom?
Could you call Tom?
The river is frozen over.
Don't you miss Tom?
Don't you miss Tom?
They took Tom away.
They took Tom away.
They took Tom away.
I'm sorry I lost my temper.
Should we call Tom?
Tom has already apologized for that.
Tom has three gorgeous daughters.
I can't give you the exact numbers.
Tom has an earache.
Tom got up to greet me.
Tom got up to greet me.
They got up to greet him.
They got up to greet her.
I got up to greet them.
I got up to greet them.
Tom got up to greet them.
Tom got up to greet them.
Tom got up to greet us.
Tom got up to greet us.
We got up to greet them.
Tom didn't give up.
Tom bowed politely.
Tom almost fainted.
They decorated the tree with stars and ornaments.
Tom almost drowned.
Never tell a lie.
Do you still love Tom?
Do you still love Tom?
Do you still love Tom?
Tom has three dogs.
Tom hid behind a rock.
Tom hid behind a rock.
Tom tried to hide his anger.
Tom tried to hide his anger.
Tom has three cats.
They skied all day long.
Do you have rice?
Tom drank some poison by mistake.
I've been an athlete my whole life.
I'm looking forward to next summer.
Tom has a big closet in his room.
I'd like to know why you were late.
I'd like to know why you were late.
Either day is OK.
I missed the bus.
Tom dried his hands with a towel.
Tom hates sitting in traffic.
Don't deceive Tom.
Don't deceive Tom.
Why did you bring Tom here?
Why did you bring Tom here?
Give me a towel.
We planted rice.
That cost a lot.
After the bird had sung, it flew away.
It was hopeless.
Who do we blame?
Tom threatened us.
Is that Tom's car?
I miss you, too.
I miss you, too.
Try to ignore Tom.
Try to ignore Tom.
Don't you see Tom?
Don't you see Tom?
Did you shoot Tom?
I'm still dizzy.
We must be fair.
Don't disturb Tom.
We laughed at Tom.
Tom has a visitor.
Tom began to pray.
You better hide.
You better hide.
You better hide.
You better hide.
You look sleepy.
You look sleepy.
Please be brief.
Please be brief.
Why was I fired?
Why was I fired?
Is Tom badly hurt?
Tom's hair is wet.
This is Tom's cat.
Is this about Tom?
She's just a babe in the woods.
Tom squatted down.
Take me to them.
Take me to them.
Can I quote you?
Leave Tom with me.
Leave Tom with me.
Get me my pills.
Get me my pills.
Find me a glass.
Find me a glass.
I want to know how tall Tom is.
These are for Tom.
It's all so sad.
Are you prudent?
Are you prudent?
Are you prudent?
This one's nice.
This one's nice.
This one's nice.
Hand me a towel.
Hand me a towel.
Don't swim here.
Don't swim here.
Can I see Tom now?
Tom has a big dog.
I see her quite often.
I see him quite often.
We did warn Tom.
Tom has a strange way of speaking.
Tom has a strange way of speaking.
You must save Tom.
You must save Tom.
Tom had blue eyes.
You look like Tom.
We should ask Tom.
We need a break.
It was Tom's wish.
We were in love.
I threw it away.
I threw it away.
I can't stop Tom.
You can't stop Tom.
You can't stop Tom.
You can't stop Tom.
I'm new at this.
That guy's name was Tom.
Tom's name was on the list.
Would I kid you?
I tend to agree.
Talk to Tom again.
Talk to Tom again.
I have an ulcer.
I can walk home.
Tom had a problem.
I dropped my key somewhere around here.
I won't drop it.
I won't drop it.
Ken gave up.
Tom isn't at work.
Tell me frankly.
Tell me frankly.
That's a puzzle.
Squirrels only find a quarter of the nuts that they bury.
There are risks.
The patient is in danger.
We'll do everything in our power to find Tom.
I'm siding with Tom.
Tom has a new job.
I couldn't do that to Tom.
I know Tom appreciates it.
I'd like to get rid of all these things.
I consider Tom my friend.
I don't really want to go swimming today.
We all missed Tom.
Tom is my fiancé.
I said let Tom go.
I said let Tom go.
I've missed you.
I never asked Tom.
I found Tom there.
I found Tom there.
I bumped into Tom.
What did Tom have?
Tom is my partner.
They visited us.
Tom won't give up.
Don't yell at Tom.
That's Tom's girl.
Don't look at Tom.
Call Tom immediately.
Call Tom immediately.
There was broken glass everywhere.
Let's call Tom.
Let's call Tom.
I'm Tom's neighbor.
Tom has a pacemaker.
I like to translate your sentences.
That's all Tom has to say.
I don't like Tom and I don't trust him.
They released Tom.
You're so tense.
You're not hurt.
You're not hurt.
You're not hurt.
You aren't late.
You're a weirdo.
You're a winner.
You're a winner.
We're objective.
Everybody claps.
The cook prepares different dishes every day.
They're friends.
Tom isn't outside.
Tom isn't outside.
I think it's going to take time.
Each of them has a bicycle.
I'm going to the toy store with the children.
I don't miss Tom a bit.
I feel so sorry for Tom.
What color hair does Tom have?
Promise me that you won't sell your guitar to anyone but me.
Are you recording this conversation?
Tom is getting suspicious.
Tom scared me.
They've taken Tom.
Tom had a knife in his hand.
Did you stop Tom?
Did you stop Tom?
Did you arrest Tom?
How do I get to the airport?
Get off at the next stop and take a bus headed to the airport.
We can protect Tom.
Did you yell at Tom?
Did you yell at Tom?
The candle is melting down.
Are you saying that's not true?
Are you saying that's not true?
You could've been hurt.
You could've been hurt.
You could've been hurt.
Tom often walks to school.
Tom had no choice but to do what the boss told him to do.
Tom's comfortable.
How long has it been going on?
Tom can’t walk on his own yet.
Tom's son is sick.
I can't leave Tom.
I can't marry Tom.
I can't marry Tom.
I can't stand Tom.
Where's the oar?
They said goodbye to each other.
I saw Tom tonight.
Did you see Tom?
Did you see Tom?
Tom has been hurt.
Who's protecting Tom?
Is there a restaurant around here?
Tom is doing fine.
Tom's doing OK.
Is it too salty?
Is it too salty?
Is it too salty?
Tom never gave up.
I lost the game.
You'd better go.
You'd better go.
The only good fascist is a dead fascist.
I taught Tom how to drive.
We took Tom home.
We took Tom home.
Give her a doll.
Give her a doll.
Give her a doll.
Anybody will do.
Tom is the coach.
You can't lose.
Tom was a lawyer.
Don't apologize.
Tom has a kid.
The students bowed to their teacher.
I must go there.
Did you kiss Tom?
Did you kiss Tom?
Are you with Tom?
Was Tom punished?
Tom was punished.
I just fired Tom.
I don't want to see Tom naked.
Do not hesitate to ask me any kind of questions.
I thought you were going to talk with Tom.
I like singing with Tom.
Tom's girlfriend is older than he is.
You are simply unbearable!
Tom's arms ached.
I escaped death.
Tom has freckles.
Cover the pot while you cook.
Is your name Tom?
Should I ask Tom?
Should I ask Tom?
Get off my car.
You let Tom down.
You made Tom cry.
It was crowded.
It was crowded.
Can you stop Tom?
Can you stop Tom?
We'll go get Tom.
Temperatures have reached -60C in Siberia.
Tom decorated it.
Tom decorated it.
It bothered me.
Hug Tom.
Tom has two cats.
We both hate Tom.
We both hate Tom.
Does Tom have it?
Does Tom have it?
Does Tom have it?
Pray for me, Tom.
That scares me.
Send me a copy.
Send me a copy.
Thank Tom for me.
Thank Tom for me.
I've got to get back to the meeting.
I missed the last bus and had to walk home in the rain.
I'll have to be careful.
Maybe I threw it away.
Maybe I threw it away.
Maybe I threw it away.
Maybe I threw it away.
I believe Tom will be acquitted.
I assure you that's not the case.
Why is Tom's name not on the list?
She put off going to Mexico.
I want to find out where Tom bought his shoes.
Tom isn't big, but he's strong.
Don't forget to go shopping.
I don't want to turn on the news.
Everyone remained calm.
Tom took three steps backward.
It was incredibly dangerous.
Tom is bored.
I'm worried about Tom being alone.
I'm convinced Tom is lying.
You're a spy.
Tom digitized an old family photo and emailed it to his mother.
I really can't tell the difference.
I was Tom's apprentice.
I'm going to go get some food.
Tom is worried that he might get fired.
It's too far away to walk from here.
Tom's achievements speak for themselves.
Scores of people gathered in front of the Royal Palace.
There is a portrait of Tom Jackson on the wall.
How frequently do you check your email?
We really enjoyed the circus.
I'm going to blow your head off.
He grabbed the machine-gun and shot at the police car.
The fire went out by itself.
This movie is about Tom Jackson.
He fell a victim to a deadly disease.
Tom has a tattoo of a snake on his back.
Tom is handicapped.
Tom came out of the bathroom with a towel around his waist.
We have a big oak tree in our backyard.
Tom has his reasons for doing that.
My shoes are bigger than Tom's.
I am sure this book will be of great use to you.
How do you assess your students?
I sold the best jewel that I had.
I'm no longer attracted to you.
Tom's smile vanished.
Tom overlooked a few minor details.
He was a member of the Supreme Court.
Tom tossed the letter away.
Tom was the only one who was punished.
Tom has already been punished.
Most French people are against capital punishment.
This time, you won't avoid your punishment.
The whole group was punished for Tom's mistake.
Their punishment was harsh, but just.
I've been keeping a diary in French for the last three years.
Tom was punished for lying.
There was only one bottle of beer in the fridge.
There's more beer in the fridge.
Put the eggs in the fridge.
In the summer, I wear cotton shirts.
Tom looked at his reflection in the mirror.
A lot of snow fell on the Kanto region last week.
Shall I wrap it for you?
Tom wrapped a towel around himself.
He's changed a lot in his looks.
The peasants were planting rice.
Tom took off his clothes and got into the bathtub.
The queue for buying tickets was unbelievably long.
Tom has the keys.
This summer is chilly.
Tom also had a sister.
Tom also had a sister.
Tom also had a sister.
Tom was killed in October.
There's a chance that Tom might try to kill himself again.
If someone paid you to kill Tom, would you?
Do you have any idea who killed Tom?
Why do you think Tom was killed?
Tom, too, was almost killed.
Tom was killed by wild animals.
The bathroom window is open.
Tom has a large social network.
Present your argument.
Present your argument.
It was the wrong call.
Hope for the best, expect the worst.
Vienna was the heart of the Austro-Hungarian empire.
I have him eating out of my hand.
Tom has very little money.
Rice is the chief crop in this area.
Tom started to choke.
Brush your teeth every day.
Fortunately, Tom didn't get seriously hurt.
The desk was covered with dust.
We miss Tom terribly.
We miss Tom terribly.
Did you know that mosquitoes have teeth?
Tom's pupils are dilated.
I want to learn how to fly an airplane.
Drunk in moderation, alcohol is not harmful.
This book is boring.
Is Tom a hero or traitor?
Tom might be the traitor.
What exactly attracted you to Tom?
I didn't ask Tom for help.
I didn't ask Tom for help.
I've just saved you from Ganon! "You did not." "Okay then."
How rewarding do you find your job?
Tom has asked us to buy him something to eat.
Tom has asked us to buy him something to eat.
I'm not mad. I'm just sad.
I can hear sadness in your voice.
I don't want to leave Tom alone.
Tom has started playing the guitar again.
In both appearance and personality, Tom is exactly like his father.
Tom has our support.
I hope you find Tom soon.
Both of them survived.
Both of them survived.
We couldn't protect Tom.
I really don't know Tom.
I didn't dance with Tom.
If you see Tom, please tell him to call me.
If you see Tom, please tell him to call me.
Tom poured some milk in a bowl for his cats.
Tom poured some milk in a bowl for his cats.
Tom was upstairs.
I beg you to stay.
I beg you to stay.
I'm buying a puppy.
Is that Tom's fault?
I'm praying for Tom.
They agree with Tom.
We need to finish what we started.
Isn't Tom handsome?
I want you to light the candle.
I want you to light the candle.
I want you to light the candle.
Tom has a Japanese friend.
Tom's novel has been translated into French.
I don't know Tom well, but I know his wife.
We've been looking for you everywhere.
Tom was stabbed 13 times.
Tom had a lot of work to do.
There is no meat left in the fridge.
What happened to Tom's parents?
Excuse me, I'm looking for Tom.
Tom should be fired, too.
Tom has a lot of money now.
Why are you wearing Tom's jacket?
I saw Tom here yesterday.
I saw Tom here yesterday.
I came here to thank you.
I came here to thank you.
I came here to thank you.
I came here to thank you.
How did your meeting with your lawyer go?
Tom and I already know each other.
I'm officially on vacation.
I didn't even get an invitation.
I didn't even get an invitation.
Tom can't be killed.
It was excruciating.
Tom didn't specify how many pencils to buy.
My friend has a cat named Sock.
Tom was never threatened.
It was a tense moment.
Tom drowned in his neighbor's pool.
Tom is mopping the floor.
I hate interviews.
Tom listened patiently.
Do you want me to drive you home?
Do you want me to drive you home?
We're lucky Tom isn't here.
Do you recognize this handwriting?
Everybody wanted to see Tom.
Please don't blame me.
Please don't blame me.
We'll have to wait for Tom.
If I had seen Tom yesterday, I would've talked to him.
I asked Tom for permission.
I asked Tom for permission.
She listened patiently.
I don't normally wear skirts.
It's not a skirt. It's a kilt.
Don't break her heart.
Don't break his heart.
Don't break her heart.
Don't break his heart.
My situation is hopeless.
Tom shyly raised his hand.
I wish you all a Happy New Year.
Oh, what a beautiful doll!
What are you going to name your doll?
Tom's mother was aghast.
This play is about love.
Where's my little princess?
Give me a copy of this book.
Tom resigned the next day.
I want a glass.
I'll go find Tom.
I still miss Tom.
I said I saw Tom.
I never knew Tom.
We don't sing that song anymore.
I miss my wife.
Tom is giving up.
You're nothing.
You're nothing.
Don't run away.
That's so rude.
I won't miss Tom.
I'll go with Tom.
I'll ride with Tom.
I'm with Tom now.
They missed us.
Something frightened them.
Something frightened me.
Something frightened him.
Something frightened her.
Can you call Tom?
Can we bring Tom?
Can we bring Tom?
It's the truth, I swear.
We must do this without Tom.
If I were Tom, I'd sue them.
I spoke to Tom on the phone.
I spoke to Tom on the phone.
Tom said that he had to go there tomorrow.
They ignored Tom.
They ignored Tom.
All my friends like playing videogames.
The stars are out tonight.
You're bound to fail.
Tom has been appointed chairman.
I don't really care what happens.
I didn't think too much about it.
It wasn't long.
Tom stood nearby.
I'm stuck here.
I'd be careful.
I'd be careful.
Tom isn't inside.
We definitely need them.
We definitely need them.
They were fake.
Tom is fair.
They got stuck.
Tom felt like getting drunk.
Tom chose wisely.
I love you, he whispered into her ear.
Where are your gloves?
Did you really dance with Tom?
Where's my microphone?
Eggs are very fragile.
Do you think I still love Tom?
We need to take a short break.
We need to take a short break.
Did you really dance with Tom?
Ask Tom to attend the meeting.
Ask Tom to attend the meeting.
They never apologized.
We're extremely proud of Tom.
Tom enjoys listening to classical music.
Tom was fired from his job and his wife left him.
Tom's parents were born outside Canada.
Why did you turn it off?
My neck is a bit sore.
We don't have a moment to lose.
I fully support Tom.
Tom became very ill.
Tom was very proud.
I didn't expect that from Tom.
I didn't expect that from Tom.
Tom doesn't have any children, does he?
We're very grateful for that.
Tom eats lunch in the school cafeteria.
You'll both be missed.
You'll both be missed.
Tom has been patiently waiting all day.
We look forward to seeing you.
Why did you turn the TV off?
Why did you turn the TV off?
Why did you turn the TV off?
Why did you turn the TV off?
Why did you turn the TV off?
Why did you turn the TV off?
We're extremely proud of Tom.
That's very, very sad.
All of us went except for Tom.
Tom's wife left him.
The train was almost an hour behind schedule today.
Could he be Tom's son?
Could he be Tom's son?
The baby wrapped his tiny hand around Tom's finger.
Tom and I lost touch after we graduated.
Tom and I lost touch after we graduated.
His wife left him and he was fired from his job.
Tom's last name is easy to pronounce.
I'll replace Tom.
You're in love.
You're in love.
You're unusual.
You're unusual.
You're unusual.
You're unusual.
Tom couldn't take his eyes off her.
There were no slaves in the West.
She has infinite resources.
We're running out of ideas.
Nobody wants to sing with Tom.
It was hard to argue with Tom.
Tom has gray hair.
Her aunt's glasses are fashionable.
Tom had a problem yesterday.
That surprised me, too.
Tom goes out for a walk every morning.
I think I was in love with Tom.
I want you to stay on the beach.
I want you to stay on the beach.
I don't want to look at Tom.
I don't care what society thinks.
Tom took off his hat and bowed politely.
Every student has access to the library.
I like spending time with Tom.
Have you seen anything unusual lately?
Why did you turn the lights off?
We certainly can't blame you.
We certainly can't blame you.
We have to go there together.
Some people find this kind of thing annoying.
Ask Tom about it when he comes.
Tom and I are about the same height.
I'll be with Tom if you need me.
Tom wanted to see my stamp collection.
We often have lunch together.
Both cars headed north.
Tom washes his hair every day.
Our resources are limited.
Our resources are limited.
Be careful not to offend Tom.
I miss you, Tom.
How did you like Tom's concert?
How did you like Tom's concert?
Have you taken a bath yet?
Have you taken a bath yet?
Ask Tom to lend you some money.
Ask Tom to lend you some money.
We stayed at home all day.
Ask Tom if you have any doubts.
We're all here except for Tom.
We hope you find it useful.
We hope you find it useful.
We'll see Tom sooner or later.
We often went there to eat.
We plan to visit Tom tomorrow.
Tom threw his son out of the house.
They'll attack.
We're grateful.
I asked Tom where he was going.
Let's follow Tom.
Let's follow Tom.
I was dreaming.
I want Tom fired.
Why didn't you try calling Tom?
Tom can't refuse.
Let's go ask Tom.
Let's go ask Tom.
I would hate to be in Tom's shoes right now.
Was Tom killed?
Let's go again.
I don't know Tom.
Did you find Tom?
Did you find Tom?
Did you warn Tom?
Did you warn Tom?
Did you warn Tom?
Tom is waking up.
Don't be naive.
Don't be naive.
Don't be naive.
Don't be naive.
Don't be naive.
I don't know Tom that well yet.
I don't know Tom that well yet.
The water was murky.
Tom asked me what I wanted to eat.
I've met Tom quite a few times.
That's a risk we had to take.
That's a risk we had to take.
We hope it isn't true.
I was totally in love with Tom.
We tried to reach you.
We tried to reach you.
I want to introduce you to Tom.
I want to introduce you to Tom.
We must develop a plan.
We must not allow this.
I still haven't heard from Tom.
I still haven't heard from Tom.
I said I wanted to talk to Tom.
I really do feel sorry for Tom.
It's dangerous to play here.
I made an appointment with Tom.
I just wanted to stay with Tom.
Is Tom in a good mood?
I should've asked Tom when I had the chance.
I should've kissed Tom when I had the chance.
I got these old coins from Tom.
I go to the same school as Tom.
I asked Tom where he was going.
Tom is usually useless in these situations.
I don't like rice.
My favorite restaurant burned down.
Who ate all the fruit?
I can't dance holding a drink.
Tom slipped a pair of socks on.
Tom has been taken to a hospital.
I canceled the order.
Drugs can ruin your life.
Tom has fewer friends than I do.
Tom has something under his arm.
Why do we talk so much about Tom?
Tom passed away on October 20th.
I'm pretty sure Tom wasn't there.
Tom said goodbye to his friends.
I have no idea why Tom was fired.
Tom has more free time than I do.
That's what I expected from Tom.
Tom is in charge of this project.
Tom won a free trip to Australia.
Why do I have to sing with Tom?
Go take a walk.
Go take a walk.
Go take a walk.
Go take a walk.
We should ask Tom to come back.
Tom washes his car once a week.
I don't mind walking.
Tom is a veteran.
Tom had no money.
Tell me a joke.
I'm not that surprised.
I'm not that surprised.
Don't obey him.
Don't obey him.
He is walking.
She is walking.
Tom was on duty.
We have to persuade Tom to stay here.
Children often want to do things that are dangerous without knowing that they are dangerous.
We were surprised to see Tom there.
I know a couple guys on Tom's team.
I know a couple guys on Tom's team.
I know a couple guys on Tom's team.
We're lucky Tom isn't here with us.
I told her not to give up.
I told him not to give up.
I told them not to give up.
I told them not to give up.
I told you not to give up.
I told you not to give up.
I told you not to give up.
I told her not to give up.
I told him not to give up.
I told them not to give up.
I told you not to give up.
I told you not to give up.
I told her to be careful.
I told him to be careful.
I told them to be careful.
Try this candy.
Try this candy.
I hit Tom again.
Many consider Italian to be the world's most beautiful language.
Tom is barefoot.
Don't you recognize that man?
Tom's parents didn't attend his wedding.
We don't have enough money.
We both saw Tom.
We both saw Tom.
I knew Tom would be late.
I knew Tom would be late.
The food is fantastic.
Tom didn't sign the agreement.
Tom is autistic.
I don't want to discuss that with Tom.
Sooner or later, the truth'll come out.
How did you manage to get Tom to help?
How did you manage to get Tom to help?
Do you want me to ask Tom to help you?
Do you want me to ask Tom to help you?
Do you want me to ask Tom to help you?
Do you want me to ask Tom to help you?
Tom wanted to go to the beach.
I'm not going to be a coach.
Was Tom the one who broke the window?
Tom was hit by a drunk driver.
I don't have much in common with Tom.
I had a very boring weekend.
I don't walk anywhere anymore.
All the girls wanted to dance with Tom.
We're doing everything we can for Tom.
Tom still has a lot of apples.
Tom still has a lot of apples.
Tom poured the milk in a bowl.
If you're bored, I suggest you to go to the cinema.
I don't believe that Tom is guilty.
I don't believe that Tom is guilty.
How dare you do that to Tom!
How dare you do that to Tom!
How dare you make fun of Tom!
How dare you make fun of Tom!
How dare you accuse me of that!
How dare you accuse me of that!
How dare you accuse me of lying!
How dare you accuse me of lying!
How dare you accuse me of that!
How dare you accuse me of that!
How dare you say such things about Tom!
How dare you say such things about Tom!
Tom probably missed his train.
Tom said that's just not true.
Did you do what you're accused of doing?
Did you do what you're accused of doing?
Tom shot a deer.
Tom worked hard.
Who broke this?
I met Tom there.
I usually walk.
Why is Tom late?
He worked hard.
Who brought Tom?
Where were you yesterday afternoon?
I talked to Tom about what happened.
Tom saw a mouse.
Tom saw a mouse.
Let's go get drunk.
You look bored.
Tom accidentally dropped an egg on the floor.
Were you able to talk to Tom yesterday?
Were you able to talk to Tom yesterday?
Things took a sudden turn for the worse.
Things took a sudden turn for the worse.
Tom kicked the ball very hard.
Tom got a puppy.
I don't want you hanging out with Tom.
Oh, how I miss you!
Does Tom have to walk to school every day?
Tom filled the pot with water.
Tom filled the pot with water.
Tom filled the pot with water.
Do you really want to walk to Tom's house?
Do you really want to walk to Tom's house?
I don't smoke, drink or do drugs.
Tom has a talent for painting.
Tom has red hair and freckles.
Tom has very neat handwriting.
I didn't know Tom was such a good singer.
Tom hung his jacket on a hook.
I asked Tom if he knew my brother's name.
It's been snowing for three straight days.
Tom insists on coming with me.
I thought you were Tom's best friend.
I thought you were Tom's best friend.
I don't recommend this technique.
My mother doesn't want me to go skating on the pond.
Tom skied down the mountain.
The old law about 'an eye for an eye' leaves everybody blind.
Tom is ambitious and talented.
You shouldn't hang out with people like that.
Mrs. Smith goes to church by car.
Did you bring a towel?
The mouse hid from the cat.
The mouse hid from the cat.
Tom and his friends headed towards the beach.
I liked walking alone on the deserted beach.
Tom has a green card.
I know that nothing lasts forever.
How many sons does Tom have?
Tom is hiding from the tax collectors.
We missed Tom.
I'm fortunate to have survived the accident.
This will come in handy.
The medic ripped open Tom's shirt and took a look at the wound.
I wasn't surprised at all.
Tom waved to everyone he saw.
I haven't thought about it since.
Don't waste your time trying to convince Tom.
I have no regrets about retiring.
Was Tom the one who taught you how to ski?
Was Tom the one who taught you how to ski?
She threatened to call the police.
Tom kicked the bucket.
Tom isn't overweight.
Tom has three secretaries.
I don't know anyone, except for Tom.
How many cats does Tom have?
Tell her that I am praying.
Tom set the table for supper.
Tom set the table for supper.
I didn't know Tom didn't have a driver's license.
How often do you go shopping?
I'm worried about him.
We're all very good players.
Tom needed money desperately.
If he were here, he would visit us.
The medicine seemed to have no effect on the patient.
The medicine seemed to have no effect on the patient.
Tom never breaks a promise.
Tom never breaks his promises.
How do they communicate?
Tom has more questions.
Tom loves me, and I love Tom.
The tax code is too complex.
Why is sweat salty?
My brother is driving me crazy.
Why are tears salty?
I'll send you Tom's picture.
Tom was hurt in the accident.
I went swimming in the river.
Have you decided where you're going to celebrate your birthday?
Have you decided where you're going to celebrate your birthday?
Have you decided where you're going to celebrate your birthday?
Have you decided where you're going to celebrate your birthday?
Did Tom say he was going to walk to school tomorrow?
I'll send you Tom's picture.
I don't know whose bicycle this is.
I hope they appreciate your humor.
Tom has a flip phone.
Why do we learn so much useless stuff in school?
Power has driven him mad.
She still misses you.
Sometimes you have to surrender.
I worked as a waiter for three years.
He bought new gloves.
Tom has more books than I do.
I like singing and playing the guitar.
Tom was apparently murdered while he was sleeping.
Tom has made a lot of new friends.
What nonsense are you talking now?
Tom never walks anywhere.
Stop interrupting me!
Stop interrupting me!
There were toys scattered all over the floor.
I'm leading a country.
I'm leading a country.
Tom has good chance of winning.
Isn't that too expensive?
Isn't that too expensive?
I guess I was a little too hard on you.
I'm extremely grateful to you and Tom.
I feel tempted to do that.
Tom has a very bad temper.
Tomorrow is Tom's birthday.
Everyone but Tom swam.
I canceled.
I canceled.
Tom is having a bad day.
I just got another phone call from Tom.
I just got another phone call from Tom.
Finally I have contributed 10,000 sentences, in various languages, to Tatoeba.
I really feel sorry for Tom.
Who threw a pie at Tom?
I don't care what you think anymore.
Tom listens to classical music.
She was becoming impatient.
War is the continuation of politics by other means.
Tom has bigger hands than me.
Tom has bigger hands than me.
Tom has bigger hands than me.
Your French isn't bad.
I taught myself French.
I'm a beginner in French.
Tom's French is terrible.
How's your French coming?
He tried to master French.
Is Tom any good at French?
One of Tom's sons became a doctor.
I'm not much of a cook.
Tom looked around his room.
Tom has more money than brains.
Tom's French is really good.
Tom's French isn't very good.
There wasn't enough time to do that.
I'm Tom's aunt.
Tom's wife died last week.
Tom made the soccer team.
Tom had a rough day at work.
Money, like vodka, turns a person into an eccentric.
I'll let Tom go.
Tom leaned back.
How late am I?
I saw Tom on TV.
Buy some toys.
I never hit Tom.
I never hit Tom.
What kind of trouble is Tom in?
I always eat lunch at two.
Have you seen Tom's new house?
Have you seen Tom's new house?
It'll take at least three hours.
I want you to eat something.
Why don't you both give up?
Tom doesn't plan to give up.
Tom has added three new names to the list.
Kiss Tom for me.
It was from Tom.
It was from Tom.
It was from Tom.
It was from Tom.
Can we save Tom?
Tom shot three times.
Tom shot three times.
I ate some cheese.
I hid in the basement.
Tom smelled gas.
Wake the kids.
Wake the kids.
I just feel sorry for Tom.
I just feel sorry for Tom.
I do feel sorry for Tom.
I feel very sorry for Tom.
I feel so sorry for Tom.
I don't feel sorry for Tom.
That's a risk.
We followed Tom.
We followed Tom.
Tom winked back.
That was free.
Resist resistance!
Resist resistance!
Tom wasn't here.
Put that away.
Put that away.
Tom was elected.
Tom was elected.
It's so dusty.
It's so dusty.
It's so dusty.
We already have enough to worry about.
We really missed you.
We really missed you.
We really missed you.
Tom had cancer.
Tom isn't alive.
Tom is grateful.
Don't get mad.
Don't drop it.
Don't drop it.
Don't drop it.
Don't drop it.
Fill this out.
Fill this out.
Take that box away!
Take that box away!
Take that box away!
Take that box away!
Tom attacked me.
Please find Tom.
Please find Tom.
Just ignore Tom.
Just ignore Tom.
Was Tom rescued?
Tom is retiring.
You're polite.
You're polite.
You're polite.
You're boring.
You're boring.
You're boring.
You're boring.
You're boring.
You're boring.
You're boring.
I wouldn't wish it on my worst enemy.
Let's thank Tom.
We're friends.
Okay, wait outside.
Tom has talent.
Tom had an anxiety attack.
I saw Tom today.
Let's be fair.
Do you miss Tom?
Do you know Tom?
Tom is anorexic.
Tom is a weirdo.
We won't lose.
Open the safe.
Open the safe.
Open the safe.
Open the safe.
Leave Tom alone.
Leave Tom alone.
I'll go there.
Is Tom on duty?
Turn the page.
Someone stole my rucksack.
Bill Gates founded Microsoft.
Wake him up.
Wake him up.
Wake her up.
Wake her up.
Wake them up.
Wake them up.
He always values his wife's opinions.
Tom is retired.
Take him away.
Take him away.
Take him away.
Take him away.
I hate Tom now.
I'll eat here.
Tom smells bad.
Tom shot at me.
Tom has braces.
We ignored Tom.
We ignored Tom.
Don't be late.
Don't give up!
I like skiing.
Stand up and take a bow.
Am I talented?
Tom lost again.
Tom was dizzy.
Dark matter is invisible.
It astonished me how nice Tom was to ladies.
Every time I get back from my evening walk, I see Tom sleeping in front of the TV.
Tom said hello.
I'll take him.
It scared me.
It scared me.
Be objective.
I'm so bored.
I'm so proud.
Who broke it?
Who broke it?
I can take Tom.
I just saw Tom.
Tom will shoot.
Tom will share.
I like candy.
She threatened him.
You'll see Tom.
You'll see Tom.
They heard Tom.
Women like Tom.
We'll stop Tom.
You must eat.
You must eat.
Tom took notes.
Take us home.
It was empty.
It was empty.
I followed Tom.
Help Tom study.
Help Tom study.
Are you cold?
Are you cold?
Are you cold?
Bring Tom here.
Bring Tom here.
Bring Tom here.
Bring Tom here.
Tom intervened.
No one has succeeded in solving the mystery.
You're a spy.
It would be very expensive.
It would be very expensive.
It would be very expensive.
Don't resist.
Tom's bleeding.
Tom's bleeding.
Have courage.
Have courage.
Let's fire Tom.
Let's find Tom.
I went to the beach.
I went to the beach.
But it's too expensive!
It's not too expensive.
I opened the safe.
I didn't have lunch.
I teach Tom French.
They're late.
I'm a waiter.
I'm barefoot.
I'm barefoot.
Find Tom and tell him to come here right now.
Tom looks pale.
Is Tom nearby?
You need to tell us where we can find Tom.
Tom got stuck.
Tom was tense.
Take it away.
Take it away.
Take it away.
Take it away.
I rescued Tom.
It'll burn.
It'll burn.
Ice is solid.
Share your experience.
I study French with Tom three times each week.
Tom would like to have a smooth skin.
Tom scared us.
Take me home.
Take me home.
I ignored Tom.
I ignored Tom.
I ignored Tom.
I missed you.
Tom has a gun.
Tom had a gun.
Tom had a job.
Tom had a cat.
Tom bent down.
Tom has money.
I know I'm not good enough.
They know Tom.
Pick a date.
Pick a date.
I was sober.
I was sober.
Just find Tom.
Just find Tom.
Eat with us.
Ask Tom again.
Ask Tom again.
Ask Tom again.
I sprang out of bed.
I sprang out of bed.
Tom will walk.
Tom is polite.
Get dressed.
Get dressed.
Why blame Tom?
He let Tom go.
She let Tom go.
Listen to Tom.
Listen to Tom.
Listen to Tom.
Listen to Tom.
Listen to Tom.
Listen to Tom.
Take Tom home.
Take Tom home.
Take Tom home.
Take Tom home.
They walked.
They walked.
Tom ate alone.
Tom ate alone.
Tom got taken.
He relented.
She relented.
Tom is on TV.
Tom rushed home.
Go brush your teeth.
Go brush your teeth.
You shot Tom.
You shot Tom.
She shot Tom.
She shot Tom.
He shot Tom.
I'm 17, too.
Tom was late.
I didn't want to worry her.
I want a pair of gloves.
He established the firm.
Tom shot him.
I caught a mouse.
Tom is tense.
Tom fired me.
It was sad.
I'll see Tom.
I called Tom.
We'll walk.
Is he in love with you?
Is she in love with you?
Is he in love with you? "I don't know."
Is he in love with you?
Is she in love with you?
Is he in love with you? "I don't know."
This table is expensive.
No matter what happens, keep moving.
She finds reading boring.
He got a D.
Let's walk.
Let's walk.
Wake Tom up.
Wake Tom up.
Tom saw her.
Tom saw him.
Did you see Tom?
Did you see Tom?
Did you see them?
Did you see them?
Did you see him?
Did you see him?
Did you see her?
Did you see her?
Tom shot me.
It burned.
It burned.
It burned.
Go with Tom.
Go with Tom.
Go with Tom.
Share your story with us.
Share your story with us.
Tom Jackson has been elected mayor.
It's open.
Contact Tom.
Do you know why Tom killed himself?
Do you know why Tom killed himself?
Do you know why Tom killed himself?
Do you know why Tom killed himself?
Tom had no choice but to stay.
Tom had no choice but to stay.
We have to get Tom out of there.
You were Tom's only friend.
I told you not to call me Tom, didn't I?
I told you not to call me Tom, didn't I?
I was very surprised.
I stayed with Tom.
Tom walked.
Tom walked.
Forget Tom.
Follow Tom.
Follow Tom.
Follow Tom.
Follow Tom.
Let Tom go.
Let Tom go.
Tom bowed.
Tom walks.
Catch Tom.
Catch Tom.
Catch Tom.
Watch Tom.
After a week, we received a letter from Tom's sister.
Ask for Tom.
Ask Tom.
Is it true that you had a fight with Tom?
Did you know there was a secret passage hidden behind the bookcase?
Did you know there was a secret passage hidden behind the bookcase?
Tom's parents came home early.
She was ironing her dress.
How many coins did you give me?
How many coins did you give me?
Tom is very neat.
Tom shared his bedroom with his younger brother.
Tom's house has a green roof.
Tom's house has a green roof.
Why are cooks fat?
Were you able to convince Tom to do that?
Were you able to convince Tom to do that?
Where do you have lunch?
I'm not as naive as you think I am.
I'm not as naive as you think I am.
I don't even know Tom's last name.
We've arrived safely.
Kim arrived back home safely.
Tom arrived back home safely.
Tom arrived at the camp safely.
Tom arrived at the camp safely.
I hope everyone has arrived safely.
We're happy that Tom arrived home safely.
Helen telephoned me that she had arrived in London safely.
I was relieved to hear that you had arrived safely.
His family was glad to hear that he had arrived safely.
Tom told me to tell you that he appreciates everything you've done for him.
That's where I met Tom.
I forgot to tip the waiter.
Why are you wearing a mask?
Why are you wearing a mask?
I talked Tom into doing that.
I went to the beach.
My brother ended up becoming a priest.
I'm bigger than Tom.
I'll make a copy for you.
I'll make a copy for you.
I usually wake up early.
I bought some rice.
I sometimes break the rules.
I hid in the attic.
Tom was a diplomat.
I'll need surgery.
Tom is a historian.
I often work late.
I hid in the closet.
I'm not a singer.
You look scared.
You look scared.
You look scared.
I rarely get angry.
The squirrel ate all the nuts.
I'm going to buy a toy for the child.
They're sleeping like babies.
Did Tom surrender?
Did you just hit Tom?
Did you ever call Tom?
Did you ever meet Tom?
Did you ever date Tom?
Did they ever find Tom?
Did you meet Tom there?
Did you ever catch Tom?
Did you do that to Tom?
Did you find Tom or not?
Did you really kiss Tom?
Did you break up with Tom?
Did you get this from Tom?
Did you notice Tom's hair?
Did you buy these for Tom?
Did you return Tom's books?
Did you try to talk to Tom?
Did you intend to kill Tom?
Did you see Tom last night?
Did you learn that from Tom?
Did you invite Tom to dinner?
Did they do something to Tom?
Did Tom have any suggestions?
Did you get a reply from Tom?
Did you say Tom was murdered?
Did you tell Tom I was joking?
I dried the dishes.
I dried the dishes.
I blamed myself.
I was very tense.
I was the winner.
I won't be fired.
I need a helmet.
Tom stopped me from doing that.
People say that I look like Tom.
I want to stop Tom from doing that.
I made a bookcase.
Tom said I looked surprised.
I opened the gate.
Tom opened the gate.
The gate was open.
The gate is open.
The gate was left open.
Tom pushed the gate open.
Tom left the gate open.
I was found guilty.
I ran a red light.
I ran a red light.
The plane had already left the airport.
I rushed upstairs.
Tom has denied the allegation.
Did I ever tell you about Tom?
Did you want to meet with Tom?
Did that really happen to Tom?
Did Tom really dance with you?
Did you really do that to Tom?
Did Tom make it back all right?
Did you ask Tom what was wrong?
Did you write down Tom's number?
Did you speak to Tom about this?
Did you get in a fight with Tom?
Did you even get to talk to Tom?
Did you have a fun day with Tom?
Did you ask Tom why he was late?
Did you get the papers from Tom?
Did Tom have a problem with that?
Did you get that ticket from Tom?
Did you really see Tom yesterday?
Did you and Tom have an argument?
Did you and Tom have an argument?
Did you go and see Tom last night?
Did you have a good time with Tom?
Did you know Tom was dealing drugs?
Did you see the look on Tom's face?
Did you borrow Tom's car yesterday?
Did you know what Tom's plans were?
Did Tom tell you that he'd be late?
Did Tom give any other instructions?
Did you manage to get a hold of Tom?
Did you ever talk to Tom about this?
I started singing.
I started working.
I can't be fired.
I tossed the ball to Tom.
There's a chance that Tom is here in the park somewhere.
I'll be extra careful.
I tried to resist.
I took this photo.
The difference is substantial.
He was a descendant of Julius Caesar.
I like Tom's jokes.
I made Tom do that.
You seem to be bored.
You seem to be bored.
I also have a motorcycle.
I also have a motorcycle.
Tom doesn't eat fruit very often.
Tom's mother is older than mine.
You're our best player.
I am playing the guitar now.
I think I'm a good coach.
I left without Tom.
I left without Tom.
We've hardly seen each other lately.
I didn't blame Tom.
He refused my offer to drive him home.
Did you hear about Tom's resignation?
Did you say Tom was going to be late?
Did Tom really drink a glass of wine?
Did you warn Tom not to open that box?
Did Tom ever tell you why he was late?
Did you get a chance to talk with Tom?
Did you ask Tom what he meant by that?
Did you ask Tom to come over and help?
Did you and Tom have an argument today?
Did you even know that his name was Tom?
Did you ever ask Tom to stop doing that?
Did you spend the entire morning with Tom?
Did Tom get hurt in the accident yesterday?
Did you manage to convince Tom to help you?
Did you see anyone else other than Tom last night?
Did the newspaper article say how fast Tom was driving?
Did you know that Tom's grandfather died of a heart attack?
Which beach do you like to go to?
I bet you're talking about Tom.
Tom and I work in the same office.
I hid myself behind the couch.
I crushed the can.
Tom wants to become a diplomat.
I bought a new schoolbag today.
Can Tom make it? He can't? Well, that's unfortunate.
I did it for free.
I didn't get hurt.
I wasn't punished.
I made Tom eat it.
I made Tom eat it.
I won the contest.
I told Tom a joke.
I went out to eat.
I dropped the cup.
I manage a hotel.
I manage a hotel.
I needed surgery.
I gave Tom a wink.
I pleaded guilty.
Tom has agreed to plead guilty.
I believed in Tom.
I screamed again.
This mouse has stopped working.
How many bikes do you have?
Don't take presents from strangers.
I'll forgive Tom.
I'm avoiding Tom.
I ride a bicycle to school every day.
Be nice to Tom.
Be nicer to Tom.
I'm nice to Tom.
That's up to Tom.
Talk to Tom again.
Stay close to Tom.
Go to Tom's house.
I was mean to Tom.
I was nice to Tom.
Let us talk to Tom.
Go and talk to Tom.
May I speak to Tom?
Please talk to Tom.
Don't speak to Tom.
It's all up to Tom.
I'll be good to Tom.
I'm indebted to Tom.
I was unkind to Tom.
I was polite to Tom.
I won't talk to Tom.
I talk to Tom a lot.
I can't speak to Tom.
I have to get to Tom.
I should talk to Tom.
I'll get this to Tom.
Pay attention to Tom.
People listen to Tom.
This is important to Tom.
I mentioned it to Tom.
I love talking to Tom.
Would you talk to Tom?
Let me go talk to Tom.
I went to Tom's house.
Stop listening to Tom.
We had to talk to Tom.
I kept talking to Tom.
What would happen if I never brushed my teeth?
Stay with Tom now.
I wasn't with Tom.
I roomed with Tom.
I'm alone with Tom.
I checked with Tom.
I'll deal with Tom.
I carpool with Tom.
Let me go with Tom.
That's OK with Tom.
Please go with Tom.
I'm angry with Tom.
I'm riding with Tom.
I do agree with Tom.
I'm fed up with Tom.
I can come with Tom.
I can ride with Tom.
Will you go with Tom?
Let's start with Tom.
I didn't go with Tom.
I've had it with Tom.
I met with Tom today.
I should be with Tom.
I met with Tom again.
I'm friends with Tom.
Let me deal with Tom.
Shake hands with Tom.
I had a chat with Tom.
Don't go out with Tom.
Don't go out with Tom.
I love being with Tom.
I'm not done with Tom.
I have to go with Tom.
I have to go with Tom.
I didn't come with Tom.
I had to deal with Tom.
I spoke with Tom today.
I was with Tom all day.
How did it go with Tom?
I'm with Tom right now.
I never agree with Tom.
Don't be angry with Tom.
Don't hang out with Tom.
I have to deal with Tom.
I have to deal with Tom.
I love arguing with Tom.
I'll set it up with Tom.
Why aren't you with Tom?
What'll you do with Tom?
What was wrong with Tom?
I used to live with Tom.
You never know with Tom.
I came to talk with Tom.
I'd like to be with Tom.
I used to play with Tom.
You should sit with Tom.
Try to keep up with Tom.
I feel relaxed with Tom.
I have no beef with Tom.
I share a room with Tom.
I share a room with Tom.
I'm glad I was with Tom.
Just be careful with Tom.
I've never seen Tom so busy.
I got really sick.
I had a lot to do.
I'm the one who caught Tom.
I'm the one who caught Tom.
I'm the one who saved Tom.
I'm the one who should apologize.
I'm the one who killed Tom.
I'm the one who has your helmet.
I'm the one who painted this picture.
I'm the one who broke that window.
I'm the one who taught Tom French.
I'm the one who broke that window.
I'm the one who made Tom quit smoking.
I'm the one who should be thanking Tom.
I'm the one who convinced Tom to join the army.
I'm the one who convinced Tom to join the army.
I've made a complaint.
I've made a complaint.
Tom is a very frank person.
I want to follow you wherever you're going.
I'm mad.
I'm neat.
I'm neat.
I'm numb.
I'm numb.
I'm sober.
I'm naive.
I'm naive.
I'm sleepy.
I'm guilty.
I'm skinny.
I'm skinny.
Tom has it.
Tom has it.
Tom has it.
I almost got fired.
I want a bicycle.
I thanked Tom.
I greeted everyone.
I didn't stay long.
I didn't stay long.
I wouldn't give up if I were you.
The problem is in that it's too expensive.
I jumped overboard.
I'm not your patient.
You look very tense.
I know Tom's family.
I know Tom's family.
I'm at the office.
I'm here for Tom.
Look out for Tom.
It's easy for Tom.
We're here for Tom.
I felt bad for Tom.
I was happy for Tom.
It was hard for Tom.
This is all for Tom.
This one is for Tom.
Do your best for Tom.
I'll wait up for Tom.
Keep looking for Tom.
I'll keep it for Tom.
I didn't send for Tom.
I bought this for Tom.
Should I wait for Tom?
I had to wait for Tom.
Should we wait for Tom?
I didn't do it for Tom.
I'll come back for Tom.
Things got bad for Tom.
I'd do anything for Tom.
Are you looking for Tom?
Are you waiting for Tom?
You're too good for Tom.
I couldn't wait for Tom.
Do what you can for Tom.
It was too much for Tom.
Can I wait for Tom here?
We didn't do it for Tom.
I fear for Tom's safety.
I paid for Tom's ticket.
I had high hopes for Tom.
I'm really excited for Tom.
I did everything for Tom.
I'm just looking for Tom.
I'm here looking for Tom.
I waited outside for Tom.
Look what I made for Tom.
Were you looking for Tom?
I've never cared for Tom.
Don't feel sorry for Tom.
I always do that for Tom.
I looked all over for Tom.
This is difficult for Tom.
I'd never do that for Tom.
I'll pay for Tom's ticket.
I have no respect for Tom.
If I'd only read the contract more carefully!
How long will you remain in Athens? "Until Sunday."
I stayed close to Tom.
I'm very close to Tom.
I can't do this to Tom.
Don't even talk to Tom.
Didn't you talk to Tom?
I'd better talk to Tom.
I tried to talk to Tom.
I'm not related to Tom.
Why not go talk to Tom?
We went to Tom's house.
I'll mention it to Tom.
I sent an email to Tom.
I can't talk to Tom now.
I'll go and talk to Tom.
Do you ever talk to Tom?
I was very close to Tom.
It didn't matter to Tom.
Please say hello to Tom.
Don't be so mean to Tom.
I sat right next to Tom.
I saw you talking to Tom.
Let's go to Tom's office.
It doesn't matter to Tom.
I'm trying to get to Tom.
I'm headed over to Tom's.
I frequently talk to Tom.
You can't do that to Tom.
You should listen to Tom.
What was the matter with Tom?
Maybe we can talk to Tom.
I'll let you talk to Tom.
Do you talk to Tom a lot?
Do I have to talk to Tom?
Can I please talk to Tom?
I spoke to Tom yesterday.
We'll speak to Tom later.
I've never been to Tom's.
Why do you listen to Tom?
I'd never do that with Tom.
You talked to Tom, right?
You must not talk to Tom.
I enjoyed talking to Tom.
I don't speak to Tom now.
Who's been talking to Tom?
He loves listening to classical music.
There are many stars in the universe that are larger than the sun.
It's a mad world.
I'm Tom's younger sister.
I study psychology in Baku State University.
They missed a good chance.
My neighbors are French.
Don't get rough with Tom.
I had a meeting with Tom.
I've been angry with Tom.
I have business with Tom.
I'm not leaving with Tom.
I'm going to go with Tom.
I was with Tom last week.
I have to agree with Tom.
I went swimming with Tom.
Are you staying with Tom?
What's the deal with Tom?
How is it going with Tom?
Nothing's wrong with Tom.
Why do you stay with Tom?
There's someone with Tom.
I was impressed with Tom.
I loved talking with Tom.
You can't reason with Tom.
I actually agree with Tom.
I want you to go with Tom.
Why don't you go with Tom?
I didn't do that with Tom.
I have a meeting with Tom.
I need some time with Tom.
I should've been with Tom.
I should've gone with Tom.
I'm sitting here with Tom.
I'll deal with Tom myself.
Give me a minute with Tom.
Do I have to eat with Tom?
Will you help me with Tom?
I went to school with Tom.
Why don't I stay with Tom?
What's your plan with Tom?
What's your deal with Tom?
So how did it go with Tom?
I get along well with Tom.
I thought I'd go with Tom.
You agree with Tom, right?
I never disagree with Tom.
You need to meet with Tom.
I can't catch up with Tom.
I might go there with Tom.
I sat at the bar with Tom.
What's the matter with Tom?
No one would meet with Tom.
I'm happy to ride with Tom.
Something's wrong with Tom.
I had a long talk with Tom.
I had an argument with Tom.
I happen to agree with Tom.
I've got business with Tom.
I just had a talk with Tom.
I'm going to stay with Tom.
I'm going to deal with Tom.
I went to college with Tom.
I was with Tom for an hour.
Stay with Tom in this room.
That's my problem with Tom.
Why didn't you go with Tom?
Why don't you sit with Tom?
How do you put up with Tom?
Did you ever work with Tom?
I watched a movie with Tom.
I'm not impressed with Tom.
I wish I could go with Tom.
I stay in contact with Tom.
I enjoyed my time with Tom.
I generally agree with Tom.
I can't be friends with Tom.
I don't want to go with Tom.
I want you to ride with Tom.
Is something wrong with Tom?
I asked Tom to drive.
I made Tom go there.
I made Tom go there.
Such is life in Russia.
I'm Tom's stepfather.
You're a great coach.
You're a great coach.
It got cold after sunset.
I don't care much for Tom.
I want to be there for Tom.
I want you to look for Tom.
Why don't you look for Tom?
I've got a message for Tom.
I'll be back for Tom later.
I was just looking for Tom.
Do we need to wait for Tom?
We have to go back for Tom.
You're not too old for Tom.
What would be best for Tom?
I'd better go look for Tom.
They'll be looking for Tom.
We want to be here for Tom.
We should be happy for Tom.
Should I wait for Tom here?
Why are we waiting for Tom?
Stay here and wait for Tom.
I feel no sympathy for Tom.
I built a bookcase for Tom.
We're still looking for Tom.
I'm genuinely happy for Tom.
I came here looking for Tom.
I have a small gift for Tom.
I have to wait here for Tom.
I searched all over for Tom.
We were all rooting for Tom.
We'll help you look for Tom.
Why are you working for Tom?
It hasn't been easy for Tom.
Is that good or bad for Tom?
We're going to wait for Tom.
Why are you looking for Tom?
I actually feel bad for Tom.
That was no problem for Tom.
I'm supposed to wait for Tom.
Don't feel too sorry for Tom.
I don't work for Tom anymore.
You need to be there for Tom.
We must do something for Tom.
I'll always be there for Tom.
This has been a tough week for Tom.
Shouldn't we go look for Tom?
Why were you looking for Tom?
They'll come looking for Tom.
It's just big enough for Tom.
I've done what I can for Tom.
Are we still waiting for Tom?
We'll do what's best for Tom.
You should watch out for Tom.
Are you still working for Tom?
I have a package here for Tom.
I've been out looking for Tom.
I have to wait for Tom's call.
I know you're working for Tom.
I'm looking for Tom right now.
I'm going to look for Tom now.
Thanks for doing that for Tom.
How long did you work for Tom?
All we can do is wait for Tom.
There is a place for Tom here.
Do you feel sorry for Tom yet?
I actually feel sorry for Tom.
I should've been there for Tom.
I'm going to wait here for Tom.
I'm concerned for Tom's safety.
We've done what we can for Tom.
I'm going back to look for Tom.
That's not good enough for Tom.
Why didn't you go back for Tom?
Whose idea was it to fire us?
Whose idea was it to fire us?
That's a Greek name.
I almost always walk to work.
Tom doesn't have a telephone.
The next train to the airport departs from platform 2.
He was mauled by a bear.
This is the most beautiful sunset that I have ever seen.
I'm waiting for the waiter.
They ate caviar and drank champagne.
I missed you. "I missed you too."
Tom has a black belt in Taekwondo.
Tom wiped the sweat off his face.
I taught Tom French.
I broke three dishes.
Tom often suffers from headaches.
Americans pay both federal taxes and state taxes.
Something's wrong with Tom's car.
You shouldn't have let this happen.
The guests ate all the nuts.
I don't want to worry her.
I don't want to worry him.
But what if he says no?
But what if she says no?
The prosecution could not prove which of the twins had committed the crime.
Pick Tom up from school today.
Do you want me to pick up Tom after school?
Do you want me to pick up Tom after school?
Do you want me to pick up Tom after school?
Do you want me to pick up Tom after school?
I drew a picture of a spaceship.
I went back to bed after I talked to Tom on the phone.
I'm a little homesick.
I could've drowned.
I gave up too soon.
I almost killed Tom.
I almost killed Tom.
I threw the ball.
I took a picture.
Tom's car isn't in the garage.
Tom's flight has been delayed.
I am repulsed by money.
Why don't we take a break?
Why don't we invite Tom to dinner?
Why don't we just cancel the meeting?
Why don't we take a short break?
Why don't you ever talk to Tom?
Why don't you take a break, Tom?
Why don't you wear that hat anymore?
Why don't you take a break, Jim?
Why don't you ask Tom to help you?
Why don't you just fire him?
Why don't you just fire him?
Why don't you just fire him?
Why don't you just fire him?
Why don't you just fire her?
Why don't you just fire her?
Why don't you just fire her?
Why don't you just fire her?
Where do you usually buy your shoes?
Where do you usually buy your shoes?
Tom's idea seemed good to me.
Tom's wife is a teacher.
Tom is easily offended.
Tom's dog is missing.
Tom's dog is missing.
Tom's cup is empty.
Leave the documents in my office.
Leave the documents in my office.
This game is really boring.
Tom's truck has been stolen.
Tom's room isn't very clean.
Tom's idea seems good to me.
Tom's French is pretty good.
Tom's wife died last week.
The eagle flew away.
You can take off the bandage tomorrow.
You can take off the bandage tomorrow.
Push all the desks back against the walls.
Push all the desks back against the walls.
There was a storm last night.
When Tom found out the truth, he was furious.
When Tom found out the truth, he was furious.
He shot her.
You shot her.
You shot her.
You shot him.
You shot him.
What does this have to do with what I was saying about Tom?
How did you manage to convince Tom?
How did you manage to convince Tom?
How did you manage to convince Tom?
How did you manage to convince Tom?
Were you able to convince Tom?
Were you able to convince Tom?
Were you able to convince Tom?
Were you able to convince Tom?
Tom's parents are missing.
I love Tom with my whole heart.
You swore that you loved me.
You swore that you loved me.
I left Tom.
I think I shouldn't make a decision without consulting Tom.
Mushrooms and plants belong to different kingdoms.
This organism can survive in outer space.
Something is stuck in the pipe.
It was the window that Tom broke yesterday.
I'm retired.
I'm careful.
I'm careful.
I'm frantic.
I'm frantic.
I'm popular.
I'm popular.
I'm up here.
I'm a pilot.
I'm resigning.
I'm grateful.
I'm decisive.
I'm decisive.
I'm escaping.
I'm not dumb.
I'm not dumb.
I'm not hurt.
I'm in a jam.
Tom and I don't talk much.
Tom and I don't talk much.
I'm Tom's ex-wife's husband.
I never spoke to Tom again.
Do you know how long I've been waiting for Tom?
He was satisfied with the horse's name.
I'm not Tom's father.
I saw Tom there with another woman.
The pursuit of wealth does not interest me.
The light suddenly went out.
How did you convince Tom to give you so much money?
How did you convince Tom to give you so much money?
How did you convince Tom to give you so much money?
How did you convince Tom to give you so much money?
Tom plans to buy a new bicycle.
I've been very pleased with Tom's work.
It's an oak tree.
It's a birch tree.
We can't let this ruin our friendship.
Tom says he can communicate with the dead.
Since she was married to an English teacher, she could learn English for free.
How do you know how much money Tom has?
How do you know how much money Tom has?
I hope you aren't getting bored.
I hope you aren't getting bored.
He came to Rome to study Italian.
We've had complaints from our neighbors.
We've had complaints from our neighbors.
Tom says he has plenty of time.
Tom seems to have good hearing.
How long will Tom be staying?
Tom broke a window yesterday.
All of my books are digital.
I'm angry with Tom for what he's done.
I'd really like to know why Tom isn't here today.
How can we avoid that problem?
How can we avoid that problem?
I thought Tom didn't have a driver's license yet.
I wonder what inspired Tom to do that.
I wonder what inspired Tom to do that.
Tom still has a long way to go.
You'll ruin your dress.
I haven't heard you play the guitar in a long time.
My uncle made me serve as interpreter.
She has been dumb since birth.
I keep thinking about Tom.
This is utter nonsense.
You are beginning to annoy me.
I like that purple shirt.
Is there any butter in the refrigerator?
I have a complaint.
I have a complaint.
Italian was the only foreign language that Dan knew.
Can you read IPA symbols?
I'm a priest.
I'm a busboy.
I'm a dancer.
I'm a singer.
I'm educated.
I'm educated.
I'm too late.
I'm too late.
I'm objective.
I'm objective.
I'm convinced.
I'm available.
I'm available.
I'm not stuck.
I'm not stuck.
I'm in a gang.
Now I'm angry.
Do you know who the Japanese ambassador to France is?
It took three weeks to demolish the old house.
I'd never leave Tom alone.
I'd never leave Tom alone.
I was waving a flag.
I was waving a flag.
The papers that were in the safe are gone.
How did you talk Tom into helping you?
How did you talk Tom into helping you?
How did Tom get you to help him?
How did Tom get you to help him?
We should invite Tom over for dinner.
How did you convince Tom not to leave?
How did you convince Tom not to leave?
How did you convince Tom not to leave?
How did you convince Tom not to leave?
I was on the point of giving up when I suddenly hit upon the solution.
You shouldn't have let this happen.
You shouldn't have let this happen.
Tom wasn't forced to do that.
I ate lunch at home.
I noticed a pattern.
I was waving a flag.
I wasn't mad at you.
I turned the tap on.
I thanked them both.
I understand Tom.
I hope this nice weather will last.
I want to earn a lot of money.
I have a lawyer.
That's no way to talk about Tom.
Tom ran a half-marathon.
We never got a chance to talk to Tom.
We never got a chance to talk to Tom.
She needs a kidney transplant.
Please sit down for a minute.
Please sit down for a minute.
These shoes are way too small for me.
I can do magic tricks.
Did you know I'm French?
I only eat fruit.
I only eat fruit.
Is that candy?
I need new gloves.
I want to be independent.
I need a kidney transplant.
He needs a kidney transplant.
The children are asleep upstairs.
Tom's car was repossessed.
It's just going to take time.
Tom will make you happy.
I would have drowned if you hadn't saved me.
I would have drowned if you hadn't saved me.
It's an American accent.
It's a British accent.
I don't recall asking for your opinion.
We must protect the environment.
I detest people who tell lies.
What do I have to be grateful for?
What do you have to be grateful for?
What do you have to be grateful for?
Wealth and health go hand in hand.
I prefer knowledge to wealth.
She's got a cute accent.
He's got a cute accent.
Are you a magician?
He's a magician.
He's a man of flesh and blood.
There's no getting away from that.
Where is the cash register?
I've been shopping with Tom.
I'd hoped to speak with Tom.
You're with Tom, aren't you?
I'll have to check with Tom.
I was just talking with Tom.
I thought you were with Tom.
I thought you left with Tom.
What's the problem with Tom?
There's no problem with Tom.
Is there a problem with Tom?
I'll swim with Tom tomorrow.
You need to go with Tom now.
Can we have a word with Tom?
Why are we dealing with Tom?
I share everything with Tom.
I share everything with Tom.
We should be there with Tom.
I've worked with Tom before.
I'm real impressed with Tom.
I had a great time with Tom.
Last week I met up with Tom.
I went to a concert with Tom.
I just wanted to be with Tom.
I can try reasoning with Tom.
I knew I'd find you with Tom.
I'm having problems with Tom.
I'm at the hospital with Tom.
I wish you could go with Tom.
I was having dinner with Tom.
Were you with Tom that night?
We'll meet up with Tom later.
I went to the beach with Tom.
I need to stay here with Tom.
I don't want to eat with Tom.
Just sit over there with Tom.
What's the big deal with Tom?
Can I have a moment with Tom?
Could I have a word with Tom?
Do you have classes with Tom?
Is anyone out there with Tom?
I'll try to keep up with Tom.
I spent the weekend with Tom.
I'm familiar with Tom's work.
I joke with Tom all the time.
I lived with Tom for a while.
Whose dog is playing with Tom?
I can't deal with Tom anymore.
I thought you'd gone with Tom.
Do you want to leave with Tom?
I've been in contact with Tom.
I haven't spoken with Tom yet.
I haven't spoken with Tom yet.
I've tried to reason with Tom.
I share an apartment with Tom.
I share an apartment with Tom.
You should've stayed with Tom.
I'm not having lunch with Tom.
I won't discuss this with Tom.
I was with Tom this afternoon.
Tell me what's wrong with Tom.
Are you going to sit with Tom?
I'm not sharing this with Tom.
You don't have to go with Tom.
I spent all day home with Tom.
How did your date go with Tom?
How are things going with Tom?
Do you want me to go with Tom?
I'm not sure I agree with Tom.
Let me have a minute with Tom.
I think we should go with Tom.
Why did you break up with Tom?
I have plans with Tom tonight.
You agree with Tom, don't you?
Nobody likes to work with Tom.
Do you keep in touch with Tom?
Do you keep in touch with Tom?
I like to play music with Tom.
I used to play music with Tom.
I want to spend time with Tom.
I love playing music with Tom.
The grass isn't green enough.
There aren't enough bushes.
English has many Greek words.
Where did you take your gloves off?
Learning languages is my passion.
I'm trying to write a poem.
It's a Greek word.
Who's the greatest composer of all time?
The sky is orange.
My Italian is terrible.
My Italian is terrible.
I tore up the paper.
I tore up the contract.
The smell of the roses filled the whole room.
I like my bike.
I have awful handwriting.
You were thinking about Tom. "I was not! I was thinking about work."
This is extremely hard for Tom.
I think we should wait for Tom.
We're supposed to wait for Tom.
I feel sorry for Tom's parents.
No one should feel bad for Tom.
Things were going well for Tom.
You waited for Tom, didn't you?
Somebody has to be here for Tom.
I just want what's best for Tom.
I had to wait for Tom to finish.
I have an errand for Tom to run.
Everyone laughed except for Tom.
You're not just working for Tom.
This is quite difficult for Tom.
We're waiting for Tom to return.
I think it's impossible for Tom.
I thought you'd be happy for Tom.
What are you going to do for Tom?
They're all drunk except for Tom.
I would've done the same for Tom.
How long have you worked for Tom?
I waited for Tom for a long time.
Let's stop here and wait for Tom.
Do you really feel sorry for Tom?
I'm going to keep looking for Tom.
I'm going to keep looking for Tom.
Praying for Tom is all you can do.
Maybe we'd better go look for Tom.
This has been quite a day for Tom.
Let's not wait for Tom any longer.
That should be no problem for Tom.
It must've been difficult for Tom.
Do you really want to wait for Tom?
I have a package in my car for Tom.
Everybody was there except for Tom.
Do you actually feel sorry for Tom?
When did you start working for Tom?
I might be able to do that for Tom.
Is there any more we can do for Tom?
Someone just came in asking for Tom.
A lot of people are waiting for Tom.
We're getting ready for Tom's visit.
I've been waiting for Tom since 2:30.
We've done everything we can for Tom.
There's a package for Tom on my desk.
You don't need to feel sorry for Tom.
I bring my phone with me everywhere.
It's a Polish name.
It's an Italian name.
It's a Korean name.
I am in favor of the death penalty.
What are you planting?
What are you planting?
I need more seeds.
The atomic bomb completely destroyed Hiroshima.
Was it Jack that broke the window?
How many bicycles do you have?
How many bicycles do you have?
I don't know what accent that is.
There's a hole in the roof.
You are such a boring person.
You are such a boring person.
This place is so boring.
What accent is that?
How many lives have you ruined?
How many lives have you ruined?
Are you still mad at me?
Tell them I'm in the office.
Tell them I'm in the office.
Did you have a fight with Tom?
I was very impressed with Tom.
It was great working with Tom.
I went out for lunch with Tom.
Are you still working with Tom?
You should be careful with Tom.
I know you're working with Tom.
I saw you with Tom last Monday.
I should get in touch with Tom.
I spent all yesterday with Tom.
I'm seriously annoyed with Tom.
I'm inclined to agree with Tom.
Were you with Tom that evening?
Do you have a problem with Tom?
Is that what happened with Tom?
What exactly happened with Tom?
You're staying with Tom, right?
I'm friends with Tom's brother.
I'm going to hang out with Tom.
We should be fighting with Tom.
Could I have a second with Tom?
I think I'd better go with Tom.
I can only discuss it with Tom.
Clearly, you're angry with Tom.
Were you with Tom when he died?
I wonder what's wrong with Tom.
I have to check with Tom first.
You don't have to sit with Tom.
There's a young woman with Tom.
I still keep in touch with Tom.
Surprisingly, I agree with Tom.
You should be at home with Tom.
I'm going to go there with Tom.
We used to be friends with Tom.
I agree with Tom on this issue.
I never ever disagree with Tom.
The kids love playing with Tom.
I am on speaking terms with Tom.
You'd better not argue with Tom.
I don't want to go out with Tom.
Why don't you just sit with Tom?
I can't deal with Tom right now.
I do a lot of business with Tom.
I have a meeting with Tom today.
I have to get in touch with Tom.
I rode home with Tom last night.
I spoke with Tom this afternoon.
I'm going to stay here with Tom.
I won't be coming back with Tom.
You need to spend time with Tom.
It's time I had a talk with Tom.
Can't you get in touch with Tom?
I was impressed with Tom's work.
I'm working with Tom these days.
Do you mind if I speak with Tom?
Why aren't you friends with Tom?
Have you tried talking with Tom?
Why don't you hang out with Tom?
I have learned to work with Tom.
You should be home with Tom now.
Why do we have to work with Tom?
I used to go to school with Tom.
How long did you speak with Tom?
I often have arguments with Tom.
I thought you had plans with Tom.
Something's wrong with Tom's car.
I just don't want to go with Tom.
I want to speak with Tom, please.
I've worked with Tom a long time.
I lived with Tom for three years.
He is a smart little guy.
Say you're sorry. "I won't."
The rooster crows at sunrise.
It's no use talking to me.
The floor was covered with dust.
Could you drive Tom home?
I felt responsible for Tom's accident.
You think I work for Tom, but I don't.
Could you make a copy of this for Tom?
We're still waiting for Tom to arrive.
I don't think we need to wait for Tom.
We waited for Tom, but he didn't come.
I expect I'll have to do that for Tom.
I waited all day for Tom to come back.
I'm sure I'll find a good gift for Tom.
I told you we should've waited for Tom.
You're not responsible for Tom anymore.
I'll be waiting for Tom until 6 o'clock.
I can't be responsible for Tom's safety.
That obviously wasn't a problem for Tom.
I think we'd better go and look for Tom.
I've been all over town looking for Tom.
We wasted a lot of time looking for Tom.
I'll be the one waiting for Tom, not you.
I thought you were going to wait for Tom.
I'm not going to wait for Tom any longer.
I don't know anyone here, except for Tom.
I thought the police were looking for Tom.
I stopped working for Tom three years ago.
You were there for Tom when he needed you.
I've been waiting for Tom for a long time.
We waited all afternoon for Tom to arrive.
Except for Tom, I didn't know anyone there.
Are you sure you don't want to wait for Tom?
Things have been pretty rough lately for Tom.
I was looking for Tom, but he found me first.
I'm looking for Tom. Do you know where he is?
All I want is a chance to do something for Tom.
I looked all over for Tom, but couldn't find him.
I thought you were going to quit working for Tom.
I got tired of waiting for Tom, so I went on home.
These shoes are obviously not large enough for Tom.
We waited all afternoon for Tom, but he never came.
Everybody in the family wore glasses except for Tom.
We can't thank you enough for all you've done for Tom.
If you don't want to do it for Tom, then do it for me.
I thought it was really nice of you to do that for Tom.
I'm looking for Tom. You don't know where he is, do you?
I want to be certain that we're doing what's best for Tom.
Were you planning to do something special for Tom's birthday?
If you really need a job, why don't you consider working for Tom?
Don't you think this computer game may be a little too difficult for Tom?
Wait for Tom.
Pray for Tom.
I just moved to town.
I go to the beach as often as I can.
Don't wipe your nose on your sleeve.
Tom may be a few minutes late.
Humans are born every second.
Babies are born every second.
Let's give up.
I'm the head coach.
I'm very impatient.
I'm very impatient.
Do you smell gas?
I will not say I'm sorry.
They refuse to say they're sorry.
She refuses to say she's sorry.
He refuses to say he's sorry.
Say you're sorry. "I won't."
I don't plan to stay for very long.
Why was Tom left there alone?
How much money do you think Tom has in the bank?
How much money do you think Tom has in the bank?
I can understand Tom's decision.
I asked Tom why he had never gotten married.
Don't get left behind.
I've seen Tom on TV many times.
I don't worry about Tom anymore.
Tom told us he loved skiing.
Tom told us he loved skiing.
You won't be able to talk Tom into helping you.
You won't be able to talk Tom into helping you.
I'll make something for you to eat.
I'll make something for you to eat.
I want you to teach Tom how to drive.
I want you to teach Tom how to drive.
I want you to teach Tom how to drive.
I want you to teach Tom how to drive.
No country should interfere in another country's internal affairs.
Please add Tom to the list.
Tom can't cross the border.
I think it's cool.
We've been friends for thirty years.
We've been close friends for many years.
I need information about Tom.
No one survived the crash.
I shot Tom.
Everyone knows that you hit Tom.
I don't know Tom's number.
Why are we listening to Tom?
I'm expecting a call from Tom.
It's important that you share your pain.
It's difficult to talk to Tom.
Tom stared at his reflection in the water.
Tom committed suicide yesterday.
I value their opinions.
Tom has decided to resign.
Tom has been released from jail.
That isn't Tom's problem.
How many televisions does Tom have?
How many televisions does Tom have?
I know why you're angry.
Tom is afraid of ghosts.
What do these symbols mean?
I don't know why Tom gave up.
Tom and I have talked about it.
I want to know why you were late.
Tom is cleaning his glasses.
Tom didn't eat lunch with us.
I like being independent.
Tom stuck his fingers in his ears.
It was a positive experience.
Tom was absent from school yesterday.
Why is Tom always having money problems?
Here's an important announcement.
Tom's dog is very big.
I think you're going to survive.
I think you're going to survive.
I used to have a motorcycle.
What percentage of marriages end in divorce?
Tom put all his money in the safe.
I doubt that Tom is guilty.
I forgot to turn off the lights.
Tom and I were very close.
Tom earns three times more than I do.
What were you and Tom doing?
There are some differences.
Tom's patience has run out.
Tom organized the event.
I think we need to take a little break.
I think we need to take a little break.
He made her a bookshelf.
Let's not fool ourselves.
Let's not fool ourselves.
Tell Tom this is hopeless.
Hurry up or you'll be late.
How is the investigation's going?
Are you recording this?
No one could stop Tom.
Tom has no idea how to operate this machine.
I'm trying to stay calm.
Tom changed his email address.
No matter what happens, don't give up.
No matter what happens, don't give up.
I still hate Tom.
I don't support his ideas.
I thought Tom already had his driver's license.
We should consider Tom's suggestion.
I can't believe you're enjoying this.
I can't believe you're enjoying this.
Tom killed himself last October.
Tom is a retired Army colonel.
Tom won't be able to lift that box by himself.
Tom won't be able to lift that box by himself.
We aren't able to defend ourselves.
I love going to the beach.
Tom has been sleeping in my garage.
A bear mauled Tom.
Why didn't you mention this before?
Why didn't you mention this before?
Why didn't you mention this before?
I'm an old friend of Tom's father.
It was a fantastic day.
Aren't you angry?
We can hear the ocean from here.
There was blood on Tom's pillow.
Tom is often in trouble with the law.
She will come back soon to visit us.
Tom parked his car in the garage.
Tom parked his car in the garage.
Her name is of Greek origin.
They said they fired me because I'm fat.
Tom may not have time either.
It took me several hours to reprogram it.
What's the difference between cabbage and lettuce?
What's the difference between cabbage and lettuce?
Women are sincere.
You put in too much pepper.
Learn to trust your instincts.
We won't give up without a fight.
It took me a long time to learn how to do this.
I tried to remain calm.
I tried to remain calm.
They made a perfect couple.
They made a perfect couple.
What are you apologizing for?
What are you apologizing for?
We're just trying to protect you.
My mother takes a bath every other day.
Just be careful with that.
Just be careful with that.
I appreciate your advice.
This newspaper article is more interesting than the previous one.
He is earning twice my salary.
I'm not on Tom's side.
I'm sure you and Tom will be very happy.
I'm sure you and Tom will be very happy.
You're interfering.
You're interfering.
Will you join us for a swim?
Tom's cat had nine kittens.
Tom had a great interest in painting.
I lost three kilograms.
I lost three kilograms.
I'm not yet convinced.
He can run a thousand metres in four minutes.
Who have I offended now?
I participated in the discussion.
I participated in the discussion.
I participated in the discussion.
Don't interrupt people when they are talking.
Don't interrupt people when they are talking.
I brought you something to eat.
We need talented people.
Tom has a personal helicopter.
The answer seems too obvious.
She is busy learning English.
I bought a new notebook and a couple of pencils.
I bought a new notebook and a couple of pencils.
Tom has been looking all over for you.
I don't care how much money you make.
Tom checked his notes.
It's not going to happen to Tom.
I'd like to speak to Tom if I may.
I'd like to speak to Tom if I may.
I didn't call Tom.
I didn't call Tom.
Tom doesn't care what people think.
I'll give you a fair price.
I'll give you a fair price.
Do you recognize that guy?
Do you recognize that guy?
I see someone waving a white flag.
There's snow everywhere.
I politely declined Tom's invitation.
I politely declined Tom's invitation.
Tom lost three games in a row.
She cooks for him every day, but he doesn't appreciate it.
How many years are there in a century?
Tom tried not to make a sound.
My parents want me to study medicine.
My parents want me to study medicine.
I'm going to France to study painting.
I want to know what Tom's blood type is.
The president addressed a large audience.
Tom's parents were asleep when he got home.
I have never seen a red refrigerator.
I'm sure Tom is bored.
I'm sure Tom is bored.
There are several advantages to city life.
I surrendered.
He moved to Istanbul with his wife.
Are you in love with me?
He has over a million dollars in assets.
Tom concealed the fact that he had been in prison.
Tom waved his hand and smiled.
I just spoke to Tom three hours ago.
I'm not going to allow that to happen.
Why didn't you tell me you were in love with her?
Why didn't you tell me you were in love with her?
I just need a big swimming pool.
Tom didn't pray.
Tom had a problem with that.
I wasn't raised that way.
Tom will succeed for sure.
I still haven't forgiven Tom for that.
I still haven't forgiven Tom for that.
I didn't do that alone.
I put the book down and turned on the light.
I put the book down and turned on the light.
I'll put your name on the list.
I'll put your name on the list.
I found my bike behind Tom's house.
Let's ask Tom if he paid his taxes.
The worst was yet to come.
Why do you think Tom was absent yesterday?
Why do you think Tom was absent yesterday?
Tom's family is here.
You're very hard to please.
It's already ten o'clock. My mother must be angry.
I wasn't accusing you of anything.
I wasn't accusing you of anything.
I wasn't accusing you of anything.
I wasn't accusing you of anything.
I don't have enough money to buy a new car.
I usually do my shopping at this supermarket.
I'm not experienced enough.
That's so annoying.
I know you're both angry with me.
They got scared and killed Tom.
You can't hide the fact from her.
You can't hide the fact from her.
You shouldn't be angry.
You shouldn't be angry.
You shouldn't be angry.
I'd better take you to the hospital.
You've got a busy week coming up.
You must have been bored to death.
You must have been bored to death.
I’ll call you before I leave.
I’ll call you before I leave.
I am planting a tree.
Tom is also in the choir.
Tom ignored the remark.
Tom and I walk to school together.
I don't have the money to buy a car.
He is going to buy a new bicycle.
Tom encountered some unexpected problems.
My brother paid double the price.
I had to try to convince Tom.
I had to try to convince Tom.
I want to resign.
How expensive is too expensive?
Do you really think Tom should resign?
He wore a mask so no one would recognize him.
I'll meet Tom there.
Buy one, get one free.
It took him three tries.
How can we end war?
Have you seen Tom's passport?
Have you seen Tom's passport?
Have you seen Tom's passport?
We have no more rice.
I know that isn't Tom's signature.
Here, put these gloves on.
Where did you buy those gloves?
Where did you buy those gloves?
Where did you buy those gloves?
I've got a pretty good idea.
A teacher's salary is less than an attorney's.
This book is very popular among women.
Tom will succeed eventually.
The French flag is blue, white, and red.
I wasn't the one who broke this window.
Tom arrived three hours late.
Is it true that elephants have good memory?
I wish I could play guitar.
Children, wake up!
Somebody attacked her.
How often do you wash the dishes?
Tom was arrested in 2013.
I don't like cars, so I always ride a bike.
What's your French teacher's name?
What's your French teacher's name?
Tom writes and sings his own songs.
I wouldn't talk to Tom anymore if I were you.
We're just high school students.
It'll happen again if you aren't careful.
I wouldn't have been able to do that without Tom's help.
Tom's wife doesn't like it when he smokes in the living room.
I know you're still angry with me.
I know you're still angry with me.
You should have visited Kyoto.
You should have visited Kyoto.
I wouldn't want to live with Tom.
Tom has achieved remarkable results.
I'm going to be late for dinner.
They brought us a basket of fruit.
I put Tom's name on the list.
Tom knows it's hopeless.
Tom apparently lost his passport.
Is Tom still mad?
I'm not suicidal.
I thought Tom didn't have a driver's license.
Tom and I are going for a walk.
How much does ten kilograms of rice cost?
Did you know Tom got arrested three weeks ago?
Did you know Tom got arrested three weeks ago?
Did you know Tom got arrested three weeks ago?
I tried to kill myself three months ago.
I tried to kill myself three months ago.
Tom didn't win the contest.
I'm one of Tom's teachers.
Tom's mother has gotten remarried.
Tom has a steady girlfriend.
I'm braver than Tom.
Tom sells building materials.
Tom broke three windows.
I made the final decision.
I made the final decision.
My father loves to play the guitar.
Tom's car isn't where he parked it.
Tom's car isn't where he parked it.
Tom and I went back to the bar.
He always eats eggs without salt or pepper.
I've gained five kilograms.
I translate, therefore I am.
Do it for Tom.
Do it for Tom.
Don't you threaten me.
They all jumped into the pool.
We know that we're going to lose.
Tom built the doghouse himself.
That doesn't sound too expensive.
Tom earns about three hundred dollars a day.
Let me make you something to eat.
Tom is extremely thankful to Mary for her help.
Tom came in through the window.
Tom came in through the window.
I didn't do what I've been accused of doing.
Tom can't control his emotions.
Tom can't hide from us anymore.
Guess who Tom's French teacher was?
Guess who Tom's French teacher was?
How can I lose three kilograms in a week?
They have no claim to the property.
By the age of 25, she had lived in five different countries.
Fuck you, asshole.
Trust is very difficult to earn, but very easy to lose.
How will you convince Tom to stay?
How will you convince Tom to stay?
Why does Tom get a higher salary than I do?
I think Tom is a very good player.
Why do you know so much about Tom?
Why do you know so much about Tom?
I'd rather starve than steal.
I think he is not Chinese.
I've told you not to call me Tom.
I live in a house that was built in 2013.
That path goes to the mountain.
Spring started indeed.
Their dining room is very spacious.
I would like to retract my previous statement.
I would like to retract my previous statement.
I don't care about your opinion.
Birds fly in packs.
I'm just a little worried about Tom.
The heat was almost unbearable.
Tom has one just like it.
Mary is tall and slender.
Tom's father is sixty-seven years old.
He is a pioneer in this field.
I'm controlling myself not to lose my head.
